Dilation of the penile urethra is described in a male infant with the classic triad of the prune belly syndrome. This dilated penile urethra was not accompanied by obstruction of the urethra proximal or distal to the dilation. Dilation of the penile urethra is a rare feature of the prune belly syndrome and may be part of the same developmental abnormality that affects the remainder of the urinary collecting system.
A 54-year-old man was diagnosed as having prune-belly syndrome, a deficiency of abdominal musculature, cryptorchidism, abnormalities of the urinary tract, and chronic renal failure. The patient was asymptomatic until the diagnosis was made at the age of 54 years; he is one of the oldest living patients to be reported in detail. Recognition of the syndrome in adults with chronic renal failure is important.
The abdominal muscle deficiency syndrome ("prune belly syndrome"), a symptom triad of aplasia of the abdominal wall musculature, malformations of the urinary tract, and cryptorchism, is described from the urologist's point of view, citing nine cases. With modern diagnostic procedures the early detection of the correct diagnosis in the usually very young patients is possible. While the urologic symptomatology is due to the malformations in the urinary tract, the life expectancy depends mainly on the degree of renal function impairment. Combat of infection together with proper operative repairs are the treatments of choice to date. Instrumental procedures should be limited as much as possible. The survival changes following kidney transplantation appear promising.
The second case of successful renal transplantation in a patient with "prune belly" syndrome is reported. In spite of early aggressive surgical approach in the management of this disease terminal renal failure frequently ensues. Hemodialysis and renal transplantation have offered new possibilities of prolonging life in these patients. The success of renal transplantation depends on the anatomic and functional state of the lower urinary tract. Pretransplant urologic examination is extremely important for the evaluation of urinary tract abnormalities.
Patients with prune belly syndrome present a spectrum of abnormality, both in the abdominal wall and the urinary tract. Ureteral pathology has characteristic features and the ureter may be more severely involved at the bladder end than in its upper portion. Early neonatal investigation is required to determine which patient can be treated in a conservative manner and which require neonatal reconstruction or temporary vesical or upper tract drainage.
In the past decade, seven children with the prune-belly syndrome have been seen. Their management has consisted of immediate high tubeless urinary diversion, usually pyelostomy. Thereafter, total reconstruction has been carried out, preferably at one stage. This consists of (1) bilateral shortening, tapering and reimplantation of the ureters, (2) reduction cystoplasty, (3) bilateral orchiopexy, and (4) excision of that part of the abdominal wall that is most redundant and least endowed with musculature. This early effort at mechanical reconstruction has led to gratifying progress in six of the seven children.
The diaphragm muscle (the red muscle) and m. obliquus externus abdominis (the white muscle) were incubated in phosphate buffer at pH 7.4 and 6.8 in the presence of different concentrations of sodium lactate (0, 5, 10 and 30 mM). None of the used lactate concentrations changed significantly glucose uptake by the both muscles at pH 7At pH 6.8 lactate in a concentration of 30 mM decreased significantly glucose uptake by the white muscle. At pH 7.4 glucose uptake by the white muscle was significantly lower than that by the red one in the presence of 10 and 30 mM of sodium lactate while at pH 6.8 in the absence of lactate and in the presence of 5 and 30 mM of lactate. Acidosis affected in smaller degree glucose uptake by the red muscle than by the white one. It may be supposed that the impairement of glucose uptake by acidosis and lactic acid in strenously working skeletal muscles can limit the amount of energy sources available for the muscles. Subsequently, it may be one of the factors limiting the ability of the muscles to continue the exhausting exercise.
Prune-belly syndrome is a rare congenital disease involving a deficiency of abdominal muscles, genitourinary abnormalities, and cryptorchidism. About half of the patients with the disease have associated musculoskeletal abnormalities, including club foot and dislocation of the hip. We saw twelve patients with this disease, four of whom required extensive orthopaedic treatment.
Lateral ventral hernias are found in the spigelian fascia lateral to the junction of the arcuate and semilunar lines and below the level of the umbilicus. Three cases are reported in infants and children. Diagnosis depends on finding an unusual mass on the anterior abdominal wall and palpation of the rim of the hernia defect upon reduction of the mass. A spigelian hernia may be misdiagnosed easily if the examiner is unaware that it can occur in childhood. The edge of the defect must be outlined while the child is straining, prior to induction of anesthesia, as the rim may be difficult to find when the patient is asleep.
Ten patients with prune bell uropathy, including 7 neonates, were treated with extensive surgical tailoring of the upper urinary tracts using primarily the upper ureteral segment. Simultaneous transabdominal orchiopexy, particularly in the neonate, is described as a useful adjunct. Our early results in these patients justify this aggressive approach.
The prune belly syndrome consists of a triad of abdominal wall musculature deficiency, cryptorchidism and urinary tract anomalies. A rarely described but fairly constant component of the syndrome is the lack of development of the epithelial elements of the prostate. We wish to suggest that this is a further expression of a postulated arrest in mesenchymal development responsible for other features of the syndrome.
Eight patients are presented who demonstrate many of the pulmonary complications seen in the prune-belly syndrome. The patients are divided into two major groups: Group I includes pulmonary hypoplasia; Group II includes lobar atelectasis and pneumonia. The etiology, pathogenesis, and radiographic features of these complications are discussed. Pulmonary complications become more important as renal dialysis and transplantation spare more of these patients from an early uremic death. Prompt recognition of the type and the extent of pulmonary disease in patients with the prune-belly syndrome may lead to increased survival.
Fifteen boys with prune belly syndrome cared for over a ten-year period required surgical treatment because of uncontrolled infection and/or progressive azotemia. Five died of renal dysplasia. Primary or staged reconstruction resulted in significant improvement when ureteral reimplantation was combined with tailoring of ureteral caliber.
Thirty cases of prune belly syndrome with no stillborn deaths seen over a twenty-five-year period at a university pediatric hospital are reviewed and the management, findings, and prognosis discussed.
Urodynamic studies were carried out in a 14-year-old boy with Prune Belly Syndrome and terminal renal failure prior and after successful renal transplantation. Increased bladder capacity, nonprovocative detrusor instability and a high compliance were the most characteristic findings during the filling phase of the bladder. During the voiding phase an increased detrusor pressure was demonstrated. Outflow resistance and maximum urinary flow rate were within normal range before and after transplantation. In contrast to the findings before renal transplantation, however, micturition was imbalanced after transplantation (residual urine 100 ml). Urodynamics revealed that the bulging of the posterior urethra, observed in the early voiding phase, was due to a congenital insufficiency of the posterior urethral musculature (megalourethra) and not caused by mechanical obstruction leading to urethral dilatation. It is suggested that detrusor-bladder-neck-dyssynergia is the primary cause of the imbalanced micturition and its consequences (bladder distention, reflux, urinary tract infection, hydronephrosis, pyelonephritis) in patients with Prune Belly Syndrome. The findings of a normal, respectively increased detrusor activity are in contrast to the observations of some authors, describing attenutation and absence of detrusor muscle fibres. The indications and effects of transurethral resection and internal urethrotomy, proposed by some authors, are discussed.
In the denticulate ventral muscle of Wistar rats at the age of 1 day--2 months activity of NAD-N-dehydrogenase, succynic dehydrogenase and cytochrome oxidase has been determined in transversal cryostat sections. Quantitative estimation of the enzymes activity has been carried on by the plag-method. With age, general tendency to increasing activity of the enzymes mentioned is noted, but the dynamics of the increase is peculiar for every enzyme. Analysing the histograms on muscular fibre distribution according to their optical density, it is possible to estimate the dynamics. Simultaneously, the width of variational series, central statistical moments, indices of asymmetry and excess are also estimated. The whole course of the muscular fibre development, in accordance to the range and moments of distribution, can be devided into four main stages: stable, initial stage, slow increase of events, rapid increase of events and stabilization of the process. The stages mentioned pass gradually one into another making it possible to mark transitional stages (5--11, 15--19, 34--60 days). Using standard indices, it is possible to characterize more strictly the processes occurring in the course of muscular fibre differentiation. Lack of parallelism in the dynamics of asimilarity and excess can be treated as variety in differentiation of muscular fibres with middle and large optic density, and parallelism in dynamics--as their simultaneous differentiation. By comparing the curves it can be concluded that up to the 12--14th days, variety in differentiation of muscular fibres occurs, while after the 14th day their differentiation is more regular and simultaneous. The method of cytophotometry with subsequent mathematical processing of the results helps to determine the stages of muscular fibres differentiation.
It has been suggested that abdominal testes might have better ultimate function if brought to the scrotum at a very early age. In a study of 16 patients with the prune belly syndrome, 8 had reconstruction of the urinary tract together with an orchiopexy and 2 had an orchiopexy alone. The results in these patients support the view that an orchiopexy in the neonate or young infant offers the best chance of obtaining viable testes in the scrotum.
Twenty-seven cases of prune belly syndrome which were well in the neonatal period are reported. Eleven were seen in the first year of life and 16 presented later. The first line of treatment was to ensure proper bladder emptying, usually by urethrotomy. Thereafter a policy of minimal surgical interference was followed, operating only for proven obstruction and intractable infection. This policy appears justified as 10 of 11 early presenters have done well. In the late presenters it was accepted that some renal damage had already occurred; nonetheless, 11 of 16 cases have done well. The X-rays were reviewed and hitherto unreported medullary cysts were noted. No radiological signs were found that were of prognostic significance.
Mitochondria isolated from abdomen muscle of crayfish Orconectes limosus exhibit malic enzyme activity in the presence of L-malate, NADP and Mn2+ ions after addition of Triton X-100. Under optimal conditions about 230 nmole of reduced NADP and an equivalent amount of pyruvate are produced per min per mg of mitochondrial protein. 2. The pH optimum for decarboxylation of L-malate is about 7.5. 3. The apparent Km for L-malate, NADP and Mn2+ ions was found to be 0.66, 0.012, and 0.0025 mM, respectively. 4. The requirement for Mn2+ can be replaced by Mg2+, Co2+ and Ni2+ ions; however, higher concentrations of these ions than Mn2+ are required for a full stimulation of malic enzyme activity. 5. Oxaloacetate and pyruvate inhibited the enzyme activity in a competitive manner with apparent Ki values of 0.05 mM and 5.4 mM, respectively.
The mechanism of plasticization of the abdominal cuticle in Rhodnius larvae has been investigated, using the properties of loops of cuticle under varying test conditions as a model for the behaviour of the cuticle in vivo. 2. It is supposed that plasticization is effected by a change in the intracuticular environment. A number of model mechanisms for plasticization may be proposed, which suppose that the epidermis is capable of regulating (a) pH, (b) ionic strength,(c) Ca and/or Mg, (d) urea, within the cuticle. 3. Analyses of cuticle ash show that models(b) and (c) are not responsible for plasticization in vivo. The levels of inorganic ions within the unplasticized cuticle are not sufficiently high to allow plasticization upon their removal. 4. No evidence for model (d) has been found; urea does not occur in the cuticle in detectable quantities. 5. Exact measurements of the intracuticular pH have not been achieved but straining experiments strongly suggest that a change in pH occurs within the cuticle on plasticization. This pH change is probably large enough to account for the increased extensibility shown by plasticized cuticle.
Palliative intubation in the management of an unresectable carcinoma of the esophagus can be accomplished by "push through" or "pull through" techniques. The most frequently encountered complication is tube dislodgment-proximal or distal migration. Dislodgment occurs more freqeuntly with the "push through" tubes such as the Souttar tube than with the "pull through" tubes such as the Celestin tube. The incidence of migration reported for the "pull through" tubes varies from 3 to 14 per cent. In order to prevent migration, we sutured the tube to the anterior abdominal wall in 6 patients. The sixth patient developed a gastrocutaneous fistula and fasciitis at the point of anterior abdominal wall fixation. In the next 4 cases, we used a two-suture technique, in which no single suture passed from the gastric lumen to the anterior abdominal wall fascia. The Celestin tube was fixed to the gastric wall over a Dacron felt pledget and this pledget was then anchored to the rectus fascia. This technique has prevented both migration of the tube and complications related to gastric perforation.
This report deals with appliances for permanent cutaneous enterostomies such as ileostomy, colostomy and ileal-bladder (called ostomies below). The purpose of the report is to facilitate the choice of appliances for these types of ostomies for prescriber as well as the person operated.
Ninety-six cases of exomphalos or gastroschisis managed at The children's Hospital, Sheffield, during the period 1964-74 are analysed. There were 306 cases with minor lesions, 30 with major lesions, 27 with a ruptured exomphalos and only 3 with gastroschisis. The overall mortality rate was 46-9 percent. Survival could be closely correlated with the birth weight, the nature of the primary lesion, the presence or absence of liver within the sac and the presence and severity of associated congenital anomalies. A "scoring system" based on these criteria is proposed to predict the prognosis of an infant with an exomphalos.
We report 2 cases of malformations occuring in the region of the umbilicus which were diagnosed by amniocenteses before the 20th week of pregnancy (with levels of alphafetoprotein) and echography. Failure of development of the abdominal wall was only diagnosed for certain after the therapeutic abortion had been carried out. The omphalocoele was diagnosed for certain by echography at the 19th week after anencephaly and spina bifida had been eliminated in spite of an abnormally high rise in the level of amniotic fluid alphafetoprotein (100.000 microgram/l). We have not found any similar cases in the literature at this gestational age. These observations prove the value of combining the estimation of alphafetoprotein level in the amniotic fluid when making antenatal diagnoses because of the age of the mother (after the age of 38), with echography specially directed to searching for such apparent morphological abnormalities.
Ultrasound was used to diagnose and demonstrate an anterior abdominal wall abscess of unknown cause in a diabetic woman. This condition may mimic major abdominal disorders and, in our patient, appeared as acute cholecystitis. The use of ultrasound is simple, quick, painless, and without known adverse side effects. The diagnosis may be more easily and accurately established than by routine roentgenography.
Porcine skin grafts and human amniotic membranes have been used as biological dressings for the treatment of gastroschisis or omphalocele in 16 newborn infants. Eleven infants with gastroschisis were managed initially by the Silastic pouch technique but delayed healing resulted in separation of the Silastic sheeting from the wound margins and required use of biologic dressings to achieve complete closure. Biological dressings were used in five patients with intact omphaloceles for all or part of their course. Average time to achieve complete closure was 55 days. Three patients died of associated anomalies. One patient developed an enteric fistula. Biologic dressings appear to be useful adjuncts in the management of some patients with gastroschisis or omphalocele.
Omphalocele and gastroschisis carried a poor prognosis (50 per cent survival) until the last half decade. 2. The use of a temporary prosthetic covering  for the exposed viscera has strikingly altered the outlook in these conditions. 3. Ventilatory assistance, when required, and the ability to monitor blood gases have contributed also to the improved survival rates. 4. In gastroschisis the capability of giving total intravenous nutrition has allowed survival through the long period of bowel dysfunction common in the postoperative period.
Successful separation of Xiphopagus-conjoined twins. The successful separation of xiphopagus-conjoined twins is described. Such an experience is of course a very gratifying and exciting surgical adventure.
5 Male children exhibiting the typical features of the Prune-Belly syndrome (malformations of the urogenital tract, aplasia of abdominal muscles) are described. Two of these are deaf. This syndrome has also been observed in a few females. Final interpretation of the cause and pathogenesis cannot yet be given. In two siblings with defects of the abdominal muscles an contractures of the joints, but without renal anomalies, a new and hitherto undescribed hereditary syndrome seems to be present.
Use of synthetic materials in herniplasty has been a controversial issue. In order to determine the influence of Mersilene mesh on the strength of healing abdominal wounds and its effectiveness in repair of hernia, experimental and clinical studies were undertaken. Experimental study included 175 male rats divided into three groups subjected to either: 1) an incision made only through the skin and closed with 3-0 silk sutures; 2) a 2.5 cm midline incision through the musculature and peritoneum closed with 2-0 Mersilene suture; or 3) the same procedure as group 2 with the addition of a Mersilene mesh onlay graft. Bursting strength of abdominal wounds as determined in all groups at intervals. Wounds of the group treated with the mesh exhibited significantly greater (P less than 0.01) bursting strength. Clinical trial consisted of 100 consecutive adult patients in which an onlay graft of Mersilene mesh was used in the hernioplasty. Mesh was used as an adjunct in patients with: 1) large ventral hernias; 2) direct hernias resulting from severely attenuated transversialis fascia; 3) indirect hernias associated with a large internal ring and a weak posterior inguinal wall; or 4) combined direct and indirect hernias. All were followed for a minimum of one year to determine the incidence of complication and rate of recurrence. This study suggests that: 1) Mersilene mesh increases the strength of healing abdominal wounds in rats; and 2) repair of large hernias with Mersilene mesh results in an acceptable morbidity and a lowered rate of recurrence.
Omphaloceles are congenital malformations with herniation of the abdominal viscera into the umbilical cord. The incidence in newborns is 1:4300, the sex ratio   124:1 in favour to boys. Children with this malformation are neither more frequent at the beginning nor at the end of the sibship; the average maternal age is not increased. In about 50% other different malformations are found. All those omphaloceles, which are found as an obligatory symptom in the EMG syndrome (Wiedemann-Beckwith syndrome) to be probably in most cases autosomal recessively inherited or which are seen within a chromosomal malformation syndrome are of etiologically known origin. Omphaloceles without other malformations are mainly sporadic, less frequent in sibs, possibly due to a polygenic or multifactorial mode of inheritance. Findings in population genetics and animal experiments suggest that exogenous factors, too, can be the cause of malformation syndromes with omphaloceles.
The mechanical properties of loops of cuticle cut from the abdomens of 5th instar Rhodnius have been investigated. The cuticle shows pronounced viscoelastic behaviour. 2. Stress-relaxation tests show a continuously falling modulus over a wide range of times after the imposition of a strain. 3. Plasticized samples of cuticle show stress-relaxation curves which are shifted along the time axis towards earlier times by up to times 10-3. The modulus at any particular time after the imposition of strain is about 10 times lower than that of the unplasticized cuticle. 4. It is concluded that the mechanical properties of this cuticle are determined, at least for maintained stresses, largely by the matrix material. Chitin microfibrils may act as a reinforcing filler for short-term, rapid stresses. The cuticular macromolecules are probably not extensively cross-linked by primary bonds, though secondary interactions between them are probably important in the viscoelastic properties of the cuticle. 5. Plasticization probably involves a change in either the number or the strength of secondary interactions between the cuticle macromolecules, or both.
Entrapment of the abdominal segmental nerves within the rectus abdominis muscle may produce abdominal pain simulating surgical or genito-urinary disease. The diagnosis can be made by localising with one finger an area of tenderness close to the lateral border of the muscle. Pressure at this site will usually reproduce the pain and precise injection of local anaesthetic will abolish the pain immediately. Effective long-term relief is usually obtained by the injection of long acting steroid or a small volume of 7 percent aqueous phenol.
A rare case of primary actinomycosis of the abdominal wall presenting as a tumour is described. The patient responded to penicillin therapy well. A brief account of the literature is included.
Since 1971, 35 children with prenatally ruptured omphalocele and paraumbilical abdominal wall defects were operated on in the surgical clinic of the Cologne Children's Hospital. 45.7% of them survived compared with 29.2% in earlier years. This improved chance of survival is attributed the use of the child's own fetal membranes.
Abdominal wall replacement with plastic mesh in ablative cancer surgery. Planned excisions of tumors involving the abdominal or chest wall should not be compromised because of lack of tissue for wound closure. Reconstruction with an inert polypropylene mesh provides a strong and stable covering for the defect. Mobilization of adjacent skin flaps to provide covering for the mesh is desirable and results in reduced morbidity. When this is not possible the mesh may be left to granulate and later be grafted. Nine illustrative cases are presented.
The results of operative treatment of gastroschisis have been improving in recent years. The survival rate is now between 50 and 60 p.c. It is very important to perform primary repair as soon as possible after birth. According to our own experiences resection of the bowel should be avoided as it gives a poor prognosis. Combined malformations of gastroschisis are very rare and their treatment should be tired since there is no other alternative. An own successfully treated case of combined malformations of gastroschisis with atresia of the small bowel is presented. Stenosis of the duodenum and tubular duplication are described
One hundred forty-four infants with anomalies of the gastrointestinal tract and abdominal wall were treated at Children's Memorial Hospital between July 1970 and July 1973. The overall mortality, including unoperated infants and those dying from other causes up to six months later, was 17%. Associated defects, particularly of the heart and CNS, were the most common causes for death. Many infants were premature; however, this factor alone did not contribute to mortality. Differences in surgical technique did not affect mortality in patients with esophageal atresia, but one baby with total aganglionosis of his colon and two with gastroschisis may have survived with different modes of therapy. Although previous advances in pediatric surgery contributed to the overall good results in these infants, parenteral alimentation emerged as the single most important factor in improved survival during this study period.
In men and in "masculine" shape of the abdomen as compared with women and "feminine" shape of the abdomen the following features of the topography of the anterior-lateral abdominal wall were revealed: a narrower white line, wider straight muscles of the abdomen in their medial and upper parts, less square surface of the lateral muscle-free portions. The inguinal region of men and the "musculine" type of the abdomen are characterized by great dimensions of the superficial and profound rings, weaker aponeurosis of the external oblique abdominal muscle in formation of the anterior wall of the inguinal canal. In elderly and senile age there occur dilatation of the white line, the increase of the amount of chinks and apertures in it as well as of the length of aponeuroses. The superficial inguinal ring expands.
Marlex mesh was used to close the abdominal wall defect in six patients with septic wound dehiscence and intra-abdominal infection. The mesh was implanted under local anesthesia and served as a protective covering for the bowel and allowed early ambulation, including prone positioning of the patient for easier wound care. In four surviving patients, the Marlex mesh was covered by full thickness skin flaps after granulation tissue had covered the material. No patients had infected sinus tract formation or extrusion. Two patients had incisional hernias develop when the Marlex mesh was not sutured to the abdominal wall permanently. The use of Marlex mesh to cover infected defects in the abdominal wall when primary closure cannot be accomplished is suggested by our experience.
The first reported case of renal transplantation in a patient with prune belly syndrome is presented. Transplanatation should be considered for patients with this syndrome in whom renal failure develops despite appropriate urologic reconstruction. A thorough preoperative evaluation ascertaining the status of the lower urinary tract is especially important in these patients.
A 26-year-old woman developed a desmoid tumor of the lower abdominal wall shortly after the birth of her fourth child. It measured 15 by 17 cm. and involved most of the lower abdominal wall of this small-framed woman. Operative removal would have been mutilating and almost surely doomed to failure. No treatment was given. Over a 5 year period, the tumor regressed and has disappeared almost completely. It was and has remained entirely asymptomatic. Desmoid tumors of the abdominal wall never metastasize, are asymptomatic, and may regress spontaneously. Since surgical treatment so often fails, it is felt that extensive or mutilating operations are not justified.
The increasing use of chemotherapy in association with surgery has prompted the suggestion that cancer chemotherapeutic drugs may interfer with the healing process. To test this hypothesis 30 Wistar rats were subjected to laparotomy and colonic resection and treated with 5-Fluorouracil or Mitomycin C. The bursting strength of the abdominal scars and the colonic anastomotic bursting pressure revealed some interference in the rats treated with 5-Fluorouracil (Student's t test P less than 0.05) but none in the case of Mitomycin C. This preliminary study deserves to be followed up.
A series of 80 patients with an incisional ventral hernia were treated with an extractable prosthesis in the period 1 January 1965--1 January 1974. The results are discussed. After a description of the advantages of an extractable prosthesis, attention is given to a number of factors which are possibly of importance in the development of such a hernia. This is most probably a multifactorial process, in which suturing technique, wound infection, obesity and postoperative rise of intra-abdominal pressure may play a part. The technique of inserting the extractable prosthesis is accurately described and illustrated with drawings and photographs. Success was ultimately obtained in 86.25% of the cases. The failure rate was 13.75%. In comparison with the data from the literature, this is a low percentage, the more so because the author's series consisted mainly of large incisional hernias. Recurrences can be treated successfully several times with an extractable prosthesis. This is, in general, easy in view of the smaller dimensions of the hernial orifices. The extractable prosthesis is recommended both for the treatment and prevention of incisional ventral hernia.
Warm stimulation of a circumscribed region of the dorsal abdominal wall of the rabbit evoked discharges in splanchnic afferent single fibers. They showed positive temperature coefficients of their static activities and of their dynamic responses to temperature changes. They were not excited by mechanical stimuli. Cooling from static conditions caused a transient inhibition of impulse frequency. Two populations were found, one having a static and dynamic maximum at 46 degrees C, the other one at about 40 degrees C. Both types were found to be C-fibers, with a conduction velocity of 0.6 -   11 m/sec.
The ability to breathe against a mild expiratory obstruction was examined in 64 adult patients under halothane-nitrous oxide-oxygen anaesthesia. The trachea of all patients were incubated. It was found that d-tubocurarine 0.11 mg/kg blocked the respiratory musculature by 50 per cent. The onset of block was immediate, with the peak effect reached within one minute. The duration of block was either very short (1 to 2 minutes) or long (paralleling the blockade in the thumb twitch), depending upon the dose of d-tubocurarine. Following injection of a small dose (up to 0.1 mg/kg) the respiratory musculature might be blocked by 30 per cent but for only one minute, disproportionately short as compared with the thumb twitch. Following injection of a large dose (0.1-0.3 mg/kg) the duration was long, but the recovery was only slightly ahead of the thumb. Following an intermediate dose, a biaphasic pattern was observed. An initial partial recovery was observed during the first 1 to 2 minutes. Comparison of the respiratory musculature and the thumb twitch revealed that the respiratory musculature was highly sensitive to block and has a different time course. Succinylcholine 0.08 mg/kg blocked the respiratory force by 50 per cent with a time course similar to the block in the thumb twitch. The clinical significance of these observations are discussed.
In plastic surgery of the hand the groin-flap is preferred to other axial pedicled flaps for practical and cosmetic reasons. This groin-flap described by McGREGOR and JACKSON 1972 is based on the superficial circumflex iliac artery (Arteria circumflexa ilium superficialis = "A. cis."). Details concerning the origin and course of the A. cis. may best be described with reference to the two osseous prominences that can be palpated through the skin of the inguinal region; the anterior superior iliac spine (S) and the pubic tubercle (T) (Fig. 1).
Primary closure with "minimal tension" of an inadequately debrided massive abdominal wall defect invariably results in further necrosis and dehiscence. Rotation flaps and prosthetic materials are potentially hazardous in severely traumatized and contaminated wounds. An alternate technique, utilizing an abdominal wall pack and porcine skin graft has been used in two patients with close-range shotgun blasts and one patient with postoperative necrotizing fascitis. The combination of a biological dressing and an abdominal wall pack, stinted by strategically placed retention sutures, controls infection, promotes healthy granulation tissue, and prevents bowel erosion with fistula formation.
Large full-thickness abdominal wall defects may be satisfactorily closed with the temporary use of prosthetic mesh. Within two weeks after placing silastic mesh directly over exposed bowel, a membrane forms below the mesh. When the membrane thickens, central eliptical portions of the mesh are progressively excised, diminishing the size of the defect. Eventually, the mesh may be removed and the defect closed primarily or repaired with permanent prosthetic mesh.
The purpose of this study was to analyze the function of the superficial muscles of the anterolateral wall of the abdomen in dorsal decubitus by an original technique: electromyocartography. This technique attempts to monitor the individual or inter-subjective variations that complicate quantitative analysis of the overall electromyogram with integration of action potentials. It is shown that relative quantification of the areas explored with respect to the most active area considerably improves the consistency of the results. The most dependable electrode locations for the analysis of the abdominal muscles are determined. From a functional point of view: The rectus abdominis is active in flexion of the cranial portion of the trunk, either alone or in combination with right or left rotation of the trunk. Its activity is less, and predominates in the distal portion of the muscle, in flexion of the caudal portion of the trunk in combination with a 15 degree flexion of the hips. The obliquus internus abdominis, which can be explored only in a single area, is especially active in rotation. The obliquus externus abdominis plays a major role in stabilizing the pelvis when the lower limbs are involved in the movement of the trunk.
Analysis of the functions of the muscles of the inferior and posterior regions of the trunk was carried out by electromyocartography for the basic movements of extension of the trunk in ventral decubitus. For a given subject, the results varied little with time. By contrast, the results were substantially the same from subject to subject in the case of only one movement : extension of the caudal portion of the trunk combined with extension of the hips. A functional balance-sheet can be based only on this movement. The sacro-spinalis (without attempting to determine the respective roles of the various bundles) seems to be the only one involved in certain movements of extension of the trunk: Its action is at a maximum, highly variable, when the extension involves both the caudal and the cranial portions of the trunk; It is considerable in the extension of the caudal portion alone, and Moderate in the extension of the cranial portion alone.
A family in which four cases of omphalocele were found within two generations is presented. One of the patients also had Down's syndrome. To our knowledge, this is the first report of such an occurrence in one family.
We present our technique of doing an abdominal lipectomy and augmentation mammaplasty in the same operation, through the same incision, in selected patients. We introduce the breast implants through tunnels made from the top of the abdominal pocket into the breast areas. We have had no complications in 12 patients in whom we have done this operation.
During the past 11 years, 18 infants with gastroschisis abdominal wall defects have undergone surgical repair at the UCLA Hospital. Sixteen infants had skin flap closure in infancy. A gastrostomy was performed on all infants, and peripheral intravenous hyperalimentation was used in 14 of the 18 infants. Sixteen of the 18 infants (89%) lived more than one year after surgical repair. Of these, 12 have undergone second-stage closure of the ventral hernia. Operative repair was greatly facilitated by forceful stretching of the abdominal musculature and milking of the bowel contents proximally into the stomach and distally out through the anus. The low morbidity and mortality of gastroschisis repair by primary skin closure, supplemented by intravensou hyperalimentation with late secondary ventral hernia repair, appear to justify continued use of this technique. Prosthetic materials probably should be reserved for reconstructing more complex abdominal wall defects.
The best synthetic material available for repair of abdominal wall defects associated with an insufficiency of tissue is Marlex mesh. Among 14 patients with large hernias and 3 who underwent tumour resection only 2 manifested recurrence of the defect. In three of these patients infection developed, but its control made it unnecessary to remove the Marlex. In another three with gross infection of the abdominal wall, Marlex was used successfully to provide abdominal wall closure.
The authors took a number of biometric measurements from two groups of young women who had had babies. A statistical study of the facts that were obtained shows that muscular strength and tone in the abdominal wall comes back quicker in women who have followed specialised courses of gymnastics before and after delivery.
Combined use of pneumoperitoneum and Marlex mesh. The most important aspects of repairing massive hernias, eventrations, or surgically created abdominal wall defects are preoperative preparation of the patient and conservative judgment in indications for use of prosthetic material. Before operation, most patients (excluding those with trauma or severe sepsis) can be prepared electively by progressive preoperative pneumoperitoneum. The procedure is safe, simple, and effective. As described, it involves no special techniques or equipment and may be carried out as an inpatient or outpatient procedure. Prosthetic material should be used only to obviate tension on a suture line, for this must scrupulously be avoided. It should not be used routinely as onlay grafts in small or moderate hernias as primary fascial suturing gives better results with few wound complications when closure without tension is possible. Progressive preoperative pneumoperitoneum, combined when necessary with Marlex mesh to obviate tension, enables closure of even gigantic defects. The technique avoids the severe and sometimes fatal preliminary complications resulting from sudden increase in abdominal pressure and diaphragmatic elevation that accompany replacement of abdominal viscera that have lost their "right of domain" with large hernias or abdominal wall defects. This technique also markedly diminishes postoperative pain and aids satisfactory pulmonary management and thus permits early postoperative mobilization and discharge from the hospital.
Three cases of gastroschisis are described, managed surgically in the neonatal period by staged reduction employing a dacron reinforced silastic sac. All three cases were treated during the postoperative period with the application of constant negative pressure around the thorax and abdomen. Reduction of the eviscerated mass appeared to be accelerated and all three cases survived. The possible benefits of constant negative  pressure around the thorax and abdomen in the treatment of gastroschisis are discussed.
A series of 28 patients is presented with the two conditions of omphalocoele and gastroschisis treated over a five-year period . Improved survival can be obtained by the use of staged procedures with a silastic prosthesis plus intravenous alimentation with later definitive operation. If peripheral veins are used, serious complications are almost totally avoided. This combined form of therapy is the treatment of choice in infants with massive defects in the abdominal wall.
The authors discuss the treatment of a desmoid tumour of the abdominal wall and propose an original technique of extensive parietal repair by epiplooplasty associated with inert prostheses.
Reduction cystoplasty is a useful procedure to treat a large, poorly functioning bladder in boys with prune belly syndrome who are candidates for urinary tract reconstruction. The technique includes elliptical resection of all anomalous urachal tissue and sufficient detrusor dome to reduce bladder capacity to average size and to create a spherical detrusor. Improved detrusor function and a satisfactory of excellent result can be expected.
Among 640 patients operated upon due to multiple recurrences of ventral hernias Spigelian hernia was revealed in 11 cases, and primary surgery for Spigelian hernia was performed only in one case. The diagnosis of Spigelian hernias in this category of patients presents considerable difficulties. It is the authors' opinion that operative treatment of Spigelian hernias after repeat operations on abdominal organs should be performed with application of allomaterials. As an alloprosthesis the authors recommend to use a specially manufactured material from Lavsan threads No 200 with 2-3 mm mesh. An examination of patients 10-12 years following herniotomy indicated that neither recurrent hernia nor complications related with the utilization of Lavsan alloprosthesis were noted in any case.
VMaintained inflation of the lung evokes abdominal muscle activity in anesthetized cats only if the vagus nerves are intact, indicating the importance of vagal receptors. The location of these receptors was determined in 14 anesthetized cats by comparing prevagotomy inflation responses of the abdominal muscles and diaphragm to the responses obtained after section of the thoracic vagi at one of three different levels. The abdominal muscle and diaphragm responses to maintained lung inflation persisted following vagotomy below the roots of the lung or denervation of the heart and great vessels. Denervation at the root of the lung, however, abolished the abdominal muscle response and the Hering-Breuer inflation reflex of the diaphragm. It is concluded that pulmonary receptors are essential for the abdominal expiratory activity, but vagal receptors in the abdomen, esophagus, trachea, heart and great vessels are not.
Reduction cystoplasty is a useful procedure to treat a large, poorly functioning bladder in boys with prune belly syndrome who are candidates for urinary tract reconstruction. The technique includes elliptical resection of all anomalous urachal tissue and sufficient detrusor dome to reduce bladder capacity to average size and to create a spherical detrusor. Improved detrusor function and a satisfactory or excellent result can be expected.
Since 1961 till present time 331 plastic reconstructions of the abdominal wall were performed, in 192 of these only proper patients' tissues being employed, in 110--autoplasty with alloplasty, in 29--alloplasty with a capron mesh. Death in the immediate postoperative period was noted in 4 patients due to cardiopulmonary insufficiency, insult and thrombosis of pulmonary vessels. The late results within the terms from 1 to 29 years were followed up in 297 patients.
A total of 102 abdominal surgical wounds in cancer patients were closed with absorbable suture material. The object of the study was to evaluate whether patients with cancer having possible wound healing impairments could be closed with absorbable sutures, thereby omitting the difficulties involved with retention sutures or nonabsorbable material. Polyglycolic acid sutures were used in the fascia in all of these patients, and they were studied regarding the incidence of wound infection, wound dehiscence, and incisional hernias. There were no instances of wound dehiscence in the entire series. A wound infection rate of 14.8% was encountered. The incidence of incisional hernia following either infection or primary healing was noted to be markedly decreased. The rate of wound dehiscence and wound hernia was sufficiently low to lead us to recommend this type of abdominal wound closure in all cancer patients.
According to the authors' data the clinic of this affection is characterized by an acute pain and the appearance of tumescence in the region of musculus rectus abdominis. The diagnosis was proved to be difficult, and all patients were directed to the clinic with improper diagnosis. The treatment is only surgical, i. e. the removal of hematoma and ligation of both ends of the ruptured inferior epigastric artery. In the national literature the authors found the description of 62 examples of this disease and report 7 personal observations.
The burst abdominal wound has a mechanical cause. It is the results of suture breaking, knot slipping, the intact suture cutting out of the tissues or protrusion of gut or omentum between stitches. Measurements of abdominal girth and the xiphoid-pubis distance before and during abdominal distension show that a wound may lengthen by 30 per cent if distension occurs. An adequate reserve of suture length in the wound is necessary to allow this lengthening to occur and to ensure a minimal resulting rise in tension between the sutures and the tissues. Three variables present in every continuous wound closure--the suture length inserted, the wound fasical length and the number of stitches--determine the stitch interval and the size of the tissue bite, which are the two vital factors in wound strength under the surgeon's control. These variables may be expressed by the ratio of the length of suture (SL) inserted to the wound length (WL), the ratio SL:WL. Analytical and clinical evidence is presented to show that:  Deep wound disruption (evisceration and ventral hernia) is associated with the use of an SL: WL ratio of 2: 1 or less-the lower the ratio, the greater is the risk of a burst wound. 2. Wound disruption because of cutting out of sutures can be prevented by the use of non-absorbable continuous sutures at 1-cm intervals and an SL:WL ratio of 4:1 or more.
Thirteen cases of gastroschisis are presented and a reduction in the operative mortality to 15 per cent is recorded. The aetiology of the condition is discussed and the opinion expressed that it represents the result of an intra-uterine rupture of an incarcerated "hernia into the cord" rather than any specific failure of development of the abdominal wall musculature. Early skin closure and the creation of a ventral hernia remain the surgical treatment of choice, but it is recognized that the use of a prosthetic sac may occasionally be necessary. Infection is not the most important single factor influencing mortality, and the prolonged administration of prophylactic antibiotics is justified on this basis. Skilled management of the protracted ileus is essential. In view of the low incidence of serious coexistent malformations the children who survive the initial operation can be offered the prospect of a life of normal duration and quality.
A case of abdominal wall epithelioid sarcoma, studied by light and electron microscopy over a 3-year period, is presented. Ultrastructurally, there appear to be two types of tumor cells, light and dark, which differ by virtue of a heavier concentration of microfibrils and dilated rough endoplasmic reticulum in the dark cells. Both tumor cell types contain prominent Golgi systems, abundant free ribosomes, and numerous pinocytotic vesicles. The ultrastructural characteristics of the tumor cells resembel those of epithelioid cells of experimental human granulomas, as well as those of normal human synovium. A multifaceted relationship between histiocytes and synovial cells is demonstrated and it is concluded that the tumor is probably derived from mesenchymal reserve cells capable of differentiating a long histiocytic or synovial lines. Preliminary chemotherapeutic data are reviewed.
In both longitudinal and cross sections of rectus abdominis muscle of Rana esculenta three types of muscle fibres are identified by means of light and electron microscopy. A comparison is made between these fibre types in homologous muscles of frog and mammals (rat and mouse). In longitudinal sections of mammalian and frog muscle the Z-line can be used for discrimination of the fibre types A, B and C because that line is of different thickness in each type. The proportions of the thickness in frog and mammalian muscles are relatively the same, but the absolute values are different. In cross sections there are no differences between frog and mammalian muscle fibres concerning the typical form of myofibrils in type A- and B-fibres, whereas in type C-fibres the arrangement of the filaments in the Z- and H-layer is different in the members of both animal classes. The amount of mitochondria and lipid droplets is different as well. In the species examined the distribution of A-, B- and C-fibres changes within the whole muscle. In frog, this pattern depends on the level in which the muscle has been sectioned. This is not true for mammalian muscle. On the other hand both ends of the rectus abdominis muscle in frog, rat and mouse show an accumulation of B- and C-type fibres.
Five cases of rectus sheath hematoma were correctly diagnosed by ultrasound. The main feature in each case was a well defined superficial abdominal transsonic mass; it appeared spindle shaped on longitudinal sections and ovoid on transverse sections. Ultrasonography is suggested as the procedure of choice for the diagnosis of this condition.
The postoperative morbidity of incisions used in retropublic prostatectomies was examined. 350 patients with vertical midline incisions were compared with 411 patients with transverse or Pfannenstiel incisions. There was a significantly increased incidence of postoperative inguinal hernias in the group of patients who had had transverse incisions. The possible reasons for this were discussed. It was concluded that the normal architecture of the inguinal canal was deformed and weakened by extra-wide transverse incisions.
The management of 7 children with massive abdominal wall hernias is reviewed, utilizing a technique of stabilizing the defect by insertion of a Teflon mesh prosthesis followed by pneumoperitoneum and staged reduction. Teflon mesh has proven ideally suited for this purpose because of its flexibility, elasticity, and relative nonreactivity, allowing it to be applied directly over the surface of exposed bowel without inducing fistula formation. Although the mesh is securely incorporated into the fascial perimeter of the abdominal wall, a pseudomembrane is formed at the point of contact with the bowel surface which allows subsequent dissection and removal of the prosthesis with relative ease. Having limited the size of the defect by insertion of the mesh, an ideal situation is created for use of pneumoperitoneum to expand the peritoneal cavity and stretch the normal tissues of the abdominal wall, thus facilitating subsequent operative reduction of the ventral hernia. Utilizing this approach, excellent cosmetic and functional results have been achieved in all 7 patients.
The authors have collected in 13 years, 15 cases of congenital aplasia of the abdominal wall. All of the patients had involvement of the urinary apparatus of varying degree of severity, megalo-ureter, megabladder and dilatation of the posterior urethra being the most constant lesions. Twelve patients with renal failure, benefited from reparatory surgery of the excretory pathway. Eleven patients had complete or incomplete retention: in 5 cases there was a urethral valve. In 6 cases the megalo-urethra was apparently idiopathic. In all of these cases, endoscopic treatment was carried out, constituted either of resection of valves, or internal urethro-sphincterotomy using a cutting electrode: 9 times, the result obtained was excellent. One patient was improved; in one case the result could not be assessed. For the authors, obstructive urethral pathology is a frequently unrecognized or badly understood fact. It is accessible to endoscopic treatment, which must precede or accompany correction of the ureteral abnormalities.
A new preformed pneumatic reduction device is available in two sizes, and it is recommended that a set be available for emergency use in any hospital which deals with the definitive emergency therapy of the newborn. The devices can be washed and flash sterilized as needed and, if properly cared for, can be reused repeatedly. The bag has facilitated the early care of newborns with omphalocele and gastroschisis and has allowed the rapid and effective reduction of eviscerated intestines. These bags can also be used for the controlled ventral hernias necessary in the treatment of infants born with large diaphragmatic hernias. It is hoped that the search for better techniques and materials will be continued, since the dramatic improvement in the survival rate of infants with gastroschisis and omphalocele has occurred not from a better understanding of the defects but by the application of improved techniques and materials in their treatment.
Closure of wounds of the abdomen with a minimal amount of foreign material is still the preferred method. However, in those instances in which loss of tissue is too great to effect closure or in which closure will place the suture line under tension, the use of a synthetic plastic mesh is an effective alternative. As described, the technique avoids the risks of further necrosis of the tissue, infection and dehiscence. In those instances of extensive loss of tissue, it is frequently the only practical method available to reconstruct the abdominal wall.
A preformed silicone polymer silo has been used in eleven infants with omphalocele and gastroschisis. This prosthesis has significant advantages over other forms of silo construction. Among these advantages are: (1) easy and rapid primary application; (2) a totally nonreactive and closed system which prevents peritoneum fluid loss and bacterial contamination; (3) a uniform constant stretching force applied to the abdominal wall which promotes expansion of the peritoneal cavity; and (4) the transparent material of the silo which permits constant evaluation of the contained viscera. These factors all contribute to a smoother operative and postoperative course than that which occurs with skin closure or the self-sutured prosthetic silos.
A 22-year-old man developed a large abdominal wall and sternal defect resulting from wound dehiscence. This was a sequel to two operations for gunshot wounds of the abdomen, the second one being for intraperitoneal abscess. The infected dehiscence was treated by the open method using povidoneiodine (Betadine) packs. As soon as the patient's condition permitted, split-thickness grafts were applied to the defect. One hundred percent success resulted, and convalescence of this critically ill patient was thereafter uninterrupted until discharge 31 days later. It is the authors' opinion that this method has a wider application than it is usually accredited.
Urodynamic studies have been carried out in 10 boys with the prune belly syndrome. In spite of gross radiological changes the condition is compatible with normal voiding dynamics. Filling cystometrograms show a marked shift to the right. Pressure/flow studies may demonstrate an unbalanced voiding mechanism which can be treated by urethrotomy. Following urethrotomy urethral pressure profiles showed a significant fall, flow rates increased and residual urine volumes were reduced. Urological treatment in the prune belly syndrome should be directed at producing a bladder which empties well: a balanced voiding mechanism. Urodynamic investigations are helpful in achieving this aim. Residual urine determination and flow rates should be used in routine follow-up. Urethrotomy to lower bladder outflow resistance is advocated as one of the first steps in treating the unbalanced voiding mechanism that is often found in the prune belly syndrome.
Metastases in the abdominal wound occur in about 1% of a material of bladder tumors and less frequently in renal or colon carcinoma. They are sometimes accompanied by metastases elsewhere. Even if the abdominal wall metastases are very large, extensive resection of all layers of the wall may enable the patient to survive for more than 5 years. Free skin grafts are sometimes sufficient to cover the defect. There is no herniation and no impairment of respiration. Metastases in the vicinity of a colostomy or ileostomy may necessitate an operation. Radiation does not appear to provide any relief.
A case of a premature infant born with gastroschisis, a congenital defect in the abdominal wall is described.
The technique and results of using autografts of dermis to repair defects in the anterior abdominal wall is shown. Dermal grafting was used in altogether 15 cases. 7 with extremely large incisional hernias, and 8 with defects after malignant abdominal wall tumours. The surgical method is described and the follow-up 1 to 4 years postoperatively has shown a very satisfactory result in 13 cases. In one case there was a postoperative haematoma with subsequent graft necrosis and in the other there was a residual hernial defect. We recommend this method as one of choice in cases with large abdominal wall defects.
Based on the experience with treatment of 16 patients with large strangulated postoperative hernias of the anterior abdominal wall, the authors describe some peculiarities of the clinic, diagnosis and surgical tactics in the given pathology in persons aged over 74 years. A planned surgical therapy for postoperative hernias in senile persons is strongly advocated. The question of the planned operation should be settled only under stationary conditions after a careful detailed examination of such patients.
The external oblique, rectus abdominis, and rectus femoris muscles of 17 college women were studied electromyographically in 8 sit-up variations to determine the best variation for maximizing abdominal muscle activity and minimizing hip flexor activity. Integrated action potentials and movement phases of each variation were recorded simultaneously. The duration of muscle activity within the movement phases was analyzed. The variables of hook-lying/long-lying, feet supported/feet unsupported, and slow/fast speed of performance were examined. The hook-lying unsupported slow and fast variations were best for maximizing abdominal muscle duration of activity and for minimizing rectus femoris muscle duration of activity. Greatest duration of activity for all muscles occurred in the long-lying supported fast variation. Supporting the feet in both hook and long-lying fast variations was more effective for increasing activity duration of all muscles than the slow supported variations. Speed of performance seemed to be as important as support of the feet or leg position in increasing duration of muscle activity.
We reviewed data on 43 patients with gastroschisis treated at The Hospital for Sick Children, London, between 1959 and 1975. In the past five years, the overall mortality has been reduced from 76% to 33%. The introduction of the Silastic silo has been the most important single factor in this improvement. Mortality may be further reduced by achieving all-layer closure following thorough bowel decompression and stretching of the abdominal wall.
The importance of urethral obstruction in prognosis. The definition, history, and clinical presentation of the prune belly syndrome are outlined. Review of autopsy material and survivors reveal three groups of patients, and the author describes the choices of management available for both groups. Highlighted is the role of the radiologist.
The external surface of the rib cage and abdominal wall in anaesthetized cats was surgically exposed in order to record their movements cinematographically in spontaneous breathing and in paralysed cats, during artificial positive pressure ventilation. 2. Cine-stereophotography was used to allow the recording of the movements of a set of markers placed on the external surface of the trunk wall and the corresponding stereometric data were numerically and graphically processed into three-dimensional drawings. The cine-film frames corresponding to the phases of maximum inflation and deflation of the lungs were analysed to reveal the changes in configuration associated with the respiratory movements of the trunk wall. 3. The changes in shape of the diaphragm and the diaphragm and the displacements of the abdominal viscera between extreme inflation and deflation were recorded by X-ray photography. 4. During spontaneous inspiratory movements, the ribs rotated outwards and rostrally about the costovertebral joints, bringing about an increase in the transverse dimensions of the cage all along its length; these movements were accompanied by a clear-cut caudad displacement of the sternum, caused by the straightening of the costal cartilages and by the widening of the angles defined at sternochondral joints between the sternum and each of the costal cartilages. 5. Neuromuscular blockade abolished muscle tone in the trunk wall, allowing the weight of the viscera markedly to deform its configuration. 6. The inspiratory rib movements of the paralysed animal during artificial inspiration were similar to those during spontaneous breathing but the movements of the sternum were inverted and showed small cranial displacements. 7. The loss of muscular tone under neuromuscular blockade made the abdominal wall more compliant than the rib cage to the positive lung pressure and allowed greater mobility of the viscera with consequent distortion of the shape of the diaphragm. 8. The role of rib cage muscle tone in meeting requirements of purely configurational character in such a shell-like structure is discussed in relation to the optimal mechanical performance of the diaphragm.
A short account of the nosological, physiopathological and therapeutical aspects of cysts due to muscle echinococcus is given. A case of echinococcus of the external oblique muscle is presented and its diagnostical difficulties pointed out.
Three fatal cases of prune-belly syndrome were associated with nonrenal features of Potter syndrome. The abdominal muscle hypoplasia is thought to be a result of large kidneys compression the developing abdominal musculature during a critical phase of fetal development. Thus, Potter syndrome and prune-belly syndrome may coexist when nonfunctioning large kidneys result in oligohydramnios. A teratogenic role of cytomegalovirus inclusion disease and other viruses is possible in the pathogenesis of these syndromes.
A case of desmoid tumor of the anterior chest and abdominal wall is presented. The entire body of the sternum along with the upper abdominal wall and inner parts of both breasts was resected. The resulting defect over the pericardium and abdomen was reconstructed by the omentum and Marlex mesh. The large skin defect was covered by bilateral thoracoabdominal tube pedicles. The patient had a stable chest wall with uncompromised respiratory function 1 week after the operation. Prevention of local recurrences of desmoid tumors requires wide excision of the involved soft tissues and bony structures. The principles of wide resection of soft tissue tumors, reconstruction of the anterior chest and abdominal wall defects, and planning the skin coverage over the resulting defect are discussed.
Dissection of the anterior abdominal wall in 40 fresh cadavers, with confirmation of the anatomical findings at operation in 25 patients, has enabled the patterns of distribution of the aponeurotic expansions of the abdominal muscles to be traced and the relation of structure to function to be determined. It is pointed out that the linea alba should no longer be regarded as the line of insertion of the abdominal muscles but as the area of decussation of the tendinous aponeurotic fibres of the muscular strata passing from one side to the other, for which the name "midline aponeurotic area" is proposed. Two separate functional areas are described, a "parachute respiratory mechanism" in the upper abdomen and a belly support in the lower abdomen. Attention is drawn to the functional derangement that may follow some of the standard abdominal incisions and to possible mechanisms of herniation through the midline aponeurotic area.
A 10-year survey from a district general hospital. The incidence of abdominal wound dehiscence at a district general hospital was found to be about   15%. Analysis of a group of 123 patients with dehiscence in 3 separate years during a 10-year period confirmed that disruption most commonly occurs during the second postoperative week. The suture material used for primary closure appeared to have no influence on subsequent dehiscence. After resuture the recorded incidence of incisional herniation was 19% and the mortality was 24%. Patients who survived resuture remained in hospital for a prolonged period.
At the Royal Alexandra Hospital for Children, Sydney, we have found that primary closure in gastroschisis is usually successful. However, in a small number of cases such closure is found to be impossible. In such patients we have not been satisfied with silastic sheeting and have on two occasions successfully used lyophilized dura.
The experimental study concerning the particularities of the cicatrization process in cases of defects of the abdominal wall -- in rabbits -- for which substitution grafts were applied, demonstrated them to be well tolerated. No essential differences were noted between surgical nets imported from foreign manufacturers, and those manufactured in our country.
Gastroschisis complicated by intestinal atresia is a complex problem. Six cases are presented. A review of the literature and of our own cases shows a high mortality rate. Success or failure is related more to the pathology present than to any specific method of operative management. Resection and primary anastomosis is the favored method of treatment, as the intestine heals well in spite of its appearance. Primary closure of the abdominal wall musculature and skin is done whenever possible. A gastrostomy is used uniformly. Intravenous hyperalimentation is critical to survival of these babies and should be used early. The use of this therapeutic modality allows for the onset of gastrointestinal function spontaneously (often over prolonged periods of time) without nutritional deprivation. Intestinal atresias almost always are easy to identify in babies with gastroschisis. Extensive dissection and mobilization of this friable intestine is contraindicated in those babies in whom an atresia is not obvious but only suspected. In such cases the gastroschisis defect should be managed by whatever method is deemed appropriate and the baby observed while receiving intravenous nutritional support. If an atresia is present, it can be managed later in the baby's course by resection and primary anastomosis.
Desmoid tumors are musculo-aponeurotic fibromatoses which most commonly occur in the abdominal wall. They do not metastasize but local recurrence is common. The treatment of choice is wide local excision of the mass and surrounding normal tissue. We have described a rare desmoid tumor which involved the abdominal wall as well as small and large bowel. En bloc intestinal resections were required for complete tumor extirpation.
An apparatus to create continence in an end left-sided colostomy in dogs is assessed. The device consists of a samarium-cobalt magnetic ring encased in methyl methacrylate and a magnetic cap. The ring is implanted in the abdominal wall and the colon delivered through it and matured to the skin. The stoma is later obturated by the magnetic cap to provide continence. Ten dogs exposed to "uncoated" samarium-cobalt magnets for periods of up to eight months showed no elevation of cobalt levels in the serum or tissues and no histopathologic changes on postmortem examination. In twelve dogs, magnetic rings were used to create continent colostomies. Eleven of twelve dogs followed for periods up to eight months were continent and tolerated the appliance well. One ring was extruded after a peristomal skin dehiscence occurred. Two skin strictures appeared and were readily controlled by digital dilatation. Sinus, fistula, or infection were not seen. Clinical application of this device is discussed.
The prune belly syndrome of marked abdominal muscle deficiency and associated genitourinary anomalies has been found almost exclusively in male subjects. Of the few reported cases of female patients with this entity most are questionable or incomplete forms. The light microscopic histology and electron microscopic ureteral abnormalities in male subjects have been reported previously. A female newborn with marked abdominal muscle deficiency and severe bilateral ureteropyelocaliectasis is described. Chromosomal studies showed 46 XX karyotype. Histologic examination of the ureter by light microscopy was compatible with the diagnosis.
A non-functional and permanently damaged lower urinary tract is no longer a contraindication to kidney transplantation. In patients with this disorder the ureter commonly is drained by an intestinal conduit. We have used terminal loop cutaneous ureterostomy as a method of urinary drainage in 3 patients with cadaver kidney transplants who have been followed for up to 8 years. The technique of terminal loop cutaneous ureterostomy and a report of these cases are presented.
Antigens of the ABO system have been determined in the various fractions of split ejaculates from three A and two O (H) men who were secretors. The activity of the antigen was determined by a hemagglutination inhibition test. Within a split ejaculate the various fractions contained almost the same antigen activity, indicating that the antigens were secreted from all the glands contributing to the seminal plasma.
Twenty-two different arbovirus antigens derived from five antigenic groups were examined for their ability to agglutinate normal and trypsinized human group O erythrocytes. Trypsinization rendered the cells susceptible to agglutination by 18 viruses,chiefly in the pH 5.85 to 6.2 range, yielding hemagglutinin titers comparable with those obtained with gander cells at their optimal pH.
From the variations of alpha-N-acetylgalactosaminyltransferases activities with the pH, evidence was obtained for the recognition of A1A2 heterozygotes in normal A blood group sera. Besides, unusual transferase properties associated with two A2 sera from individuals out of AAm1 siblings, lead to the identification of the very infrequent A2AAm1 genotypes. These results strongly support the simultaneous coexistence of both A1 and A2 transferases in heterozygotes' sera, and bring some new information on the genetical background of the Am phenotype. The meaning of transferase properties directly determined on whole sera is briefly discussed.
The lectins from the seeds of Vicia cracca react specifically with human blood group A erythrocytes. They were purified by affinity chromatography on an adsorbent containing matrix-bound N-acyl-D-galactosamine. By a continuous pH gradient the lectins could be separated into two fractions each of which was shown to consist of several agglutinating species. The behaviour of both fractions in affinity chromatography was paralleled by the pH dependence of the interaction with the hapten sugar N-acetyl-D-galactosamine. Both lectin fractions have the same molecular (125000) and subunit (33000) weights, display the same pH dependence of their titre against A1 erythrocytes, and bind to N-acetyl-D-galactosamine at pH 8 with the same constant of about 6 X 10(3)M-  1
The analysis of 15 hereditary controlled blood characteristics in 57 Alzheimer-patients revealed abnormalities in the distribution of ABO-blood-groups and phenotypes in the third component of complement system. These data indicate that the phenogenesis of the Alzheimer syndrome is multiconditional and is obviously influenced by selective processes of immuno-genetic factors. This selective vulnerability offers a lead into the elucidation of amyloid deposition in Alzheimer's disease.
The membrane-bound N-acetylgalactosaminyltransferase from porcine submaxillary glands which provides A blood group specificity to mucin has been purified 38,000-fold by affinity chromatography on UDP-hesanolamine-agarose in aqueous Triton X-100. Design of a suitable purification procedure was developed by assessing the strength of interaction between enzyme and affinity adsorbent using batch desorption. The pure transferase has an apparent molecular weight of 100,000 as judged by zonal centrifugation and by sodium dodecyl sulfate polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis in the absence of a reducing agent. The reduced and carboxymethylated protein has an apparent molecular weight of 46,000 and 57,000 as judged by sedimentation equilibrium and sodium dodecyl sulfate polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis, respectively, suggesting that the native enzyme contains two subunits. It is a glycoprotein with a specific activity of 30 micronmol/min/mg of enzyme, which is 55,000 times that reported for the same enzyme isolated from human serum.
Porcine A blood group-specific N-acetylgalactosaminyl-transferase required either Mn2+, Cd2+, or Zn2+ for activity and 2'-O-alpha-fucosylgalactosides as acceptor substrates. The presence of detergent stabilizes the enzyme but is not essential for catalysis. To obtain information about the kinetic mechanism of the transferase reaction, initial rate parameters have been determined using 2'-fucosyllactose or A--mucin as acceptors, and Mn2+ or Cd2+ as cosubstrates. 2'-Fucosyllactose is a competitive inhibitor with respect to A--mucin and a noncompetitive inhibitor with respect to UDP-N-acetylgalactosamine. UDP inhibits noncompetively with respect to acceptor; thus UDP-N-acetylgalactosamine or acceptor can bind to the transferase via an equilibrium random pathway. The transferase converts human O blood type erythrocytes of A blood types. After exhaustive glycosylation, 3 X 10(6) N-acetylgalactosaminyl residues were incorporated per cell. Gel electrophoretic analysis of the labeled erythrocyte membranes indicates that glycoproteins with apparents molecular weights from 30,000 to 100,000 have been glycosylated; glycolipids account for only 15% of the labeled material, although pure H-glycolipid is a good acceptor. The transferase, with its strict acceptor specificity, can thus be used as a tool to study the biosynthesis and function of glycolipids and glycoproteins.
A to O bone marrow transplantation was performed in a 25-year-old male affected with severe aplastic anaemia, the donor being an HLA compatible brother. Three plasma exchanges had to be performed with an Aminco separator to remove the original and recurring anti-A isohaemagglutinins. The dynamics of O to A blood group conversion were followed by means of differential agglutination. An early wave of marked dyserythropoiesis was observed in the engrafted marrow. Mild to moderate GvHD was treated successfully with MTX, bolus high dosage 6-methylprednisolone and, at relapse, with intravenous ALG.
Purification by affinity chromatography and properties. alpha-D-Galactosidase was isolated from untoasted soybean meal and purified to homogeneity by affinity chromatography on N-epsilon-aminoacaproyl alpha-D-galactopyranosylamine-Sepharose. The purified enzyme destroyed the B-specificity of human ovarian cyst B-glycoprotein with an accompanying increase in H-specificity, and converted human type-B erythrocytes to type O. The enzyme consists primarily of a tetramer, molecular weight 150 000 +/- 5 000 at pH 4.0 and of a monomer, molecular weight 40 000 +/- 3 000 at pH 8.0. Polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis in dodecyl sulfate at pH 7.2 distinguished between two types of monomeric unit of similar molecular weight. N-terminal alanine was identified as the sole N-terminal amino acid residue. The enzyme was shown to be devoid of carbohydrate.
Seventeen patients with aplastic anemia or acute leukemia received transplants from donors who had major ABO incompatibilities. Antibody titers were decreased by plasma and whole blood exchanges prior to marrow infusion. All 17 patients were successfully engrafted, and there was one possible rejection in the patient with the highest pretransplant anti-A IgG titer. Nine of 17 patients are currently alive. A review was carried out of transplants performed in Seattle between HLA-matched siblings with aplastic anemia and leukemia. Two hundred forty-six evaluable patients with ABO-compatible donors were compared with 46 with minor ABO-incompatible donors. There was no effect of minor ABO incompatibility on graft rejection, incidence and severity of graft-versus-host disease, or survival.
An unusual IgG complement-binding antibody was observed in a 64-year-old man prior to surgery. This antibody was detectable by the indirect antiglobulin test when the red cells were suspended in saline, but not when they were suspended in acid citrate dextrose or albumin solutions. Positive reactions were obtained with the patient's own red cells and with the cells of all donors tested. In vivo chromium survival studies showed that donor cells and patient cells, when suspended in saline, had 1-hour survivals of 32 and 46%, respectively. In contrast, donor and patient cells suspended in ACD solution had 1-hour survivals of 77 and 93%, respectively. We concluded that this phenomenon may casue accelerated destruction of saline-suspended cells and should be suspected whenever in vitro incompatibility is noted with red cells suspended in saline.
Another example of anti-IB is reported.  The antibody would only react with cells having both B and I antigens and was transient.
Gene frequencies for 10 blood groups and the ABH-Le secretor traits in the Yanomama and their neighbors; the uniqueness of the tribe. In this paper we present the results of blood group typings for a total of 33 villages distributed among five South American Indian tribes--Yanomama (21 villages), Makiritare (eight villages), Macushi (two villages), Piaroa (one village), and Wapishana (one village). These new results for the Yanomama and Makiritare tribes have been combined with those previously reported to allow a better appreciation of the distribution of allelic frequencies in the tribes. The relationship of the Yanomama to other South American Indian tribes is investigated using data on six polymorphic loci (Rh, MNS, Fy, Jk, Di, Hp). By use of four genetic measures (two of genetic relationship and two of genetic diversity), we demonstrate that the Yanomama are genetically unique among a sample of 20 South American tribes. In addition, the Yanomama show somewhat less genetic diversity for the six loci analyzed than the average South American tribe. Taken together, these results indicate a rather long period of isolation for the population antecedent to the Yanomama--perhaps since the time of entry of man into the South American continent. The pattern of genetic relationships and genetic diversity for the 20 tribes is consistent with the hypothesis that evolution in South America proceeded by a process of fission-fusion leading to isolation of subpopulations with subsequent genetic differentiation as a consequence of population isolation. The uniqueness of the Yanomama appears to stem entirely from such a process, there being no evidence of any selective differential for the loci analyzed.
The authors examined in immunized healthy persons the correlations between the ability of immune response, the value of their different immunological parameters, and the HL-A blood-group antigens by computer analysis. Immune reactivity showed mosaic-like correlation against the HL-A system. The most definite negative correlation was noticed between the HL-A 3 and 7 antigens and the cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes. Remarkable and definite correlation was found between the Rh system and immune reactivity. The level of the natural antibodies, the immunoglobulins and the functions of lymphocytes were generally decreased in males in comparison to females.
The authors present serologic characteristics of the "cis AB" phenotype in the ABO blood system on the basis of investigation of three families in Poland and data from the literature and genetic concepts explaining the mechanism of development of this phenotype.
Blood group glycosyltransferases were used to modify HeLa cells of H specificity (O Group) into cells of A and B specificity. We also obtained the identical type of modification with lymphocytes from healthy subjects and leukemia patients. This method can be applied to tumor cells in general, and constitutes an attempt to stimulate the immunocompetent system.
The sera of many patients with malaria and filariasis, and also anti-A and B blood group sera, were found to react by immunofluorescence with the somatic musculature of nematodes, especially Ascaris, and human and rat muscle, especially the skeletal type. These reactions were attributed to a polysaccharide related to AB substance in adult nematodes and to raised AB antibodies in malaria. Similar heterologous reactions were found to involve the integument of schistosome adult worms and the microfilariae of Loa loa, which were attributed to the incorporation of host AB blood group substances into the parasite. Other parasites and sera gave mainly negative results. These heterologous reactions constitute a potential hazard in immunofluorescence tests, against which skeletal muscle provides a control. The antibodies concerned were not operative in complement fixation tests, but there was a relationship to anti-complementary activity which suggested the transient presence of a circulating antigen.
A family in which five members has a weak B variant and one member had a normal A and weak B reaction is reported. It appears that these phenotypes arise by the inheritance of a variant allele of the ABO locus. Their cells react weakly when added to anti-B sera, and they have normal anti-A activity and an absence of anti-B in their sera. Additionally, all of the members tested had increased levels of cellular H substance and all of the affected secretor members of the family secreted normal amounts of both B and H substance. Transferase activity of the sera of these individuals confirmed the presence of the B-gene specific transferase.
In vitro production of ABH blood group-degrading enzymes by enteric bacteria. Human feces contain enzymes produced by enteric bacteria that degrade the A, B, and H blood group antigens of gut mucin glycoproteins. We have studied their production in fecal cultures to determine if such cultures can be a source for enzyme purification and to explore how blood group antigen-degrading enzymes are adapted in individual human colon ecosystems. They were present in fecal cultures from each of 27 healthy subjects, including ABH nonsecretors. Heat-sensitive obligate anaerobes are their major source. From 39 to 85% of the total enzyme activity produced by growing cultures was extracellular. Commercial hog gastric mucin and salivary glycoproteins, including Lea saliva which lacks A, B, and H antigens, enhance production of A-, B-, and H-degrading activity in anaerobic fecal cultures irrespective of the glycoprotein's blood group specificity. There is evidence that the host's ABO blood type and secretor status affects the specificity of blood group-degrading enzymes produced by his fecal bacteria in vitro. Thus, fecal inocula from B secretors incubated with hog gastric mucin (A and H specificity) or with Lea saliva produced greater levels of B-degrading than A- or H-degrading activity, and inocula from A secretors in similar media produced greater levels of A-degrading than B- or H-degrading activity. Blood group-degrading enzymes produced in fecal cultures are glycosidases and not proteases. The B-degrading enzyme cleaves the B antigenic determinant alpha-D-galactose from the oligosaccharide side chains of mucin glycoproteins with B specificity. Anaerobic fecal cultures containing blood group substances are a feasible source for purifying blood group antigen-degrading enzymes. Prior adaptation to blood group antigens in the gut mucins of type A and type B secretors affects the specificity of the enzymes produced in vitro.
A gene interaction in man that affects the fecal population density of certain enteric bacteria. The autosomal dominant ABH secretor gene together with the ABO blood type gene control the presence and specificity of A, B, and H blood group antigens in human gut mucin glycoproteins. Certain obligate anaerobes in feces produce extracellular antigen-specific glycoside structures. We estimated the populations of these bacteria in feces of 22 healthy subjects by determining the greatest dilution of feces that yielded A, B, or H blood group-degrading enzyme activity after 24 h incubation in anaerobic cultures. Comparatively small populations of fecal bacteria produce blood group-degrading enzymes; their estimated populations were 10(8) per g or less in 21 subjects. Fecal populations of B-degrading bacteria were stable over time, and their population density averaged 50,000-fold greater in blood group B secretros than in other subjects. We present evidence that the greater fecal populations of B-degrading bacteria in B secretors is due in part to a competitive nutritional advantage gained by their ability to enzymatically cleave the B antigenic determinant alpha-D-galactose from gut mucins of B secretors. Fecal populations of bacteria producing A and H antigen-degrading enzyme activities were comparable in all subjects to the fecal population of B-degrading bacteria in B secretors. The large populations of fecal anaerobes may be an additional source of A antigen substrate for A-degrading bacteria; thus, antigens cross-reacting with A antigen were detected on cell walls of anaerobic bacteria from 3 of 10 cultures inoculated with 10(-10) g feces. Bacteria producing B-degrading activity likely represent a separate population from those producing A- or H-degrading activity since their fecal populations differed numerically in 14 subjects. These findings suggest that adaptation of blood group-degrading enzymes to mucin structures in human colon ecosystems is chiefly by mutation-selection of comparatively small populations of constitutive enzyme-producing strains rather than by substrate induced enzyme synthesis in many strains.
Erythrocyte, histocompatibility, and Y-dependent antigens. Determination of ABO and HL-A antigens and sex ratio of infants born to 46 women with preeclampsia or eclampsia, in comparison with normal controls, disclosed no predominant blood group, HL-A haplotype, or qualitative difference in maternal-fetal incompatibility. These results suggest that a link between immunologic mechanisms and the pathogenesis of toxemia syndromes, if present at all, must be associated with feto-placental tissue-specific antigens.
Fractionation of hog and human A, H, and AH blood group active substance on insoluble immunoadsorbents of Dolichos and Lotus lectins. The purified lectins from Lotus tetragonolobus and Dolichos biflorus were coupled to Sepharose 2B to make insoluble adsorbents for purification and fractionation of blood group A and H active glycoproteins. With both adsorbents, hog gastric mucin A + H blood substance (HGM), purified by phenol-ethanol precipitation, yielded fractions showing only A, only H, or AH activities. The AH fraction was obtained when the adsorbent column was overloaded with HGM and its A and H specificities seem to be carried on the same molecules since they were not separable by chromatography on either column. However A and H specificities of blood group substance from the stomach of a presumably heterozygous individual hog were both on the same molecules as they too could not be fractionated on either column. Analytical properties of the isolated fractions were generally similar to those of the unfractionated material, the purfied A substances had a higher galactosamine/fucose ratio than did the H substances. Although the original A + H showed very little specific optical rotation, the separated A and H substances rotated positively and negatively, respectively. The lectin-Sepharose adsorbents have also proven useful in isolating A or H substances directly from the crude commercial hog gastric mucin. Blood group A2 substance from a human ovarian cyst yielded two fractions on the Lotus-Sepharose column; the effluent did not interact with the Lotus lectin but precipitated the Ulex and Dolichos lectins and anti-A, and appears to contain type 1 H determinants. The other fraction reacted with Lotus and Ulex lectin as well as with Dolichos and anti-A.
The ABO blood-group distributions of 1460 patients who had died from a stroke were compared with those of a control group of 20 705 controls selected at random from the healthy population at risk (ie, over thirty-five years of age and matched for age and sex ratio). The cause of death was certified as cerebral thrombosis in 329 cases and as cerebral haemorrhage in 482 cases, these diagnoses being established in neurological hospitals; the remaining 649 cases had an unspecified type of stroke, the diagnosis being made by general practitioners. In the group with unspecified type of stroke the blood-group distribution was practically the same as the distribution in the controls. In the thrombosis cases there was an excess of blood-groups A and AB and a deficiency of O and B; in cerebral haemorrhage this situation was reversed. However, these were only trends; the differences were not significant at the 5% level. A statistically significant difference did emerge when the A+AB excess in thrombosis was contrasted with the O+B excess in haemorrhage, suggesting that this difference might be accounted for the major A subgroup (A1) and, consequently, A1B.
The influence of HES on serological blood grouping (ABO. Rh. crossmatch) was tested in comparison with dextran. It was shown out that a previous volume substitution up to 20% did not influence the reading of blood grouping determination. Higher dilutions of blood led to rouleaux formation which however could be easily distinguished from agglutination by addition of isotonic saline solution. Crossmatching brings difficulties, as weak antibodies might be missed even using the AHG test due to too high a degree of dilution of the patient's serum by plasma expanders. Increasing the sensitivity be enzyme technics (Papain, Eldon) is not advisable as irreversible non-specific reactions can be found already at low degrees of volume substitution.
A carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA-M) was purified from a hepatic metastasis obtained from a blood group O patient with cancer of the rectum. Using 125I-labeled carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) and blood group antisera, H specificity has been found on the CEA-M. As the addition of anti-H to anti-CEA does not modify the extent of binding of labeled CEA-M to its antibodies (86%), the H and CEA determinants are carried by the same molecule. The affinity chromatography of CEA-M on an immunosorbent "anti-H-Sepharose" demonstrated that a proportion of CEA-M molecules might bear both H and CEA antigenic determinants. In addition, glycosyltransferases were used to modify the blood group H specificity into blood group A or B specificities.
The chemical acetylation of RBC bearing the acquired B antigen led to the disappearance of the agglutinability by anti-B and restored the A1 specificity. The same results are obtained using RBC transformed in vitro by a Clostridium Tertium filtrate, where a deacetylase was reported.
Blood group ABH determinants in human erythrocytes are carried by four kinds of glycolipid carbohydrate chains, differing in their structural complexity. They are Aa, Ab, Ac, and Ad for A variants, and H1, H2, H3, and H4 for H variants (Table I and Fig 1). Based on the surface labeling of A variants and on the reactivity of erythrocytes to antibodies directed against H3 and against its degradation products, it is concluded that complex variants of A or H determinants (Ac and Ad/or H3 and H4) are absent or significantly low in fetal erythrocytes (80-150 days after gestation) and in new born erythrocytes, whereas these complex structures are fully developed in adult erythrocytes. In contrast, A determinants linked to simpler carbohydrate chains (Aa, Ab variants) are fully developed before birth and do not show significant change after birth. The precursor of blood group carbohydrate chains seems to be abundant in fetal or newborn erythrocytes. This assumption is based on the higher reactivity of fetal or newborn erythrocytes to an antibody, which is directed against the precursor N-acetylglucosaminly beta1 leads to 3 galactosyl beta1 leads to 4 glucosylceramide than in adult erythorocytes. Reactions of glycolipids of gastrointestinal mucosa, with antibodies directed against H3 glycolipid and its degradation products, were compared to that of gastrointestinal tumors. The reaction to bela Glc NAc1 leads to 3 beta Gall leads to 4 Glc leads to ceramide (structure 4), which is the precursor of all blood group glycolipids, was consistently high in many cases of tumor glycolipid than that of normal glycolipid. This as well as other evidence supports a general concept that the process of ontogenesis of a blood group carbohydrate chain occurs as step-by-step elongation and arborization, and that blocking of such a development of a carbohydrate chain occurs in the process of oncogenesis.
The level of plasminogen alpha1-antitrypsin, alpha2-macroglobulin and the platelet count were measured in 511 blood donors. The mean level of alpha1-antitrypsin was significantly lower in men of group B compared with that of group O. No other differences between the blood groups reached statistical significance. Woman had higher mean levels of alpha1-antitrypsin and alpha2-macroglobulin and a higher platelet count than men. The levels of plasminogen and alpha1-antitrypsin were significantly higher in women using oral contraceptive compared with those who were not. The level of alpha2-marcoglobulin fell with age until the 60-64 year age-group in men and the 40-49 year age-group in women. A positive correlation existed between the alpha1-antitrypsin and the alpha2-macroglobulin level and between the platelet count and the plasminogen level.
Many cases of acquired B antigens, always observed in group A subjects have been so far reported. Most of them were found in patients with digestive tract disease, essentially colonic cancer. An investigation on 200 patients in a gastroenterology department showed that this B-like antigen was quite frequent (10,6%); it occurred only in A1 individuals and was related to infectious syndrome. Immunological and serological studies of many cases had shown that this B-like antigen differs from that of normal B cells. Groupe A1 cells transfused to patients acquired B activity; on the contrary group A2 and O cells remained unchanged. Likewise, only A1 cell became active when incubated in vitro with C. Tertium A, known to contain a deacetylase. In 1970, we postulated that a deacetylase enzyme could be responsible for this B-like antigen: this enzyme could transform the N-acetylgalactosamine (A specific sugar) into galactosamine, which could cross react with anti-B sera. The relationship between the acquired B antigen and a deacetylase was recently confirmed: A1 acquired B cells, chemically acetylated lost their B reactivity and enhanced their A1 activity. A polyagglutinability, different from that associated with T, Tn, Cad, Hempas has been always found in acquired B cells; nervertheless, because of its weakness, it could sometimes be unnoticed. Besides, it disappeared prior to B reactivity in case of recovery. Like acquired B activity, it decreased in low pH medium of after acetylation of the cells. Nevertheless, this polyagglutinability appears, contrarly to acquired B antigen, in vitro, on all the cells, irrespective of their ABO phenotypes. A deacetylation of N-acetyl-neruaminic acid could explain such a phenomenon.
The biochemical aspects of the immunodominant structures of blood groups antigens are mainly restricted to the following: ABH and Lewis in secretory fluids or on the red blood cells; P system (P1, P, Pk antigens); MN antigens and related; Tn and Tn antigens; Some hypothesis may be put forward for the I, i antigens. Many other antigens seem to be on the dependence of interactions between proteins and lipids of the red cell membrane; such immunodominant structures are not yet known. Except for the ABH and Lewis groups, the biosynthesis pathways are at present unclear.
The analysis of more than 140 "weak A" samples: A3, Ax, Aend, Am, Ay and Ael, support the classical distinction between each subgroup which has been established on serological and genetical data. Accordingly, a valuable classification of these rare phenotypes must take into account, (i) the mode of inheritance, (ii) the agglutination pattern of the RBC by anti-A reagents, (iii) the presence or absence of soluble A substances in the saliva of secretors. The question is then open to know if such related erythrocytic antigens, whose specificity appears to be very similar, could be described on a quantitative basis or on qualitative structural variations. Evidence for quantitative differences was first demonstrated by a gradual decrease in the standard agglutinability of "weak A" RBC with human anti-A (B) sera, from A3 red cells (63 +/- 10%) to Ax (33 +/- 10%), Aend (10 +/- 5%) then Am, Ay and Ael (0%), and secondly by direct measurement of A antigen site densities, the mean values being respectively 35.10(3) A sites/RBC (A3); 4.8 10(3) (Ax); 3.5 10(3) (Aend) and 0.7 10(3) (Am, Ael). Further investigation on A3, Ax and Aend RBC agglutinability lead also to the demonstration of a large heterogeneity in the A antigenic content of red cells inside one individual sample. The most striking result was obtained with Aend phenotypes which appeared like A + O transmitted mosaicisms. However, heterogeneity was also observed, but to a lesser extent, among A3 and Ax RBC. The significance of this heterogeneity is discussed and used to explained the typical picture of agglutinability commonly observed with such red cells and anti-A antibodies. Qualitative difference were also studied by estimation of equilibrium constants (Ko) and thermodynamic parameters (delta Fo, delta Ho and delta So) associated with the binding of rabbit 125I-IgG anti-A molecules onto A RBC determinants. Only small variations of thermodynamic parameters were observed between each subgroup, but the high Ko values (greater than 10(8)M-1) measured, strongly suggest that "weak A" RBC determinants would process a common antigenic structure of the type: alpha-GalNAc (1 leads to 3) [alphaLFuc (1 leads to 2) beta Gal. However, the small differences of reactivity observed from one sample to an other could be related to slight variations in tridimensional configurations of oligosaccharides chains bearing the A specificity, associated with their variable antigenic content.
A and A1 antigens have been detected on cells of the human erythrocyte series by immunoelectron microscopy. These antigens have been revealed by an indirect method involving various anti-A and anti-A1 antibodies (allo, auto, hetero-antibodies) and peroxidase-conjugated anti-immunoglobulin antibodies. Immunologic labelling has been carried out with erythrocyte or bone marrow cell suspensions which were fixed prior to incubation with reagents. Cells from various A phenotypes were examined. A and A1 antigens were visualized on maturing normoblasts, at every developmental stage. In addition cell to cell variations of the surface labelling of erythrocytes was found in normal phenotypes, suggesting the existence of several populations of cells according to antigenic load.
Although the first weak B phenotypes have been observed some thirty years ago, very few comparative studies have been done until now. In this work, different samples were analysed, using immunogenetic methods, thermodynamics, agglutination kinetics and agglutination profiles. Almost hundred weak B samples were tested, belonging to twenty nine families including cis AB but exclusing acquired B and Bh. Using these methods it could be evidenced that the reactive structures differ from one family to another, but are strictly the same within one family. Consequently, each sample should have been called from the family mane; from a practical point of view, it was but necessary to agree on a simple classification. The simplest criteria were looked for such as agglutination velocity on a tile, agglutination picture, presence or absence of anti-B in serum... Three groups were then distinguished: 1) B3, for which the agglutination velocity is high (less than or equal to 30 inches), giving a typical mixed field agglutination pattern; there is no anti-B in the serum; 2) Bx, for which the agglutination velocity is low (larger than or equal to 30 inches), giving generally a weak agglutination pattern; there is a weak anti-B in serum; 3) Bel, for which there is no agglutination at all; the presence of B antigen on the membrane being evidenced by a fixation-elution test; in these three conditions genetic studies proved the phenotype being due to an allele at the ABO locus, the Bel class is the most "discutable"; when an important secretion of B substance can be evidenced in saliva, and the phenotype is proved to be inherited as a dominant character, the appellation Bm can be proposed. On the contrary, when genetics suggest the presence of a modifying gene, the Bel mod or By appellation can be used, according as the type of modification is dominant or recessive. Only one sample appeared to be unclassable, for which the fixation-elution test is positive, but only 5 to 10% of the red cells are agglutinated, giving a dual population pattern; the galactosyl-transferase activity seems to be normal, as well as the--delta H (20.000 cal/mol.). The B weak appellation appears to be the most appropriate for this given sample. This case expected, the proposed practical classification appears to fit well the studied phenotypes. As the various studies on weak B phenotypes, reported in the literature have not been compared within a same laboratory, using the same technics, it appears illusive to apply the proposed classification to the different reported samples. Several already published samples form a part of the present study, but their appellation do not correspond to the previous one; stricklingly, only few B3 (new appellation) have been described in the literature, which let one think that they might be undetected using classical grouping tests, and thus considered as normal B. Of course, there is not an absolute correspondance between the criteria defining A3, Ax, Ael phenotypes and those proposed here for B3, Bx, Bel...
Materials precipitated from an aqueous extract of house dust by saturation with ammonium sulphate showed immunological reaction with antisera to human serum albumin, human alpha1-acid glycoprotein, human IgG, Gm and Inv antigens and to A, B and H antigens. It is concluded that the albumin and alpha1-acid glycoprotein are of human origin. It seems that the apparent IgG activity is due to cross-reactivity since, from the anticipated specificities of the Fab and Fc fragments of human IgG, the former could not be detected, and since Gm (6) activity was present, unexpectedly, in Swiss house dust. The A, B and H blood group antigenic activities were detected in relative concentration different from those expected if they were solely of human origin. It is concluded that they are from both human and non-human sources.
The application of adsorption chromatography on charcoal-Celite leads the authors to characterize in normal urines a class of fucose-rich oligosaccharides which possess blood group activities and are related to the phenotypes ABH, Le and secretor. Most of these oligosaccharides have a glucose residue in reducing terminal positions. Excretion of some oligosaccharides increases in the urine of diabetic and lactosuric subjects. In spontaneous or induced galactosurias, the elimination of oligosaccharides with a glucose residue in reducing terminal position decreases while appears a large amount of new oligosaccharides which all possess a galactose residue in reducing terminal position. These results lead to the conclusion that urinary oligosaccharides do not originate from glycosphingolipids, but from transglycosylation on carbohydrates which exist free in the organism: glucose for normal and diabetic subjects, lactose or galactose for lactosuric and galactosuric subjects, respectively.
Induced galactosuria is characterized by the excretion in urine of large amounts of new oligosaccharides, the structure of which are in connection with blood-group phenotypes ABH, Lewis and Secretor: O group : O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 2)-D galactopyranose et O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 2)-O-beta-D galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 4)]-O-beta-D 2-deoxy-2 acetamido-glucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 4)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 6)]-D-galactopyranose. A group: O-alpha-D-2-deoxy-2 acetamido-galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 2)]-D galactopyranose et O-alpha-D-2-deoxy-2 acetamido-galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 2)]-O-beta-D galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 4)]-O-beta-D-2-deoxy-2 acetamido-glucopyranosyl-(1 leads to)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 6)]-D galactopyranose. B group : O-alpha-D galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 2)]-D galactopyranose et O-alpha-D galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 2)]-O-beta-D galactopyranosyl-(1 leads to 3)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 4)]-O-beta-D-2-deoxy-2 acetamido-glucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 4)-[O-alpha-L fucopyranosyl-(1 leads to 6)]-D-galactopyranose.
Immunologic, thermodynamic and quantitative studies of ABH antigens. Fifteen samples of cis AB bloods belonging to six unrelated families were tested by serological and thermodynamic assay techniques. The B and H antigens of cis AB bloods differ significantly from those of trans AB bloods. Differences were found among unrelated samples, but identical results were obtained within a given family : this could mean that there had been as many mutations as there were families.
A previous report of other researchers that aqueous phase fractions of erythrocyte stromata of secretors contained more ABH blood group activity than similar fractions of non-secretors was confirmed. The recovery of H activity in the butanol phase extracts of both secretors and non-secretors, which had not been seen previously, is reported here for the first time. Three H specificities were present when the aqueous and butanol phases of group O secretor stromata were examined in inhibition of agglutination studies with anti-H of group Oh and group A1 sera and three lectins. The anti-H (group Oh) sera were inhibited by both aqueous and butanol fractions. Anti-H serum (group A1) and the lectin Ulex europaeus were inhibited by the aqueous fraction only. The lectins Laburnum alpinum and Lotus tetragonolobus were not inhibited by either the aqueous or butanol phase extracts.
Further evidence that RB is not produced by lymphocytes. In a case of chimaeric male twins which showed red and white cell chimaerism, the latter being demonstrated using polymorphism of autosomes, it could be shown that the determinant RB, being defined by lymphocytotoxicity and associated with ABO blood groups and ABH secretor status, is probably absorbed from the serum on to the lymphocyte surface and not produced by the cells themselves.
In a series of 4998 cadaver kidney transplants the extent of HLA matching correlated with transplant outcome in patients with blood-groups other than O (non-O) but not in patients of blood-group O. The high survival-rate of poorly matched kidneys in O recipients was responsible for the lack of correlation between HLA matching and graft survival in these patients. Survival-rates of transplants with 4 HLA mismatches were 52 +/- 3% at one year in 222 O-to-O grafts compared with 24 +/- 5% in 65 B-to-B grafts (P less than 0.0001). In 2827 non-O patients, there was a strong correlation between HLA matching and graft survival (P less than 0.0001 at one year). One possible reason for the cancelling out of the effect of HLA mismatching in type-O recipients is that these patients waited longer on dialysis for a transplant and consequently received more blood-transfusions.
In England, Wales, and Scotland there is a strong association between mortality-rates and ABO blood-group distribution. It is suggested that some of the discrepancies in investigations of the relation between water hardness and mortality-rates from cardiovascular disease may be attributed to genetic influences.
Heat resistant, high mol. wt glycoproteins of the three WZ phenotypes (W+Z+, W-Z+ and W-Z-) were extracted from normal human colonic mucosa and labelled with 125I. More than 80 per cent of the radioactivity of the W+Z+ antigens labelled with I125, was precipitated by natural or immune anti-W antibodies. About 60 per cent of the W-Z+ 125I-labelled antigens were precipitated by immune anti-Z antibodies. No specific precipitation could be detected with W-Z- 125I-labelled antigens. All the precipitin reactions were quantitatively inhibited with the crude antigen extracts of the corresponding phenotypes. The W and Z antigens were only found in the intestinal mucosa and there was a 100-fold increase in the relative concentrations between the small bowel and the rectum. As opposed to this, the ABH antigens were found in all the digestive secretions studied, except those of the rectum, and their relative concentrations progressively decreased by about 100 between the small intestine and the recutm. The decrease in ABH concentration seems to be correlated to a WZ increase in the same regions.
A study of A3, Ax and Aend variants. The distribution of the A receptors was studied among 'agglutinated' and 'free' populations of A variant RBC (A3, AX, Aend) known to be either partially or weakly agglutinated by human anti-A reagents. Following separation of the red cell populations and disaggregation of the clumps by mild treatment with soluble blood group substances, it was shown after appropriate controls, that among A3 ARBC,  the 'agglutinated' RBC have at least five times as 'free' RBC, these latter however being strongly A positive. The differences between the A antigenic content of the AX RBC were less pronounced. The most striking result was obtained with the Aend RBC, where two populations are clearly demonstrated; the first, including 5-10 per cent of the RBC, strongly agglutinates with anti-A and contains erythrocytes of high antigenic content (140,000 A receptors per cell). The second, including the majority of RBC could not be differentiated from the control O RBC. A wide heterogeneity of antibody binding capacity of the various populations of A3, AX and Aend red cells, was also demonstrated following ultrastructural examination by immunoelectron microscopy with peroxidase-conjugated antibodies. Such study reveals furthermore an heterogeneity of labelling from one cell to another in the same population of red blood cells. Comparison of 'week A' RBC and O RBC enzymatically converted into A RBC, demonstrates a similar pattern of reactivity between these cells, and supports the general relationship between antigen site density and red cell agglutination. It is concluded that the typical pattern of agglutinability of A3 and AX RBC arises both from their heterogeneous antigenic content and from the occurrence of an antigenic threshold below which red cells become non-agglutinable. The typical mixed-field agglutination pattern of Aend RBC merely reflects the occurrence of a probably true dual population of RBC. Finally, the mechanisms of inheritance of such well-known Mendelian characters, enabling the production of highly heterogeneous blood cell populations in the same individual, remains to be elucidated.
Sucrases were purified from human small intestine and from areas of intestinal metaplasia of the stomach mucosa surrounding stomach cancers. The kinetic constants and pH activity profiles of enzyme preparations from the two sources were similar. No blood group activity of sucrase was detectable in preparations from three cases of intestinal metaplasia, but preparations from two other cases showed activity like that of the small intestine. These results indicate that sucrase from areas of intestinal metaplasia has similar enzymatic properties to those of enzyme from the small intestine, but that the antigenic sugar moiety of the enzyme associated with blood group activity varies.
The results of a comparative quantitative investigation about the agglutinability of erythrocyte antigens A, B, and H to be found in fetus (fifth to ninth lunar month), newborns, adults, and old age people are represented. In investigating with anti-H sera it could be found that A-antigens in fetus undergo the same development to be observed in newborns; it amounts to 75% of the agglutinability present in adults. After delivery the agglubinability will essentially increase up to the fifth month; it will only reach the average values of adults, however, after the seventh year of age and will remain unchanged then until the end of life. The agglutinability of B-erythrocytes with anti-B will also change in the same way. In fetus and newborns the agglutinability of A1 erythrocytes with anti-A1 sera is markedly weaker than that determined by anti-A sera. After delivery it will rapidly increase, will be stronger afterwards than the agglutinability with anti-A sera and will have the values to be found in adults after the third year of age. After the 85 year of age, however, there is a tendency of weakening the agglutinability with anti-A1 serum. With growing age the agglutinability of O-erythrocytes with anti-H serum is changed in the same way. Furthermore, it could be detected that the interaction between genes A1 and B to be found in adults will find its expression in a weakening of the agglutinability of A1B-erythrocytes with anti-A1 and anti-B sera, the agglutinability with anti-A serum remaining constant. This behaviour is valid for the whole life of man. In all stages of life an interaction between weak and strong genes can be observed in A2B-erythrocytes.
When red cells from the group O blood of adults and newborn infants (cord blood) were incubated with UDP-galactose and group B serum, over 200,000 B sites per cell were generated on adult O cells but only 40,000--70,000 sites per cell on cord cells. It is concluded that smaller amounts of substrate for the B transferase are present on cord cells.
Competitive binding assays of A1 and A2 blood group substances with insolubilized anti-A serum and insolubilized A agglutinin from Dolichos biflorus. Competitive binding assays using 3H-labeled blood group A substance and insolubilized Dolichos biflorus lectin or human anti-A were carried out, measuring competition by blood group A1 and A2 glycoproteins, and by unabsorbed anti-A sera, and with these sera absorbed with the A1 and A2 glycoproteins. With Dolichos lectin specific for (formula: see text) A1 substances had about 11 times as many determinants as did A2 substances, but the slopes of the lines in the competitive binding assays were the same. With insolubilized anti-A, A2 substances gave lines of lower slopes. Although individual A1 populations varied in the amounts giving 50% inhibition in the assays, as did A2 substances, the slopes of the lines for the A1 substances were the same and always higher than the slopes of the lines for the A2 substances. Competitive binding assays with unabsorbed anti-A sera and with these sera absorbed with insoluble polyleucyl A1 and A2 substances showed that partial absorption of polyleucyl A1 substances left antibodies of lower slope in the supernate, whereas absorption with polyleucyl A2 substance left antibodies (anti-A1) having the same or an even higher slope than the unabsorbed sera. The findings indicate that human A1 and A2 glycoproteins differ in their determinants, and that A2 specificity is determined by the type 2 chain in which the A trisaccharide (formula: see text) is linked beta 1 leads to 4 to DGlcNAc, whereas the A1 specificity is determined by the type 1 chain in which this trisaccharide is linked beta 1 leads to 3 to DGlcNAc; most of the determinants in the glycoproteins have a second LFuc linked alpha 1 leads to 3 and alpha 1 leads to 4 to the DGlcNAc of the type 2 and type 1 chains, respectively.
The qualitative and quantitative determinations of A, B, and H antigens were studied in blood samples of 509 normal subjects and 114 patients. 11 of 53 (20.75%), 3 of 27 (1  111%), and 4 of 34 (1  176%) of adults with leukaemia, children with leukaemia and adults with lymphomas, respectively, show significantly lower antigenic scores than normal controls. Since all A, B and H antigens were found to be independently affected, the destruction of well-developed ABH antigens by a certain substance produced during the course of the disease was suspected.
It is argued that Lewis genes are responsible for adding specificity to glycoprotein molecules after the activities of the secretor, H and ABO genes, respectively, have been expressed. This conclusion is based on the results of studies on the expression of ABO and Lewis antigens in salivas from Australian aborigines, and on biochemical results. A simple figure illustrating the antigens determined on red cells and in body secretions as a result of the action of these genes, in their correct order--secretor, H, ABO, Lewis--is presented.
A comparison is made of the specific combining sites of a number of lectins and of antibodies with emphasis on those reacting with blood group A, B, and H determinants. The ranges of site sizes and specificities of both groups are similar both from immunochemical studies and from the limited x-ray diffraction data available.
Investigations of the fixation of 125I-labelled anti-A and anti-I antibodies onto rightside-out and inside-out membrane vesicles prepared from human A1 and OI erythrocytes, respectively, showed that both antibodies were bound to the rightside-out vesicles, giving clear evidence that blood group A and I antigenic sites are exclusively localized on the external surface of the membrane.
Incidence of ABO(H) blood group variants among the Bulgarian population. The result of a screening of ABO (Hh) variants after investigating the blood group of 106,980 persons are presented. The Ax variant is registered most frequently among the Bulgarian population. As a whole the frequencies of ABO blood group variants Ax, Ael, A3, Aend and Am among the Bulgarian population are similar to that established by other authors among the French population and nearly twice as high as among the population of Bombay. The group of H-deficient phenotypes includes AA1Xh, AHm, OHm variants. Their frequency is significantly lower when compared with the frequency of AHm and OHm variants among the population of Thailand. Variants A1 and Aint with unusually high H-content are classified as A1H, A1Hint, Aint H and integrated as a category of H-excess phenotypes. Their incidence among the Bulgarian population is significantly lower than that registered among Maharastrian, South African Bantu and Indian.
Another case of Tn-polyagglutination is described where for 6 years those responses have been observed which are typical of the acquired erythrocyte changes, viz. mixed-field polyagglutination by normal adult sera of all blood groups, no response with anti-TAh, agglutination of a certain part of erythrocytes by anti-TnSs, anti-ADb, anti-AHP, agglomeration of the other part by protamin sulfate and A-like specificity. Papain treatment eliminates polyagglutination by human sera of adults. Sera of new-borns did not agglutinate Tn-erythrocytes. Mrs. B. B. 38 years old belongs to blood group 0 and shows latent signs of haemolysis as well as permanently lowered leukocyte and thrombocyte numbers. The difficulties in blood group serology in connection with polyagglutination are referred too.
The genetics of salivary secretion of ABH blood group substance was investigated. Eight secretor phenotypes were determined by Sephadex G-100 chromatography. Presence or absence of three different fractions were shown to be controlled by three different secretor gene loci. These loci are called Sec1, Sec2 and Sec3. Sec1 controls expression of the traditional secretor status. Sec2 and Sec3 are linked, but distinct, loci controlling the expression of low molecular weight ABH substance in human saliva. A dominant mode of inheritance for the Sec2 and Sec3 systems is described.
The levels of A, H, I and i antigens were measured in the plasma of 185 normal subjects by the agglutination-inhibition method. The presence of H in the plasma was only detectable with immune anti-H. The level of H in the plasma was directly correlated with the amount on the red cells, and was affected by the donor secretor status. The plasma of group O secretors contained more H than the plasma of donors of other phenotypes. On the other hand, I and i plasma antigens were not related to the other systems studied. Unlike the Ii antigens on the red cell membrane, there was no relationship between the levels of I and i in plasma.
In order to test the influence of the plasma substitutes Macrodex 6%, Plasmasteril and Expafusin on subsequent blood-typing and serologic tolerance tests, blood specimens of known donors of blood group 0 Rh negative were incubated with the respective plasma substitutes in various dilutions and serologic tests performed. In the AB0 and Rh system, none of the plasma substitutes tested caused falsely positive agglutinations. Reading of cross-match in the albumin test was not impeded in any of the substitutes. The higher molecular dextran Macrodex 6% and the high molecular hydroxyethylene starch Plasmateril appeared to have positive blood-group serologic reactions. With the low molecular hydroxyethylene starch Expafusin no irritations occurred in all tests of cross-matching.
The antigenicity of human erythrocytes of four different ABO blood groups and sheep erythrocytes of unknown blood type from different individual sheep were analyzed in terms of their cross-reactivity with antibody-producing cells (plaque-forming cells, PFC) and serum antibody in immunized C57BL/6 and C3H/He mice. The antigenicity of human erythrocytes of different ABO blood groups in the C57BL/6 mice, as determined by the number of specific PFC, was, in decreasing order, AB = A greater than B = O (p less than 0,005). The efficiency of immunogenicity of the human erythrocytes in terms of their cross-reactivity with PFC was, in order, AB = A = B greater than O, and the degree of reactinogenicity was, in order, AB greater than A greater than B greater than O. The order of antigenicity of sheep erythrocytes from different animals, SRBC No. 1 - No. 6, was No. 1 (= No. 2) greater than No. 3 = No. 4 = No. 5 greater than No. 6 in C57BL/6 mice and No. 1 = No. 2 = No. 3 = No. 4 = No. 6 greater than No. 5 in C3H/He mice, determined by the number of specific PFC (p less than 0.01). The cross-reactivity of SRBC No. 1 - No. 6 with PFC demonstrates that the order of immunogenicity of SRBC was No. 1 = No. 2 = No. 3 = No. 4 = No. 5 greater than No. 6 in C57BL/6 mice and No. 1 = No. 2 = No. 3 = No. 4 = No. 6 greater than No. 5 in C3H/He mice, and that of their reactinogenicity was No. 1 greater than No. 2 =No. 3 = No. 4 = No. 5 greater than No. 6 in C57BL/6 mice and No. 1 greater than No. 4 = No. 6 greater than No. 2 = No. 3 greater than No. 5 in C3H/He mice. The cross-reactivity at the antibody level was indicative of the immunologic characteristics of blood cells of low antigenicity (human group O erythrocytes and SRBC No. 5 and No. 6). SRBC No. 5 and No. 6 were somewhat opposed to each other regarding antigenicity in C57BL/6 and C3H/He mice. This signifies the presence of different immunogenic components on SRBC No. 5 and No. 6. The production of anti-SRBC No. 1 antibody reached its peak on the third day after secondary immunization. That of anti- SRBC No. 1, cross-reactive with SRBC No. 6, occurred after a longer latent period, reaching its peak on day 6. This indicates that SRBC No. 1 possesses more than one kind of immunogenic component or immunogenic determinant group on its surface.
Samples of blood for estimation of beta-thromboglobulin (BTG) in normal subjects have been obtained both from blood donors at the end of their donation and from other volunteers by standard venepuncture. The former was a satisfactory method in males only. By standard venepuncture females have on average lower values than males and in the pre-menopausal age groups the difference is statistically significant. Mean values vary little up to 59 years after which they rise slowly but steadily. There is no significant difference in the mean B.T.G. values between the ABO blood groups.
Lipids and protein-containing nonlipids of pig erythrocytes, serum and several organs were tested for A blood group activity. Both lipids and nonlipids of brain, myocardium, skeletal muscle and adipose tissue show no A activity. The way of distribution of A activity on lipids and nonlipids of other tissues and serum differs among individual pigs. With respect to the acquisition of A activity of erythrocytes in a postnatal period, it seems likely that the lipidic A substance Tor part of it containing the A determinant) is transferred from plasma to the erythrocyte membrane.
2,140 pregnant Sudanese women attending the antenatal clinic in Omdurman Maternity Hospital during the period November 1975 to December 1976 had ABO and Rh typing performed. Their sera were also screened by a modified papain enzyme technique for the presence of atypical antibodies. The rate of Rhesus immunization, the frequency distribution of blood groups, the atypical antibodies encountered, and the advantages of the method used for screening the sera in a developing country are discussed.
The study deals with a family of 22 members spreading over four generations; 14 members suffer from hereditary angio-neurotic edema; all of them have been typed for 30 antigens of the A and B loci in the HLA System and for ABO and Rhesus erythrocyte markers. There is no connection between the disease and any of the markers considered. As for the HLA system, there should be at least 7 chromosomic recombinants to account for the relationship with one of the haplotypes involved.
Groupamatic 360 can be adapted to the quantitative measurement of erythrocyte agglutination reactions. Here the authors give the necessary conditions to obtain the best sensitivity and the best reproductibility. They have considered globular suspensions, incubation of the erythrocyte antiserums mixtures, centrifugation, agitation, photometric measurement. As concerns the quantitative technique, we used the average peripheral measurement obtained in the twleve cuvettes of the same selected disc sector. The calibration is fixed to 50 mV for a non agglutinated red cell suspension and to 950 mV for albumin in a saline solution. In these conditions, the best discrimination is obtained for agglutination with measures between 400 and 800 mV. The maximum sensitivity is reached with reactions corresponding to 600 mV, that is to say in our selected conditions with 50% of free red cells. The choice of the zone between 500 and 600 mV enables to detect variations from   15 to 2% in an antibody solution concentration. This zone is particularly favorable for quantitative work. Although a part of these operations in this preliminary work were manually effected, the automatic centrifugation, agitation, photometric measurement and results print out make possible a large number of measurements with very satisfactory reproductibility conditions. Besides, these experiments pointed out some factors of improvement which will be helpful for the new 360 G Groupmatic equipments.
A, B, O blood group frequencies and Rh factors were studied in 69 white keratoconus patients and compared with 1,465 healthy white individuals. We did not detect a significant excess of any particular blood group among keratoconus patients. It was concluded that blood groups were not associated with keratoconus.
Survival studies of incompatible red blood cells in a patient with HLA-associated haemagglutinins. Serum from a multitransfused patient with bladder papilloma was examined. The serum contained anti-Kell as well as polyspecific, cytotoxic HLA antibodies and HLA-associated haemagglutinins. The HLA haemagglutinins were demonstrated by the Auto Analyzer method and reacted predominantly with red blood cells (RBC) from HLA-A28-positive individuals, and were distinctly weaker with all other test cells. Survival studies with 51Cr-RBC from an HLA-A28-positive, Kell-negative donor with strong A28 RBC reactivity were performed. A small component of the RBC showed clearly reduced survival time, while the main component showed nearly normal survival.
On a sample of n = 320 unrelated Kureel Chamars (Lucknow district) and n = 314 unrelated Jaiswar Chamars (Jaunpur district) ABO- and Rh(D)-typings have been carried out. The two Chamar groups occupy the lowest position in caste hierarchy. In this paper the question is examined, whether the geographical fission of the both Chamar groups, followed by isolation, has had genetical effects.
ABO and Rho (D) blood groups were studied in  61,023 people receiving medical care at the medical units or blood banks of the Instituto Mexicano del Seguro Social in the metropolitan area in the city of Monterrey, Nuevo Len, so as to determine the genetical inheritance patterns that control these blood antigens, and that were used in the stimation of ABO and Rho (D) incompatibility in married couples and in births with maternal fetal incompatibility. It was found that IMSS populations, regardless of the medical units, can be considered as part of the same one and are different to those observed in blood banks. From the married couples, 28.58 percent were found to be incompatible with ABO and 7.15 percent with Rho (D); in 2.04 percent of cases, maternal fetal incompatibility had a ratio of 15.63 percent in the ABO group and 5.60 percent in the Rho (D) group. Double incompatibility was found in 0.88 percent of cases. The importance of these facts is stressed, considered as significant data for neonatologists and for those working in maternal fetal isoimmunization clinics.
Blood samples taken from the foetus by foetoscopy early in the 2nd trimester of pregnancy can be used for reliable blood grouping. However, the sampling technique is not perfect. In 5 out of 15 pregnant women, no foetal blood was obtained, although between 1 and 10 samples were taken on each occasion. One-third of 56 samples from the 10 women contained foetal blood. Contamination of samples with amniotic fluid varied, but did not interfere with the blood grouping. ABO and Rh typing of the foetus was possible even if the samples were contaminated with large amounts of maternal blood. In nine cases, blood grouping of the foetus was performed on red cells from foetoscopy samples. Control blood samples from the foetus following abortion were obtained in seven of these cases, and the foetoscopic results were confirmed.
A glycoprotein isolated from the cell wall of Trichophyton mentagrophytes was assessed for its cross-reaction with human blood group isoantigens. Rabbit antiglycoprotein antibodies agglutinated human erythrocytes of blood groups A1 and A2, and precipitated Blood Group Substance A in agarose gels. Erythrocytes of blood group B were only slightly agglutinated, and O(Rho+) and O(Rho-) erythrocytes were not. Additionally, the glycoprotein was shown to specifically inhibit isoagglutination of erythrocytes of group A. Partial identity between the glycoprotein and a crude extract of the fungus was demonstrated by immunodiffusion. Analyses revealed the glycoprotein to be composed of approximately 17% protein and 80% carbohydrate. The glycoprotein was found by indirect immunofluorescence to be located in the mycelial cell wall. The possibility that cross-reacting antigens may lead to a chronic, spreading infection is discussed.
Tk polyagglutinable erythrocytes are described in which A and H activities were reduced. It is suggested that Bacteroides fragilis isolated from cultures of the patient's blood was responsible for each of these membrane modifications.
Under observation were 175 patients with ovarian tumors and cysts. The distribution of ABO blood groups and Rh factor in relation to this pathology was studied as compared with the control series (2000 healthy females). There was noted an increased probability of the incidence of the majority of the ovarian tumor types among AB blood group females compared with other groups (O, A and B), and just the opposite, the probability of the tumoriform processes incidence in AB group females is considerably less than in other groups. The probability of ovarian tumors malignification proved to be the least in B group females. There is noted a considerably increased relative ovarian tumor and cyst morbidity among Rh-positive females compared with Rh-negative ones.
A 55-year-old man was admitted to the hospital with a hemoglobin of 8.5 gm/dl. Two units of blood were ordered. The patient's antibody screening was positive in albumin and antiglobulin phases, and crossmatches were incompatible in those same phases. An antibody identification panel was performed and nine of ten cells were positive. The multiple antibodies were identified by special antigen typing of the patient's cells, heat absorptions of the patient's serum with special cells, and tests of the patient's serum against a selected cell panel.
Investigations of HLA and blood-groups were carried out in 68 patients with infectious mononucleosis comprising all known cases diagnosed within one year in a restricted geographical area of Denmark. The HLA distribution of these patients did not differ significantly from that of controls. Combining the results of the present investigation with two previous studies did not show any significantly different distribution from that of combined control groups. The ABO and Rhesus typing was in accordance with that found in a major Danish control group. However, available studies do not exclude the possibility that HLA-D/DR or still unknown HLA factors may be involved in the susceptibility to mononucleosis.
The present study has been conducted on 500 pregnant women belonging to Patiala city (Punjab State, India), during various stages of pregnancy, who were investigated for evidence of immunization. Incidence of immunization was found to be   120% in total sample and 25.00% in Rh (D) negative pregnant women. All the immunized cases were multiparae. Immunized cases were more in second trimester. Obstetrical histories of immunized cases suggest that five of them were probably immunized due to repeated pregnancies and one case was probably due to previous still births. A greater fertility was observed in the immunized group as compared to other groups. No case of immunization had previous history of blood transfusion. Rh-immunization was also studied in relation to AB0-incompatibility.
The distribution of 16 antigens of the HLA-A and 15 antigens of the HLA-B series of HLA system, the blood groups ABO, and Rh antigens were studied in 40 alcoholics with cirrhosis, 18 alcoholics without cirrhosis, and in normal control subjects. The group of alcoholics with cirrhosis showed a significantly high frequency of HLA-B13 (corrected P less than 0.01) when compared with normal subjects, while the frequency of HLA-B13 was similar to normal in alcoholics without cirrhosis. On the basis of these findings, its seems that the carriers of HLA-B13 are more susceptible to liver damage caused by alcohol. Both groups of alcoholics and the normal controls had a similar distribution of ABO blood groups and Rh antigens.
The type and antibody screen is a safe, economical substitute for "routine" two-unit crossmatch in those elective surgical procedures rarely necessitating blood transfusion. This report confirms a previous finding that the type and antibody screen is 99,99% effective in preventing the transfusion of incompatible blood. The type and antibody screen is even safer than the stated 99,99%, when the immediate spin, saline and albumin procedures (the initial portion of the authors' complete crossmatch) are performed prior to releasing blood in an emergency situation. The immediate spin procedures not only verify the ABO compatibility but also detect any high-titer antibodies directed against low-incidence antigens that might not have been present on the screening reagent erythrocytes. The use of the type and antibody screen is applicable only in those medical facilities that have moderate reserves of blood readily available for transfusion.
Fifteen polymorphic systems of the blood (ABO, MNSs, Rhesus, P, Kell, Duffy, Kidd, Hp, Gc, Gm, Inv, aP, PGM1, EsD, and 6-PGD) were examined in 191 unrelated male and female patients suffering from malignant melanoma. These polymorphic systems were compared with the corresponding phenotype and gene frequencies of controls from the same geographical area (Rhineland-Palatinate). The only associations discovered were the ABO and Gm polymorphisms: The incidence of O and Gm(-1) phenotypes in patients is obviously higher than in controls. These observations agree with the findings in other population samples from Germany and Bulgaria.
Using human erythrocytes of known antigenic density, sensitized by ABO and Rhesus (D) alloantibodies, it is shown that K cell cytotoxicity mediated by peripheral blood lymphocytes is directly correlated with the number of IgG molecules specifically bound to the target cell surface. The lytic sensitivity of P1k but not P2 or p erythrocytes coated with anti-Tja (anti-P + P1 + Pk) antibodies, demonstrates that effector K cells are mainly triggered through the IgG ANTI-Pk component of such sera.
Genetically conditioned traits: blood groups ABO, MN and Rh were studied in 695 patients with osteochondrosis and in the population. Among the patients blood groups AB, N and Rh-negative were more frequent than in the control. Blood groups can be regarded as risk factors in vertebral osteochondrosis. Sex and age differences were found.
The paper reports the distribution of A1A2BO and Rho (D) blood groups among five tribal populations, Koya Dora, Raj Gond, Naikpod, Pardhan and Lambadi from three districts of Andhra Pradesh, South India. Blood samples from a total of 1090 unrelated individuals were tested. Koya Doras were, however, sampled from five distant localities to find out intratribal variation, if any. In A1A2BO blood group system the combined frequencies of "P1" and "P2" among the five Koya Groups always exceeded the frequency of "q", a characteristic feature of many tribal populations of Andhra Pradesh. However, among Raj Gond, Naikpod, Pardhan and Lambadi tribes the frequency of "q" is higher than "p" with the maximum in Pardhans. The frequency of "r" is always higher than the combined frequencies of "p1" and "p2" except in Raj Gonds. The higher frequency of "q" over "p" among Naikpod, Pardhan and Lambadi tribes is indicative of a tendency towards the distribution pattern found in North India. A few Rh negative persons were detected only in Koya Dora, Raj Gond and Lambadis indicating that the allele r (cde) is present in these populations, although in a low frequency.
The authors have made a serious effort to present the distribution of ABO and D antigens in SRM for the first time after many uers of these antigens in a representative group in a whole population and according to different nationalities. Also, the comparison as done between obtained results and some others (results from some other countries and from other republics in Yugoslavia). The gene frequency of ABO system was analised.
The use of the 15 channels blood grouping autoanalyzer with automated recording and interpretation proved its fiability through more than 30 000 tests for ABO, Rh and Kell determinations. Misreactions come mostly from the carry-over phenomenom. However no discrepancy was noticed for ABO determination. Only few ones occured for Rhesus and Kell, leading to false positive interpretations which were always corrected by checking the event recorder track. New improvements are expected from the automatic phasing using a microprocessor and further extents are setting up with the connection to a computer.
Rh-positive erythrocytes were enriched and depleted of membrane cholesterol, and the mediated change in the degree of exposure of the D antigens was determined by fluorescence-activated cell sorting, using indirect fluorescent antibody labeling. The results are compatible with a model in which the expression of the D antigens can be modulated significantly by the lipid microviscosity (eta). At a high cholesterol-to-phospholipid ratio (C/PL) of   155, which corresponds to eta (25 degrees C) = 7.5 poise (1 poise = 0.1 Pa.sec), the relative detectable number of D antigens was about double than that at C/PL = 0.65, eta (25 degrees C) = 4.1 poise. In analogous experiments similar fluidity changes resulted in only about 20% modulation of expression of the A1 antigen, suggesting that in the native state this antigen is already well exposed on the erythrocyte surface. This type of antigenic modulation may also operate in vivo, and may thus bear some fundamental implications on tumor immunology and autoimmune diseases.
Phenotype distributions of some genetic polymorphisms are reported in a sample of 721 diabetics and 515 non-diabetic, non-blood donor controls. Reference is also made, in the case of the ABO and Rhesus systems, to previously published results for blood donors resident in the Durham area. Non-insulin-taking diabetics show an increased frequency of blood group A1 (and A1 + A2) when compared with controls. This difference is particularly marked in male diabetics. When diabetics are compared with age matched controls, the difference is confined to the older cases. It is proposed that this effect is predominantly the result of a deficiency of group A1 in controls rather than the result of increased susceptibility to the disease among A1 people. No association with any of the Rhesus phenotypes is shown. In non-diabetics, the results suggest an enhanced survival value for the rr genotype. No significant associations are seen when the MNSs, Kell, Lewis, Duffy, haptoglobin, red cell acid phosphatase, phosphoglucomutase, adenylate kinase, and adenosine deaminase distributions in these groups of subjects are compared.-
The patients were observed by a reanimation-hematological team of the Leningrad emergency service. It has been established that the hemorrhagic syndrome is the main one deterimining the unity of pathogenesis and clinical picture of the hemotransfusional complication. Phase character of the changes in the homeostasis system during the transfusion of incompatible blood was noted. The express diagnosis of the disorders and a scheme of the sequence of administration of hemostatic drugs are proposed. Mortality among such patients was reduced.
Red cells and serum from two Bh variants (B+H-cells) have been investigated for B and H blood group glycosyltransferases. The H enzyme could not be detected using either type 1 or type 2 chain acceptors. The B enzyme was present in normal amount when 2'-fucosyllactose was used as substrate, neither 6'-fucosyllactose nor 6'-fucosyllactosamine could act as acceptors for the B enzyme. Upon treatment of the Bh red cells by the B-degrading enzyme from Trichomonas foetus the B antigen was destroyed while H determinants were uncovered (B-H + cells). The cells thus treated could be further converted into A&H-red cells by the action of the A transferase from human blood group A serum. Previous treatment of the B-H + cells by the H-degrading enzyme from T. foetus, however, led to B-/-erythrocytes and prevented their conversion into A red blood cells by the A enzyme. The results clearly demonstrate that, as found in normal B individuals, the B antigen from Bh cells is built up from the H precursor and provide additional evidence that H is not a completely silent gene in Bh individuals.
For detection of ABO substances in the saliva of the cynomolgus monkey, the mixed cell agglutination reaction (MCAR) gave specific and clear results with a very small amount of saliva. Anti-A and anti-B antibodies in the sera of the same species showed the clearest hemagglutination by the saline agglutination method. The combined use of both methods was demonstrated to be easily and accurately applicable to the determination of human-type ABO blood groups of the cynomolgus monkey.
ABO and Rh (D--,dd) phenotype frequencies and gene frequencies are reported on 1547 pregnant women from different populations in the Outer Hebrides. There was significant heterogeneity of ABO gene frequencies in the Isle of Lewis, but not in or between other populations. More heterogeneity was apparent at the Rh locus, significant amounts being present between the populations of rural Lewis, between Lewis and Harris and between Lewis, Harris and the combined populations of North and South Uist, Benbecula and Barra. There was no evidence of heterogeneity due to religion in Benbecula or South Uist. Data on exogamy and endogamy suggest that migration between the various populations has been at a level sufficient to prevent or correct any tendency to genetic diversification. It is suggested tentatively that the heterogeneity observed may be the result of the massive emigration from the islands which has occurred over the last 150 years.
Pepsin 1, the ulcer-associated pepsin, occurred significantly more frequently in the gastric juice of those patients with duodenal ulcer who did not secrete A, B, or H antigens into gastric juice than in those secreting these antigens. This observation may explain the increased proportion of such non-secretors among patients with duodenal ulceration. In patients with gastric ulcer and non-ulcer dyspepsia, and in a miscellaneous group of patients, there was no association of pepsin 1 secretion with secretor status, suggesting that the association noted in duodenal ulceration is an indirect rather than a direct one. No increase of pepsin 1 occurred in group O patients with peptic ulcer, so that the increased proportion of such patients in peptic ulcer does not arise from differences in pepsin 1 secretion.
A statistical research has been carried on 334 pregnant women considering the variation of leucocyte number and leucocyte formula beginning from the 2nd month on. The resulting variations either of the leucocyte number or their formula structure might favour etiological researches for a better understanding of the deep changes caused by pregnancy. These variations refer also to blood group (ABO) and Rh (D) factor.
Urine and stool specimens from 425 school children in Swaziland were examined for evidence of Schistosoma mansoni or Schistosoma haematobium infection. Concurrently, saliva collections were analysed for ABH secretory ability and blood samples were typed for ABO, Rh and Lewis groups. Among individuals infected with S. mansoni, the frequency of blood group B was significantly increased (P < 0.001), and there was a greater prevalence of positive secretor status (P < 0.05). In contrast, the presence and severity of S. haematobium infection did not correlate with any of the variables tested.
The recent observation by Arndt-Hansen et al. (1974) of increased frequency of blood group A over group O in blood donors positive for the hepatitis associated antigen has been investigated in Down's syndrome, in order to establish if this could account for the increased frequency of the antigen in that syndrome. Seventy-one of 227 subjects with Down's syndrome (3  13%) were found to be positive for the antigen by haemagglutination, and comparison of these with the HAA-subjects failed to reveal any differences in the ABO blood groups.
The absorption-elution method allows the determination of the blood group properties of the ABO-System from human teeth. The results of own investigations carried out on a larger number of specimens are reported. The significance of the determination of the blood group antigens in teeth for the forensic stomatology is emphasized.
The study of the genic and antigenic frequencies of the ABO and Rhesus systems amidst a population of 16559 subjects, reveals are very good correlation as regards the various autors. Considering the HLA typing of 481 subjects, one will point out the lowering of the HLA2 antigen.
In health up to 6% of human lymphocytes will form rosettes with homologous group O rhesus-negative erythrocytes (H rosettes). Increased numbers of H rosettes were found in T-cell-proliferative diseases-- namely, infectious mononucleosis, Szary's syndrome, and T-cell leukaemia. H-rosette formation is thus a marker for a subpopulation of T lymphocytes, and this easily performed test of T-cell activation may have clinical value in characterising changes in blood lymphocyte populations in disease.
Nine cases of autoantibodies in the ABO-system, found by routine investigations, showed the following specificities by agglutination, absorption, and elution techniques: 5 anti-AI, 2 anti-(not-I)-A, I anti-BI and 1 anti-HI. Neutralization experiments by blood group substances revealed heterogeneity among the 5 anti-AI-cases. This is interpreted by different antibody specificities directed against I-antigen components. The relations between the ABO- and Ii-systems are discussed. The occurrence of these antibodies is attributed to oligosaccharides, which are common to both antigen systems. The etiology remains unknown.
By means of ferritin- and gold-labelled protectin from the albumen gland of the edible snail Helix pomatia the blood group antigen A was located on human erythrocytes of groups A1, A2 and A1B. With erythrocytes of groups O and B the reaction is negative. The antigen is focally distributed on the outer surface of the cell membrane. Cells from groups A1 and A1B have an antigen A concentration about 4 times greater than A2 cells. The numbers of particles after tagging with ferritin or gold are comparable. The gold particles show an extremely high contrast and are therefore very suitable for the immunoelectron microscopic localization of antigens.
Blood groups of the ABO system were studied in 186 chronic carriers of typhoid bacilli and in 392 patients with typhoid fever from various districts of the Uzbek SSR. In comparison with control (healthy persons), carriers displayed a higher percentage of persons with A (II) blood group (50.88 and 42.64 against 37.51 and 32.13 in control) and a lesser percentage of persons with the O (I) blood group (2  105 and 22.48 against 32.93 and 32.07 in control). These data demonstrated that predisposition of persons with the A (II) blood group to chronic typhoid carrier state was characteristic of the Asian part of the country. In comparison with control, there were significantly less persons with the O (I) blood group and more with the AB (IV) blood group. Possible correlative mechanisms between the blood group and the typhoid infection and the development of chronic typhoid carrier state is discussed.
The distribution of ABO, Rh and MN blood groups among 6450 persons of six main nationalities in Karaganda is found to be the following (in percent); O blood group-Ukrainians (34.04+/-  15), Germans (35.46+/-  15), Kazakhs(34.62+/-  16), Tatars (35.9+/-2.2), Russians (37.01+/-  15), Byelorussians (40.36+/-2.4); A blood group--Kazakhs (27.47+/-  15), Tatars (32.57+/-2.1), Russians (32.66+/-  15), Byelorussians (37.23+/-2.4), Ukrainians (37.70+/-  15), Germans (46.32+/-  15); B blood group--Germans (13.37+/-  11), Byelorussians (16.55+/-  18), Ukrainians (19.30+/-  13), Russians (23.11+/-  13), Tatars (24.22+/-0.2), Kazakhs (28.33+/-  15); AB blood group--Germans (4.85+/-0.7), Byelorussians (5.86+/-  12), Tatars (7.30+/-  12), Russians (7.22+/-0.8), Ukrainians (8.96+/-0.9). Reliable differences in Rh system were discovered only in Kazakhs and Tatars, among persons of different nationalities.
The phenotypes with their respective alleles frequencies of the ABO system were studied in 33 230 individuals of 9 ethnic groups of the Transcarpathian Region population. Statistically significant differences in allele frequencies were found in Gypsies, Germans and Slovaks as compared to those in the main Ukrainian population. There are significant differences between Hungarians and Gypsies of the Transcarpathian Region and analogous populations beyond the region. Absence of a reliable difference between gene pools of the Slav groups of the population and of Hungarians may point to the local origin of the later.
In experiments on 30 animals and in observations over the course of acute closed craniocerebral trauma in 24 patients is was found that the course and prognosis of a posttraumatic period were dependent on the functional activity of the sympathoadrenal system and cholin- and serotoninergic processes. Based on the data obtained, it is concluded that the character of neurohumoral interrelations can serve as the prognostic criterion in craniocerebral traumas, whereas the information about these processes--in selecting the appropriate therapy.
Electrical and mechanical activities of the longtitudinal muscle of the dog antrum were recorded with the double sucrose-gap technique. 2. The muscle exhibited spontaneous action potentials which consisted of a spike-like potential which, after a brief and partial repolarization, was followed by a negative-going, plateau-type potential. In 97% of the preparations, no tension changes were produced by spontaneous action potentials. 3. Tetrodotoxin, atropine, alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor antagonists, and H1 and H2 receptor blocking agents had no effect on the action potential. It was concluded that the action potential was myogenic in origin. 4. The mean frequency of the action potential at 37+/- 0.5 degrees C was   10/min+/-0.06 (s.e. of mean, n=92) and the mean duration 7.1+/-0.2 sec (s.e. of mean, n=11). 5. Steady depolarizing current increased whereas hyperpolarizing current decreased the frequency of the action potential. 6. Length-tension relations were studied. In twelve strips, the average resting, passive, tension at LO was 570 mg. The active force of isometric contraction produced by acetylcholine increased with strip length up to a maximum, then decreased wtih further increased in length. There were no mechanical responses to pentagastrin. 7. Pentagastrin had two sites of action. On smooth muscle, it increased the frequency of the action potential in a dose dependent fashion. Threshold concentraions ranged from 2X10-14 to 10-11M. The ED50 was 2X10-10M. The maximum response, 5.4/min, was reached at 10-8M. Pentagastrin also released acetylcholine from intramural cholinergic nerves. 8. Pentagastrin reduced the amplitude and duration of the action potential.
The amounts of oxytocin released during Ferguson and vago-pituitary reflexes are estimated by measurements of intramammary pressure. For the milk-ejection reflex, the gain in weight of the young over a period of 30 minutes is taken as an indirect index of the release of oxytocin. 2. Antagonists of specific cholinoceptors and adrenoceptors were injected into the third ventricle in order to delineate the role of the mediators and receptors in the control of oxytocin release. 3. The results suggest that three reflexes have a specific chemical transmission since: a) The Ferguson reflex is inhibited by the drugs that only block alpha and beta adrenoceptors. b) The vago-pituitary reflex is inhibited by the drugs that block alpha and beta adrenoceptors and muscarinic cholinoceptors. c) The milk-ejection reflex is inhibited by the drugs that block alpha adrenoceptors and muscarinic and nicotinic cholinoceptors.
The response of human erythrocytes to cholinergic ligands was studied with an electron spin resonance assay. The membrane response to carbamyl choline was found to be antagonized by atropine and, in the absence of calcium, by tetrodotoxin. Experiments with resealed ghosts showed that the membrane response to carbamyl choline required ATP and calcium. Reductive alkylation of intact cells eliminated the cholinergic response, but the presence of saturating amounts of carbamyl choline protected the putative receptor against inactivation. Affinity labeling was used to demonstrate an apparent molecular weight of 41,000 for the carbamyl choline-binding species. A lipid vesicle extraction technique was used to induce a specific cation permeability defect in intact cells. Preliminary investigation of this phenomenon is described.
Microwave irradiation of 6 kw at 2450 MHz for 300 msec was sufficient to completely inactivate mouse brain cholinesterase and choline acetyltransferase. After this method of sacrifice, the acetylcholine contents of mouse brain regions, given in nanomoles per gram, were found to be: striatum, 81; medulla-pons, 44; diencephalon-midbrain, 34; hippocampus, 31; cerebral cortex, 26; and cerebellum, 17. Sodium pentobarbital caused a dose-dependent increase in whole brain acetylcholine. A maximal increase of 81% in whole brain was seen at 15 minutes with 80 mg/kg of sodium pentobarbital. The increase in acetylcholine after sodium pentobarbital treatment was not caused by anoxia from respiratory depression or by hypothermia. All brain regions except the cerebellum exhibited an increase in acetylcholine after pentobarbital treatment. Fifteen minutes after treatment, cerebellar acetylcholine was significantly decreased. However, at the time when half of the animals had regained the righting reflex, the unconscious mice showed an increase in cerebellar acetylcholine which was statistically significant  as compared to control. The relative accumulation rate of acetylcholine calculated for cerebral cortex and hippocampus was higher than that for striatum although the absolute rate of accumulation of ACh was higher in the striatum. Thus, after sodium pentobarbital treatment, the cerebral cortex and hippocampus exhibit a greater cholinergic response than the striatum.
Right ventricular kitten papillary muscles were incubated with dibutyryl adenosine 3',5'-monophosphate (db-cAMP) at varying concentrations from 1 X 10(-4) M to 1 X 10(-3) M. A positive inotropic effect was observed with all concentrations of db-cAMP. Concomitant administration of 5 X 10(-4) M monobutyryl guanosine 3',5'-monophosphate and 1--2 X 10(-4) M db-cAMP did not produce an inotropic response. At the biochemical level cardiac guanyl cyclase activity is enhanced 2--3 times with acetylcholine and this enhancement is completely blocked by atropine. This increased activity appears to be the result of a decrease in the Michaelis constant (Km) for GTP. Calcium also produces a significant activation of guanyl cyclase activity.
Changes in enzymatic activities in phosphorolytic and hydrolytic glycogenolysis in the working heart and in resting skeletal muscle after intravenous injection of sympathicolytic compounds were studied in vitro. Reserpine, alderline and ligation of the adrenals inhibited the influence of acetylcholine on phosphorylase, Reserpine alone or ligation of the adrenals caused an increase in hydrolytic activity similar to that produced by compounds acting on the ganglia. This confirms the concept according to which the adrenergic system (beta-receptor) inhibits hydrolytic activity during glycogenolysis.
Superfused hamster stomach strip has been used in the bioassay of prostaglandin E2 (PGE2) and acetylcholine. The preparation proved very stable and had no spontaneous movements. The sensitivity to PGE2 (and PGE1) was in the range of 10(-9) g ml(-1) and to acetylcholine 10(-12) g ml(-1). After treatment with physostigmine the sensitivity to acetylcholine was 10(-15) g ml(-1). In acetylcholine determination the preparation is more sensitive than any other method.
Three and 4 day old embryonic chicken hearts were examined for their responsiveness to acetylcholine and presence of acetylcholinesterase (AChE) to determine the role of the enzyme in the cardiac effects of the transmitter. The effects of acetylcholine on rate and contractility of 3 day old hearts were indistinguishable from those on 4 day old hearts. The effects were readily blocked by atropine at both stages of development. In 3 day old hearts the responses to acetylcholine were not affected by the AChE inhibitor physostigmine but in 4 day old hearts they were considerably potentiated. The effect of acetylcholine on the rates of 4 day old hearts is of short duration (5 min or less). In 3 day old hearts it persists for a much longer time. Thus, the appearance of AChE in the embryonic heart of the chicken does not seem to modify the responsiveness of the cholinergic receptor to the transmitter.
Light scattering methods have been used to examine the aggregation in aqueous solution of a series of antiacetylcholine drugs based on the diphenylmethane nucleus. The drugs investigated included adiphenine hydrochloride, piperidolate hydrochloride, benztropine mesylate, orphenadrine hydrochloride, chlorphenoxamine hydrochloride, lachesine hydrochloride, poldine methylsulphate, pipenzolate bromide, clidinium bromide, benzilonium bromide and ambutonium bromide. A micellar pattern of association was established for all compounds and critical micellar concentrations and aggregation numbers have been determined.
Levels of acetylcholine were significantly elevated in the telencephalon and diencephalon + mesencephalon of rats killed by near-freezing during conditioned suppression of food-reinforced lever pressing, whereas levels of serotonin, dopamine, and norepinephrine were not altered. These neurochemical changes were not seen in rats serving as controls for conditioning experience, activity levels, or stimulus presentation.
Cholinergic stimulation of the lateral hypothalamic neurons with intrahypothalamic microinjections of acetylcholine or carbachol caused a marked increase in the content of the active form of glycogen (starch) synthase in the liver. Total activity of the enzyme (active plus inactive forms) was not increased significantly. The lowest effective dose of acetylcholine was 5 X 10(-10) mole, and the optimum dose was 5 X 10(-9) mole. Similar applications of other neurotransmitters, such as norepinephrine, dopamine, serotonin, and gamma-aminobutyric acid, did not affect the enzyme's activity.
The self-association of the antiacetylcholine drugs, propantheline bromide, methantheline bromide and methixene hydrochloride in aqueous solution, has been examined by surface tension, light scattering and conductimetric methods. Surface tension graphs were similar to those of conventional surfactants, showing apparent critical micelle concentrations (cmc) at distinct inflection points. Surface tension measurements in the presence of increasing amounts of electrolyte indicated a decrease in the apparent cmc with increase in electrolyte concentration for propantheline bromide. Light scattering curves for propantheline bromide in electrolyte solution showed no significant discontinuity attributable to a cmc. A mode of self association involving aggregate growth by the stepwise addition of monomers was assumed and equilibrium constants for the initial stages of the association were evaluated. An increase in the magnitude of the stepwise association constants with increase in electrolyte concentration was noted. Integration of the light scattering data according to 1n x = oo [(M/Mapp) - 1] dln c (where M and M app are the monomer and apparent aggregate weights respectively and x is the weight fraction of monomers) showed an asymptotic increase in monomer concentration towards a limiting concentration, as the solution concentration, c was increased. Limiting monomer concentrations determined by this method were in reasonable agreement with the apparent cmcs from surface tension studies. It was not possible to detect a cmc for methantheline or propantheline bromide from conductivity measurements.
A method for determination of acetylcholine in small, discrete biological objects by use of ion-pair technique has been developed. Acetylcholine is extracted as an ion pair with 3,5-di-t-butyl-2-hydroxybenzenesulphonate and separated from co-extracted components by ion-pair partition chromatography with picrate as the counter ion and porous cellulose as support. The quantitative evaluation is made from the acetylcholine peak in the chromatogram obtained by ultraviolet detection. Acetylcholine has been analysed in 1 cm large pieces of rat sciatic nerve containing about 60 pmol (10 ng). The overall recovery of the method is 100 +/- 10% at the 120 pmol level of acetylcholine in a sample.
The administration of choline in doses previously shown to elevate brain acetylcholine concentrations also increases the activity of tyrosine hydroxylase in rat caudate nuclei. This response can be blocked by atropine, a muscarinic antagonist. These findings indicate that choline-induced increases in acetylcholine concentrations may be associated with parallel changes in the amount of the neurotransmitter released into synapses.
An active concentrative component of the ACh accumulation in fragments of human term placenta followed kinetics predicted by the Michaelis-Menten equation (Km greater than 15 mM). This process was competitively inhibited by choline or hemicholinium-3, suggesting the possibility that a common carrier existed. Morphine reduced the 3 H-ACh uptake competitively. Imipramine, desmethylimipramine, haloperidol and chlorpromazine decreased the concentration ratios. This effect was uncompetitive with respect to chlorpromazine. Compared to drug actions on the ACh uptake in innervated tissue drug effects in the placenta were much less predictable for various classes of compounds.
The synthesis of acetylcholine, as well as catecholamines, was studied by assaying the activities of choline acetyltransferase (ChA) and tyrosine hydroxylase (TH) in the tumor tissues and the culture cells of human neuroblastoma. In the majority of 20 neuroblastomas of sympathetic origin, both ChA and TH activities were detected at a significantly high level. In the culture cells of five cell lines of human neuroblastoma, ChA activity was high, but TH was negative in four of the lines. However, it was observed that these enzyme activities changed significantly while in the long-term culture. ChA assay is a useful diagnostic test for neuroblastomas that synthesize acetylcholine. Future studies of neuroblastoma should consider cholinergic activity.
There are two kinds of adrenergic receptors in rat fundus (stomach), the alpha receptors are stimulated with adrenaline and noradrenaline and can be blocked effectively with azapetine and the beta receptors are stimulated with isoprenaline and adrenaline and can be blocked effectively with propranolol. Adrenaline, noradrenaline and isoprenaline all produce inhibition of acetylcholine induced contractions in both untreated and reserpinized tissues that can be antagonized with azapetine and propranolol on its specific receptors but propranolol has a greater capacity to decrease the sensitivity of both untreated and reserpinized tissues to isoprenaline and adrenaline than azapetine can in case of noradrenaline and adrenaline.
A study was made of the synthesis of acetylcholine (ACh) and other transmitters by the cell bodies of functionally identified neurons in leech segmental ganglia. 2. Choline acetyltransferase, the synthetic enzyme for ACh, was detected in excitatory motoneurons but not in mechanosensory cells or Retzius cells. The ability of motoneurons to synthesize ACh was also demonstrated by their accumulation of [3H]ACh following incubation of segmental ganglia with [3H]choline. [3H]ACh was not detected in the other cell types. When eserine was included in [3H]choline incubations, the amount of [3H]ACh in motoneurons increased severalfold and small amounts of [3H]ACh (1% that in motor cells) appeared in extracts of sensory and Retzius cells. 3. In addition to [3H]ACh segmental ganglia synthesized [3H]5-HT, [3H]gamma-aminobutyric acid, [3H]dopamine, and [3H]octopamine from exogenous, labeled precursors. None of these labeled transmitters was detected in identified neurons except [3H]5-HT, which was found in Retzius cells. 4. These results provide biochemical evidence that excitatory motoneurons in the leech are cholinergic, but leave open the identity of the sensory transmitter(s).
The commonly used buffering agent tris(hydroxymethyl)methylamine (tris) antagonizes the action of iontophoretically applied acetylcholine on neurons of Aplysia californica. Concentrations of 5 to 10 millimolar tris markedly reduced both excitatory and inhibitory responses.
The effects of changes in the pH of Tyrode's solution on the responses of isolated guinea pig ileum preparation to acetylcholine and histamine were studied. At higher levels of pH (increased alkalinity), the responses of the tissue to both acetylcholine and histamine were increased. At lower pH levels (increased acidity), the response of the tissue to acetylcholine was increased but that to histamine was reduced.
Cultured human neuroblastoma cell lines were assayed for biochemical characteristics of neuonal function. Cell lines studied included LA-N-1, LA-N-2, IMR-32, SK-N-SH, and SK-N-MC. Veratridine-dependent uptake of 22Na+ implied the presence of the action potential Na+ ionophore in LA-N-1, LA-N-2, IMR-32, and SK-N-SH. The time course of 22Na+ uptake and inhibition of uptake by tetrodotoxin supported this. SK-N-MC had no veratridine-dependent 22Na+ uptake. Tyrosine hydroxylase (EC   114.10.), glutamic acid decarboxylase (EC 41  115), and acetylcholine contents in neuroblastoma cells were compared to those in brain. LA-N-1 and IMR-32 contained 15 and 5 times as much tyrosine hydroxylase, respectively, whereas LA-N-2, SK-N-SH, and SK-N-MC contained only 0.5 to 5% of that in brain. Acetylcholine was present in -LA-N-2 in 15- to 20-fold greater quantities than in brain; other lines had only 10 to 50% of that in brain. None of the cell lines contained glutamic acid decarboxylase. Thus, continuously propogated human neuroblastoma cell lines may have the action potential Na+ ionophore and may be adrenergic (LA-N-1 and IMR-32), cholinergic (LA-N-2), or inactive (SK-N-SH and SK-N-MC). This is the first demonstration of the action potential Na+ ionophore and of acetylcholine production in human neuroblastoma cell lines.
The effects of local distension of the intestinal wall on the release of acetylcholine (ACh) from the adjacent non-distended part were studied with the segment os isolated guinea pig ileum. Local distension of the intestinal wall induced the increased release of ACh in the distended part and in its anal side but not in its oral side. Such aboral release of ACh by local distension was abolished by tetrodotoxin or atropine in the concentrations which did not block the release in the distended part. When hexamethonium was applied exclusively to the distending part, significant increase of ACh release was observed in both the regions oral to and anal to the distended part. It is suggested that distension stimuli applied to the myenteric plexus are transmitted aborally along the network of the Auerbach's plexus to the anal direction. The release of ACh from the intestine by nicotine or DMPP differed from the occurring during local distension in that the release was localized to the part of the intestine to which the drug was applied.
Possible adrenergic mechanisms involved in acetylcholine (ACh) induced potassium movements in the sinus node have been investigated using a tracer potassium (42K) and a microelectrode technique. The ACh-induced increase in 42K uptake was enhanced by propranolol and was unaffected by phentolamine. Reserpinization neither prevented the ACh-induced increase in 42K uptake nor the enhanced effect in the presence of propranolol. In reserpinized preparations, ACh-induced 42K uptake was the same before and after norepinephrine (NE) administration, but was greater after acute reserpinization. NE alone induced an increase in 42K uptake but the simultaneous administration of ACh and NE provoked an increase in 42K uptake similar to that obtained with ACh alone. When both neuromediators and atropine were given simultaneously, an increase in 42K uptake did not occur. Thus, the ACh induces an increase in 42K uptake independently of NE. ACh antagonizes the NE effect on 42K uptake independently of a muscarinic interaction.
The quaternary ammonium compound, methantheline, was found to antagonize acetylcholine induced contractions in isolated guinea pig ileum by a mechanism which did not conform to the criteria for either competitive or non-competitive inhibition. Enhancement of the lipid solubility of methantheline by formation of an ion pair with trichloracetate failed to influence its cholinergic inhibitory activity. The results suggest that in the guinea pig ileum a) an intracellular site of action does not exist for methantheline and b) the membrane receptors for methantheline most likely are located in an aqueous environment.
Photoresponsiveness by Gymnodinium splendens Lebour was monitored quantitatively by a microscope-television system. Exposure to the catecholamines DOPA and Dopamine caused a decrease in light sensitivity, while 0.01 mM norepinephine, or isoproterenol did not affect photoresponsiveness. Classical catecholamine blocking agents, dichloroisoproterenol, propranolol, and dibenzyline, and an inhibitor of DOPA synthesis, alpha-methyl-rho-tyrosine, caused an increase in sensitivity. In addition, acetylcholine and an inhibitor of acetylcholinesterase activity, eserine, caused an increase in sensitivity, while an inhibitor of acetylcholine action atropine, had the opposite effect. These experiments suggest that G. splendens may have an antagonistic catecholamine-cholinergic system which participates in regulating photosensitivity.
The aim of the present work was to explain the mechanism of the stimulating effect of adrenaline (A) on acetylcholine (ACh) synthesis. This action is exerted most probably through the beta- adrenergic receptors, since propranolol and oxprenolol inhibit the stimulating effect of adrenaline on acetylcholine synthesis in the rat cerebral cortex in vitro. Dihydroergotamine does not show such effect. Practolol and phentolamine decrease the spontaneous synthesis of ACh in concentration several times lower than that inhibiting the ACh synthesis stimulated by adrenaline. It is suggested that adrenaline-induced stimulation of ACh synthesis in the rat cerebral cortex is not due to cyclic AMP, because noradrenaline (NA) does not increase ACh synthesis either in vivo or in vitro, although it activates the adenyl cyclase. NA on the other hand activates ACh synthesis in the calcium-free medium, which inhibits activating effect of NA on adenyl cyclase. Moreover it was found that cyclic AMP depresses ACh synthesis in the rat cerebral cortex in vitro.
The evidence is reviewed for the presence of muscarinic receptors on the sympathetic nerves to blood vessels. Activation of these receptors by acetylcholine in doses that are too small to affect the smooth muscle cells directly inhibits the release of norepinephrine evoked by electric impulses or potassium ions. This inhibitory action of acetylcholine is prevented by muscarinic blocking agents and is probably due to hyperpolarization of the adrenergic nerve terminals.
Pentobarbital (30 and 60 mg/kg) and chloral hydrate (300 and 600 mg/kg) administered in anesthetic/hypnotic doses produced significant increases in acetylcholine concentration in the cerebral cortex, striatum, hippocampus and brainstem. Hypnotic/anxiolytic agents like diazepam, flurazepam (100 mg/kg each) and triazolam (30 mg/kg) significantly increased the acetylcholine concentration only in the cerebral cortex and striatum. Alprazolam and ketazolam had no significant effect on regional distribution of acetylcholine in the brain. The results have been discussed with respect to the role of central cholinergic system in anesthetic and hypnotic actions of these drugs.
The effect of physostigmine has been studied on cholinesterase in homogenates of chick biventer cervicis muscles and on the contractile responses of the intact muscles to acetylcholine and carbachol. The concentration of physostigmine required to produce the maximum increase in sensitivity to acetylcholine almost completely inhibited the cholinesterase in muscle homogenates. This concentration of physostigmine had no effect on muscle contractures elicited by carbachol. By taking account of the combined effects of acetylcholine diffusion and enzymic hydrolysis, a quantitative theoretical relationship has been derived between the level of cholinesterase activity in cylindrical muscles and the fractional occupancy of the acetylcholine receptors in these muscles in the presence of different concentrations of exogenous acetylcholine. This theory attributes the thousand-fold increase in sensitivity to exogenous acetylcholine produced by anticholinesterases in chick biventer cervicis muscles largely to an alteration in acetylcholine concentration gradient within the muscle and accounts satisfactorily for the shift in the dose-response curve for acetylcholine which occurs after treatment of the muscles with various concentrations of physostigmine.
The total and free acetylcholine (Ach) and cholinesterase (CHE) content of adult Setaria cervi were estimated. The Ach was estimated by bioassay on rectus abdominis muscle of frog and the CHE by measuring the drop in pH following incubation of worm homogenate with Ach chloride. The free and total Ach contents (4.0 +/- 0.57 and 6.0 +/- 0.48 microgram/g wet weight of worms respectively) were as high as found in mammalian brain cortex. The cholinesterase activity was found to be 5.57 +/- 0.6 units/g wet weight of worms. It is possible that there may exist a well developed system responsible for the synthesis, storage, release and destruction of Ach and that Ach may be acting as an excitatory neurohormone in S. cervi.
In the posterior half of the pulvinar of cats anaesthetized with halothane and nitrous oxide, the majority of neurons were fired by ACh released with small electrophoretic currents. In the anterior part of that nucleus, ACh had more variable effects: excitation, depression or none. 2. In comparison with L-glutamate, DL-homocysteic acid and DL-aspartic acid, ACh appeared to be the most potent excitant. 3. ACh-induced discharges were easily and reversibly blocked by low doses of atropine. In most cases, ACh effects could not be blocked selectively by mecamylamine or dihydro-beta-erythroidine. 4. Nicotine failed to mimic ACh, whereas carbachol was a potent excitant and was readily blocked by low doses of atropine. 5. The histochemical reaction to acetylcholinesterase was moderate in the pulvinar. 6. These observations support the view that pulvinar cells differ from other thalamic cells.
It has previously been shown that neuroleptic drugs block an apparently inhibitory influence of dopamine on cholinergic interneurons in striatum, thereby increasing acetylcholine turnover. In this study, systemic administration of the neuroleptic, fluphenazine, decreased the acetylcholine content in the striatum but not the neocortex of rats killed by focussed microwave irradiation. The effect was observed with doses of fluphenazine as low as 0.05 mg/kg, and was also seen after two other neuroleptics, spiroperidol (1 mg/kg) and haloperidol (4 mg/kg). In contrast, neither fluphenazine nor haloperidol pretreatment had any effect on the high affinity accumulation of choline by striatal synaptosomes. These observations suggest that after administration of dopamine receptor antagonists the release and metabolism of acetylcholine in the striatum is increased, but that a compensatory increase in choline uptake does not occur, thereby resulting in a temporary decrease in acetylcholine concentration. On the basis of these findings, we conclude that acetylcholine synthesis is regulated differently in the striatum than in other brain regions.
A new enzyme electrode is described to measure continuously acetylcholine concentration. A coating containing active acetylcholinesterase is produced on a pH-glass electrode. The mean thickness of the coating is 50 micrometer. Optimal operational conditions with respect to buffer concentration, ionic strength, linearity, stability, sensitivity, pH of the bulk solution, and response time are studied and discussed. The use of acetylcholinesterase-containing membranes as sensors could offer several novel advantages.
The effects of electrical stimulation, changes in external ion concentrations and various drugs on acetylcholine release from the myenteric plexus were measured by bioassay in the presence of physostigmine and by recording the responses of the longitudinal muscle. In preparations from the guinea-pig, the acetylcholine output per pulse increased with decreasing frequency of stimulation and reached its maximum at a frequency of 0.017 Hz (1/min) and thus ensured that the output per unit of time was constant at frequencies below 0.5 Hz. Spontaneous release was suppressed during stimulation at 0.017 Hz. 2 In the rabbit, the fractional acetylcholine release was lower than in the guinea-pig. The output per pulse increased with decreasing frequency of stimulation but at a lesser rate, with the effect that the output per unit decreased between 0.5 and 0.017 Hz. 3 In the guinea-pig, reduction of the Ca2+ concentration, addition to the bath fluid of Mn2+, ganglion-blocking drugs, morphine and catecholamines reduced output more at low than at high frequencies of stimulation. In the rabbit, acetylcholine output was less sensitive to changes in Ca2+ concentration and insensitive to Mn2+ and morphine. 4 In the guinea-pig, morphine and catecholamines depressed both the contractile response and acetylcholine output whereas Mn2+ in concentrations up to 125 muM, bretylium and ganglion-blocking drugs depressed only acetylcholine output. 5 In preparations from the guinea-pig, drugs blocking noradrenergic neurons or alpha-adrenoceptors, e.g. bretylium, phenoxybenzamine, thymoxamine and phentolamine, increased acetylcholine output during stimulation at high (  15 to 10 Hz) but not at low frequencies. 6 The implications of these findings for the release of acetylcholine from different pools in the heterogeneous myenteric plexus are considered. The possible errors, introduced by the effects of physostigmine, on the size of the acetylcholine pools and on the transmission of impulses within the myenteric plexus are discussed.
Viloxazine, an antidepressant with no peripheral antiacetylcholine activity, was capable of reducing responses of single cortical neurons to acetylcholine. Acetylcholine responses could also be potentiated by viloxazine. Both potentiation and reduction by viloxazine were often seen in the same study, reduction of responses invariably preceding potentiation. These results suggest that viloxazine may have selective effects on central cholinergic receptors. Responses of cortical neurons to monoamines could also be potentiated by viloxazine although it has little effect on monoamine uptake. These results are compatible with the idea that potentiation of monoamine responses may occur by a postsynaptic mechanism.
\After alkaline extraction, purified subsynaptic fragments isolated from Torpedo electric tissue exhibit on sodium dodecyl sulfate/polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis predominant peptides of apparent Mr 41,000, 50,000, and 65,000 (ie, the peptides characteristic of the nicotinic receptor purified and isolated in detergent solutions). The peptide of Mr 43,000 that is also found in the isolated postsynaptic membranes is recovered in the supernatant after alkaline extraction. The alkaline-extracted membranes were functionally intact, as demonstrated by the following criteria. The kinetics of binding of [3H]acetylcholine in the presence and absence of 30 micron carbamoylcholine to occupy acetylcholine binding sites, [14C]-meproadifen [2-(diethylmethylaminoethyl)-2,2-diphenylvalerate iodide ] was bound with a dissociation constant, KD, of 0.3 +/- 0.1 micron to 0.3 +/- 0.1 site per [3H]alpha-toxin site. This binding was displaced by perhydrohistrionicotoxin. The carbamoylcholine-stimulated efflux of 22Na+ from the Torpedo vesicles were preserved after alkaline extraction. It is concluded that not only the acetylcholine binding site, but also the local anesthetic binding site, must be associated with the peptides of the cholinergic receptor itself and not that of Mr 43,000. Those peptides remaining after alkaline extraction are also sufficient for permeability control.
Kindling is an experimental model of epilepsy in which periodic brain stimulation induces the progressive development of electrical and behavioral seizures. A kindling-induced electrical seizure (afterdischarge) in the rat hippocampus produces prolonged neuronal supersensitivity to microiontophoretically applied acetylcholine after a latency of 40 to 60 minutes. Neuronal acetylcholine supersensitivity is correlated with the further progression of kindling. A larger hippocampal after-discharge is elicited by a subsequent kindling stimulus delivered in the presence of acetylcholine supersensitivity, but not by one delivered before the onset of the supersensitivity. The results suggest that alteration of synaptic sensitivity to acetylcholine may contribute to kindling and epileptogenesis.
Segments of mouse pancreatic or exorbital lacrimal gland were superfused with saline solutions. Under visual control two micro-electrodes were inserted into neighbouring cells within the same acinus or into neighbouring acini. Cell to cell electrical coupling was assessed by injecting rectangular current pulses through one electrode and measuring the electrotonic potential change in the same cell (V(1)) and in the neighbouring cell (V(2)). Acetylcholine (ACh) was added locally to impaled acini by micro-ionophoresis from an extracellular micropipette.2. Exposure of the tissues to a Krebs solution equilibrated with 100% CO(2) caused a rapid increase in the size of electrotonic potential changes in the current injection cell and disappearance of the electrotonic potential changes in a neighbouring acinus or cell. This electrical uncoupling of previously coupled cells was rapidly reversible upon return to a solution equilibrated with 95% O(2) and 5% CO(2).3. Reduction of electrical intercellular coupling was also obtained using smaller CO(2) concentrations (50, 20 or 10%). In these cases the effects developed more slowly and were less dramatic. Reducing the extracellular HCO(3) concentration enhanced the uncoupling effect of 10 or 20% CO(2). However, weak uncoupling effects were still observed using 10 or 20% CO(2) in combination with a high bicarbonate concentration maintaining a constant extracellular pH (7.4).4. Reductions in extracellular pH (down to 5.5) achieved by varying combinations of Tris base and Tris HCl had no effect on electrical coupling. Brief periods of anoxia (100% N(2)) also had no effect.5. Exposure to 20% CO(2) markedly enhanced the uncoupling effect of a brief ionophoretic pulse of ACh.6. Exposure of the tissue to 10 mM-NH(4)Cl, a procedure expected to increase the intracellular pH, counteracted the uncoupling effect of ACh. During sustained uncoupling caused by a sustained ACh stimulation a brief period of exposure to NH(4)Cl caused an immediate and fully reversible recoupling.7. It is concluded that variations in intracellular pH have marked effects on the electrical coupling between neighbouring cells in the pancreatic and lacrimal acinar tissue.
The effects of high pressures of helium and of nitrogen on acetylcholine release were tested using the guinea-pig ileum as a model preparation. A superfusion system was designed in which this tissue could be maintained under physiological conditions in a high pressure chamber.2 Helium, at a pressure of 136 atm slightly increased the spontaneous output of acetylcholine but produced no significant changes at 68 atm (136 atm is close to the lethal pressure for small mammals).3 The acetylcholine release evoked by electrical stimulation or by 55 mM potassium was not altered by 136 atm of helium. Effects on tetrodotoxin-treated tissues were not consistent.4 Nitrogen, which in contrast to helium possesses general anaesthetic properties, caused considerable increases in spontaneous and in electrically evoked acetylcholine output at pressures which produce anaesthesia. These increases were not changed when helium was used to increase the total pressure to 136 atm, although this reverses the general anaesthetic actions of nitrogen in vivo.5 The increases in rate of acetylcholine release produced by nitrogen were observed in tetrodotoxintreated tissues and in tissues from reserpine-treated animals. In a calcium-free medium the increases were considerably smaller.6 The conclusions from these results are that while high pressures of helium caused little or no change in acetylcholine release rates, nitrogen produced large changes, which were not due to effects on axonal conduction. The effect of nitrogen is not apparently related to its general anaesthetic actions. Differences such as these in transmitter release would be likely to contribute to the differing physiological effects of these two gases.
The mode of action of ACh antagonists on the parasympathetic neurones of the submandibular ganglion of the rat was studied by means of a two-micro-electrode voltage-clamp technique. The currents produced by various agonists (carbachol, ACh, suberylcholine) were studied in steady state and after voltage steps, before and after perfusion of various antagonists. 2. For three antagonists (tubocurarine, hexamethonium, decamethonium) the blocking action increases with hyperpolarization. For three other antagonists (surugatoxin, trimetaphan, mecamylamine) the effects observed at low concentrations appear to be independent of membrane potential, although in some cases voltage dependence of the block was observed for mecamylamine. 3. The blocks the 'open' channel-reception complex. The block produced by tubocurarine, hexamethonium and decamethonium increases with the agonist concentration, an observation which supports a 'sequential' scheme in which the antagonist blocks the 'open' channel-receptor complex. The block produced by trimetaphan and mecamylamine decreases slightly with increased agonist concentration, which in turn suggests that these two compounds are competitive antagonists, preventing binding of the agonists to the closed channel-receptor complex. 4. In the cases where the block is voltage dependent, voltage jumps trigger slow relaxations which are not present in control conditions. In the case of tubocurarine and hexamethonium, the relaxation following a hyperpolarizing voltage jump corresponds to a decrease in conductance. In the case of decamethonium, the slow relaxation is in the opposite direction. 5. The slow relaxations observed with tubocurarine and hexamethonium are speeded by an increase of the antagonist concentration; the slow relaxations observed with decamethonium are slowed by an increase of the decamethonium concentration. 6. The steady-state observations and the relaxations can be interpreted in terms of a scheme in which tubocurarine, hexamethonium and decamethonium act mainly by blocking the channels opened by the cholinergic agonists. 7. The two types of slow relaxation are those predicted if tubocurarine and hexamethonium dissociate slowly from the channel, and decamethonium rapidly. 8. An additional effect of tubocurarine is described, which consists of a potentiation of the rising phase of the response to an ionophoretic pulse. Possible mechanisms of this effect are discussed.
Methysergide (3 x 10(-6) M) enhanced the contractile responses of the isolated stripped vas deferens of guinea-pig to acetylchline(ACh) and arecoline, but not those to noradrenaline, tyramine and bradykinin. Methysergide (3 x 10(-5) M) suppressed the contraction elicited by noradrenaline or histamine. The methysergide-induced potentiation of the response to ACh was prevented by pre-addition of hemicholinium but not by tetrodotoxin or morphine. The augmentation of the response to ACh by physostigmine was unaffected by hemicholinium. The phasic contraction of the tissue elicited by 30 mM KCl was also enhanced by methysergide, and this enhancement was prevented by the pre-addition of atropine (  14 x 10(-7) M). In the depolarized vas deferens after exposure to 30 mM KCl, methysergide occasionally induced a sustained tonic contraction which was inhibited by atropine. These findings suggest that methysergide facilitates a release of ACh by acting on the cholinergic nerve terminals and selectively potentiates the cholinergic response.
The release of acetylcholine evoked by field stimulation of the guinea-pig ileum (3 Hz) is increased by yohimbine and tolazoline but not affected by phentolamine. It is proposed that yohimbine and tolazoline by blocking alpha-adrenoceptors of the cholinergic nerves abolish the inhibition caused by endogenous noradrenaline, and thus facilitate the output of acetylcholine.
In alert monkeys the time course for development of supersensitivity to topical acetylcholine in partially isolated frontal cerebral cortex was determined. Thresholds for paroxysmal discharge fell progressively and markedly during 3 weeks, further in 5 and somewhat more after 6 months. ACh supersensitivity was demonstrated in chronic "isolated" occipital cortex. Epileptiform discharges were recorded selectively from chronic partially isolated frontal cortex on peripheral nerve stimulation and these spread, causing a clinical convulsive siezure when the open end of the isolation extended into the precentral gyrus. The basic mechanisms responsible for the supersensitivity are unknown but evidence presented and much in the pertinent literature is in keeping with the hypothesis that partial isolation of cortical cells, ie, denervation, deafferentation, or disuse may be important. It is suggrested that peripheral nerve stimulation, like arousal, may cause an outflow of ACh on the normal brain surface and over the open end of a partially isolated area, which, especially, in the presence of a diminished cholinesterase activity (in partially isolated cortex), could act like topical ACh, cause a DC shift and an epileptiform discharge.
Spontaneous and evoked cortical electrical activity of the post-central gyrus was studied in 5 unparalyzed, unanesthetized monkeys during slow-wave sleep (SWS) and wakefulness (W), before and after the administration of a muscarinic anticholinergic agents, hyoscine. It was found that hyoscine reproduces the effect of SWS: (1) on spontaneous EEG activity and single unit discharges of the somatosensory cortes without any concomitant behavioral sleep; and (2) on surface evoked potentials and reactivity of cortical neurons to peripheral electrical stimulation. Short episodes of EEG desynchronization were noted in the alert state after hyoscine suggesting the existence of a phasic activating system unblocked by hyoscine. These observations support the concept of an EEG-behavior dissociation produced by muscarinic anticholinergic agents and extend this concept to single neuron activity. These observations also lead to the conclusion that tonic EEG activation during arousal may be cholinergic at the cortical level even though other neurotransmitters may be involved.
Sera from patients with myasthenia gravis (M.G.) were studied by the quantitative micro-scale complement-fixation assay for the presence of humoral antibodies against acetylcholine receptor (AChR). The purified receptor was extracted from the electrogenic tissue of the electric ray, Torpedo californica. A significant difference in the antibody titres was observed between myasthenic and non-myasthenic patients. Out of fifteen patients with myasthenia gravis, at least 12 (80%) had antibodies against AChR. Only one case out of twenty-four controls had an indication of anti-receptor antibodies. In view of observations on the role of AChR as the autoantigen in myasthenia gravis, such antibodies may have significance in producing the neuro-muscular block characteristic of the disease.
ACh contractures of denervated lumbricalis muscles of rats were washed in Tris-methanesulfonate solutions and in sucrose solutions. The peak tension was diminished by about 80% following a 30 min exposure to solutions containing 400-600 mM glycerol when Tris solutions were used in the testing period, and by about 50% when sucrose solutions were used. The amplitude of the membrane potential changes provoked by ACh was decreased by about 36% following the glycerol treatment. The treatment had no effect on the ACh-induced 45Ca uptake of muscles. Electron microscopy of the glycerol-treated muscles showed widespread vacuolization apparently originating from swelling and disruption of the T system. It was concluded that ACh receptors which arise in the muscle membrane following nerve section are distributed in the external surface membrane and in the membranes of the T system.
The mitotic inhibitor colchicine (COL) and its isomer lumi-colchicine (lumi-COL) were tested on the axonal transport of acetylcholine (ACh), cholineacetyltransferase (CAT) and ACh-esterase (AChE) in rat motor nerves in vivo. COL was found to be far more effective in blocking axonal transport of all 3 substances than was an equimolar concentration (0.1 M) of lumi-COL, when injected into the sciatic nerve. Since COL and lumi-COL have similar properties as regards binding to cellular membranes, but differ markedly in their binding capacity to microtubule protein, the results give strong support for the theory that microtubules are essential for intra-axonal transport in mammalian nerves.
Possible regenerative overgrowth of cholinergic axon terminals. Parkinson's disease is characterised by an imbalance between acetylcholine and dopamine which probably results from the degeneration of a dopaminergic nigrostriatal pathway. A new hypothesis is proposed to explain the development of this imbalance. Applying the concept that degeneration of nerve-fibres in the central nervous system can lead to collateral sprouting of uninjured fibres, it is suggested that the death of dopaminergic nigrostriatal neurons results in sprouting of axons of cholinergic interneurons in the caudate nucleus. This overgrowth could result in the cholinergic innervation of neuronal membranes vacated by degenerated dopaminergic terminals. Thus, the apparent changes in the activity of dopaminergic and cholinergic systems can be accounted for by faulty regeneration in the central nervous system.
The structure of regions with a high concentration of ACh receptors (clusters) on cultured skeletal muscle myotubes was examined by immunoperoxidase staining of bound alphaBT. The clusters did not appear to differ from the other regions except in their higher concentration of receptor.
Sciatic nerves of rats and tibial nerves of rabbits were kept anaesthetized in situ for periods of 3-11 days by applying silastic cuffs containing lidocaine base or marcaine hydrochloride. To insure a more uniform release of the rapidly diffusing lidocaine base, the drug was contained in compartments at some distance from the nerve and the cuffs were covered with polystyrene. The completeness of anaesthesia and the functional state of the nerve were tested by stimulating the exposed nerves proximal and distal to the cuff and by observing the behaviour of the muscle prior to killing the animals. The ACh sensitivity was tested by electrophoretic application of ACh from micropipettes and by recording the results changes of the resting membrane potential in individual muscle fibres. The ACh sensitivity was found to be present in the extrajunctional area of all muscle fibres including those displaying miniature end-plate potentials. These was no difference between the behaviour of muscles from rats and rabbits and between the action of lidocaine base and marcaine hydrochloride. Previous reports on the absence of extrajunctional ACh sensitivity in muscles of rabbits whose nerves had been treated by lidocaine base were explained by a relatively rapid loss of the drug from the usual type of nerve cuffs (more than 70% of the drug lost in one day), permitting a premature recovery of the nerves from anaesthesia.
Myasthenia gravis is a spontaneously occurring autoimmune disease in which antibodies and lymphocytes are specifically reactive with nicotinic ACh receptors of skeletal muscle. Antibodies reactive with junctional receptors of human muscle are found in 90% of patients with myasthenia gravis and not at all in other diseases. Their capacity to cross the placenta suggests their involvement in the pathogenesis of neonatal myasthenia. The role of the thymus in myasthenia gravis remains a mystery, but it has a recently been established that the thymus contains nicotinic ACh receptors and that anti-receptor antibodies are present in myasthenic thymuses. Antibodies of myasthenic patients detect only partial cross reactivity between ACh receptors of different species. However, greater antibody binding is observed with receptors isolated from denervated rat muscle than with receptors from normal rat muscle. This suggests that extrajunctional and junctional ACh receptors might express different antigenic determinants. Although human antibodies bind minimally to ACh receptors of the electric organs of eels and marine rays, lymphocyte reactivity to electric eel receptors is found in high incidence in myasthenic patients. This suggests that electric organ and mammalian muscle ACh receptors may share more lymphocyte-defined than serologically-defined antigenic determinants. Both cellular and humoral immune responses to ACh receptors can be induced experimentally. Sufficient antigenic homology exists between receptors of different species that electric organ receptors are capable of inducing in mammals experimental autoimmune myasthenia gravis. Syngeneic muscle receptor also is immunogenic in rats. Induction of both myasthenia and antibodies to ACh receptor requires participation of thymus-derived lymphocytes. The majority of ACh receptors in myasthenic rat muscle exist complexed with antibody, but antibody is not bound directly to the receptor's ACh-binding site. Anti-receptor antibodies in vitro are capable of impairing the electrophysiological function of ACh receptors with minimal blocking of the ACh-binding site and in the absence of complement. Thus, myasthenia gravis and its experimental model provide unique biological tools for studying the structure, function and pathology of cell membrane receptors.
Pharmacological consequences of the unequal reactivity of the myocardial different parts to parasympathic system. The effects of acetylcholine on the various levels of cardiac automatism are studied on open chest dogs with extracorporeal circulation. This drug depresses the sinus node, and more specially the atrio-ventricular node (AV node), but does not alter the His bundle and the Purkinje fibers activity. The sensitivity of the intra-cardiac conduction to acetylcholine also depends upon the considered level of conduction: measured with a bipolar electrode situated upon the His bundle, this one is lowered electively in the atrio-ventricular part. So, the A, V. node can be considered as the elective place of action of acetylcholine on the double point of view of automatism and conduction. Drugs modifying the vagal tonus see their action altered, either in a plus way (antiarrhythmic agents), either in a minus way (cardiac glycosides, halogenated hydrocarbons).
Cultures of thymic tissue or thymic lymphocytes from nine patients undergoing thymectomy for myasthenia gravis were examined for evidence of anti-acetylcholine-receptor-antibody synthesis. One of four thymic tissues and three of five thymic lymphocyte preparations synthesised this antibody.
The role of intercellular pathways in the ADH-dependent water transport was studied on the frog urinary bladder by means of acetylcholine (AC) and other cholinergic compounds. AC (10(-3) M) was found to cause a strong suppression of the pituitrin-stimulated water flow. Analogous effect was produced by AC on the osmotic flow stimulated by cyclic adenosine monophosphate (cAMP) and theolin. The antipituitrin effect was not reproduced either by nicotine, nor by potent M-cholinomimetic agents (methylfurmetide and F-2268), and was not prevented by M- and N-cholynolytic drugs (atropine, metacin, flaxedil, hexamethonium). However, the antipituitrin effect of AC was completely removed by the anticholinesterase drugs with different mode of action (eserine, proserine, armin, acridine iodmethylate, GD-42) in concentrations of 10(-6)--10(-3) M. It was concluded that the smooth muscles contraction with the subsequent closure of the intercellular spaces was not responsible for the antipituitrinic action of AC. This effect appears to be connected with cholinesterase activation. A possible role of the phosphoinositides in the water permeability regulation of the urinary bladder wall is discussed.
The two mitotic inhibitors colchicine (COL) and podofyllotoxin (POD) and their respective isomers, lumiCOL and picropodofyllin (picPOD) were tested for their effect on the intraaxonal transport (AXT) of acetylcholine (ACh) and the cholinergic enzymes in rat sciatic nerve. The mitotic inhibitors and their isomers were dissolved in saline+10% ethanol (COL and lumiCOL) or dimethylformamid (DMFA) (POD and picPOD) and injected (3-5microliter) subepineurally into the sciatic nerve. As controls the vehicle (saline +10% ethanol or DMFA) alone were injected into some rats. 2 h later a crush operation was performed 15 mm distal to the site of injection. The accumulation of ACh or the two enzymes, ACh-esterase (AChE) and cholineacetyltransferase (CAT), in the nerve segment proximal to the crush (12 h before death) was used as a measure of the AXT. COL and POD were very effective in inhibiting AXT of all 3 substances, while their isomers, lumiCOL and picPOD, were essentially without effect on AXT in equimolar concentrations (0.1 M). The effects on AXT of the 4 test substances thus appear related to their affinity to bind to tubulin, which is several orders of magnitude higher for COL and POD than for their isomers. The results further support the view that intact microtubules are essential for AXT of both membrane-bound (ACh E) and soluble (CAT) enzymes, as well as of ACh in rat motor nerves.
The axonal transport of acetylcholine (ACh), choline acetyltransferase (ChAc) and cholinesterase (ChE) was estimated in the peroneal nerves of rabbits by measuring the accumulation of each against a nerve crush over a period of 20 hr. 2. Estimates were made of the amounts of these substances that were transported in nerves that had been regenerating for up to 111 days after being crushed or up to 13 days after being cut. 3. The initial response was the same whether the injury was a crush or a cut; the amount of ACh transported was increased, while ChAc and ChE transport was reduced. 4. The amounts of ACh, ChAc and ChE transported tended to return to normal levels when the nerves were allowed to reinnervate the denervated muscles. ChAc transport also showed an early recovery in the cut nerves. 5. The ACh content of the central nerve stump did not alter throughout regeneration but ChAc and ChE contents were reduced at the times when the transport of the enzymes was reduced. 6. These results are discussed in relation to the time course of nerve regeneration.
Twenty-eight patients with myasthenia gravis (MG), five with and 23 without thymoma, and 47 normal controls were typed for serologically defined HLA-A, B, C, and DRw antigens. Sera from all patients were titered for antibodies to acetylcholine receptors (AChR). The frequency of HLA-B8 and DRw3 in the non-thymoma MG patients was significantly higher than in the normal population. Most of the non-thymoma patients with AChR titers higher than the average level were positive for HLA-B8 and/or DRw3, while the majority of the HLA-B8(-) and/or DRw3(-) non-thymoma patients demonstrated AChR titers below average. These findings support the possibility of the existence of immune response genes in the HLA-B, DRw segment of the major histocompatibility complex which are concerned in the response to or recognition of autoantigens.
Forty patients with myasthenia gravis were HLA tissue typed and the amount of anti-acetylcholine receptor protein antibody determined. Sera from seven patients were tested for antibody titer by repeated determinations and the serum concentration was found to be stable. Patients with thymoma had higher titers than patients with normal thymus histology or hyperplasia. Individuals with thymoma lacking HLA-B8 were found to have a higher concentration of antibodies than HLA-B8 negative individuals with hyperplasia. No statistically significant differences were obtained when comparing the amount of antibody in HLA-B8 positive and negative individuals. Titers in patients subjected to thymectomy more than 8 years before sampling did not deviate from those in non-thymectomized myasthenics.
Rabbit retinas were studied in vitro under conditions known to maintain their physiological function. Retinas incubated in the presence of [3H]choline synthesized substantial amounts of both [3H]phosphorylcholine and [3H]acetylcholine. With time, [3H]phosphorylcholine proceeded into phospholipids, primarily phosphatidylcholine. Retinas pulse-labeled by a 15-min exposure to 0.3 microM [3H]choline were incubated for a subsequent hour under chase conditions designed either to retain newly synthesized acetylcholine within synapses or to promote its release. At the end of this time the two groups of retinas were found to contain equal amounts of radioactivity in the phospholipid pathway, but only the retinas incubated under the acetylcholine-protecting conditions contained [3H]acetylcholine. Freeze-dried, vacuum-embedded tissue from each retina was autoradiographed on dry emulsion. All retinas showed silver grains over the photoreceptor cells and faint labeling of all ganglion cells. In the retinas that contained [3H]acetylcholine, silver grains also accumulated densely over a few cells with the position of amacrine cells, over a subset of the cells of the ganglion cell layer, and in two bands over the inner plexiform layer. Fixation of the retina with aqueous osmium tetroxide retained only the radioactive compounds located in the photoreceptor and ganglion cells. Sections from freeze-dried tissue lost their water-soluble choline metabolites when exposed to water, and autoradiography of such sections again revealed radioactivity primarily in the photoreceptor and ganglion cells. Radioactive compounds extracted from the sections were found to faithfully reflect those present in the tissue before processing; analysis of the compounds eluted from sections microdissected along the outer plexiform layer showed [3H]acetylcholine to have been synthesized only by cells of the inner retina. Taken together, these results indicate that the photoreceptor and ganglion cells are distinguished by a rapid synthesis of choline-containing phospholipids, while acetylcholine synthesis is restricted to a few cells at both margins of the inner plexiform layer. They imply that the only neurons to release acetylcholine within the rabbit retina are a small group of probable amacrine cells.
The effect of amniotic fluid on the binding of anti-acetylcholine receptor (anti-AChR) antibodies from myasthenia gravis (MG) patients to AChR preparations was examined by radioimmunoassay using 125I-labelled alpha-bungarotoxin. Human amniotic fluid from healthy women in their second trimester inhibited the in-vitro interaction between antibody and antigen. This finding suggests that during pregnancy there is a similar inhibitory effect in MG on the in-vivo binding of maternal anti-AChR antibodies, transferred through the placenta, to AChR at the fetal neuromuscular junction. The presence of feto-placental inhibitory factors may explain the development of transitory muscular weakness only after birth and only in the minority of the babies born to myasthenic mothers.
[3H]acetylcholine (ACh) or [3H]gamma-aminobutyric acid (GABA) was injected into the cell body of a cholinergic neurone of Aplysia kurodai. 2. [3H]ACh moved down the axon at a maximum speed of 2.5 mm/sec at 20 degrees C. 3. 20 mM-colchicine suppressed this movement, but some passive movement of radioactivity was noted along the axon. 4. Profiles of the passive movement coincided with theoretically obtained diffusion profiles. 5. The diffusion coefficient of ACh in the axoplasm was estimated. It was 3 x 10(-6) cm2/sec at 5 degrees C, 4 X 10(-6) cm2/sec at 15 degrees C and 6.5 x 10(-6) cm2/sec at 30 degrees C. The Q10 was   135, the activation energy was about 5 kcal/degrees C. These diffusion coefficients were lower than that of free diffusion of ACh (8 x 10(-6) cm2/sec at 18 degrees C, Fatt, 1954), and assumed to be reasonable, if one considers frictional resistivity of axoplasm in the diffusion of ACh molecules. 6. [3H]GABA diffused similarly to ACh, and the diffusion coefficients agreed with the estimated value when the molecular size differences were taken into account. 7. Both ACh and GABA seemed to diffuse in soluble form or as single molecules in the axoplasm. 8. Intra-axonal diffusion is very effective for short distances.
Acetylcholine (ACh) (10(-5) M) in the presence of eserine (2 . 10(-4) M) stimulated the release of [3H]dopamine (DA) continuously formed from [3H]tyrosine, when delivered to a push-pull cannula implanted in the left caudate nucleus of halothane anaesthetized cats. This effect was transient and followed by a second increase in [3H]DA release after removal of ACh and eserine. These changes in [3H]DA release during and after ACh application were no longer seen during activation of the dopaminergic neurons by continuous delivery of substance P to the ipsilateral substantia nigra (SN). These results indicate that the presynaptic regulation of DA release by ACh is dependent on the rate of firing of nigro-striatal dopaminergic neurons.
1 The effect of two ionophores, BrX-537A (Bromolasolacid) and A 23187, on acetylcholine (ACh) output from brain slices was studied. 2 The slices were prepared from rat cerebral cortex, incubated in Krebs solution containing physostigmine and ACh output determined by bioassay. 3 Both ionophores enhanced ACh output. BrX-537A exerted its maximal effect, a six fold increase, at a concentration of   18 micron, while A 23187 caused a three fold increase at a concentration of 58 micron. 4 When the slices were incubated in a Ca-free medium, the effect of A 23187 on ACh output was only reduced, BrX-537A was abolished while that of BrX-537A was also active when disodium edetate (EDTA) was added to the the Ca-free medium. 5 The activity of BrX-537A was not affected by the presence of tetrodotoxin in the incubation medium. 6 The stimulation of ACh output elicited by KCl (25 mM) was increased further by hyoscine, but not by BrX-537A. Hyoscine however had no effect when ACh output was stimulated by BrX-537A. 7 The effect of BrX-537A on ACh output was potentiated by the addition of Mg2+ (9.3 mM) to the incubation medium and was reduced in a Mg-free medium. 8 It is concluded that A 23187 stimulates ACh output by transporting extracellular Ca2+ into cholinergic nerve endings. The effect of BrX-537A does not depend only on Ca2+ but also on other mechanisms.
Rats were exposed to lead acetate from birth, and were killed at the age of 44--51 days for analysis of levels and turnover rates of acetylcholine (ACh). Steady-state levels of ACh were not altered in midbrain, cortex, hippocampus, or striatum of lead-exposed rats. Similarly, no changes in choline (Ch) concentrations were found in cortex, hippocampus, or striatum. In the midbrain, however, a 30% reduction in Ch levels was observed. Changes in specific activity of Ch and ACh were measured as a function of time in selected brain areas of rats infused with a radio-labeled precursor of Ch. Specific activities of ACh were not altered. Ch specific activities were, however, significantly elevated in all brain areas examined, as compared with age-matched control rats. The in vivo ACh turnover rate in cortex, hippocampus, and striatum was diminished by 35%, 54%, 51%, and 33%, respectively. These findings provide direct evidence for an inhibitory effect of lead exposure from birth on central cholinergic function in vivo. Since a significant reduction of body weight was found in those animals treated with lead acetate, the alteration of central cholinergic function may partially be attributed to malnutrition observed in the lead-exposed animals.
Nerve-evoked muscular activity was abolished in the small hand muscles of the baboon for 1-2 months by a 3 hr period of nerve compression from a pneumatic tourniquet inflated round the forearm. In the large diameter nerve fibres, this produced either a prolonged conduction block due to local myelin damage at the site of compression, or (in 10-30% of the large fibres) Wallerian degeneration. 2. At varying intervals after nerve compression the extrajunctional acetylcholine (ACh)-sensitivity of innervated but inactive muscle fibres in the fourth lumbrical muscle was measured. Observations were also made on lumbrical muscle fibres at similar intervals after surgical denervation. 3. The ACh sensitivity of nerve-blocked muscle fibres started to develop later than in denervated muscle fibres (10 vs. 7 days) and remained at a lower level (40-80 mV/nC, median ACh-sensitivity) than that of denervated muscle fibres (200-437 mV/nC) from 21 to 63 days after nerve block or denervation. 4. In stimulation experiments on four muscles, extrajunctional ACh-sensitivity of both denervated and innervated but inactive fourth lumbrical muscle fibres was reduced by muscular activity. 5. In four animals mild compression was used in the lower limb to produce persistent nerve block without Wallerian degeneration. With one exception (in which some Wallerian degeneration had occurred) recording with a co-axial needle from abductor hallucis showed no spontaneous fibrillation up to 28 days after compression, although the extrajunctional ACh-sensitivity of the muscle fibres appeared to reach levels similar to those observed in the forelimb. All four muscles developed a slight increase in insertion activity after 1-2 weeks. 6. It may be concluded that both muscular activity and some other neural influence, independent of muscular activity, are able to influence extrajunctional muscle properties in the baboon. The neural influence appears to be more effective in preventing spontaneous fibrillation than in preventing a rise in ACh sensitivity of the extrajunctional muscle membrane.
Synaptosomes prepared from Rat striatum were loaded with (14C) choline at 0 degrees C in the course of a 60 min. preincubation. After the removal, by washing, of the extracellular molecules, synaptosomes were incubated 5 min. at 37 degrees C in the presence of (3H) choline. The measurement of the amounts of (3H) ACh and of (14C) ACh formed allowed us to conclude that the acetylation of the molecules of choline was directly coupled to their passage through the synaptosomal membrane.
The present experiment was intended to study whether or not acetylcholine decreases the electrical resistance of the basal membrane of secretory cells in stimulating eccrine secretion of fluid and electrolytes. An isolated segment of the secretory coil of the monkey palm eccrine sweat gland was dissected out in vitro and immobilized in the tip of a constriction pipette. Using a bridge-balanced single glass microelectrode, input impedance of the secretory cell was compared before and after local superfusion of acetylcholine in each cell. The mean input impedance was 27 Momega, which did not significantly change after application of acetylcholine. Between 15 and 30 sec after cessation of acetylcholine superfusion, input impedance increased by 42% and then returned to normal within 60 sec. The current-induced voltage deflection due to intraluminally injected current pulse was measured across both the basal membrane (deltaVb) and the epithelial wall (deltaVt) as qualitative measures of the respective membrane resistances. Both deltaVb and deltaVt increased by about 10%, but their ratio remained unchanged after stimulation with acetylcholine. A Ca++ ionophore, A23187, which is as potent a stimulant of eccrine sweat secretion as acetylcholine in vitro, also failed to change the above two parameters. It was concluded that the decrease in the electrical resistance of the basal membrane of the secretory cells could not be detected in the sweat gland after stimulation with acetylcholine or A23187. The possibility was discussed that the action of acetylcholine at the basal membrane is one of enhancing the activity of the nonconductive pathway rather than the conductive pathway in this exocrine gland.
From 6% to 25% of primary renal carcinomas are either hypovascular or avascular and are the major source of false negative angiography. High-dose renal pharmacoangiography, a valuable adjunct to conventional angiography, combines a renal vasodilator, acetylcholine, with a high dose of contrast medium. High-dose renal pharmacoangiography improves the diagnosis of hypovascular mass by enhancement of tumor vessels, increase of tumor stain, and better opacification of main and collateral renal veins. During a 4 year period, 20 hypovascular renal neoplasms were studied and successfully diagnosed preoperatively by this method.
In the site of the myoneural junction a liberation of Ca++ ions, which is similar to that described previously after an electric stimulation or use of cholinesterase inhibitor, can be revealed by histochemical methods (heavy metal substitution, tetracycline fluorescence technique and glyoxal-bis-(2-hydroxyanil) complex formation) using repeated acetylcholine and SCh administration. The possible aspecific reaction due to the presence of Mg++ ions can be excluded by means of the glyoxal-bis(2-hydroxyanil) method. It can be suggested that there is a correlation between the liberation of Ca++ ions an the function dependent mitochondrial energetic processes.
Pentagastrin, histamine, and acetylcholine stimulated acid secretion in the isolated rhesus (Macaca mulatta) gastric mucosa. The potencies were in the order pentagastrin greater than histamine greater than acetylcholine. However, histamine was more effective, the calculated maximal response being twice as great as for the other two agonists. Metiamide inhibited acid secretion induced by both histamine and pentagastrin. Whereas the inhibition of histamine by metiamide was surmountable, that of pentagastrin was not. Atropine inhibited the response to acetylcholine. Even in higher doses, atropine had no effect on histamine. With stimulation, transmucosal potential differences and resistances decreased; the changes were reversed on inhibition.
The alteration of two erythrocyte plasma membrane functions, acetylcholine hydrolysis and glucose exchange, by a series of structurally related small lipophilic compounds which exhibit antihemolytic behavior was studied. 2-Methyldimethylaminoazobenzene is a more potent inhibitor of acetylcholinesterase than the 3'-methyl analogue, while the unsubstituted compound fails to inhibit. Esterase inhibition by the 2-methyl compound is non-competitive and dependent on the anion composition of the assay buffer. The temperature dependence of acetylcholinesterase activity in the presence of the 2-methyl compound suggests that interaction with inhibitor is influenced by the state of lipids tightly bound to the enzyme. Glucose exchange is inhibited to the same extent by both methyl derivatives but not by the unsubstituted dye, and the temperature dependence in the presence of inhibitor is not grossly altered. The lack of correlation between inhibition of membrane function adn stabilization of erythrocytes against osmotic hemolysis is discussed.
Isolated gastric smooth muscle cells were prepared from the stomach of Bufo marinus by successive incubation in collagenase without added trypsin. Contraction was determined by image-splitting micrometry and expressed as the mean percentage decrease in cell length from control. Peak contractile response was attained within 30 s. Dose-response curves constructed from peak responses showed that the maximal responses to CCK-OP (37.2 +/- 3.8%), acetylcholine (35.3 +/- 2.5%), and Ca2+ (42.3 +/- 0.9%) were similar. The D50s for octapeptide of cholecystokinin (CCK-OP) and acetylcholine were around 10(-12) M and 10(-11) M, respectively. The response to a combination of submaximal concentrations of acetylcholine and CCK-OP exceeded the individual responses but did not exceed the maximal response to either agent alone. A low concentration of atropine (5 X 10(-10) M) inhibited specifically the maximal response to acetylcholine. A high concentration of atropine (5 X 10(-8) M) inhibited partially the maximal response to CCK-OP but had no effect on the maximal response to Ca2+. It was concluded that 1) dispersed gastric smooth muscle cells are highly sensitive to stimulation; 2) CCK-OP has a direct (myogenic) contractile effect on gastric smooth muscle; and 3) the effect of CCK-OP and acetylcholine are mediated by separate receptors.
The binding of Ca2 to single ganglioside species (GGtet1NeuAc, GGtet2aNeuAc, GGtet 3aNeuAc), to their free, reducing sialyl-oligosaccharides and to ganglioside mixtures from chicken brain was investigated by means of ion-sensitive electrodes (potentiometry). Unlike the sialyl-oligosaccharides and free N-acetylneuraminic acid, gangliosides were found to possess two different modes of binding for Ca2, depending on the total concentration of Ca2. This was mainly indicated by a release of up to 75% of previously bound Ca2 after raising the total Ca2-concentration above a critical level of about 5--9 X 10(-5)M. Addition of acetylcholin (9mM), Li, K, and Na, respectively, caused a release of Ca2 from ganglioside-Ca2-complexes (0.1mM Ca2, 0.1mM ganglioside-NeuAc) in the sequence: acetylcholin : Li : K : Na = 4 : 3 : 1 : 1 composed on molar basis (9mM).
Lymphocyte proliferative response to acetylcholine receptors is under H-2-linked Ir gene control. As a first step in determining the genetic control of experimental autoimmune myasthenia gravis in mice, we tested the proliferative responses of lymph node cells to torpedo acetylcholine receptors (TAR). Studies with congenic and recombinant inbred strains of mice revealed that T-cell responses to TAR are controlled by an H-2 linked Ir gene, mapping in the I-A subregion of mouse major histocompatibility complex.
Acetylcholine (ACh) injected into the cortex induces epileptic seizures which spread very slowly, with a propagation speed of some millimeters per minute over the cortex. To study this propagation mechanism the ECoG recorded with two rows of equally spaced electrodes, one row on the homolateral the other on the contralateral hemisphere, was analysed using correlation techniques and spectral analytical methods. Rabbits were used as experimental animals. If a cortical area is involved in the seizure of rhythmic fast and low activity of about 30 Hz is observed. The frequency decreases discontinuously and simultaneously the amplitudes increase. After one or more seconds the activity seems to stabilize showing a tonic pattern of about 9 Hz but a few seconds later this tonic pattern is replaced by an irregular seizure activity. This mechanism was found for the spreading of the primary focus as well as for the spreading of the mirror focus on the contralateral hemisphere which occurs about 2 hours after the injection of ACh. The analysis of the approximately 9 Hz tonic period yielded the following results: at the beginning, the 9 Hz activity of the cortical area already involved leads the activity of the adjacent area which is going to be involved. High coherences were found between both areas during this state. Then the coherence decrease, indicating an uncoupling of the two areas. The subsequent increase of coherence indicates a renewed coupling, but now the newly involved area is leading. This was found by correlation and phase analysis. From these results it can be concluded that the propagation of such seizures is based on a stepwise propagation of an active focus and that the propagation is strongly correlated with certain graphoelements and rhythms.
The effects of centrophenoxine on the release of acetylcholine and on the changes in the bioelectrical activity are determined in experiments on non-anaesthesized cats subjected to perfusion of the anterior horn of the lateral cerebral ventricle and simultaneous recording of the bioelectrical activity of cortical and subcortical structures. Centrophenoxine is tested in doses of 25, 50 and 100 mg/kg intravenously. Most characteristic changes are found to occur after the dose of 50 mg/kg, when centrophenoxine markedly increases the amount of the released acetylcholine and changes the bioelectrical activity (synchronous changes in the cortex and hypothalamus). The parallelism between the increase release of acetylcholine and the bioelectrical changes continued until the time of the peak effect of centrophenoxine (45 min), followed by dissociation between them (the level of the released acetylcholine gradually approached the initial level, while the changed bioelectrical activity persisted for a longer time.
The effect of phentolamine (alpha-adrenoceptor antagonist) and propranolol (beta-adrenoceptor antagonist) on the increased brain acetylcholine-releasing effect of centrophenoxine were studied in unanaesthetized cats in which perfusion of the anterior horn of a lateral cerebral ventricle was performed. Phentolamine alone decreased the amount of spontaneously released acetylcholine and did not change the effect of centrophenoxine. Propranolol alone did not change the amount of spontaneously released acetylcholine and reversed the centrophenoxine effect. The effects of centrophenoxine on acetylcholine release are attributed to its action on the presynaptic adrenoceptors (alpha and beta) situated in the cholinergic terminals of structures lying the anterior horn of a lateral cerebral ventricle.
The presence of acetylcholine in aqueous extracts of the fruit of Solanum nigrum Linn. (black nightshade) has been established based upon the following pharmacological tests: a) isotonic contraction of the isolated toad rectus abdominis; b) negative chronotropic and inotropic action on the isolated toad heart; c) isotonic contraction of the isolated guinea pig's ileum; d) isotonic contraction of the rat's isolated jejunum; 3) decrease on the cat's arterial blood pressure; f) secretory effects on the rat's submaxillary gland. These actions were selectively blocked by curate or atropine and disappeared after incubation of the extract at 37 C with plasma. Further evidence showing that the fruit of the black nightshade contains acetylcholine was obtained by chromatographic separation of the aqueous extract. The average content of acetylcholine was found to be 250 micrograms/g of fruit.
Regional cerebral acetylcholine (ACh) levels and utilization rate were assessed in vivo in rats rendered thiamin deficient using the thiamin antagonists pyrithiamin or oxythiamin. ACh levels were significantly reduced in all brain regions of pyrithiamin treated rats and in the medulla-pons and striatum of oxythiamin treated rats compared to controls. ACh utilization was significantly reduced in the midbrain, striatum and hippocampus of pyrithiamin treated rats, but was reduced only in the striatum of oxythiamin treated rats compared to controls. Thus, there are some reductions in ACh levels and utilization that are unique to pyrithiamin induced deficiency and as such are distinct from oxythiamin/undernutrition related reductions. Since only pyrithiamin produces neurological symptoms, its unique ACh effects may be related to these symptoms.
The effect of adrenaline on acetylcholine synthesis, choline acetylase and cholinesterase activity. Acta Physiol. Pol. 1975, 26 (1): 45-54. The purpose of the study was to assess the participation of adrenaline in the processes of acetylcholine synthesis and breakdown in white rats. After intraperitoneal administration of adrenaline the content of acetylcholine in the tissues (brain, stomach, sciatic nerve, lumbar spinal cord) initially, slightly decreased, increased in the 30th, 60th, and 120th min, and then fell again below the initial value after 240 min. The rise in acetylcholine tissue content after administration of adrenaline seems to be due to its increased synthesis. This was also confirmed by in vitro investigations. The fall in the tissue acetylcholine content was associated with reduced synthesis of acetylcholine in the cerebral cortex. The increase in acetylcholine synthesis in the brain tissue after adrenaline given in vitro and in vivo does not seem to be caused by activation of choline acetylase. The activity of cholinesterase in the brain was not changed after adrenaline administered in vivo and in vitro.
Proteolipid was extracted from the electric organ of Narke japonica by using chloroform/methanol (2:1, v/v). This extract was separated into acetylcholine-binding and non-binding substances by column chromatography. However, acetylcholine-binding substances did not show the characteristic properties of protein. 2. The membrane fragments of the electric organ were separated into three main parts by sucrose density gradient centrifugation. From the heaviest, the fractions were acetylcholine receptor rich, ATPase rich, and acetylcholinesterase rich. 3. The membrane fraction having acetylcholine receptor showed the excitability, the increase of Na+ permeability by the application of cholinergic agonists. However, the acetylcholine binding substance extracted by the organic solvent was richer in the lighter fraction. This substance differed from the true acetylcholine receptor.
Effect of acetylcholine on Na, K-ATPase from cardiac and skeletal rabbit muscles is studied. The inhibition of the enzyme by acetylcholine was shown to depend on the Na+/K+ ratio and Mg2+ concentration in the incubation medium. The sensitivity of Na, K-ATPase to acetylcholine and its analogues decreased as follows: acetylcholine, propionylcholine butyrylcholine, arecoline, carbacholine, choline. Muscle denervation resulted in 20-fold increase of the enzyme sensitivity to acetylcholine. Preparations of Na, K-ATPase from different muscles have the increasing sensitivity to acetylcholine in the following order: white, mixed, cardiac, denervated muscles.
Effect of acetylcholine (ACh) on Na, K-ATPase system has a complex character. ACh concentration, as well as the type of membrane are responsible for the increase or decrease of Na, K-ATPase activity. The inhibition and activation capacity is not constant in different subcellular fractions. The maximal effect is observed in subcellular fractions rich in junctional complexes, whereas minimal effect is in microsomes. There is no effect in mitochondria and myelin at all. EGTA and EDTA removes the inhibition, but the activation remains unchanged. ACh is supposed to release from membrane structure Ca2+, which subsequently inhibits Na, K-ATPase. On the other hand, activation by ACh is the result of its direct effect. The inhibition prevails over the activation at high (2-10 mM) concentration of ACh, whereas at low (2mM) concentration it might be vice versa. Thus the effect of ACh on Na K-ATPase is the result of two different processes having opposite effects.
Sarcoplasmic reticulum (SR), Ca2+ plus Mg2+-ATPase, and Ca2+-ionophore were obtained from white rabbit skeletal muscles. Methylmercury inhibited the Ca2+ plus Mg2+-ATPase and Ca2+-transport but had no effect on the Ca2+-ionophore. Mercuric chloride inhibited all three functions (ie, ATPase, transport and ionophoric activity). The mechanism of HgCl2 inhibition of the Ca2+-ionophore was by competition with Ca2+ for Ca2+-ionophoric site whereas its inhibition of the enzyme and Ca2+-transport was due to the blockage of essential sulfhydryl (--SH) groups. Ca2+ plus Mg2+-ATPase and Ca2+-transport were more sensitive to methylmercury than to HgCl2. Acetylcholine receptor (AChR) was obtained for the electric organ of T. californica. Methylmercury inhibited the ACh binding to AChR WITH Ki = 5.7 - 10(-6) M. This effect was not due to mercuric ion alone since mercuric chloride up to 10(-4) M did not affect ACh binding to AChR. It is concluded that: the Ca2+ plus Mg2+-ATPase and Ca2+-transport contain --SH groups essential for their activity, and that the two functions are tightly coupled; the Ca2+-ionophore contains no --SH groups essential for its activity; CH3HgCl inhibition of Ca2+ plus Mg2+-ATPase and Ca2+-transport is partly due to its reactivity with --SH groups in hydrophobic environment; the Ca2+-transport is inhibited by HgCl2 through two processes, one which is the blockage of --SH groups and another which is the inhibition of the Ca2+-ionophoric site; and the inhibition of ACh binding to AChR is due to the blockage of --SH groups in hydrophobic environment, which is inaccessible to Hg2+. Our data present for the first time a molecular basis for the myopathy associated with mercurial compounds toxicity.
Response to purified acetylcholine receptor and autologous thymocytes. To determine the potential importance of an immune response directed against the acetylcholine receptor in myasthenia gravis, we studied cell-mediated immunity to receptor as measured by lymphocyte stimulation in 21 myasthenic patients and 21 controls, including five with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis. The mean (+/- S.E.M.) stimulation index was 5.3 +/-   13 for patients and   12 +/- 0.3 for controls (P less than 0.005). Fourteen patients had indexes greater than 2.0 (nine of 11 males, five of 10 females, 10 of 11 elderly patients, and five of six with thymoma). Stimulation index correlated with disease activity (rs = 0.71, P less than 0.01). Peripheral blood lymphocytes from one of three young female myasthenic patients responded to autologous thymocytes but not to receptor; peripheral blood lymphocytes from the other two responded to receptor but not to autologous thymocytes. Our findings are further evidence that autoimmunity to the acetylcholine receptor plays a central part in myasthenia gravis.
The intrinsic alpha activities and the D2 (frog, m, rectus abdominalis) concentrations were estimated for different acetylcholine and sebacinylcholine derivatives. So were also the A2 values for antagonists and the affinity constants Kc for some partial agonists. The results obtained disprove Paton's "rate-theory". The relationship between the cholinergic activity and the volume of cationic groups was studied and it could not possibly be explained by the steric hindrance alone. It is suggested that certain hydrophobic radicals of the cationic groups contact the receptor surface outside the anionic centre. Such contacts prevent the cholinoreceptor to change its conformation and thus inhibit the depolarization of the membrane. An approximate estimation of the anionic site dimensions is given.
Lumbar cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) acetylcholine (ACh) and choline (Ch) levels were measured in patients with Huntington's chorea (N=11), Parkinson's disease (N=8), and subjects at risk for Huntington's chorea (N=4), and all three groups were found not to differ significantly from normal controls (N=10). The values found for lumbar CSF ACh and Ch levels in the normal subjects were comparable with previously reported values. The use of physostigmine, a cholinesterase inhibitor, in collecting the CSF samples did not appear to make a difference with regard to ACh and Ch concentrations. Evidence suggesting a ventricular-lumbar gradient, with lumbar CSF Ch concentration being less than ventricular CSF Ch concentration, was found. Finally, ACh levels in CSF did not correlate with corresponding Ch levels.
"One-way" mixed lymphocyte reaction was not enhanced when the cells were allowed to be exposed to acetylcholine or carbamylcholine at a concentration of 0.01-  10mumole/ml during the entire period of culture. It was thought to be due to cytotoxicity effect of these agents on responding cells. When the responding cells were incubated with cholinergic agents for 1 hr prior to washing the cells  and setting up the mixed cell culture, "one-way" mixed lymphocyte reaction was enhanced. However, when the stimulating cells were similarly treated with either agent, no enhancement of "one-way" mixed lymphocyte reaction was observed. These observations indicate that cholinergic agent induces enhancement of mixed lymphocyte reaction by affecting only the responding cells and not the stimulating cells.
The authors extracted acetylcholine (ACh) from bovine iris and carried out biological assay on guinea pig ileum. One of the pairs of irides were subjected in vivo for an hour to an aqueous solution of pilocarpine HCl 3 per cent, with the loading dose instilled in the conjunctival sac at the rate of ten times three drops in intervals of three minutes. The bio-assays of tissue extracts of pilocarpinised iris after one hour's action and the control studies present the following values: the amount of ACh in the pilocarpinised irides was 0,70 mug and in the controls it was 0,58 mug of ACh/150 mg of tissue. The remaining proportion of the elevated dose of pilocarpine applied to the iris tissue, one hour after the in vivo action, was comparable only to 1,5 mug of free pilocarpine or to a fifth of the ACh in the iris (0,12 mug). The results of these experiments demonstrate a complete decomposition of the pilocarpine as well as the existence of a certain limitation of elevation of the cholinergic tone in the iris tissues. The authors support data in the literature which indicates that pilocarpine raises the ACh levels. They do not attribute a fundamental importance to the raised loading dose of pilocarpine concerning the desired effect of a maximal elevation of cholinergic tone in order to achieve a favourable clinical effect in glaucoma.
The acetylcholine (ACh) concentration was determined in the diaphragm, extensor digitorum longus and atria of rats with permanent access to food and in single-fed animals. single feeding caused a statistically highly significant increase in the ACh content of the atria, but did not significantly affect the ACh content of the skeletal muscles.
In this study the authors have compared the cholinergic tone in a collection of bovine choroids after instillation of pilocarpine in the conjunctival fornix in one group using the opposite choroid from the same animal as a control. The tests for acetylcholine (ACh) were assayed on guinea-pig ileum. The choroidal nerves in the pilocarpinised eyes had an average level of 0,50 mug of ACh, the homologous choroidal nerves of the controls had an average level of 0,45 mug of standard ACh per 150 mg of tissue. The pilocarpine had been instilled in the conjunctival fornix as a 3 per cent aqueous solution of pilocarpine HCl, ten times three drops in intervals of three minutes. One hour after the last application the animals were sacrificed and the eyes enucleated. The authors discuss the clinica importance of the infiltration of pilocarpine into the choroid.
A double sucrose gap voltage clamp technic has been used to study the extra-current induced by acetylcholine (Iach) on the myocardial membrane on frog atrial trabeculae. I) No desensitization of the Iach current is noted for repeated perfusions of Ach. II) The Iach current is suppressed by atropine. III) The reversal potential Each is more negative than the resting potential --20 mV less than or equal to Each less than or equal to OmV.IV) The relationship Iach/Holding potential for various [K+]o shows a) That Each behaved as a potassium electrode, b) an inward going rectification. These results indicate that the cholinergic receptor might be related with the gk1 channel.
The authors have determined the acetylcholine (ACh) content in bovine ciliary bodies. One of the ciliary bodies was subjected in vivo to the influence of an aqueous solution of pilocarpine HCl 3 p. 100 which was instilled in the conjunctival cul-de-sac (ten times at a dose of three drops every three minutes). The contralateral ciliary body of the same animal served as a control for the ACh concentration. Enucleation was performed one hour after the last instillation. The average concentration of ACh estimated in 13 control ciliary bodies was 0,40 mug of ACh, and in 13 pilocarpinised eyes 0,50 mug of ACh (for 150 mg of tissue). The questions concerning the inactivation of pilocarpine and the source of augmentation of cholinergic tone in the pilocarpinised eyes have been discussed in previous communications.
Using titrations of acetylcholine (ACh) on guinea-pig ileum the authors have demonstrated that there is no significant statistical difference between the cholinergic activity of extracts of 150 mg of retinal tissue from pilocarpinised eyes (0.3 mug of ACh) and the activity of extracts from control eyes not subjected to pilocarpine (0.29 mug of ACh). The pilocarpine had been instilled into the bovine conjunctival sac at the rate of three drops of 3 p. 100 pilocarpine HCl ten times at intervals of three minutes. One hour after the last application the animals were killed and the eyes enucleated. The role of pilocarpine in the regulation of tissues in the posterior segment of the eye is discussed.
Cocaine treatment (10 or 50 mg/kg, i.m.): 1) did not change significantly the amount of 3H dopamine synthesized from 3H tyrosine in the striatum but reduced the specific activity of 3H tyrosine; 2) delayed the release of cerebral dopamine after inhibition of its biosynthesis by alpha-methylparatyrosine; 3) reduced the amount of 5-hydroxyindolacetic acid accumulated after Probenecid, which reflects an inhibitory effect on serotonin release; 4) did not change significantly the acetylcholine level of the brain.
The work discusses the measurement of acetylcholine (ACh) in the bovine iris in 150 mg of tissue on guinea-pig ileum. Prior to the extraction of ACh, a 1% solution of physostigmine salicylate (eserine) was instilled into the conjunctival sac ten times at a dose of three drops at intervals of three minutes (to a total of 15,000 micron g). The fellow eye of the same animal was left untreated and served as a control. One hour after the least instillation the animal was killed. The nine eserinised irides showed an average of 0.65 micron g ACh, and the nine controls an average of 0.47 micron g ACh (for 150 mg of tissue). The difference was statistically significant. In the discussion the authors admit that the amplitude of contraction of the guinea-pig ileum can be very little influenced by traces of eserine, possibly by binding effect. The form of eserine applied no longer influences the amplitude of the guinea-pig ileum contractions after an hour of in vivo action, and this is the same in considerably smaller doses where it is possible to prove its inactivation. Augmentation of the activity in the eserinised iris is adequate for the levels of acetylcholine. The more intensive action of eserine on the iris compared to that of pilocarpine is related to its greater binding power with the iris tissues.
In the presence of a glucose concentration of   15 g/1 the secretion of insulin from the isolated perfused rat pancreas is clearly weaker at 28 degrees C than at 37.5 degrees C. In response to cholinergic stimulation, the absolute increase of insulin secretion rate is less at 28 degrees C than at 37.5 degrees C. However, when evaluated in percentage in relation to the baseline value, this increase is more important at the lower temperature. As to glucagon secretion, lowering of the temperature from 37.5 degrees C to 28 degrees C modifies neither this secretion in the presence of glucose alone, nor the increased secretion provoked by the cholinergic stimulation.
Electrophysiologic, morphologic, and biochemical definitions of the synapse will be correlated spatially and temporally. Postsynaptic fatigue and facilitation follow oscillations of the free pool of acetylcholine, predicted by the kinetic theory and observed at the electric organ of Torpedo marmorata. The underlying thermodynamic instability exhibits properties of the Na+--K+-dependent hydrolysis of adenosine triphosphate and represents a necessary condition for synaptic memory.
The postjunctional membrane of mouse diaphragm fibres was hyperpolarized by 1-2 mV during local curarization of the end-plate zone in the presence of anticholinesterase. In a solution containing 5 mM K+, the mean hyperpolarization was   10+/-0.35 mV. Hyperpolarization was   146+/-0.30 mV when the activity of the Na-K pump was blocked by 2 x 10(-5) M ouabain and   182+/-0.43 mV when it was blocked by bathing the muscle in a K+-free medium. Reactivation of membrane ATP-ase by addition of potassium after a period in K+-free medium reduced the hyperpolarization to zero, when measurements were made 10-20 min after the readdition. It is concluded that spontaneous non-quantal leakage of acetylcholine occurs at the mouse neuromuscular junction, as it does in the frog (2). Conditions which block the Na+-k+-dependent ATPase increased the leakage whereas potentiation of the pump activity decreased it.
The hydrolysis of p-nitrophenyl phosphate by wheat germ acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric monoester phosphohydrolase, EC 313.2) has been investigated in mixtures of aqueous buffers with acetone, dioxane and acetonitrile. The enzyme was either in free solution or immobilized on a pellicular support which consisted of a porous carbonaceous layer on solid glass beads. The highest enzyme activity was obtained in acetone and acetonitrile mixed with citrate buffer over a wide range of organic solvent concentration. In 50% (v/v) acetone both V and Km of the immobilized enzyme were about half of the values in the neat aqueous buffer, but the Ki for inorganic phosphate was unchanged. In 50% (v/v) mixtures of various solvents and citrate buffers of different pH, the enzymic activity was found to depend on the pH of the aqueous buffer component rather than the pH of the hydro-organic mixture as measured with the glass-calomel electrode. The relatively high rates of p-nitrophenol liberation in the presence of glucose even at high organic solvent concentrations suggest that transphosphorylation is facilitated at low water activity.
Acid hydrolases and lysosomal membrane properties were studied at various ages in the normal human brain. In CSF and four brain regions, the inferior olive, the cerebellar cortex, the caudate nucleus and the frontal cortex were thus beta-galactosidase, beta-glucosidase, alpha-mannosidase, hexosaminidase and acid phosphatase biochemically quantitated at ages varying between 2 and 89 years of age. Also the membrane latency for acid phosphatase was studied in these regions. No major regional quantitative differences were found with regard to the enzymes studied. Their kinetic properties were also defined. There appeared to exist a regional and intra-areal variation in lysosomal membrane permeability. There was, however, no age related increase in total enzyme contents. The possibility significance of these findings are discussed with reference to the aging process.
Acid phosphatases I, II and III have molecular weights of greater than 200 000, of 107 000, and of 13 400, respectively. Following partial purification, isoenzyme II was obtained as a single activity band, as assessed by activity staining with p-nitrophenyl phosphate and alpha-naphthyl phosphate on polyacrylamide gels run at several pH values. With 50mM p-nitrophenyl phosphate as a substrate, enzymes II and III exhibit plateaus of activity over the pH range 3 - 5 and 3.5 - 6, respectively. Acid phosphatase II is not significantly inhibited by 0.5% formaldehyde. The activity of human liver acid phosphatase II and of human prostatic acid phosphatase towards several substrates is compared. The liver enzyme, is marked contrast to the prostatic enzyme, does not hydrolyze O-phosphoryl choline.
A sedimentable form of acid phosphatase (EC 313.2) from Tetrahymena pyriformis was found to be solubilized by Triton X-100. The total enzyme activity in the insoluble cell fraction increased almost 200% upon solubilization with Triton X-100 or Nonidet P-40. Removal of membrane lipids and Triton X-100 from the particulate wash solution with a chloroform extraction resulted in non-specific enzyme-protein aggregation which was reversible upon addition of Triton X-100. The results indicate that this acid phosphatase is an integral membrane protein. The pH optima for this particulate bound acid phosphatase was 3.5 with o-carboxyphenyl phosphate and 4.0 with p-nitrophenyl phosphate as substrates. The Km values of each substrate were 3.1 and 0.031 mM, respectively.
Cattle brain cortex was homogenised in 0, 29 mol/1 sucrose and centrifuged at 101 000 X g. The supernatant contains the majority of 3 enzymes participating in protein turnover: cathepsin (EC 3.4.4.23), phosphoprotein phosphatase (EC 313.16) and acid phosphatase (EC 313.2). They were separated by chromatography on Sephadex G 200 in neutral buffer. The cathepsin was purified up to 380 fold by gel filtration on Sephadex and column electrophoresis. The pH optimum of cathepsin was 5.7. At 37 degrees C no decrease of activity was measurable during 30 min. The Km was found to be 2.75 mg/ml Casein Hammarsten. The molecular weight by gel filtration and exclusion-gel electrophoresis was about 45 000, corresponding to the cathepsin from human liver (Barrett, A.J. (1970) Biochem. J. 117, 601-607). The sedimentation constant 3.0 S20,W is comparable with the values of proteinase of different origin, and the composition is similar with respect to the high proportion of acidic amino acids. The phosphoprotein phosphatase can be further purified by chromatography on hydroxyapatite and by column electrophoresis. The pH optimum of phosphoprotein phosphatase was about pH 5.5. At 45 degrees C no decrease of activity was measurable during 20 min; the Km was   143 mg/ml casein isoelectric. The pH optimum of acid phosphatase was about 5.6. At 54 degrees C NO DECREASE OF ACTIVITY WAs measurable during 30 min; the Km was 2 mumol/1 for Sodium phenolphthalein diphosphate. All three enzymes slowly lost their activity during several weeks at - 4 degrees C, apparently by self digestion in the cold.
The histochemical enzyme pattern in normal, extra-hepatic bile ducts from rabbits was studied. A difference between the duct epithelium and the crypt epithelium was noted mainly in the activity of gamma-glutamyl-transpeptidase and alkaline phosphatase which only stained positively in the crypts. No difference from the normal enzyme pattern was noted after diversion of the bile flow for up to 30 days.
Potato acid phosphatase (EC 313.2) was used to remove the eight phosphate groups from alphas1-casein. Unlike most acid phosphatases, which are active at pH 6.0 or below, potato acid phosphatase can catalyze the dephosphorylation of alphas1-casein at pH 7.0. Although phosphate inhibition is considerable (K1=0.42 mM phosphate), the phosphate ions produced by the dephosphorylation of casein can be removed by dialysis, allowing the reaction to go to completion. The dephosphorylated alphas1-casein is homogeneous on gel electrophoresis with a slower mobility than native alphas1-casein and has an amino acid composition which is identical to native alphas1-casein. Thus the removal of phosphate groups from casein does not alter its primary structure. Potato acid phosphatase also removed the phosphate groups from other phosphoproteins, such as beta-casein, riboflavin binding protein, pepsinogen, ovalbumin, and phosvitin.
Ovine erythrocytic acid phosphatase showed two peaks of activity at pH 5.0 and 5.7 in acetate buffer with p-nitrophenylphosphate as substrate. The enzyme was only slightly inhibited by fluoride and L-phenylalanine, but high concentrations of urea strongly inhibited it. Activity of the enzyme was greater in goat erythrocytes than in sheep. By means of starch electrophoresis, three isoenzymes belonging to nine types were separated from the ovine enzymes, while three isoenzymes of five types were present in goats. Electrophoresis in polyacrylamide gel was suitable for detecting the rapidly migrating isoenzymes.
The rate of inactivation of acid phosphatase (EC 313.2) from bovine brain by dithiobis-(2-nitrobenzoic acid) (Nbs2) is identical to the rate of titration of one of the two SH groups of this enzyme. The rate of inactivation of the enzyme by Nbs2 is pH dependent and, at 300 mM NaCl, can be described by the reaction of a single SH group of pK 8.4. At low ionic strength the pK determined from the k inactivation vs. pH profile is 7.7 and the results deviate markedly from the predicted values at pH values less than or equal to 6. The decrease of V upon addition of salts is paralleled by the decrease of inactivation rate by Nbs2. The relevance of SH groups in catalysis by bovine brain acid phosphatase is discussed in terms of these data.
The progesterone-induced purple phosphatase isolated from the uterine flushings of pigs is activated by a variety of reagents that cleave disulfide bonds, including 2-mercaptoethanol, dithiothreitol, L-ascorbate, L-cysteine, sulfite, and cyanide. It is inhibited by various mercurials, iodoacetamide, O-iodosobenzoate, and hydrogen peroxide. Thiols increase the specific phosphatase activity from 25 to about 300 units per mg of enzyme. This activation is accompanied by a shift in the extinction maximum to higher energy to yield a protein with a pink coloration. Following maximum activation there is a gradual decrease in enzyme activity and protein color which is accompanied by loss of ferrous iron from the protein. Sodium dithionite at 10 mM or higher causes an immediate inhibition of phosphatase activity and bleaching of color, and can be used to prepare the iron-free apoprotein. The latter can be partially reactivated by Fe3+ salts but not by Fe2+. The Fe3+ restores the pink form of the enzyme with a specific activity of about 200 units/mg of protein. Cu2+ also causes some reactivation, but other metal ions were ineffective. ESR studies showed that the pink form of phosphatase contains approximately 1 atom of high spin ferric iron per molecule. It is concluded that the phosphatase requires a free thiol and Fe3+ for activity. Reduction of the iron leads to complete loss of both color and enzyme activity. The color change from purple to pink represents disulfide reduction and is not due to reduction of iron.
Allogenous spleen cells were transplanted subcapsularly into the kidney of mice irradiated in a dose of 650 r. The resulting damage of the kidney cortex structure was closely associated with the function of macrophages and with activation of the lysosomal enzymes.
The localizations of acid phosphatase (ACPase) and thiamine pyrophosphatase (TPPase) activities were studied in the placental labyrinth of the cat during the last days of gestation. ACPase activities were observed essentially in the syncytiotrophoblast and in the "interstitial inert substance" (S.I.I.) that separates maternal from foetal tissues. Reaction product was localized in lysosomes, multivesicular bodies, and in the network of smooth-membraned tubules which open on the cell surface of the syncytiotrophoblast facing the S.I.I. The S.I.I. exhibit a strong activity, probably of syncytiotrophoblastic origin. TPPase activities were found in the syncytiotrophoblast, rarely in the Golgi apparatus but always in the lumen of the network of smooth-membrande tubules. The S.I.I. shows a moderate activity. These TPPase positive tubules being frequently observed very close to the Golgi cisternae, it is proposed that they arise from the Golgi complex and convey phosphatases to the S.I.I. After phosphotungstic acid staining at low pH, luminal surface coat of maternal endothelium is always strongly and continuously visualized, while the plasma membrane of the syncytiotrophoblast facing the S.I.I. is never stained. Staining is intense in the lumen of tubules, and continuous with the stain of the S.I.I. ACPase activity of the S.I.I. could be implicated in enzymatic degradation of maternal molecules during their transfer from maternal to foetal blood. The S.I.I. may correspond to the immunological buffer zone at the interface between maternal and foetal tissues.
Acid phosphatase II (AP II) was isolated from the cell-free extract of Pichia guilliermondii Wickerham ATCC 9058 and partially purified. The enzyme is a non-specific phosphomonoesterase. It hydrolyzes p-nitrohenyl-phophate (NPP), beta-glycerophosphate, glucose-6-phosphate, guanosine-5'-monophosphate, adenosine-5'-monophosphate, cytidine-5'-monophosphate, uridine-5'-monophosphate, alpha-naphtylphosphate, FMN. The order of the substrates corresponds to the degree of their hydrolysis decrease. The Michaelis constant of the enzyme was   14-10-3 M for NPP as a substrate, pH optimum was 5.5 and temperature optimum-40C. AP II was strongly inhibited by MoO4-2, F-, inorganic phosphate, Cu2+ and Be2+. The activity of the enzyme in the yeast cells does not change noticeably during growth on media with low and high iron content.
Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate phosphomonoesterase was isolated and partially purified from wheat (Triticum aestivum L. var. Selkirk) leaves. The enzyme had KNADP value of   14 X 10(-4) M and a pH optimum of 5.9. In vitro activity of this enzyme was unaffected by precursors of NAD (nicotinamide and nicotinic acid) or cytokinins (kinetin and benzimidazole). However, when detached wheat leaves were treated with solutions of these compounds, the precursors lowered the specific activity while the cytokinins enhanced the activity. It is suggested that spatial separation and compartmentation of the enzyme and its substrate NADP account for the similar effect of benzimidazole on both.
Bovine brain acid phosphatase is inhibited, at any pH, by an increase in ionic strength. The rate decrease is associated at pH 5, with a marked decrease in Km and, at pH 8, with a noticeable decrease in Vm. The rate of thermal inactivation of the enzyme is unaffected by increasing ionic strength up to 300 mM. These results are discussed in terms of interactions at the active site of the enzyme.
A continuous-monitoring method for measuring acid phosphatase activity with alpha-naphthyl phosphate as the substrate was critically evaluated and modified. Using partially purified prostatic acid phosphatase, we show that certain conditions for the assay must be satisfied to ensure linearity. These conditions include maintaining the pH between 5.6 and 5.9 and the addition of detergent to sustain linearity. The results obtained with alpha-naphthyl phosphate have been compared with those obtained by using p-nitrophenyl phosphate as substrate. When used with an automatic rate analyzer, the modified method is as sensitive but more reproducible.
Acid phosphatase (EC. 313.2) has been separated by molecular sieving into two fractions and these fractions were purified by Sephadex ion-exchange chromatography. One of the purified enzymes (fraction II) was purified 830 fold and had a specific activity of 34 international units per mg protein at 37 degrees C and at a pH of 4.9. The Km value with p-nitrophenylphosphate as substrate was 9.10(-4) M and the kinetic studies showed no possibilities of control by allosteric transitions, and no effect of metabolites (amino acids) on the reaction velocity.
A tartrate-resistant acid phosphatase was isolated from a human leukemic spleen by freeze-thawing in saline and purified by repeated chromatography on carboxymethyl-cellulose. The purified enzyme has a molecular weight of 64 000. It catalyzes the hydrolysis of inorganic and organic pyrophosphate as well as the phenolic ester of monoorthophosphate, with optimal activity between pH 5 and 6. However, there is no activity toward mono-orthophosphate esters of aliphatic alcohols. The present data have identified its catalytic function as a pyrophosphatase. However, it has properties different from the pyrophosphatase previously observed in normal animal tissues.
The activity of the acid phosphatase from prostate was increased by 90% by the addition of 150 mmol/l 1-pentanol to the assay mixture. This activation results in an increased turnover of substrate, so that the phosphomonoester is cleaved more rapidly and a correspondingly larger amount of the release organic residue can be detected. The quantity of free phosphate, however, does not correspond to the substrate turnover, because some of the phosphate residue is transferred from the substrate to the 1-pentanol in a transphosphorylation reaction. The influence of the substrate, buffer, pH and of tartrate on the 1-pentanol-activated prostate phosphatase was investigated.
Gastric mucosae were isolated from the European frog,temporaria, and after 5-7 h, stimulated with histamine (10(-4) M) and theophylline (5 mM). Acid secretion increased about fourfold, and this was accompanied by a threefold increase in secretory surface of the oxyntic cells, as determined in electron micrographs with conventional morphometric techniques. At the same time phosphatase activity of the secretory surface increased. Other experiments showed that the latter was due to an acid phosphatase, with pH optimum near 3. It appears that the increase in surface phosphatase with stimulation can be attributed to a diminished local pH and not to the increase in surface area demonstrated in this study.
One component, the i form, of acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313.2) produced by Aspergillus niger was purified from the mycelial extract. The purified enzyme was homogenous on Sephadex G-200 gel filtration, disc electrophoresis and heat inactivation. The purified enzyme was studied and the following results were obtained:  The enzyme catalyzed the hydrolysis of a wide variety of phosphomonoesters, but not that of bis(p-nitrophenyl)phosphate, adenosine 3',5'-cyclic monophosphate, fructose 1,6-diphosphate, adenosine 5'-diphosphate or adenosine 5'-triphosphate. 2. Fluoride, orthophosphate, arsenate, borate, molybdate and (+)-tartrate acted as inhibitors. This enzyme was inactivated by N-bromosuccinimide and 2-hydroxy-5-nitrobenzyl bromide, and was not affected by p-chloromercuribenzoate, N-acetylimidazole, p-diazobenzenesulfonic acid and tetranitromethane. From these results, tryptophan was estimated to play an important role in the enzyme activity. 3. The apparent molecular weight was 310000 by Sephadex G-200 gel filtration. Polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis in the presence of sodium dodecyl sulfate suggested that the molecular weight of the subunit was approximately 89000. 4. The purified enzyme contained 29% carbohydrate consisting of glucosamine, mannose and galactose. The amino acid composition of this enzyme was not specific compared with other known acid phosphatases.
Guinea-pig epidermal acid phosphatase has been purified approximately 120-fold by a procedure including acid treatment, CM-cellulose and DEAE-cellulose chromatography, and gel filtration on Sephadex G-100. The enzyme had a pH optimum at 5-0 and the optimal temperature for activity was approximately 50 degrees C. The enzyme was not activated by divalent cations or 2-mercaptoethanol, but it was inhibited by p-chloromercuribenzoate and by fluoride. The km value for p-nitrophenyl phosphate was 1-31x10-4 M, the molecular weight was about 73,000 as determined by Sephadex G-100 gel filtration and the isoelectric point was 6. The enzyme hydrolyzed deoxyribonucleoside monophosphates to deoxyribonucleosides.
Chlamydomonas reinhardi, cultured under normal growth conditions, secreted significant amounts of protein and carbohydrates but not lipids or nucleic acids. A fivefold increase in light intensity led to a tenfold increase in secreted protein and carbohydrate. Among the proteins secreted was acid phosphatase with a pH optimum at 4.8 like the enzyme in the cells. Phosphorus depleted algae grown on minimal orthophosphate contained and secreted both acid and alkaline phosphatase. The pH optimum of the intracellular alkaline phosphatase was 9.2. When phosphorus-depleted cells were grown with increasing orthophosphate, intra- and extracellular alkaline phosphatase was almost completely repressed and intra- and extracellular acid phosphatase was partially repressed. Extracellular acid and alkaline phosphatase increased with the age of the culture. Electrophoresis indicated only one acid and one alkaline phosphatase in phosphorus-satisfied and phosphorus-depleted cells. Chlamydomonas cells suspended in an inorganic salt solution secreted only acid phosphatase; the absence of any extr-cellular cytoplasmic marker enzyme indicated that there was little, if any, autolysis to account for the extracellular acid enzyme. Phosphorus-depleted cells were able to grow on organic phosphates as the sole source of orthophosphate. Ribose-5-phosphate was the best for cell multiplication, and its utility was shown to be due to the cell's ability to use the ribose as well as the orthophosphatase for cell multiplication.
The histochemical distribution of acid phosphatase in microfilariae and in the larval stages of four mosquito-borne filariae: Wuchereria bancrofti, Brugia malayi, pahangi and Dirofilaria immitis was studied using naphthol AS-TR-hexazonium technique and light microscopy. Accurate differentiation between microfilariae of the four species could be made on the basis of their patterns of acid phosphatase activity. In contrast to microfilariae in the blood, the larval stages in the mosquito exhibited different patterns of acid phosphatase activity which were characteristic for each developmental stage. In the first-stage larva, maximum acid phosphatase activity was found in the anal vesicle, the growing anal membrane (anal plug), buccal cavity, forming intestine and rectum. In the second-stage larva, acid phosphatase activity was present throughout the alimentary canal, particularly in the section of the intestine and rectum. In the infective third-stage larva, the whole body stained densely red. The reaction for acid phosphatase in the excretory cell complex of W. bancrofti and of both species of Brugia gradually decreased in intensity and disappeared completely towards the end of the first-larval stage, whereas in D. immitis a strong reaction in this area persisted throughout the larval life in the mosquito. The presence or absence of enzymic activity in the excretory cell complex and in the Mundgebilde (amphids) of the developing larvae can be used as an adjunctive diagnostic method.
At least three gluconic acid forming enzymes were identified in cell-free extracts of Aspergillus niger: glucose oxidase (EC   1  13.4), a glucose dehydrogenase (EC   1  199.10), and an enzyme or a mixture of enzymes catalyzing the cleavage of 6-phosphogluconate into gluconate and inorganic phosphate. 2,6-dichlorphenolindophenol was one of the hydrogen acceptors in vitro of the glucose dehydrogenase. Some properties of this enzyme (Km values, pH-dependence, substrate and hydrogen acceptor specificity), as determined in cell-free extracts, were found to be in good agreement with properties described in literature for a glucose dehydrogenase which has been purified from Aspergillus oryzae. The formation of Pi from 6-phosphogluconate and other phosphate esters was found to have an optimum between pH 7 and 8 , and another below pH 4. This suggests that it is catalyzed by an alkaline and an acid phosphomonoesterase (EC 313.1, 313.2), both enzymes exhibiting only low substrate specificity. The influence of extraction and assay buffers on the activity of gluconate forming enzymes was investigated. Loss of activity during preparation of cell-free extracts, as calculated from loss of activity storage of cell-free extracts at 4 degrees C, was found to be lower than 4%. Purified glucose oxidase added before homogenization was found in the extract almost quantitatively.
Acid phosphatase from the yeast Rhodotorula rubra was purified 44-fold. The purification procedure involved mechanical disruption of cells, precipitation with ethanol, chromatography on DEAE- and CM-cellulose. 2. The purified enzyme is homogeneous in polyacrylamide gels at pH 4.5, 9.5 and 8.4. Carbohydrate content accounts for 57% of the total weight. The optimum pH is at 4.0-4.6, and the enzyme is stable over pH range from 2.6 to 6.0. Full activity was retained on 60-min incubation at 50 degrees C, but it was reduced by half on 60-min incubation at 65 degrees C. 3. Specificity of the enzyme is fairly broad; monoesters of carbohydrates, and nucleosides and inorganic pyrophosphate can serve as substrates. Km was found to be 1 X 10(-4) M for p-nitrophenyl phosphate as a substrate. The enzyme is inhibited by molybdate, phosphate, arsenate and fluoride ions.
Influence of Isatin on rat tissue acid phosphatase has been studied. It has an organ-specific effect, the liver enzyme is activated, the brain enzyme is inhibited while those of kidney and intestine are not affected. Isatin activation of the liver enzyme is of mixed type and pH dependent. Rat liver enzyme appears to require intact amino and sulfhydryl groups for activity. Isatin seems to combine with the enzyme through the sulfhydryl group of the latter.
Seminal fructose and acid phosphatase levels have been determined in 30 vasectomised and 30 nonvasectomised healthy adults, both the groups being closely matched for age (32 to 45 years). The fructose and acid phosphatase values in the vasectomised men, 3 to 6 months after the operation, were 316 +/- 36 mg% and 2,098 +/- 112 K.A. units/ml, respectively, while in the control group they were 251 +/- 28 mg% and 1,932 +/- 92 K.A. units/ml. The differences are statistically significant (P less than 0.001) and the possible implications of the post-vasectomy rise in these androgen dependent seminal constituents are discussed.
Acid phosphatase (othophosphoric monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313.2) from the human prostate was immobilized by its protein moiety on cyanogen bromide-activated Sepharose, by carbohydrate moiety on Concanavalin-A-Sepharose, and by Schiff base formation with partially oxidized carbohydrate groups on ethylenediamine-Sepharose. The highest retention of enzyme activity, 80%, was found for the noncovalent immobilization on Concanavalin-A-Sepharose. It was demonstrated that the optimal pH changes for the Concanavalin-A-Sepharose and CNBr-Sepharose-enzyme complexes are electrostratic in character. In all cases of immobilization the enzyme has higher thermostability than that for the native enzyme under the same conditions. The effects of the enzyme stabilization were interpreted in terms of the multipoint interaction between the enzyme molecule and the carrier.
The method of Hillmann, in which hydrolysis of alpha-naphthyl phosphate by acid phosphatase is coupled to the formation of an alpha-naphthol-Fast Red TR azo-compound, has been adapted for use with the LKB Produkter AB 8600 reaction rate analyzer. Factors which affect the reproducibility of the method are described and its performance is shown to be superior to that of a manual phenyl-phosphate procedure.
At pH 10, which is in the alkaline measurement range, phenolphthalein is bound by albumin. The resonance system of this acid-base indicator cannot therefore be completely formed, and the colour intensity is correspondingly lower. Albumin also binds phenolphthalein monophosphate at pH 4-8, in the pH range of the enzymic reaction. Depending on the relative concentrations, the substrate concentration is therefore either suboptimal (manifested as a lower catalytic concentration of phosphatase), or the substrate excess is bound by albumin, so that the substrate inhibition of the phosphatase is decreased or abolished. Binding of phenolphthalein and its monophosphate to albumin is partly prevented by the addition of alcohol. These results show that the determination of prostate phosphatase with the substrate phenolphthalein monophosphate is markedly influenced by various factors. The interpretation of the observed colour intensity is therefore difficult, and the calculation of the catalytic concentration is frequently subject to error.
We describe a new assay that is useful for identifying individuals who may be affected with Gaucher's disease. The assay involves the determination of serum acid phosphatase activity using the fluorogenic substrate 4-methylumbelliferyl phosphate. The assay measures acid phosphatase activity at pH 6.0 in the presence of 3.0 M 2-mercaptoethanol and requires a 5 microliter serum sample and a 15-min incubation period. Under these conditions, 2-mercaptoethanol preferentially inhibited the acid phosphatase activity in control serum but did not inhibit the elevated acid phosphatase present in the serum of patients with Gaucher's disease. Using this assay, we observed a 5-50-fold elevation in serum acid phosphatase activity in 8 patients with the adult, non-neuropathic form of Gaucher's disease when compared to control serum assayed under the same conditions. Serum from several heterozygotes free from pathology exhibited normal acid phosphatase activity when assayed at pH 6.0 in the presence of 2-mercaptoethanol. Acid phosphatase activity in serum from patients with prostatic cancer can be distinguished from that in Gaucher serum on the basis of the well-documented sensitivity of the former to inhibition by sodium tartrate. A serum sample from a patient with Niemann-Pick disease exhibited a mild elevation in tartrate-resistant acid phosphatase activity so that conclusive diagnosis of Gaucher's disease requires assaying leukocytes or fibroblasts from suspected patients for glucocerebroside:beta-glucosidase activity.
The pH dependence of the human prostatic acid phosphatase-catalyzed hydrolysis of p-nitrophenyl phosphate and beta-glyceryl phosphate has been studied over a wide range of pH and the values of Km and V calculated with the aid of the Cleland HYPER program. The pH dependence of Km shows the effect of substrate ionization: pK values of 5.6 and 6.4 are observed as for the respective values of free substrates. The pH dependence of both Km and V for each substrate reveals the involvement of an ionizable group in the ES complex which is ascribed to a phosphohistidine-enzyme intermediate. The small deuterium solvent isotope effects which are observed on V are consistent with values observed for solvolysis of phosphoramidates. The measured data for Km indicates limits on burst-titration experiments of prostatic acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase, EC 313.2).
Generally acid phosphatase (ACP) assay is used for testing cases of alleged rape. Comparison of three different chemical methods for Acid Phosphatase (Andersch's method with p-nitrophenyl-phosphate substrate and tartrate inhibitor (A-Tart), Roy's method with thymolphthalein phosphate substrate (R-TMP), and Babson's method with alphanaphthyl phosphate substrate) indicated that Roy's method (R-TMP) should be the preferred one. This method had both acceptable sensitivity and confirmed specificity. Our data confirmed that the vaginal wash of normal healthy women has a very low level of ACP activity. Because of inconclusive data in the literature regarding this ACP level, a normal and equivocal range of ACP was suggested until more is known about causes and interferences. Possible sources of normal ACP activity in the wash fluids were also indicated.
The kinetics of the hydrolysis of nitrophenylphosphate by nonspecific acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313.2.) from Schizosaccharomices pombe was studied. 2. The kinetic parameters, Km and V, were determined as well as the inhibition constants, K1, for the inhibitors, phosphate and fluoride, as a function of pH. 3. The results, interpreted according to the theories of Dixon and Waley indicated the presence of three ionizable groups on the enzyme itself and one on the enzyme-substrate complex. 4. A model of the hydrolysis of phosphoric acid monoesters by the S. pombe acid phosphatase is proposed based on the ionization state of the reactants and on the results of the inhibition by the competitive inhibitors.
Acid and alkaline phosphatase activity has been localized in the cells of the sterile septae of starved and fed anthozoa. Acid phosphatase is present in lysosomes, in Golgi cisternae and old phagosomes of starved animals. In fed animals, the reaction is more intense and the number of lysosomes is increased. New phagosomes are loaded with lead phosphate. In starved animals, the alkaline phosphatase activity has been observed on the plasma membranes and in the old phagosomes.
Acid phosphatase has been characterized and quantified in human suction blister fluid, interstitial fluid and serum. The acid phosphatases of suction blister fluid and serum showed differences in their pH activity curves, Michaelis-Menton constants, heat stabilities and sensitivities to inhibition by tartrate and fluoride. The behaviour of the interstitial fluid enzyme was intermediate between these two. The levels of activity in blister fluid and serum were very similar, both being more than twice that of interstitial fluid. These results suggest that the acid phosphatase activity in suction blister fluid is derived largely from the overlying epidermis rather than from serum.
Although the primary genetic defect in all individuals with Gaucher's disease is a deficiency in glucocerebrosidase activity, the finding of marked elevations in splenic and serum acid phosphatase activity is almost as consistent a finding. Gaucher spleen and serum contain at least two forms of acid phosphatase that can be readily separated by chromatography on columns containing the cation exchange resin Sulphopropyl Sephadex. The major species of acid phosphatase (designated SP-I) contained in Triton X-100 (1% v/v) extracts of Gaucher spleen accounts for 65%--95% of the total activity and has the following properties: (1) it does not bind to the cation exchange column; (2) it exhibitis a pH optimum of 4.5--5.0; (3) it is inhibited by sodium fluoride (15 mM), L(+)-tartaric acid (20 mM), and beta-mercaptoethanol (2.1 M), and (4) it is resistant to inhibition by sodium dithionite (10 mM). The minor acid phosphatase activity (designated SP-II) present in extracts of Gaucher spleen has properties similar to those of the major species of acid phosphatase activity contained in serum from patients with Gaucher's disease: (1) it binds firmly to cation exchange columns (eluted by 0.5 M sodium chloride); (2) it exhibits a pH optimum of 5.0--6.0; (3) it is inhibited by sodium fluoride and sodium dithionite; and (4) it is resistant to inhibition by beta-mercaptoethanol (2.1 M) and L(+)-tartaric acid (20 mM). In addition, a second form of acid phosphatase that is tartrate resistant was found to be elevated in Gaucher serum. This form of serum acid phosphatase did not bind to Sulphopropyl Sephadex, was found to be significantly resistant to beta-mercaptoethanol (2.1 M), and was only partially inhibited by sodium dithionite (10 mM). The findings reported here indicate that at least three distinct forms of acid phosphatase activity are elevated in Gaucher's disease. Furthermore, the minor acid phosphatase activity contained in spleen homogenates has properties very similar to those of the major acid phosphatase activity observed to be present in serum of patients with Gaucher's disease. These data indicate that simple spleen spillage cannot account for the increased levels of serum acid phosphatase in patients with Gaucher's disease.
When the pH of growth medium containing a limited amount of inorganic phosphate is kept below 3.0, cells of Saccharomyces cerevisiae produce repressible alkaline phosphatase but no repressible acid phosphatase. The same cells produce acid phosphatase immediately on shifting the medium pH to 4.0 or above. Like intact cells, spheroplasts prepared from cells grown at pH 3.0 or 4.5 in medium with a limited amount of inorganic phosphate in suspension begin production of acid phosphatase immediately after pH shift from below 3.0 to 4.0 whereas sheroplasts from cells grown in inorganic phosphate-rich medium showed a prolonged lag period (3 h). The enzyme formation on the pH shift was sensitive to cycloheximide. No significant differences could be detected in cellular growth or in incorporation of 3H-L-lysine or 14C-adenine between cells cultivated at pH 3.0 and 4.5. These results along with the fact that the expression of structural genes of repressible acid and alkaline phosphatases is controlled by a common genetic regulatory system, at least in part, indicate that the genetic regulatory system operates to express the structural genes even at low pH, though the expression of repressible acid phosphatase is interrupted. Coupled experiments of temperature and pH shifts with the temperature-sensitive mutants of the regulatory genes suggest that the acidic pH affects the function of the cytoplasmic products of those genes in the expression of the structural gene. Based on these observations, a revised model involving the simultaneous functioning of the regulatory factors was suggested for the genetic regulation of repressible acid phosphatase synthesis.
The effect of cultivation temperature and pH on growth of the culture Penicillium brevi-compactum and biosynthesis of extracellular phosphohydrolases (acid and alkaline RNases and acid PMEase) involved in RNA degradation was studied. The maximum growth of the culture was seen at 30 degrees and pA-7.0 and its maximum physiological activity with respect to the above enzymes was noted at 24 degrees and pH = 3.0, ie optimal conditions for the biosynthesis of phosphohydrolases did not coincide with those for the culture growth. The cultivation temperature and pH produced an effect on the oxygen consumption and synthesis of extracellular phosphohydrolases by the culture.
The principal enzyme of human prostatic acid phosphatase [orthophosphoric monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313,2], which had been highly purified by affinity chromatography, isoelectric focusing, and gel filtrations, was shown to be homogeneous at pH 5,0 by sedimentation equilibrium analysis. The amino acid composition was determined and the sedimentation coefficient of the native molecule measured. The relative molecular mass was 89,000 at pH 5.0, as measured by analytical ultracentrifugation. The Km-value of the enzyme for p-nitrophenyl phosphate as substrate is   18-10(-4) mol/liter. I also examined substrate speificity, different inhibitors, and the effects of pH, temperature, and serum on the enzyme activity.
Specificity and pH-dependence of the canine enzyme. Two isoenzymes of rat liver acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum) EC 313.2) have been purified to homogeneity, at least one of these for the first time. Both of the rat liver isoenzymes have identical specific activities towards p-nitrophenyl phosphate. Molecular weights of the native enzymes are 92 000 for rat liver isoenzyme I and 93 000 for isoenzyme II, while the subunit molecular weights are 51 000 and 52 000 respectively. Data on substrate specificity and pH dependence are presented for the homogeneous canine prostatic enzyme, which is also isolated as a dimeric enzyme of (native) molecular weight 89 000. Carbohydrate analysis data are presented for canine prostatic acid phosphatase and it is further noted that both isoenzymes of rat liver acid phosphatase are also glycoproteins. The amino acid compositions of the two rat liver isoenzymes are presented together with those of the similar dimeric acid phosphatase of human liver and of canine prostate. Comparison of these results with published data for the amino acid composition of human prostatic acid phosphatase shows substantial similarities. However, significant differences are seen in the amino acid composition of rat liver acid phosphatase isoenzyme I as compared to a previous literature report. Most notably, 17 histidine residues are found per mol of isoenzyme I and 18 for isoenzyme II.
Optimal assay conditions are described for plasma alpha-galactosidase, beta-glactosidase, beta-glucuronidase, alpha-mannosidase, alpha-glucosidase, N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase, alpha-fucosidase, N-acetyl-alpha-glucosaminidase, acid phosphatase and arylsulphatase A. The levels of these activities in normal adults and children, and the stabilities of the activities on storage at -20 degrees C or 4 degrees C, are reported. The levels of these enzymic activities in plasma from patients with Fabry, Pompe, Sanfilippo A, Sanfilippo B, Tay Sachs and Hunter diseases, GM1-gangliosidosis and metachromatic leucodystrophy are described, and the possibility of using plasma hydrolase activities in the diagnosis of these conditions is discussed.
The testicular homogenate of adult mice was eluted by DEAE-cellulose chromatography. Four peaks of acid phosphatase were identified. The pooled samples of each peak were used to determine substrate specificity, pH-optima, modifier characteristics, thermal stability, and Km-values. The results obtained suggest that each peak may represent a separate and distinct type of acid phosphatase. These observations are very similar to those previously obtained with the rat testis. The acid phosphatase activities in the mouse seem, however, to differ biochemically to some extent from those in the rat.
Acid phosphatase (AcPase) from liver of the frog, Rana esculenta has been isolated and purified. The enzyme is heterogeneous, showing 4 activity zones on disc electrophoresis. The AcPase was separated into 3 peaks on DEAE-cellulose. Peak A corresponding to the electrophoretic AcPase IV represents an extensively purified enzyme form. 2. The separated enzyme forms are change isomers with a molecular weight of about 33,000. They differ markedly in substrate requirements and sensitivity towards activators and inhibitors. All of them are highly activated by dithiothreitol, show a rather restricted substrate specificity, and marked activity against ATP.
A new method for the estimation of acid phosphatase in seminal fluid based on the use of p-nitro-phenylphosphate is described as simple in practicability and appropriate for routine in clinics. The frequency distribution of acid phosphatase activity is specified with 66 samples showing a normal spermiogram. The values spread logarithmically with an average of 400 U/ml and a standard deviation ranging from 200 U/ml to 880 U/ml. Correlations between acid phosphatase content and general, cytological and biochemical spermiogram-parameters are investigated. A plain negative correlation with the pH (r = 0,4615, n = 250) and a very strong positive correlation with citrate (r = +0,9029, n = 200) turned out. The significance of these correlations is discussed. Among the biochemical parameters in spermiogram both citrate and acid phosphatase--each representing prostatic function--are equivalent in diagnostical significance.
The localization of acid phosphatase in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae at different growth phases had been studied. It was shown to be crucial for authentic location of acid phosphatase that the cytochemical reaction be performed on whole cells. Dimethylsulphoxide was used to alleviate the effects of fixation of the yeast cells with glutaraldehyde; the sulphoxide did not affect the distribution of acid phosphatase in the cells. It has been established that in exponentially-growing cells acid phosphatase is localized mostly in small vacuolar compartments. In mature cells, the bulk of acid phosphatase is found in the central vacuole, although a significant amount of the enzyme is detectable in the plasma membrane and the adjacent vesicles.
The substrate specificity of isoenzymes of acid phosphatase in m.gastrocnemius of rabbits. Three distinct isoenzymes of acid phosphatase have been separated from extracts of m.gastrocnemius of normal and of vitamin E deficient rabbits by gel filtration and polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis. These isoenzymes, termed I, II and III, have molecular weights of: 110,000--130,000, 60,000--78,000 and 12,500--14,500. Isoenzymes I and II split the substrates 4-methylumbelliferyl phosphate and naphthol AS-BI phosphate and the activity is strongly increased in the muscles of vitamin E deficient rabbits. Isoenzyme III splits only 4-methylumbelliferyl phosphate and the activity is not increased in the muscles of vitamin E deficient rabbits. The pH-optimum for isoenzymes I and II is 4.8 and for isoenzyme III 5.5. It has been shown that the histochemical semipermeable membrane technique, using substrate naphthol AS-BI phosphate, is a very reliable technique for demonstrating activity of the isoenzymes I and II in tissue sections. On the other hand, activity of isoenzyme III cannot be demonstrated with this histochemical technique. In pathologically altered muscles, the activity of the isoenzymes I and II is greatly increased whilst the activity of isoenzyme III is not significantly altered.
Treatment of homogenous human prostatic acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313.2) with low concentrations of Woodward's reagent K (N-ethyl-5-phenylisoxazolium-3'-sulfonate) leads to a rapid loss of enzymic activity. The rate of inactivation of the enzyme is reduced in the presence of the competitive inhibitors phosphate and L-(+)-tartrate, but not in the presence of non-inhibitory D-tartrate. Measurement of the ethylamine produced upon hydrolysis of enzyme modified in the presence of D- and of L-tartrate permitted the quantitative estimation of the number of carboxylic acid residues at the active site. The data indicate that two carboxyl groups per (dimeric) enzyme molecule are essential for catalytic activity. It is proposed that one function of the active site carboxyl group may be to protonate the leaving alcohol or phenol portion of the phosphomonoester substrate during the formation of the covalent phosphoenzyme intermediate.
Alkaline and acid phosphatase activity was measured in the ejaculate of normo-, oligo-, and azoospermic males. Due to the considerable scattering no correlation was found between sperm density and enzyme activity. Phosphatase activities were very similar in the fertile and infertile groups. On the basis of this observation phosphatase activity measurements are not recommended in clinical practice.
An isoelectric focusing technique for the separation of acid phosphatases is described. The focusing patterns for semen and vaginal secretion are examined in detail and the technique is evaluated as a means of identifying and distinguishing between these body fluids and other materials of potential forensic interest. The method can reliably be used to diagnose the presence of semen in stains and in the post-coital vagina.
Examination of human seminal plasma showed that there was no p-nitrophenylphosphatase activity maximum at alkaline pH values. A constant ratio of enzyme activities in 8 split ejaculates, identical temperature dependence and copurification through a three-step purification procedure led us to conclude that the alkaline phosphatase in human semen is identical to acid phosphatase.
Intact Angiostrongylus cantonensis is able to hydrolyse glucose-phosphate esters, mononucleotides and rho-nitrophenyl phosphate as well as beta-glycerophosphate in vitro. Reciprocal inhibition studies suggest that the hydrolysis of such substrates is due to a non-specific phosphomonoesterase. Molybdate ions, which exert no effect on either the uptake of glucose or the production of lactate, inhibit the hydrolysis of glucose-1-phosphate in the external medium and simultaneously lower the production of lactate by the intact worms in vitro.
Glutaraldehyde prefixation causes a considerable inactivation of the acid phosphatase of yeast protoplasts in dependence on the duration of aldehyde influence. Lead ions necessary for ultracytochemical demonstration effect a still stronger inhibition of enzymatic activity. Prefixation, however, protects the enzyme from further inhibition by lead. At pH 4.4 in intact cells acid phosphatase activities are mainly localized in the periplasmic space and in vesicles fused with the plasma membrane. The cell wall and cytoplasm usually remain free of reaction products. On the cell surface activities are found in form of globular lead deposits. At pH 5.2 and 6.3 the periplasmic activity appears decreased compared to that at lower pH values and the intracellular activity is increased. The plasma membrane of protoplasts is completely free of precipitates. The intracellular activity sites of protoplasts (cisternae of endoplasmic reticulum and/or Golgi-like system, small vesicles, central vacuole, nuclear envelope) are the same as for intact cells. The occurrence of at least two forms of acid phosphatase in S. cerevisiae id deduced.
alpha-D-mannosidase, beta-D-galactosidase, alpha-L-fucosidase, beta-N-acetylgalactosaminidase, alpha-D-glucosidase and acid phosphatase activities were studied in circulating blood leukocytes from Sus scropha var. domestica L. (pig) and Equus asinus x caballus (mule) by spectrophotometric procedures using p-nitrophenyl derivatives as substrates and three different buffer solutions. 2. The highest specific activity corresponds to acid phosphatase. The specific activities of the glycosidases, all relatively close together in all cases, were low in comparison with that of phosphatase. 3. Generally, each of the above-mentioned enzymes shows one common peak for the pH optimum between 3.5 and 6.0, except alpha-D-glucosidase, which shows two peaks. 4. The pH optima values are generally similar in three buffer solutions employed. 5. Specific activities of the studied enzymes show a parallelism in leukocytes from both pig and mule. Also, this parallelism is observed in their pH optima values. 6. Thermal stability of alpha-D-mannosidase is high whereas that of acid phosphatase is low, in both materials. For other enzymes, differences in the thermal stability was observed according to their source.
Enzyme studies of thick noncholesteatomous epithelium. Thick mucosa removed from the promontory in cases with chronic otitis media showed prominent PAS-positive glands and epithelial secretory cells. Alcian blue positivity was less pronounced, contrary to the mucosa from glue ears. Enzyme activity in the epithelium and propria was comparable to that in glue ears, with some increase in alkaline phosphatase and some decrease in proprial lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase activity. Removal of thick, permanently altered mucoas is recommended even in the absence of squamous epithelium. Steps should be taken to allow regrowth of thin, normal middle ear epithelium on the promontory.
Plasma and prostatic fluid from man, dog, and baboon were measured for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) by a radioimmunoassay technique. No CEA was detected in plasma, prostatic fluid, or seminal fluid in 12 dogs and three baboons. Elevated CEA (less than 2.5 ng/ml) was found in 13 of 20 human prostatic fluids. It was inferred that there was no immunologic cross-reactivity of CEA among man, dog, and baboon. CEA has been isolated and purified from liver tumors. Biochemical studies reveal that CEA consists of 60 percent carbohydrate and 40 percent protein. It contains the following carbohydrates: fucose, mannose, galactose, sialic acid, N-acetylglucosamine, and a small amount of N-acetylgalactosamine. The following amino acids were found in CEA: lysine, histidine, arginine, aspartic acid, threonine, serine, glutamic acid, proline, glycine, alanine, valine, emthionine, isoleucine, leucine, tyrosine, phenylalanine, and cysteine. The amino acid sequence (first 30 amino acids) of the N-terminal has been determined. The N-terminal amino acid was lysine. Using this study as a model, other tumor antigens from prostatic tumor tissues are being investigated. The acid phosphatase isoenzyme from prostatic tissue was also studied. After a series of purifications, two chromatographic fractions were obtained. Treatment with neuraminidase removed the sialic acid content of the molecule, changed the isoelectric focusing patterns, and abolished the chromatographic heterogeneity. Sedimentation studies indicated a molecular weight of about 100,000. Biochemical studies showed that prostatic acid phosphatase isoenzyme is a glycoprotein which consists of 7 percent carbohydrate and 93 percent protein. It contains fucose, galactose, mannose, sialic acid, N-acetylglucosamine, and the following amino acids: aspartic acid, threonine, serine, glutamic acid, proline, glycine, alanine, valine, methionine, isoleucine, leucine, tyrosine, phenylalanine, lysine, histidine, arginine, tryptophan, and cysteine. An antiserum to this purified prostatic acid phosphatase isoenzyme is being prepared in animals.
With the Gmri technique, lead precipitates have been found in thyroid follicle cells in unusual localizations such as apical hyaloplasm and microvilli; it has been established that they were actually significant for acid phosphatase activity: constant results in spite of repeated controls and several variations from the original cytochemical technique, allow to think that lead precipitates were not merely artefactual, but actually significant of enzymatic activity. However it is pointed to the fact that the origin of the enzyme has to be questioned; it is assumed that most likely acid phosphatase has diffused from its original lysosomal site. Such diffusion implies variations of the selective permeability of lysosomal membranes; inappropriate relation between the quantity of enzyme present in these organelles and the quantity of substrate used might also be considered, though changes in the amount (resp. concentration) of substrate remained ineffective and induced no modification in the localization of observed enzymatic activity. In addition, one point of interest is an obvious relation between the observed enzyme diffusion and the state of activity resp. rest of the cell; in the present state of investigations, this remains unexplained and likely related to factors escaping control during processing; moreover, no explanation can be provided for the fact that it revealed impossible to avoid such diffusion even by means of variations of the numerous parameters involved in the Gmri technique. So that it finally appears necessary to remain on a critical position regarding the results at the ultrastructural level of this standardized technique, and there is no doubt it would reveal useful that several assumptions in the literature about extra lysosomal acid phosphatase activity should be reinvestigated with a similar critical purpose.
Normal human monocytes, based on appearance after Romanowsky-type staining, have been considered to be a homogenous class of mononuclear leukocytes. Cytochemical studies, however, indicate that these cells are markedly heterogenous with respect to certain hydrolytic and oxidative lysosomal enzymes and to a lesser extent show variability in cytoplasmic carbohydrate and ribonucleic acid content. Individual monocytes were found to vary most widely in non-specific esterase activity and least in acid phosphatase activity. Variation in monocyte peroxidase activity was intermediate between these extremes. Using a cytochemical "scoring" technic, younger adults were found to have higher mean monocyte non-specific esterase scores than older adults. No significant age or sex differences were found for peroxidase or acid phosphatase activity. Furthermore, the overall activities of these monocyte enzymes in healthy adults, as estimated by intensity of staining, were unrelated to one another. Using consecutive double staining technics, individual monocytes were also found to vary in their content of these biochemical consituents. A statistically inverse relationship was found in individual monocytes between their nonspecific esterase and acid phosphatase activities (r = -0.68). Analysis of other combinations studied showed only random distribution with no significant correlations. These findings emphasize the biochemical individuality of circulating monocytes and the variations noted probably reflect differences in number and composition of lysosomes.
Experimental retrograde E. coli pyelonephritis was produced in rats. The study covered the period from 6-24 hours up to 6 months. Macrophages in the renal tissue were studied using immunofluorescence staining for bacterial E. coli antigen and histochemical staining for aicd phosphatase. A comparison of sections stained according to the two methods showed that antigen-containing macrophages in nearly all cases yielded a positive reaction for acid phosphatase. On the other hand, in several kidneys acid phosphatase-positive macrophages occurred which in consecutive sections studied by immunofluorescence did not contain antigen. The possibility of using staining for acid phosphatase as a screening method for the detection of active, antigen-containing macrophages in human chronic pyelonephritis is discussed.
Activities of acid phosphatase, beta-glucuronidase, N-acethyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase and acid beta-galactosidase were investigated histochemically in rabbit corneas. Frozen sections after block fixation in cold 4% formaldehyde with 1% CaCl2 followed by washing in cold physiological saline as well as cold microtome sections of corneas quenched in petroleter chilled with acetone-dry ice mixture, transferred to nonprecooled slides or semipermeable membranes were used. Standard aqueous media were employed in the case of free-floating frozen sections of fixed corneas as well as of cold mictrotome sections (postfixed in cold 4% formaldehyde). Agar media were used in connection with the technic of semipermeable membranes. Gomori method (in the case of acid phosphatase), simultaneous azocoupling methods (substrates derivated of naphthol-AS-BI with hexazonium-p-rosanilin) in the case of acid phosphatase, beta-glucuronidase and N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase and the indigogenic method in the case of acid beta-galactosidase were applied. Enzyme activities in sections of fixed corneas were minimal in comparison with those in cold microtome sections of unfixed material revealed particularly with the technic of semipermeable membranes which is to be preferred. This technic is recommended in studies concerned with lysosomal enzymes in the cornea, particularly in keratocytes. All enzymes investigated were present in corneal epithelium, keratocytes and endothelium. Acid phosphatase displayed the highest activity followed by beta-glucuronidase and acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase. The activity of beta-galactosidase was the lowest. For the demonstration of activities in keratocytes sections parallel to the surface are very suitable. In these sections enzyme activities were demonstrated in small granules (apparently lysosomes) present in the central part of their cytoplasm as well as in projections. Diffuse staining was also seen, being the highest in the case of acid phosphatase.
Activity of acid phosphatase, beta-glucuronidase, and beta-glucosaminidase in peripheral blood lymphocytes was determined cytochemically in 20 normal subjects, 10 male and 10 female, by the use of BARKA and ANDERSON's (1962), HAYASHI et al. (1964) and HAYASHI's (1965) methods, respectively. Results obtained were semiquantitatively according to subdivision of lymphocytes into enzyme-negative and enzyme-positive cells. Enzyme-positive lymphocytes were divided into cells with granular, mixed granular and diffuse enzymatic reaction type. In the first two types of cytochemical reaction a number of enzyme-positive lysosomal granules were counted and expressed in terms of both absolute count and percentage of circulating lymphocytes. Enzyme-positive lymphocytes represented 80.3%, 40.5% and 4  15% of the total lymphocyte count in regard to the presence of acid phosphatase, beta-glucuronidase, and beta-glucosaminidase, respectively.
The localization of acid phosphatase during xylem development has been examined in the bean, Phaseolus vulgaris. The azo dye, the final reaction product, is initially prominent in the dictyosomes, vesicles apparently participating in secondary wall formation, and in the middle lamella of the young vessel element. Final reaction particles are also present in mitochondria, chloroplasts, and certain vacuoles and are sparsely scattered in the cytoplasm. At a later stage of vessel differentiation, the azo dye is concentrated in the disintegrating cytoplasm and along the fibrils of the partially hydrolysed primary wall and middle lamella. In the mature vessel element, the azo dye is still present along the disintegrated primary wall at the side of the vessel and covers the secondary wall. In the parenchyma cell adjacent to the vessel element, acid phosphatase localization is found in the dictyosomes, endoplasmic reticulum, mitochondria, small vacuoles, and the middle lamella. The controls from all stages of vessel element development were free of azo dye particles. The concentration of acid phosphatase along the secondary walls of the mature vessels and in the middle lamella between other cells indicates that this enzyme has other functions besides autolysis of the cytoplasm and primary cell wall. Acid phosphatase may participate in the formation of the secondary wall and may also have a role in the secretion and transport of sugars.
The ultrastructural histochemical localization of acid phosphatase in salivary glands of third instar larvae of Drosophila melanogaster has been studied. Using Gomori's lead phosphate method for acid phosphatase detection, the optimal incubation time in the reaction medium was determined to be 30 min. When glands having wild-type acid phosphatase activity are incubated for this time, deposition of the final reaction product is observed in essentially every lysosome and artifactual staining is minimal.
Incubation of human platelets in plasma containing a suspension of latex particles for 1-90 min resulted in progressive accumulation of particles in the open-channel system, followed by localization of latex in electron-opaque vacuoles. After 60 min, acid phosphatase was localized within latex-containing vacuoles. The periodate-alkaline-bismuth reaction intensely stained external membranes and membranes of the open-channel system. Membranes of latex-containing organelles were not stained. Latex phagocytosis was independent of both anticoagulant choice and aspirin effects. Our results indicate that the platelet can act as a true phagocyte, and we suggest that the phagocytic process is chronologically similar to that reported for polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
Submandibular, sublingual and parotid glands of cat have been studied following periods of ductal ligation ranging from 1 day to 1 year. An increased prominence of granules of acid phosphatase, beta-glucuronidase and E600-resistant esterase reaction products was sometimes seen in acinar cells and atropic striated ductal cells, and probably represents increased lysosomal enzymic activity, which may be of importance in the adapation of the parenchyma to the altered environment. Other reaction products often appeared to be at normal levels in parenchymal structures that were not very atrophic, and at reduced levels in those that were very atrophic, suggesting a reduction of functional activity in these structures.
We find an elevation of serum acid phosphatase levels 5 min after prostatic massage in only 10% of patients with prostatic adenoma. This increase is caused by stored prostatic secretion being pressed into the blood vessels. 60 min later these serum levels decrease. With some other patients a slower increase of phosphatase levels occurs; this increase, however, lasts for hours. This kind of increase is caused by prostatic fluid being forced into the interstitium where it is slowly absorbed. A combination of both kinds leads to a curve with two peaks; this could be demonstrated in two cases. No difference was seen in reaction of total acid phosphatase and prostatic phosphatase levels. The increase of phosphatase levels following prostatic massage was no sign of prostatic carcinoma.
An 81-year-old male with congestive heart failure and prostatic hypertrophy was found to have markedly elevated serum acid phosphatase (EC 313.2) and moderately elevated serum alkaline phosphatase (EC 313.1). Alkaline phosphatase isoenzyme analysis was performed to determine the organ source of the enzyme. There was an unsual slow-migrating alkaline phosphatase isoenzyme band in the serum of this patient suggestive of hepatic origin by a variety of biochemical tests.
By mapping the distribution of resorptive and appositional surfaces in rat skull bones with the help of in vivo staining with alizarin red S it has been possible to study the connection between patterns of bone growth and alkaline and acid phosphatase activity on bone surfaces. Alkaline phosphatase activity obviously bears no specific relation to appositional and resorptive surfaces as all surfaces react strongly. Acid phosphatase activity, in contrast, is most marked at sites of resorption.
Immunologic specificity of the prostatic acid phosphatase (PAP) and the kinetics of the PAP-anti-PAP antibody interactions were studied in detail. Antigenic identity of electrophoretic isozymes of PAP was established in this study. Counterimmunoelectrophoretic assay, radioimmunoassay, and immunofluorescence technique were developed to detect PAP and PAP-synthesizing cells. These techniques were applied to the determination of serum PAP levels and to the identification of metastatic prostate cancer cells in biopsies.
A light microscopical and histochemical study of S1 dorsal rootlets in developing kittens. The postnatal development of the transitional region (TR) ie the proximal free part of a spinal rootlet that contains both PNS and CNS tissue, was studied light-microscopically in semi-thin sections and after histochemical staining according to the Marchi and OTAN methods for the demonstration of degenerating myelin and according to the Gomori method for the demonstration of acid phosphatase activity. In the newborn kitten the PNS tissue extended well up to the spinal cord surface and the rootlets lacked a transitional region. The CNS tissue entered the root during the second postnatal week, and a trasitional region was fully established at the beginning of the second month. The degree of myelination in the group of large fibres differed on the two sides of the PNS-CNS borderline: well myelinated PNS fibres were transformed into poorly myelinated or apparently unmyelinated CNS-fibres. PNS and CNS myelin sheaths of large fibres appeared to be of equal thickness in the 4 week old kitten. During the first postnatal month large amounts of Marchi positive material and a high acid phosphatase activity occurred in complex paranodes and very short internodes in the PNS compartment just distally to the PNS-CNS borderline. In the adult cat Marchi positive bodies were numerous in the CNS compartment just proximally to the PNS-CNS borderline. The results are discussed against previous studies on focal demyelination as found during the normal development of the feline peripheral nervous system.
Biochemical characteristics, subcellular distribution and histochemical localization. After separation of three epididymal acid phosphatases their biochemical properties were differently studied. With appropriate substrate and inhibitor selection the distribution of the enzymes in different segments as well as the subcellular fractions of the rat epididymis was also demonstrated. The same biochemical differences were also utilized in the histochemical localization of the enzymes. It was found that Enzyme I had a pH-optimum at 5.0, a molecular weight of 97 000 and Km-constant of 0.901 mM. It was highly sensitive to tartrate and fluoride and it was localized in lysosomes as well as in the epididymal spermatozoa. Enzyme II had an optimum at pH 5.7, a molecular weight of 67 000 and Km-constant of 0.806 mM. It was also inhibited by fluoride but more resistant to tartrate. Its subcellular site was also particulate, but it was also found in the epididymal fluid. Enzyme III had an optimum at pH 5.2, a molecular weight of 135 000 and Km-constant of 0.685 m. It was resistant to low concentrations of fluoride and tartrate but sensitive to heavy metal ions. The enzyme was soluble and it behaved incoherently in thermal inactivation. All enzymes revealed the highest activity in the thin middle segments of the epididymis. Histochemical naphthol substrates gave a diffuse reaction in the epididymal epithelial cells. With the lead salt methods glycerophosphates and p-nitrophenylphosphate gave somewhat different results depending on their specificity as substrates for the epididymal enzymes. Both substrates gave a strong reaction supranuclearly in the Golgi area of the chief cells. This activity was inhibited by tartrate and was most probably due to Enzyme I. The epididymal corpus and cauda showed additionally a very strong apical activity in the chief cells with p-nitrophenylphosphate. This activity was resitant to tartrate but sensitive to fluoride. It was concluded that this enzyme represents Enzyme II activity. Similar activity was also found in the dissolving "holocrine" cells of the corpus and the cauda. The activity of the soluble Enzyme III could not be revealed with the present methods and the spermatozoa in the tubular lumina remained unstained.
After an initial decrease, the specific activity of Physarum polycephalum acid phosphomonoesterase increases during the growth of the organism in an axenic medium. This increase is independent of the inorganic phosphate concentration in the culture medium. The specific activity of inorganic alkaline pyrophosphatase remains constant during the growth and is not modified by a high extracellular concentration of orthophosphate. During starvation in a non nutritive saline medium, the increase of acid phosphatase activity is immediate whereas pyrophosphatase activity remnins constant.
Tissues from patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia were used for the cytochemical demonstration in light and electron microscopy of a secreted, nonlysosomal prostatic acid phosphatase (PAP) with phosphorycholine, substrate specific for PAP. The specificity of phosphorylcholine for PAP is attributable to the pentavalent nitrogen in phosphorylcholine, a feature that renders it resistant to hydrolysis by all other acid phosphatases. PAP activity was found in the Golgi cisternae and its associated vacuoles and in secretory vacuoles localized in the nuclear, Golgi, and apical areas of the prostatic epithelial cell. These results confirm the existence of two types of acid phosphatase in prostatic tissue. One is lysosomal and is prevalent in many tissues and the other, PAP, is the major enzymatic product secreted by the prostate. The specificity of PAP for phosphorylcholine, one of the natural substrates for this enzyme, validates the use of this method for the histochemical characterization of PAP and indicates the prostatic origin of cells showing PAP activity.
A simple, rapid and efficient procedure is presented for the purification of human prostatic acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313.2) to homogeneity. The method employs two steps suitable for use with large quantities of material, followed by chromatography on concanavalin A-Sepharose as its sole column step. The procedure also permits the recovery of purified enzyme in higher yields than earlier methods.
We compared our radioimmunoassay with the standard enzyme assay for prostatic acid phosphatase in the diagnosis of prostatic cancer. Serum samples from 50 controls, 113 patients with prostatic cancer, 36 with benign prostatic hyperplasia, 83 with other cancers, 20 with gastrointestinal disorders and 28 with total prostatectomies were randomized and studied by radioimmunoassay and enzyme assay. When the upper limit was set at 8.0 ng per milliliter (mean + 4 S.D.) the radioimmunoassay diagnosed prostatic cancer in 33, 79, 71 and 92 per cent of the patients with Stage I, II, III and IV disease. In contrast, the enzyme assay detected elevations of enzyme in the serum of 12, 15, 29, and 60 per cent respectively. No false-positive results were detected by either assay in normal controls but the radioimmunoassay test was positive in two patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia, in one patient after total prostatectomy, in nine with other cancers and in one of the group with gastrointestinal disorders. In contrast to the enzyme assay, the radioimmunoassay distinguished over half the cases of intracapsular prostatic cancer.
Methodology and clinical evaluation. An immunochemical method for detection of prostatic acid prosphatase is described. Purified acid phosphatase was isolated from cancerous human prostate. A specific antiserum to the purified enzyme was produced in rabbits. The antiserum to postatic acid phosphatase did not react with acid phosphatase originating from other tissues. A counter immunolectrophoresis, utilizing the specific antibodies and a chemical staining technique, has been developed and clinically evaluated. Sera from patients with prostatic carcinoma (6/20 of stage B, 27/49 of stage C, and 98/125 of stage D) gave positive results. Sera from 19 patients with benign prostatic hypertrophy, from 89 patients with other tumors, from 12 patients with Gaucher's disease, from 107 healthy volunteers, and from 50 normal age-matched men all gave negative results. The sensitivity of this method was 0.4 IU of enzyme activity or 20 ng per ml of prostatic acid phosphatase protein. Further clinical evaluation of patients in the early stage of prostatic cancer and of patients undergoing chemotherapy is in progress.
Human acid phosphatases are ubiquitous phosphohydrolases that are present in most respiring tissues and cells. Specifically, human prostatic acid phosphatase is a unique enzyme within a vast family of acid phosphatases concerned with catabolic processes in cellular metabolism. The majority of serum and bone marrow acid phosphatases are of non-prostatic origin and are present chiefly in erythrocytes, leukocytes, platelets and other maturing cells in the bone marrow. The specific concentration of prostatic acid phosphatase in serum and bone marrow is normally relatively low compared to non-prostatic acid phosphatases. Many falsely positive assays for total serum acid phosphatases and bone marrow acid phosphatases have been reported, particularly after traumatic marrow biopsy procedures and mishandling of blood samples in the clinical laboratory and in hematologic disease states. The disruption and lysis of whole blood and marrow cells can liberate non-specific acid phosphatases into the serum. Since standard enzymatic assays do not discriminate accurately prostatic acid phosphatase from non-prostatic acid phosphatase present in the serum spurious results can be realized. A preliminary experience with a promising radioimmunoassay for the specific measurement of prostatic acid phosphatase in bone marrow and serum is presented.
The diagnostic value of the acid-phosphatase reaction was assessed double-blind in 148 cases of acute lymphoblastic leukaemia (A.L.L.) classified by surface-membrane markers and entered into the M.R.C. U.K. A.L.L. trials. 90% of cases of T-A.L.L. showed a positive reaction in the majority of blast cells, while only 2% of common-A.L.L. and 10% of null-A.L.L. were positive. This cytochemical reaction distinguished the more aggressive form of A.L.L. any may aid the choice of therapy.
A double-antibody radioimmunoassay was developed and utilized to measure prostatic acid phosphatase in bone marrow aspirates. One hundred-eighteen patients with carcinoma of the prostate in various clinical stages, and fifty with benign prostatic hyperplasia were studied. In patients with carcinoma, levels of prostatic acid phosphatase in bone marrow aspirates were found to correlate well with increasing clinical stage of the disease. Determination of bone marrow prostatic acid phosphatase by radioimmunoassay may be a valuable adjunct to clinicopathologic staging of prostatic carcinoma.
An immunochemical method for detection of prostatic acid phosphatase is described. Acid phosphatase was obtained from benign human prostatic tissue. A specific antiserum to this enzyme was produced in rabbits. A counter immunoelectrophoretic method utilizing the specific antiserum with a chemical staining technique has been developed. Clinical trials have indicated the usefulness of this method for the specific determination of prostatic acid phosphatase.
The carbethoxylation of prostatic acid phosphatase (orthophosphoric-monoester phosphohydrolase (acid optimum), EC 313.2) was accompanied by modification of histidine residues and the inactivation of the enzyme. These findings are consistent with photoinactivation experiments described earlier (Rybarska, J. and Ostrowski, W (1974) Acta Biochim, Polon. 21, 377--390). Prostatic acid phosphatase was phosphorylated at alkaline pH using p-nitrophenyl [32P]phosphate as substrate. Phosphoryl enzyme is stable in alkaline solutions and undergoes dephosphorylation at acidic pH. After hydrolysis of phosphoryl enzyme in strong alkaline solution, a single phosphoryl amino acid was isolated from hydrolyzate and identified as the tau-phosphohistidine.
Technical considerations. Cytochemical demonstration of tartrate-resistant acid phosphatase activity is essential for the diagnosis of leukemic reticuloendotheliosis. In order to perform this test correctly and to interpret the results propertly, it is necessary to understand the technical details of the cytochemical methods thoroughly. The method using naphthol--ASBI phosphoric acid--fast garnet GBC is recommended for this purpose, and factors crucial to the cytochemical study, such as fixation, substrate, coupler, pH and temperature of incubation buffer, counterstains, and mounting media are examined and discussed. Conventional methods for acid phosphatase in the presence and absence of L(+) tartaric acid are also critically examined. The naphthol--ASBI phosphoric acid--fast garnet GBC method is sensitive, technically simple and easily reproducible. Its reaction product is highly chromogenic and is most suitable for cytochemical demonstration of acid phosphatase and tartrate-resistant acid phosphatase activity in cytologic preparations. The naphthol--ASBI phosphoric acid--pararosaniline method is highly specific and is best for histochemical demonstration of acid phosphatase and tartrate-resistant acid phosphatase in tissue sections.
The simultaneous determination of acid phosphatase and citrate concentration in the seminal fluid obtained from 16 patients with prostatic adenoma showed normal values, 6 patiients with prostatic carcinoma (cytologically and histologically verified) however extremely low values. The difference between persons with prostatic cancer and those with adenoma became particulary obvious with both experimental results evaluated in the way of a twodimensional diagram. This clear separation of both clusters by the simultaneouse estimation of both biochemical parameters may possible get useful diagnostic significance.
A modified procedure is described for the sequential staining of agar precipitates of seminal plasma and antiseminal plasma serum for acid phosphatase and total protein. The procedure employs Gomori's glycerophosphate-lead sulphide method for acid phosphatase, ultraviolet light for photobleaching and amidoschwartz for total protein staining. In a single agar diffusion plate, a minimum of 7 protein bands was observed, 3 of which contained acid phosphatase activity.
Ninety diffuse large-cell lymphomas (diffuse histiocytic lymphoma) were subclassified into B-cell, T-cell, and histiocytic types according to their enzyme histochemical and immunohistochemical characteristics. The B-cell type was characterized by presence of intracellular monoclonal immunoglobulin; negative or weakly positive diffuse acid phosphatase activity; and an occasional focal nodular pattern or preceding nodular lymphoma. The T-cell type was characterized by moderate, focal acid phosphatase activity; convoluted nuclear structure; and frequent preceding cutaneous manifestations. The histiocytic type was characterized by strong nonspecific esterases and diffuse acid phosphatase activity and presence of lysozyme and phagocytic activity. Most of the lesions (74 cases) were of the B-cell type. This group was further subdivided into follicular center cell type and B-cell immunoblastic sarcoma, according to the stage of cellular transformation. Preliminary clinical correlation suggests that the histiocytic type is most resistant to treatment. B-cell immunoblastic sarcomas were much more aggressive than neoplasms of the follicular center cell type.
The cytotoxic effect of the silicate cement "Silicap" was evaluated in an in vitro system which simulates the clinical usage of the material. BHK-21 (C-13) cells on cover slips were exposed to the freshly mixed material for 1h, and stained for the demonstration of succinic dehydrogenase and acid phosphatase. The mean stain density for succinic dehydrogenase and acid phosphatase in the experimental cells was 77% and 153% of the control values respectively. The mechanism of cytotoxicity of "Silicap" is discussed.
A new purification procedure is described for the human prostatic acid phosphatase. The procedure included carboxy-methyl-Sephadex and Concanavalin A affinity column chromatography. The purified enzyme has a high specific enzyme activity and is free from any extraneous proteins judging from immunochemical criteria and biochemical criteria such as SDS-polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis. The purified enyzme produced a monospecific anti-PAP antisera in animals and this anti-PAP antibody did not cross-react with other human acid phosphatases.
Counterimmunoelectrophoresis for rapid identification. When serial dilution of standard prostatic acid phosphatases (PAP) was reacted with constant amounts of anti-PAP serum by counterimmunoelectrophoresis (CIEP), the detection end point of enzyme concentration was 0.25 ng in a 10 microliter sample volume. The PAP concentrations in unknowns can be quantitated by comparing the dilution end points of reference PAP with the testing samples. Serum PAP levels were determined by a radioimmunoassay (RIA) and CIEP using normal male and female sera and serum samples from patients with prostatic cancer and nonprostatic tumors. An excellent correlation was observed between the two assay results. According to RIA data, the concentration of PAP higher than 0.4 ng per 10 microliter (or 4.0 ng per 100 microliter) signify the elevation of serum or bone marrow PAP level beyond normal range (normal value   16 +/- 0.8 ng/100 microliter). Thus, the CIEP assay will be a simple and reliable screening method for the serum PAP levels in the clinical diagnosis of prostatic cancer.
A double--antibody radioimmunoassay. A double-antibody radioimmunoassay method for prostate-specific acid phosphatase (PAP) is presented. Experimental details are outlined to assess the reproducibility and reliability of the method under assay conditions. The upper limit of the serum PAP levels in the present assay was set at 2.4 ng/100 microliter by 162 determinations of normal serum samples. The serum PAP levels of patients with nonprostatic malignant tumors fell in the normal range, whereas the levels higher than 4.0 ng/100 microliter were found in patients with prostatic carcinoma.
"Prostatic acid phosphatase" is a term that has been used widely and ambiguously to refer to acid phosphatase, which 1) is elevated in the sera of patients with various diseases of the prostate, 2) is inhibited by one or more specific inhibitors, 3) attacks one or more specific substrates, 4) has certain unique antigenic properties, 5) is extracted from homogenates of prostate, and 6) is obtained from prostate secretions, etc. Most of the data adduced to justify this term is indirect. We have purified specific kinds of cells from prostates and other tissues. These purified cells have served as sources of enzymes known to be derived from particular kinds of cells. We studied several substrates and one inhibitor that have been claimed useful for the measurement of prostatic acid phosphatase. None of the substrates or inhibitors studied appeared to offer much "specificity," which would allow us to distinguish acid phosphatase activity from prostatic epithelial cells from acid phosphatase activities from several other kinds of purified cells.
Acid phosphatase activity has been measured in various tissues and in extracts of cultured cells. Cells were solubilized with NP40 at neutral pH, and thymolphthalein monophosphate was used as substrate. Reproducible assays were possible with a few as 10(6) cells.
Prostatic acid phosphatase from human seminal fluid was purified to homogeneity. The enzyme was characterized as to its purity, molecular weight and amino acid composition. Analytical isoelectric focusing of purified enzyme on polyacrylamide gels resolved the enzyme activity into eleven discrete bands, apparently due to various amounts of sialic acid associated with the glycoprotein. Antisera raised against the purified enzyme produced only one precipitan arc on immunoelectrophoresis. A double antibody radioimmune assay was developed and used to evaluate serum prostatic acid phosphatase in 226 patients without prostatic disease, in 186 patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia and in 93 patients with prostatic carcinoma. No statistical difference was noted in serum prostatic acid phosphatase between patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia and in those without prostatic disease Serum prostatic acid phosphatase was elevated in 94% of the patients with metastatic prostatic carcinoma. Significant elevations were also found in carcinoma patients without metastases.
An indirect immunofluorescence technique for identifying prostatic acid phosphatase was used to evaluate primary prostatic cell cultures and established cell lines of prostatic origin. With the use of this technique, we positively identified acid phosphatase immunochemically of prostatic origin in cell lines EB 33 and MA 160. Other cell lines showing positive immunofluorescence reactions include H 494, H 575, and DU 145.
Formol-stable serum acid phosphatase (SAP) was measured in 200 patients with symptoms of prostatism, before and at varying time intervals after digital rectal examination. In three separate groups of 50 patients SAP levels were measured before and at 5, 15 and 30 min following rectal examination and in a fourth group of 50 patients it was measured before and at 6, 24 and 48 h after examination. No significant change occurred in SAP levels following this examination in any of the groups studied. We conclude that rectal examination does not raise the SAP and that, contrary to popular belief, blood levels recorded at any time within this 48-h period are reliable.
Acid phosphatase isozymes were investigated in cancerous prostatic tissue (4 cases) and benign prostatic hyperplasia (6 cases). Electron-microscopic histochemical examination of cancer tissue revealed irregular acid beta-glycerophosphatase staining in various cell organelles, including the plasma membrane, which was not seen in non-malignant tissue. Cancerous tissue homogenates also contained isozymic acid phosphatase species with high electrophoretic mobility, which was not detectable in benign tissue unless treated with detergent. Fractionation by differential centrifugation confirmed that much of the acid phosphatase activity in cancer tissue was extra-lysosomal. The detection of these isozyme properties may provide an opportunity, by means of tissue investigations, to define tumour stages earlier than on the basis of increased levels of serum acid phosphatase activity indicative of stage IV (D) prostatic cancer.
Evidence is accumulating which indicates that the basic defect in cystic fibrosis interferes with the formation of recognition markers on hydrolytic enzymes. As a result these hydrolases leak into the extracellular space and some of them display abnormal thermolabilities. By heat inactivation of plasma alpha-mannosidase at 41 degrees C and plasma phosphatase at 36.5 degrees C, both enzymes being assayed at pH 5.4, it is possible to differentiate normal people from cystic fibrosis carriers and patients.
Histochemical staining for enzymes is usually performed on frozen sections. This report lists the longer incubation times required to demonstrate esterase, acid phosphatase, beta-galactosidase, and cytochrome oxidase in plastic embedded and ruotine paraffin embedded tissues. The sections embedded in plastic, ie water soluble methacrylate (Polyscience's JB-4) and cut at 2 micrometers, were far superior to frozen sections and paraffin embedded sections both in tissue detail and in the localization of the histochemical reaction product.
An observed differential distribution of alkaline and acid phosphatase on the surfaces of growing bones may serve to describe transformative processes of bone growth. This conclusion has been reached by comparing the distribution of the two enzymes on the surfaces of fibulae from young rats with the patterns of apposition and resorption on the periosteal surfaces of this bone, revealed by in vivo staining with alizarin red S. Presence of reaction to acid phosphatase is, as shown before, an indication of resorptive surfaces, while the presence of reaction to alkaline phosphatase is an indication of depository surfaces.
Demonstration of prostate-specific acid phosphatase by immunologic methods in tissue sections or in plasma necessitates a monospecific antiserum. This is produced by immunizing rabbits with pure prostate-specific acid phosphatase antigen, prepared from seminal fluid. The ejaculate is centrifuged, dialyzed against a citrate buffer, pH 4.8, and centrifuged again. The supernatant is brought onto a Sephacryl S-200 Superfine column and eluted with the same buffer. Prostate-specific acid phosphatase-positive fractions are concentrated, brought onto and stepwise eluted from a Sulphopropyl Sephadex column with citrate buffers at pH 4.8, 5.2, and 5.5. Fractions containing prostate-specific acid phosphatase are concentrated again and purified over a Blue Sepharose CL-6 B column. After elution, a new concentration step yields a protein concentration of 0.5-  10 mg . ml- This sample in polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis shows a single protein band and is used to immunize female rabbits. The purity of the antiserum is then tested by immunoelectrophoresis and an Ouchterlony technic. Besides anti-prostate-specific acid phosphatase, two other antibodies against serum proteins are present, one of which is anti-albumin. Absorption of these impurities results in a monospecific antiserum against prostate-specific acid phosphatase.
The effects of acid-base changes on cardiac output during diethyl ether anaesthesia were studied in 25 mongrel dogs prepared by surgically implanting a plastic encased non-ferrous core electromagnetic probe on the ascending aorta. The findings are: (1) Metabolic acidaemia produced only slight decrease in cardiac output but a more marked fall became evident with decreasing pH(2) Respiratory acidaemia led to a slight rise in cardiac output. (3) Respiratory alkalaemia decreased cardiac output. (4) Metabolic alkalaemia also produced a decline in cardiac output.
The effect of acid-base alterations was analyzed using isolated rat hearts perfused at constant coronary perfusion pressure, and stimulated to contract at constant rat. The amount of shortening in the major axis and its derivative were measured to assess myocardial contractility. Both the 'respiratory' and 'metabolic' alterations affected the contractile behavior to the same extent. In the physiological range studied by us, acidosis depresses and alkalosis increases myocardial contraction. However acidosis seems to depress contractility more than the enhancement produced by the same change in pH towards the alkalotic side. When either amount of shortening or max dl/dt was plotted as a function of hydrogen ion acitvity (aH+) a linear correlation was obtained, either with pure 'metabolic' or 'respiratory' acid-base induced alterations (correlation coefficients higher than -.95; P less than .01). Our findings suggest that in the range studied by us, contraction of the perfused rat heart following acid-base alterations, is a linear function of hydrogen ion activity.
Twenty mongrel dogs, weighing between 7.5 and 13.0 kg were used to investigate the percentage limits permissible for hemodilution using a double-helical reservoir heart-lung machine which has a 1,100 ml of priming volume. In both 40 and 50 per cent groups of intentional hemodilution by 30 minute extracorporeal circulation, remarkable anemia was inevitable and recovery was extremely slow, especially in the 50 per cent dilution group. In both 40 and 50 per cent groups of intentional hemodilutions by 30 minute extracorporeal circulation, metabolic acidosis was observed. In 50 per cent group of intentional hemodilution, no improvement of metabolic acidosis was observed even after perfusion. When sodium bicarbonate was administered to 40 per cent hemodilution group, minimum alterations of acid-base balance and of serum electrolytes were observed during and after extracorporeal perfusion. When sodium bicarbonate was administered to 50 per cent hemodilution group, metabolic acidosis was more evident than in 40 per cent hemodilution group accompanied with an increase in serum sodium concentration and a decrease in serum chloride concentration. These data qualify the use of 40 per cent intentional hemodilution using Lactate Ringer's solution or low molecular weight dextran for 30 minute extracorporeal circulation when sodium bicarbonate is administered in adequate amounts.
Response of the fetal kidney to metabolic acidosis was studied in five fetal lambs, 115-125 days gestation, in order to evaluate the renal contribution to elimination of hydrogen ion during intra-uterine development. Experiments were conducted on healthy unanesthetized fetuses, intact in utero, with catheters implanted at hysterotomy into a fetal femoral artery and vein and into the bladder via the urachus, four or more days prior to the study. A metabolic acidosis was induced by infusion of isotonic lactic acid, 15 m mole/kg, intravenously over a period of 90 minutes. Serial arterial samples were taken and urine collected in fractions before, during and for three hours following the infusion, for measurements of pH, bicarbonate, lactate and electrolytes as well as urine output. During the infusion, urine pH fell from 6.65 to 6.25 and was 6.34 three hours later (Figs. 1 to 4, Tabs. III to IV). Lactic acid infusion caused a prompt increase in urine output from a mean rate of 0.12 to a maximum of 0.28 ml/kg/min at the end of the infusion, returning to control rates three hours later. Lactate excretion increased from 0.05 to a maximum of 4.6 mumole/kg/min at the end of infusion; titratable acid increased from 0.22 to a maximum of 4 muEq/kg/min; the rates of excretion of lactate and titratable acid were still higher than control at the end of three hours. Ammonia excretion increased from 0.21 to a maximum of 0.56 muEq/kg/min three hours after the end of infusion. The acid infusion caused a small but significant fall in excretion of bicarbonate. During the 90 minutes of infusion and over the following three hours, about 800 mumole lactate was excreted while net acid excretion over the same period was no more than half that amount. The diuresis was also accompanied by a net loss of sodium and chloride, the excretion of these ions increasing more than threefold following acid infusion; excretion of potassium decreased to one-third its rate prior to the infusion. During the 90 minutes of infusion, blood pH fell from 7.36 to 7.13, base deficit rose from 3.8 to 16.4 mEq/L and lactate rose from 2.2 to 14.8 mM/L; there was also a small but significant rise in both blood PCO2 and PO2 (Figs. 1 to 2, Tabs. I to II). During the following three hours of recovery, pH rose gradually to 7.29, base deficit and lactate fell to 7.4 mEq/L and 8.7 mM/L respectively. Since renal excretion of net acid and lactate was small, the decrease in blood base deficit and lactate levels during the recovery must therefore be mainly due to equilibration in various fetal compartments as well as placental transfer. These experiments indicate that, in the lamb fetus, intact in utero, the kidney although limited by immaturity of several mechanisms, is capable of responding to an acid load and thus can make a small contribution to fetal homeostasis. The increase in excretion of net acid is accompanied by loss of sodium and chloride in the urine.
The effect of  prolonged (10 days) dehydration on acid-base parameters of camel blood was examined. The pH and PCO2 levels rose significantly in the course of dehydration. This state was comparable with compensated non-respiratory alkalosis found in other animals. The plasma sodium, and magnesium levels rose significantly also. The plasma oxygen and calcium levels declined significantly. There were no significant changes in potassium and phosphate levels. It is concluded that the changes found in acid-base status following dehydration are further evidence of water preservation mechanisms in the dehydrated camel.
Authors applied blood-gas analysis in 30 healthy gravid women on 3,3 occassions making out 90 cases altogether by blood samples taken from the pulp of the finger capillaries. As a control 27 healthy non-gravid women were examined for comparative analysis. In 10 cases between the 16. and 28. week the results of samples taken from the arteria femoralis and the pulp were evaluated. It has been found that in the gravidity period of the 16. and 28. week respiratory alcalosis does not appear. No metabolic changes have been found during the whole period of pregnancy. The parallel examination of blood samples taken from the arteria femoralis and the pulp have proved that it is sufficient and reliable to take blood-gas analysis on the material gained from the pulp capillary only. A special importance is attached to keeping to exact methodical prescriptions.
Stripped duodenal mucosa of rabbits was mounted in Ussing chambers containing a Ringer solution gassed with 100% O2. The disappearance of acid or alkali from the mucosal solution of short-circuited tissue was measured with a pH stat while the serosal pH was kept at 7.4. The duodenum rapidly disposed of both acid and alkali; neither property was altered by gassing with N2 while iodoacetate was in the perfusing solutions. Prevention of release of CO2 from the mucosal chamber obliterated the early rapid phase of acid disposal by the mucosa while a similar maneuver in the serosal chamber increased the appearance of serosal acid without altering the rate of acid disposal. Gut sacs of rabbit duodenum in vitro and in vivo showed a positive correlation between acid disposal and the rate of luminal CO2 production. While acid disposal progressively decreased with time for the in vitro gut sacs, the in vivo gut sac showed no fatigue in this respect. Luminal acidification in the Ussing chamber was associated with a profound reduction in short-circuit current (Isc), partially reversible by elevation of the mucosal pH but not by luminal glucose. Our data suggest that acid disposal occurs in part by intraluminal neutralization and in part by diffusion into the mucosa.
9 normal pregnant women in the active phase of labor were treated with 500 ml low molecular dextrane with a pH of 4,5 under standardised external conditions. Before and after this infusion simultaneous estimations of the maternal and fetal acid-base status were made. There was neither a maternal nor a fetal acidosis.
This paper reports two randomized control trials on the effects of nalorphine, pethidine, morphine and heroin on fetal and maternal acid base status. The drugs decreased pH and increased pCO2 in the mother, and decreased pH and base excess in the fetus. The changes in the fetus were independent of the changes in the mother. In equivalent dosages, nalorphine increased maternal pCO2 more than pethidine and morphine. The effects of heroin were found to be greater than that of other drugs, and we suggest that heroin should be avoided where the fetus is already at risk.
The age-dependent peculiarities of the acid-base balance at rest and with standard loads were studied in 466 rats. It was found that with age the pH value of blood decreases, the tension of the carbonic acid increases, but the values of BB, BE, SB, and AB do not undergo any significant changes. With loads, old animals showed more profound changes in the system and these changes were of decompensated character. The maximal changes in young animals were registered   15 hours after loading, in old rats--3 hours after. The normalization of the shifts in old rats occurred much more slowly than in young animals, and it does not reached the initial value by 24 hours after loading. The analysis of the data obtained shows that with aging the reserve potentialities of the organism's mechanisms of the acid-base balance regulation greatly decrease, which under certain conditions results in disturbance of the given system compensation, thus exerting a negative effect on the body vital processes.
Blood gases, lactic acid concentrations, and pH were measured in arterial and mixed venous blood in moderately conditioned Standardbred horses after a standardized exercise load of   16 km in 2 minutes, 40 seconds. Samples were obtained at rest, immediately after exercise, and at 3, 6, 15, 30, and 60 minutes after exercise. Arterial oxygen tension and mixed venous oxygen tension increased after exercise, reaching peak values at 6 minutes. Arterial oxygen tension returned to the resting (preexercise) value by 15 minutes, and mixed venous oxygen tension by 30 minutes. Arterial carbon dioxide tension decreased immediately after exercise, reaching its lowest value at 6 minutes, and returned to resting value by 30 minutes. Mixed venous carbon dioxide tension reached its highest value immediately after exercise, then decreased to less than the resting value, reaching its lowest value by 15 minutes, and returned to normal by 60 minutes. Lactic acid concentration increased immediately after exercise, reaching its highest value at 6 minutes, and returned toward normal by 60 minutes. Arterial pH decreased immediately after exercise, reaching its lowest value at 6 minutes, and returned to normal by 60 minutes. Mixed venous pH reached its lowest value immediately after exercise, then began to increase, and returned to normal by 60 minutes. The decrease in mixed venous pH was more pronounced than that in arterial blood since, in addition to the increase in lartic acid, there was a considerable increase in mixed venous carbon dioxide tension.
Seven healthy males were studied during cycle ergometer exercise at 33%, 66% and 90% of VO2 max. on three occasions when NH4C1, NaHCO3 or CaCO3 (as a control substance) were administered in gelatin capsules double blind and in randomized order. Plasma growth hormone (HGH), lactic acid and hydrogen ion concentration ([H+]) were measured at frequent intervals. 2. Ammonium chloride produced highest blood [H+] and NaHCO3 the lowest. These differences were maintained during exercise and in recovery. Plasma lactic acid concentrations were similar at rest. At 66%, 90% VO2 max. and recovery lactic acid was highest with NaHCO3 and lowest with NH4C 3. Exercise stimulated HGH secretion in all studies and the elevation was proportional to the intensity of the exercise. NH4C1 caused a variable elevation of HGH at rest and 33% VO2 max. At 66% VO2 max, plasma HGH was significantly elevated to similar concentrations in all studies and, at 90% VO2 max, HGH was highest with NaHCO3. 4. An infusion of sodium L(+)-lactate producing plasma lactate concentrations of 3-5 mmol/l did not influence HGH secretion. 5. Exercise is a physiological stimulus to HGH secretion and the mechanism is independent of blood [H+] and lactate concentrations.
Viable human leucocytes were isolated from venous blood and suspended in artificial media. Intracellular pH measurements were made by the dimethyloxazolidinedione technique in conditions simulating "respiratory" or "metabolic" acid-base disturbances. 2. Normal intracellular pH was 7-11 +/- 0-02 (mean +/- 2 SD) at an extracellular PCO2 of 5-8 kPa and a bicarbonate concentration of 25 mmol/l. 3. "Respiratory" and "metabolic" acidosis caused little change in pHi although increases in PCO2 led to relatively greater falls in pHi than did reduction in external bicarbonate concentration. 4. "Respiratory" and "metabolic" alkalosis caused similar and relatively greater increases in the pHi when compared with the response to an external acidosis.
10 Blood acid-base changes were studied at 17 degrees C in immersed crabs (Carcinus maenas) exposed to hypoxic and hyperoxic conditions, by measuring the pH and the CO2 partial pressure, PbCO2, and by calculating the bicarbonate concentration. 20 Hyperoxia first induces a marked respiratory acidosis with a rise of PbCO2. This acidosis is compensated thereafter by a non-ventilatory increase of the blood buffer base concentration. These results are discussed in relation to the general problems concerning the control of the blood acid-base balance in aquatic animals.
An analysis of basic parameters representative of the acid-base balance was made in arterial blood samples from 140 clinically healthy dogs, under a general intravenous Thiopental anaesthesia. The following mean values +/- S.E.M. were obtained: pH = 7.33 +/- 0.01; pCO2 = 47.16 +/- 0.95; base excess = -2.12 +/- 0.27; buffer base = 46.63 +/- 0.37. The results showed a prevalent trend of lower values of pH, base excess and buffer base and higher values of pCO2 than those found commonly in human clinical practice. Special attention was paid to the respiratory component of the acid-base balance (ABB) revealing certain undesirable side effect of Thiopental anaesthesia.
The respiratory properties of rainbow-trout blood were investigated in acid-stressed fish. In the first group acid was introduced into the bloodstream and in the second the carbon dioxide content of the ambient water was increased. 2. Initially the introduction of acid to the blood caused a decrease in blood pH and bicarbonate, and increases in oxygen uptake and ventilation volume. After 2-3 h these values had returned to the control levels. 3. Trout subjected to high ambient CO2 (about 10 mmHg) showed a decrease in blood pH while PCO2 and bicarbonate increased. After 8 h the trout began to show signs of compensation to the acidosis. 4. In each experiment the blood PO2 was little changed but blood O2 content was decreased and tended not to resume the control value even after several hours. 5. The results are discussed in terms of the various acid-base mechanisms thought to be available to the fish. These include branchial ion exchanges and the possible buffering roles of the extracellular and intracellular fluids.
Nephrectomized, open chested dogs were infused with 25-30 ml.kg(-1) body weight of 0.15 M NaCl (group I), 0.15 MHCl (Group II) or 0.3 M lactic acid (Group) III). Pulmonary ventilation was maintained constant in the three groups. Intracellular pH was calculated with the CO2 method. No significant intracellular or extracellular acid-base changes were produced in Group I. A similar degree of extracellular acidosis was achieved in Groups II and III. In spite of constant arterial PCO2, the PCO2 of mixed, coronary sinus and femoral vanous blood increased moderately after the infusion in Groups II and III. It was calculated that less than half of the HCl acid infused remained in the extracellular space. However, no significant changes were observed in the acid-base composition of skeletal muscle in either Group II or III. Comparison of the cardiac muscle cell acid-base composition of Group I with that of Groups II and III whows that metabolic acidosis of the degree and duration produced in these experiments does not produce appreciable myocardial acidosis.
We have previoulsy shown pH compensation to be similar in CSF and arterial blood during chronic hypoxemic hypocapnia in man and pony, and postulated that the compensatory reduction in CSF [HCO3] was dependent upon corresponding changes in [HCO3]a. We tested this hypothesis in anesthetized, paralyzed dogs by determining the effects of 7 or 14 hours of hypocapnia (PaCO2 20 and 30 mm Hg), hypoxemia (PaO2 30, 38 and 48 mm Hg) and hypocapnic hypoxemia on CSF acid-base status. [hco3]a was either permitted to fall normally or was held near control levels by NaHCO3 infusion. In hypocapnia and hypoxemic hypocapnia, the decrease in [HCO3] and % pH compensation in CSF were less than or equal to that in arterial blood. Most (51-89%) of the compensatory decrease in CSF [HCO3] was prevented by preventing the corresponding reduction in [HCO3]a. This dependence of changes in CSF on plasma [HCO3] required a concurrent decrease in CSF PCO2, but was largely independent of variations in plasma pH. A minor but significant portion of the decrease in CSF [HCO3] was achieved independently of corresponding changes in [HCO3]a. The contribution of this local mechanism to CSF [HCO3] regulation increased with increasing severity of hypocapnia or hypoxemia and was usually associated with a selective increase in CSF lactate. It was concluded that [HCO3] regulation in the CSF during hypoxemic hypocapnia was primarily dependent upon, and therefore limited by, the concomitant decrease in plasma [HCO3].
The acid-base balance (pH, pCO2 and HCO-3) of 23 normal subjects was determined both in arterialized capillary blood and in the CSF. 2. Statistically significant correlations (determined by means of Spearman's rank correlation) were found between: pCO2 in arterialized blood and CSF pH (Rs=--0.372, p is less than 0.05), pCO2 in the CSF and CSF pH (Rs=--0.421, p is less than 0.05), HCO-3 in the CSF and in arterialized blood (Rs=0.623, p is less than 0.05), blood pH and CSF pH (Rs=0.485, p is less than 0.025), pCO2 in the CSF and HCO-3 in the CSF (Rs=0.559, p is less than 0.005). 3. The regulatory mechanisms of the CSF acid-base balance in normal subjects and also in patients with extra-neural or CNS disturbances are discussed.
This paper presents the results of measurements of the acid-base and gaseous status of maternal and fetal capillary blood at the time of amniotomy, before the onset of labor. The correlation coefficient between maternal and fetal bicarbonate concentration is 0.6, and that between maternal and fetal PCO2 is 0.3 From the results obtained, as well as from a survey of other work in the field, it is proposed that the diffusion of carbon dioxide across the placenta could not explain some of the findings and that bicarbonate concentrations equilibrate across the placenta.
Pulmonary ventilation (VE), O2 consumption (VO2), and CO2 production (VCO2) were measured continuously on each of 10 turtles, Pseudemys scripta elegans, at 20 degrees C, during and for 1 h after heating to 30 degrees C and during and for 1 h after cooling to 20 degrees C. In seven of the animals, arterial blood was sampled at the three temperature plateaus. Ventilatory ratios (VE/VO2 and VE/VCO2) and metabolic rate adjusted promptly to temperature change, stabilizing at values similar to those observed previously in turtles following 1 day or more at each temperature. Likewise, mean blood pH and PCO2 values conformed both in absolute values and in temperature-dependence to data previously obtained from animals exposed to the various temperatures for longer time periods or from turtle blood thermally equilibrated in vitro. Total plasma [CO2] did not change significantly, suggesting that steady-state CO2 exchange prevailed throughout the experiment. In accordance with this, R(VCO2/VO2) did not change significantly during the 20-30 degrees C transition; however, R rose during the 30-20 degrees C transition, suggesting possible hyperventilation at this stage. We conclude that the respiratory control of blood acid-base status adjusts rapidly to temperature change in the turtle and its adjustment minimizes disturbance to CO2 balance.
Equations for proton equilibria of a single-phase binary buffer system have been applied to temperature-induced changes in pH and PCO2 of separated dog plasma at constant carbon dioxide content. Predicted behaviour, measured as deltapH/deltaT and deltalog PCO2 /deltaT, and pH and PCO2 as a function of temperature (range 8-45 degrees C), are in reasonable agreement with theory. Theory predicts and data confirm that deltapH/delta T and deltalog PCO2/deltaT functions of temperature; no single "temperature correction factor" is applicable. Comparison of whole blood with binary buffer equations also shows acceptable agreement between theory and experiment. Blood and separated plasma show similar responses in deltapH/deltaT and deltalog PCO2/delta T when compared over identical temperature intervals. For blood or plasma with initial pH (AT 37.5 DEGREES C) values in the range 7.53-7.45 deltapH/delta T (u/ degrees C) values are -0.0139 (37.5-27.5 degrees C) and -0.0192 (19-7 degrees C); comparable deltalog PCO2/deltaT values are 0.0195 (37.5-27.5 degrees C) and 0.0240 (19-7 degrees C). The charge state of protein components in this system remains nearly constant as temperature varies.
The Donnan ratio for chloride ion (rCl) was determined for human red cells in plasma utilizing 36Cl. The effect of altered PCO2 and pH on rCl was followed in two ways. CO2 partial pressure was varied (1-  15% CO2 in O2; pH range 7.1-7.9) at 37.5 degrees C (isothermal); PCO2 and pH were also changed by altering temperature (range 5-45 degrees C) at constant CO2 content (temperature induced). At pH 7.4 and 37.5 degrees C, rCl was 0.631 +/- 0.0269 (SE, N = 5); isothermal drcl/dpH = -0.306 +/- 0.0234. When measured under conditions of variable temperature at constant CO2 content (pH range 7.3-7.9), drcl/dpH = .018 +/- 0.0232, significantly different from isothermal response (P less than 0.001). Hematocrit (H) changes with pH for conditions of initial H(7.4) of 0.45, under these conditions were also determined: isothermal dH/dpH = -0.031 +/- 0.0019; temperature induced, -0.004 +/- 0.0009. Temperature change alone at constant carbon dioxide content produces no significant change in distribution of chloride ions or water between erythrocyte and plasma compartments.
Evidence that the response of the kidney is not geared to the defense of extracellular (H+). It is generally believed that the reduction in plasma [HCO3] characteristic of chronic hypocapnia results from renal homeostatic mechanisms designed to minimize the alkalemia produced by.the hypocapneic state. To test this hypothesis, we have induced chronic hypocapnia in dogs in which plasma [HCO3] had previously been markedly reduced (from 21 to 15 meq/liter) by the prolonged feeding of HCl. The PaCO2 of chronically acid-fed animals was reduced from 32 to 15 mm Hg by placing the animials in a large environmental chamber containing 9% oxygen. In response to this reduction in PaCO2, mean plasma [HCO3] fell by 8.6 meq/liter, reaching a new steady-state level of 6.4 meq/liter. This decrement in plasma [HCO3] is almost identical to the 8.1 meq/liter decrement previously observed in normal (nonacid-fed) animals in which the same degree of chronic hypocapnia had been induced. Thus, in both normal and HCl-fed animals, the renal response to chronic hypocapnia causes plasma [HCO3] to fall by approximately 0.5 meq/liter for each millimeter of Hg reduction in CO2 tension. By contrast, the response of plasma [H+] in the two groups was markedly different. Instead of the fall in [H+] which is seen during chronic hypocapnia in normal animals, [H+] in HCl-fed animals rose significantly from 53 to 59 neq/liter (pH 7.28-7.23). This seemingly paradoxical response is, of course, an expression of the constraints imposed by the Henderson equation and reflects the fact that the percent fall in [HCO3] in the HCl-fed animals was greater than the percent fall in PaCO2. These findings clearly indicate that in chronic hypocapnia the kidney cannot be regarded as the effector limb in a homeostatic feedback system geared to the defense of systemic acidity.
Pooled canine blood of different hemoglobin concentration was equilibrated with two carbon dioxide tensions and the resulting pH's of the samples were measured at 38 degrees C. Readings obtained provided data for the construction of a cartesian nomogram for the dog, based on the pH/log pCO2 coordinate system. The nomogram can be used to evaluate both respiratory and non-respiratory acid-base parameters. For contrast, a control nomogram on human blood was also constructed. Both nomograms show broad similarity. This is to be expected as the normal criteria used to define base excess relating to dog blood are the same as those used for human blood. Nonetheless, base excess and buffer base calculations using the nomogram for the dog and that for man show a deviation of 2.5-10%, and we consider this deviation to be more due to a species difference than to any summated experimental error.
The effects of acute hyperthermia on certain physiological parameters of turkey hens was studied. It was found that the response of the turkey to hyperthermia is similar to the reported response of the chicken. The birds began panting and the average body temperature increased 0.1 degrees C. as the ambient temperature reached 32 degrees C. The panting or polypnea induced a profound respiratory alkalosis in the turkeys. The acute hyperthermia also caused a significant (P less than 0.05) decrease in plasma levels of sodium, total calcium, magnesium and inorganic phosphorus. The plasma level of potassium was significantly (P less than 0.05) increased.
Turkey hens were exposed to stepwise increases in ambient temperature from 21 degrees C. to 25 degrees C. to 30 degrees C. to 35 degrees C. at two-week intervals. Dietary calcium levels to   154, 2.01 and 2.48 percent were fed. Acid-base balance, plasma electrolytes and production performance were studied. The temperature increase caused a significant (P less than 0.05) decrease in plasma sodium, calcium, and magnesium, and in egg production, shell thickness and egg weight and a significant (P less than 0.05) increase in plasma potassium. There was no significant change in the acid-base balance of the blood as measured by blood PO2, PCO2 and pH. Egg production was not significantly correlated to blood gas activitelated to plasma calcium and magnesium levels. Dietary calcium levels had no influence on the parameters measured.
Blood perfusing isolated dog gracilis muscles was equilibrated with CO2 tensions ranging from 30 to 120 mm Hg, resulting in venous P CO2 from 35 to 135 mm Hg. Extracellular pH values ranged from 6.96 to 7.41, and muscle cell pH, calculated from DMO distribution, ranged from 6.64 to 6.94. When intracellular pH was plotted as a function of the corresponding extracellular pH, a linear relationship (r = 0.92) was observed throughout the entire pH range. The slope deltapHi/deltapHe was 0.64, without evidence of a difference in slope at different pH values. These results do not support the previous observations in rat diaphragms that cell pH is not affected by PCO2 changes over a certain extracellular pH range. pHe was 0.64, without evidence of a difference in slope at different pH values. Theses results do not support the previous observations in rat diaphragms that cell pH is not affected by PCO2 changes over a certain extracellular pH range.
Each of 21 dogs was bled until mean arterial blood pressure fell to 50 torr; this hemorrhagic shock state was then maintained for two hours. During hemorrhagic shock, the blood lactate concentration increased sixfold. The severe metabolic acidosis in arterial blood was partially compensated by a decreased PCO2 caused by increased ventilation. However, in mixed venous blood, the metabolic acidosis was combined with a respiratory acidosis. This hypercapnia in venous blood was indicative of the increased PCO2 in tissues poorly perfused following hemorrhage. The increase in the PCO2 of the femoral venous blood was greater than that in mixed venous blood, suggesting that some tissue beds were better perfused than those of the hind limb during shock. The intracellular lactate concentration of hind limb skeletal muscle was greatly increased in the shock state, and tissue PCO2 rose. Intracellular pH of skeletal muscle was only slightly decreased and bicarbonate concentration was unchanged during this combined metabolic and respiratory acidosis. This capacity of skeletal muscle to maintain a high HCO-3 concentration in intracellular fluid during metabolic acidosis may be an enhanced response of the mechanism responsible for maintaining (HCO-3)i normally at a level approximately ten times that which would be expected if HCO-3 were distributed passively.
Larger Spotted Dogfish, Scyliorhinus stellaris, were exposed to varied ambient temperature (t) in order to determine the behavior of extracellular pH (pHe), Pco2 and bicarbonate concentration as well as intracellular pH (pHi) in three muscle types. pHe was found to vary with temperature slightly less than expected on the basis of the rule of constant relative alkalinity in juvenile (deltapH/deltat= -0.0148 per degree centigrade) as well as in adult (deltapH/deltat= -0.0136) fish. The absolute pHe values of adult fish were about 0.08 pH units higher than in juvenile fish. Arterial pco2 increased with rising temperature, the increase being much more marked in adult than in juvenile fish. Extracellular bicarbonate concentration (calculated from the pH and Pco2 values measured in arterial blood) was not maintained constant, but diminished in juvenile and increased in adult fish with increasing temperature, indicating that extracellular pH in dogfish is regulated by variations of both Pco2 and bicarbonate concentration. Variations of intracellular pH with temperature (deltapHi/deltat), -0.0178 for white muscle, -0.0334 for red muscle, and -0.0098 for heart muscle, were significantly different from the values of the extracellular compartment and, except for white muscle, significantly different from the condition for constant relative alkalinity (deltapH/deltat= -0.0183). These results are in agreement with the rule of constant relative alkalinity with respect to extracellular pH and possibly also with respect to an overall mean intracellular pH, but the rule is not quantitatively followed by the individual body compartments and tissues.
In respiratory alkalosis the fall in CSF bicarbonate is in part due to increased CSF lactate. The rest of CSF HCO3 fall may be actively regulated or as more recent evidence suggests is dependent on plasma HCO3 fall. Therefore, the relationship between plasma and CSF HCO3 changes was studied during 4 hours of respiratory alkalosis (PaCO2=20 mm Hg) in anesthetized dogs when plasma HCO3: (1) fell normally, (2) kept 'normal' by NaHCO3 infusion, (3) increased by infusing more NaHCO3, and (4) reduced by infusing HCl. In respiratory alkalosis plasma and CSF HCO3 fell 4.6 and 3.8 mEQ/L, respectively. In hypocapnia and 'normal' plasma HCO3 CSF HCO3 fell 2 mEq/L and lactate increased   133 mEq/L. In hypocapnia and metabolic alkalosis plasma HCO3 increased 6.5 mEq/L and CSF HCO3 remained unchanged and lactate increased 2.12 mEq/L. In combined hypocapnia and metabolic acidosis plasma HCO3 fall 10.5 mEq/L but CSF HCO3 fell 3.1 mEq/L and CSF pH returned to normal at 4 hours. Therefore CSF HCO3 fall in hypocapnia is primarily and critically dependent on the simultaneous fall in plasma HCO3 content, with a minimal contribution from CNS lactate increase. When CSF PH has returned to normal, however, CSF HCO3 fall is stopped despite further falls in plasma HCO3.
By means of the Astrup equilibration method the values of the acid-base balance of the blood were determined in 104 cows, 99 horses, 100 pigs, 15 sheep, 20 goats, and in 101 dogs. The pH values of the blood, the partial pressure of CO2, the base excess, the base buffer, the standard bicarbonate, the actual bicarbonate, and the total CO2 were processed statistically and are presented in tables.
The acid-base characteristics of polyenic antibiotics, such as nystatin, mycoheptin and levorin in aqueous solutions were studied. A special procedure provided the use of potentiometric titration for investigation of ionization of the groups of vater-insoluble substances. The ionization constants of the carboxylic and amine groups of the antibiotics at several temperatures were determined. It was found that ionization of the acid group did not practically depend on the temperature. At the same time the heat effect of the amine group ionization was significant and amounted to about 10 kcal/mole. Thermodynamic analysis of the ionization process of the polyenic antibiotics in aqueous solutions was performed. Integral components defining the process energetics were calculated.
A statistical analysis of CSF lactate concentration and CSF pH and PCO2 was performed. The values were obtained from 211 samples taken from 76 neurosurgical patients. The values of pH and pCO2 were classified in three groups corresponding to the following three ranges of lactate concentration: below 15 mg%, 15-30 mg%, over 30 mg%. The mean values and standard deviations were calculated: suitable tests: F, t (Student), C (Cochran and Cox) were used. It was established, that statistically significant changes of CSF acid-base balance were present at lactate levels over 30 mg%. Next, the patients with lactate concentrations over 30 mg% were analysed. They were divided into three groups according to etiology: inflammatory changes, injuries, tumours. It was shown, that the CSF acid-base balance in patients with brain tumours is less disturbed then in patients with inflammatory changes or brain injury.
The respiratory and non-respiratory factors of acid--base status have been evaluated mathematically. New units of measurement for derangements of the acid--base balance are proposed.
We have examined the effect of K depletion on CSF [HCO3-] homeostasis in awake rats. The relationship of CSF [HCO3-] to arterial [HCO3-] in metabolic acid-base disturbances is displaced is an upward direction and has a significantly increased slope in K-depleted vs. control rats (0.51 +/- 0.02 vs. 0.42 +/- 0.02). Results of partial K-repletion experiments, with peripheral acid-base balance held constant, suggest that the effect is K specific. The K-depleted animals also exhibit a wider (CSF-arterial) PCO2 difference than controls (1  11 vs. 8.4 mmHg). When CSF [HCO3-] is shown as a function of CSF PCO2 the data of K-depleted rats are no longer displaced when compared to controls but still have a significantly greater slope (  121 +/- 0.23 vs. 0.89 +/- 0.08). This increased slope is interpreted to reflect enhanced HCO3- movement from blood to CSF at high arterial [HCO3-]. Analysis of our data and observations from the literature in conditions of mixed acid-base disturbances suggest that CSF [HCO3-] is determined by a) CSF PCO2 and b) the level of arterial [HCO3-] when the latter is greater than the normal CSF [HCO3-].
In six healthy male volunteers at sea level (PB 747-759 Torr), we measured pH and PCO2 in cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), and in arterial and jugular bulb blood; from these data we estimated PCO2 (12) and pH for the intracranial portion of CSF. The measurements were repeated after 5 days in a hypobaric chamber (PB 447 Torr). Both lumbar and intracranial CSF were significantly more alkaline at simulated altitude than at sea level. Decrease in [HCO3-] IN lumbar CSF at altitude was similar to that in blood plasma. Both at sea level and at high altitude, PCO2 measured in the lumbar CSF was higher than that estimated for the intracranial CSF. At altitude, hyperoxia, in comparison with breathing room air, resulted in an increase in intracranial PCO2, and a decrease in the estimated pH in intracranial CSF. With hyperoxia at altitude, alveolar ventilation was significantly higher than during sea-level hyperoxia or normoxia, confirming that a degree of acclimatization had occurred. Changes in cerebral arteriovenous differences in CO2, measured in three subjects, suggest that cerebral blood flow may have been elevated after 5 days at altitude.
The behaviour of partial tensions of respiratory gases and pH in the arterial blood was evaluated in anoxiaemic and hypercapnic (1st group) and hypo-eucapnic (IInd group) subjects undergoing oxygen therapy. The following phenomena were observed: 1) normalization in paO2 values in both groups; 2) statistically significant diminution in paCO2, especially as regards hypercapnic subjects; 3) statistically significant diminution in blood pH; 4) statistically significant diminution in bicarbonates. In the light of these findings, it is considered that other variables, such as the electrolytes, might play an important role in pH diminution during oxygen therapy and that further research should be carried out to look into the possibility.
The behaviour of the partial tensions of respiratory gases and the main parameters of acid base balance in hypoxaemic and eucapnic chronic bronchopneumopathics undergoing oxygen therapy has been assessed. The patiests were subdivided into two groups, the first consisting of subjects undergoing oxygen therapy alone, the second of subjects having oxygen and i.v. theophylline at the same time. Two subgroups were also distinguished. These consisted respectively of normochloraemic and hypochloraemic patients, the purpose being to reveal whether electrolytic changes could be attributed to the  concentration of chlorine evaluated in basal conditions. The results obtained showed a disappearance of the hypoxaemic state without appreciable changes in paCO2 in all patients; in those undergoing oxygen therapy only, also observed were: 1) increase in plasmatic H+ and reduction in pH; 2) diminution in HCO3- and plasma Na+; 3) increase in plasma concentration of Cl-; 4)  statistical significance of these data; 5) tendency of all values in the parameters considered to return to basal values upon suspension of oxygenation.
Changes in partial tension of the respiratory gases and in acid-base balance were studied in venous blood subjected to oxygenation, with or without incubation with theophylline. The following modifications were noted: 1) increased pO2; 2) decreased CO2 due to true wash-out caused by tonometry in oxygen; 3)decreased hydrogen ion concentration and bicarbonates following CO2 washing in both experimental models. A smaller reduction in pH and HCO3 was statistically significant in specimens treated with theophylline. This is seen as proof of the view that theophylline inhibits red cell membrane ion exchanges, such as to oppose or at any rate limit metabolic changes in acid-base balance induced by oxygenation.
Two cases of severe chronic respiratory insufficiency in severely acute phase with disturbances in acid base balance characterized by serious gaseous acidosis are reported. Therapy was based essentially on controlled ventilotherapy using an iron lung and considerable improvements were achieved clinically with practically total normalization of the acid base imbalance after only a few hours of treatment. In the following days, however, a picture of metabolic alkalosis established itself and this is discussed and interpreted as an expression of post-hypercapnic hypochloraemia.
The changes of acid-base values of 60 mature and premature neonates treated by exchange transfusion were followed. It could be shown that the blood conserves having acidic pH values caused no acidosis if the acid-base balance of the patients had been normal before transfusion. An existing acidosis frequently increased significantly in the first day of life of the mature but also in the later days in premature neonates. Thus, the determination of acid-base state prior and after transfusion of such patients seems to be important. In the case of pronounced acidosis its correction and also the control of the acid-base values after the exchange transfusion are necessary.
Measurements of intracellular pH (pHi) in air-breathing ectotherms have only been made in the steady state; these pHi indicate that protein charge state, measured as alpha imidazole (alphaIM), the fractional dissociation of protein histidine imidazole groups, is preserved when ectotherm tissues change temperature in vivo, with related changes in pHi and PCO2. In partial answer to the question of how such tissues are able to avoid disrupting transients to functions sensitive to protein charge states, model studies were carried out to assess the passive intracellular buffer system response to a combined change in body temperature and CO2 partial pressure as occurs in vivo in these species. The cell compartment was modeled as a closed volume of ternary buffer solution, containing protein imidazole (50 mM/1); phosphate (15 mM/1) and CO2-bicarbonate buffer components, permeable only to CO2 and permitted no change in buffer base. Excursions from a steady-state non-equilibrium pHi were computed to a step-change in temperature/PCO2. Computations for frog (Rana catesbeiana) striated muscle show that the calculated pHi response on the basis of estimated composition and concentration of cell buffer components, moves along the curve describing the steady-state temperature relationship. No transient away from steady-state alphaIM and carbon dioxide content need be postulated. Applications to turtle (Pseudemys scripta) striated muscle are also explored. These calculations show that ectotherm cells may be capable of responding without appreciable time for adaptation to intracellular acid-base state changes incurred by sudden alteration of body temperature in vivo, given the observed adjustments of blood PCO2 with temperature.
Changes in the total CO2 content of tissues were determined in order to characterize variations in intracellular acid-base parameters during the onset of hypercapnia. Within two minutes after an increasement in the CO2 tension of the inspired air of rats, there were large increases in the intracellular bicarbonate concentrations of both cardiac and skeletal muscles. Greater changes occurred in the heart, and its intracellular pH remained near normal during the first hour of hypercapnia; whereas there was an intracellular acidosis in skeletal muscle. This greater capacity of the heart to buffer excess CO2 has been linked to an increased movement of bicarbonate ions into and/or hydrogen ions out of cardiac cells during hypercapnia (Lai et al, 1973c). Yet, the buffer capacity of the heart was not compromised by metabolic acidosis during which there was a greatly reduced extracellular bicarbonate ion concentration and a greatly increased extracellular hydrogen ion concentration. The intracellular pH of the cardiac ventricle was stable following the imposition of a noncarbonic acid load on normocapnic rats.
The influence of hepatectomy on cerebral energy metabolism was studied in rats in which an end-to-side portacaval anastomosis had been performed one week earlier. The hepatectomy gave rise to an exaggeration of the increase in tissue ammonia content resulting from the shunt. Three hours after the hepatectomy there was a fall in tissue glutamate content but no change in alpha-ketoglutarate. The energy state of the tissue, as evaluated from the concentrations of ATP, ADP, and AMP, was unchanged. There was a significant increase in cerebrospinal fluid pH but no change in intracellular pH.
The purpose of this study was to determine whether the early artificial rupture of the amniotic membranes performed to shorten the duration of an otherwise normal labor and delivery might have potentially deleterious effects on the fetus that would be reflected in the neonate. In 38 infants delivered at term, acid-base balances and O2 and CO2 pressures were obtained in umbilical arterial and venous blood at birth, prior to the first inspiration. For the purpose of the study the infants were divided into two groups: group I infants were born after a normal labor in which the amniotic membranes were permitted to rupture spontaneously at full cervical dilatation; group II infants were born after a labor in which the membranes were ruptured artificially when cervical dilatation was 4 to 5 cm. There was no evidence of fetal distress, and all infants were vigorous at birth. The pH of umbilical venous blood was greater in the group with late rupture of the membranes (fiftieth percentile [P50] = 7.36) than in those born after early amniotomy (P50 = 7.30) (p less than 0.01). The pH values of umbilical arterial blood were also higher in the group I infants (P50 = 7.31) than in those born after amniotomy (P50 = 7.25)(p less than 0.025). These differences were also observed in the 19 neonates in whom the cord was not encircled around the neck at the time of birth. The PCO2 in umbilical venous blood was less, and the hemoglobin saturation was greater (P less than 0.05) in group I infants than in those of group II. It is possible that the influence of early amniotomy on fetal pH may be deleterious in infants born after high-risk pregnancies in which the uteroplacental circulation is impaired.
The arterial (a), mixed venous (v), and arterial-mixed venous differences (A-V) of hydrogen ion concentration ([H+]), PCO2, HCO-3 and base excess (BE) were measured during 3 h in control (C), water-depleted (WD) and water- and salt-depleted (WSD) dogs. In WD animals the difference in hydrogen ion concentration between venous and arterial blood increased because the [H+] increased more in venous than in arterial blood. In WSD animals (A-V) [H+] remained unchanged since both [H+]a and [H+]v increases were parallel. [H+] variations seem to represent the changes in fixed-acid concentration of blood. The difference between both groups of animals in (A-V) [H+] changes could be ascribed to PCO2 variations. [HCO-3] values changed inconsistently. Arterial samples from the experimental groups showed a continuous decrease at the same rate of change. The mean values in WSD were lower than in WD. [HCO-3]v of WSD decreased slowly during the experiment. The rate of decrease of (A-V) [HCO-3] was higher in WD than in WSD. The different behavior of of [HCO-3] between both arterial and mixed venous samples and among experimental groups disappeared if [HCO-3] changes were corrected for bicarbonate generation due to PCO2 variation (respiratory bicarbonate). Thus [HCO-3] corrected for PCO2 variation represents metabolic changes, in good agreement with both [H+] and BE variations. The metabolic acidosis cannot be explained only on the basis of the increase in blood lactate; it is suggested that other fixed acids might contribute to the decrease in blood bicarbonate. In both experimental groups PvCO2 increased continuously. The (A-V) PCO2 showed the same rate of change. There is a good relationship between this increase and the degree of plasma volume change. It therefore might be that PvCO2 increase is a direct consequence of hemodynamic impairment. In WD and WSD, BE decreased progressively in both arterial and mixed venous samples. BEa values were lower than BEv values after the experiment began. (A-V) BE decreased in an exponential manner in both experimental groups; this change could be ascribed to the increased level of deoxygenated hemoglobin in mixed venous blood, thus giving rise to a decrease in fixed acid concentration.
Blood gases were measured in hibernating and hypothermic animals as a biological model of clinical hypothermia. Blood gas analyses from hamsters and dormice were carried out with the aid of permanent arterial catheters during normothermia and hibernation. In golden hamster pH increased from 7.30 to 7.46 during hibernation and PaCO2 decreased from 59.7 to 40.5 mm Hg. In dormice pH increased from 7.24 to 7.44 and PaCO2 decreases from 38.5 to 27.4 mm Hg. The actual bicarbonate concentration increased from 29 to 52 mMol in golden hamsters and from 16 to 34 mMol in dormice during hibernation. In experiments with induced hypothermia in golden hamsters under ketamine-anaesthesia there was no correlation between temperature and PaCO2. Despite the slight decrease in PaCO2 during hibernation we conclude that PaCO2 rather than total carbon dioxide content is held constant when temperature is changed. During clinical hypothermia it will probably be safe to keep PaCO2 constant.
In 12 mongrel dogs intravenous loading with ammonium chloride (4 mmol NH4+/kg body weight) was performed before and 2-9 weeks after unilateral hydronephrosis had been produced by ligation of the ureter over an indwelling catheter. In an attempt to satisfy the demand for adequate, constant, alveolar ventilation a special respirator of the high-frequency positive-pressure ventilation (HFPPV) type was used. The acid-base status of the blood was determined before and after the loading and the acidification capacity of each kidney was assessed by measuring the amount of titratable acid and ammonium ions excreted in the urine. In the hydronephrotic kidney the excretion of both titratable acid and ammonium ions was statistically significantly reduced, both compared with the initial values in session I and compared with the healthy kidney in session II. After additional loading with ammonium chloride in session II, however, both kidneys increased their excretions to approximately similar extents. When the excretion was calculated per ml glomerular filtrate, no statistically significant changes were found between sessions I and II, either for the intact or the hydronephrotic kidney. The renal pelvic volume on the hydronephrotic side was measured and related to the reduction of the capacity of the kidney to excrete titratable acid and ammonium ions. No statistically significant correlation was obtained.
A stable and reproducible methemoglobinemia is induced by small concentration of an oxidizing gas (NO). Under such conditions we evidenced that plasma pH (pHe) to erythrocyte pH (pHi) relationship is unchanged. A strong acidity bound to the changes of NO in water occurs. But we may conclude that the buffer capacity of erythrocyte is not modified by the oxydation of ferro into ferrihemoglobin within the erythrocyte.
Vigorous term infants who are born normally initially have a moderate metabolic and respiratory acidosis which is corrected by the time the infant is 6 hours old. Asphyxiated infants consistently show a greater degree of acidosis, both metabolic and respiratory. Caesarean section results in higher pCO2 values, especially when 'diffusion apnoea' occurs. Indications for the correction of acidosis in asphyxia are proposed.
During their spontaneous recovery after birth, the acid-base balance was studied in 32 healthy newborns. The observation period lasted for 4 hours. Determinations were carried out, both in umbilical vessels as in central arterial blood. The most outstanding phenomenon was an increase in acidosis at 30 minutes of life. The metabolic component predominating over the respiratory was a definitely evident fact. At the end of four hours, the acid-base balance reached figures considered normal for the adult.
The association of umbilical cord complications and variable decelerations with acid-base findings. Variable decelerations during the last 2 hours of labor were associated with an abnormally positioned umbilical cord at delivery in 52% of cases. In cases where an abnormally positioned umbilical cord was seen at delivery, 89% had been preceded by variable decelerations. Cord compression resulted in an A-V difference in pH that was significantly increased when compared to a control group. This was mainly due to a decrease in the pH of the umbilical artery. The pathophysiology of cord compression is discussed.
The Henderson-Hasselbalch equation has always occupied a central place in the description of the acid-base status of the blood. An equation of similar importance is the equation for the CO2 equilibration curve of blood in vitro. It is proposed to name this the Van Slyke equation: a - 24.4 = - (2.3 X b + 7.7) X (c - 7.40) + d/(1 - 0.023 X b), where a = bicarbonate concentration in plasma/(mmol/l), b = hemoglobin concentration in blood/(mmol/l), c = pH of plasma at 37 degrees C, d = base excess concentration in blood/(mmol/l). These two equations provide an arithmetic algorithm for calculation of the various acid-base variables of the blood after measuring the pH, the pCO2, and the hemoglobin concentration.
Acid-base physiology is concerned with sources, extent, and control of hydrogen ion donation in the body, at the organ-physiological as well as the molecular level of study. With the introduction of Van Slyke's methods for quantitative carbon dioxide measurements in biological fluids, one important source of hydrogen ion donation became identifiable; and these and derived methods have permitted of fairly precise quantitative descriptions of transport and pulmonary elimination of carbon dioxide. However, the inevitable operational concept of non-carbonic (non-volatile) contributions to the titratable acidity of the body fluids has been a cause of considerable methodological and conceptual difficulties; and whereas it is now possible by means of the micro-equilibration technique to make accurate assessments of the concentration of non-volatile titratable acid (base) in blood, the question of the physiological relevance of the concept of 'base excess' remains open. In particular, the concept of non-carbonic acid does not possess a specific relevance with respect to the acid-base physiology of kidney, bone, and gastro-intestinal tract comparable to the 'substrate-specificity of carbon dioxide with respect to the lung. Our studies indicate that a subdivision of the titratable non-carbonic acid of any biological medium in two subcomponents will provide an improvement of specificity, adequate for a system physiological approach at the organ level. Thus, a distinction should be made between (1) processes of hydrogen ion donation, reversible by endogenous metabolic means (quantitated in terms of the component MA = metabolizable non-carbonic acid) and (2) processes of hydrogen ion donation associated with gastro-intestinal, skeletal, and renal transport, storage, and control of non-metabolizable non-carbonic acid (NA). Some implications of this distinction for acid-base physiology and acid-base diagnostics are discussed.
It has been recommended to use SI units in clinical chemistry. A consequence of this is that pH is reported as the excess chemical potential (or standard chemical potential) of hydrogen ions with the unit kJ/mol. On the basis of the excess chemical potential of H+ it is possible to calculate the hydrogen ion concentration in the system = the equilibrium concentration of H+ = the concentration of free H+. This quantity must be clearly distinguished from the stoichiometric concentration of H+ = the excess concentration of total H+, which indicates the amount of added or removed H+. The latter quantity with opposite sign has been called the excess concentration of base, but the designation "stoichiometric concentration of H+" seems to be more logical. The general principles for description of a component in a chemical system are based on (1) an extensive quantity (the stoichiometric amount of substance), and (2) an intensive quantity (the excess chemical potential); the product of these has the dimension of energy.
In 40 young males aged 18-20 years operated on for inguinal hernioplasty acute respiratory alkalosis was obtained in the 45th minute of general anaesthesia. The values of basic acid-base balance parameters, blood gases, pyruvate and lactate levels and "lactate excess" were determined before and after hyperventilation. Shifts in the concentrations of hydrogen and bicarbonate ions were found which are both typical of acute respiratory alkalosis. No changes were observed in the oxygenation of capillary blood and the values of "lactate excess" were normal which rules out tissue hypoxia during acute respiratory alkalosis. Passive hyperventilation being a less dangerous alternative of hypoventilation is a frequent occurrence during general anaesthesia and it causes transient respiratory alkalosis.
Experiments were conducted on dogs which had sustained a 10-minute circulatory arrest caused by electrotrauma; the acid-base balance of the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) and the blood was studied during the postreanimation period. Although the systemic uncompensated acidosis persisted in the course of the first hour of the postreanimation period, compensation of the CSF acidosis occurred much earlier and the pH was maintained at the initial level for 6 hours. Despite a high lactate concentration for a period of 3 hours of the postreanimation period the bicarbonate concentration remained near the initial one at this period.
The necessity of providing alkalizing therapy after re-establishment of the local circulation was studied in 10 otherwise healthy patients with intermittent claudication. No such necessity was found in providing stable peroperative circulation, normo- to slight hypothermia, adequate infusions, and normal acid-base values prior to arterial clamping. It is pointed out that alkalosis can cause circulatory problems that are just as serious as those occurring with acidosis; therefore the routine use of alkalizing agents during vascular surgery is inadvisable. Should unstable circulatory parameters occur and hypoperfusion be suspected, then repeated control of the acid-base values is indicated.
The effect of the gastric alkaline tide on serum-ionized calcium levels was determined in human subjects. Gastric acid seretion was stimulated by a standard steak meal, human synthetic gastrin, and betazole hydrochloride. Ionized calcium levels fell to a similar extent after each stimulus. The mean decrease in calcium ion concentration in all experiments was 5.4% of the basal concentration. The fall in serum calcium ion concentration was highly correlated with the rise in serum pH. We speculate that increased formation of calcium bicarbonate complex in the serum as well as increased binding of ionized calcium by serum protein accounts for the surprisingly large effect of the alkaline tide on serumionized calcium levels.
Fetal heart rate (FHR), dip area (DA) and the acid base status (AB) were investigated in breech deliveries (BD) (N= 167) and in group of spontaneously delivered vertex presentations (VP) (NFHR, DA=50; NAB=109). 90 minutes prior to delivery fetal heart rate and dip area were in both groups not significantly different. However as labor progressed the fetal heart rate as well as dip area increased in breech deliveries much more (FHR 163 (SD 16.2) beats/min, DA 1,07 (SD 0,80) cm2/min) than in VP (FHR 136 (SD 14,8) beats/min, DA 0,65 (SD 0,39) cm2/min) (2p less than 0,001). The base excess of the umbilical arterial blood was correlated to the DA measured from 10 minutes prior to birth till the delivery of the baby: BE =  -8,2 --0,3 (DA) (2alpha less than 0,01). The frequency of acidotic babies was more in vaginally delivered breech presentations (pH less than 7,20 = 30, 2%, BE greater than -10 meq/l = 43,7%) than in breech deliveries by caesarean section (pH less than 7,20 = 19,1%, BE greater than -10 meq/l = 24,4%) and vertex presentations (pH less than 7,20 - 5,5%, BE greater than -10 meq/l = 14,6%), respectively. The distance between the vertex and the umbilicus was 28 cm and between the breech and the umbilicus 9,4 cm. From this anatomical observation it is concluded that umbilical cord compression, preferentially umbilicai vein occlusion takes place in breech presentation at an earlier point on than in vertex presentation. The rise of fetal heart rate and the increase in dip area are showing in addition that the fetal buffer base in breech presentation will be reduced during the last time course of the second stage of labor.
Data from 4081 vaginal deliveries (no caesarean sections) were analyzed retrospectively (IBM 730/158) with regard to duration of second and "final stage" of labour and fetal outcome (acid-base balance and apgar scores). The average duration of the two periods amounted to 22.8+/-29.6 and 9.9+/-7.8 min. Mean pH (UA) was 7.268+/-0.084 and the acidotic risk (pH less than 7.20, pH less than 7.10) 13.4 and   16% respectively. The distribution of the Apgar-scores after 1 min was assessed: 0-3:   17%, 4-6: 5.4%, 7-10: 92.9%. The dependance of the time variables from parity was studied. Two samples (N1=1755, N2=1098) of uncomplicated term pregnancies were chosen according to 7 clinical selection criteria differing only in the presence of cord entanglements at birth. The association between the two time variables and parameters of the fetal acid-base balance in cord blood was evaluated using rank correlation- and polynomial regression analysis. Highly significant correlations (tau) were found between the variable time and actual pH in blood of the umbilical artery and vein as well as pCO2, BEECF and HbO2 in the umbilical vein. The association however is not very close and thus clinically not of great importance. The deltapH (UA & UV) pro 60 min of second (and "final") stage of labour was computed and amounted to -0.024 (-0.087) in blood of the umbilical artery and -0.036 (-0.115) in blood of the umbilical vein and -0.017 (-0.062) (UA) and -0.032 (-0.120) units (UV) in the sample with and without apparent cord entanglements at birth respectively. The response of fetal acid-base balance to cord compression during second stage of labour was assesses: The acidotic risk (pH less 7.2) was doubled: 14.5% (7.7%) and AV-differences of all variables were "opened" if cordcoilings were observed. Apgar scores were not significantly different. Moreover, the association between AV-differences of each parameter and the variable time was studied: it became evident that with passage of time AV-difference is "closed" (-0.052 AV DpH/60 min "final stage" of labour, N=1098) indicating time related impairment of placental function. From these observations and data of the literature the conclusion is drawn that second stage of labour should not exceed 45 min in any patient. Furthermore it is concluded that in cases without signs of impending fetal distress it seems to be possible to wait more than 20 (Multipara) or 30 min (Primipara) duration of "final stage" without increased risk of fetal peril measured in terms of acidemia and clinical depression. This is valid only in term pregnancies with the possibility of continuous monitoring of FHR, in cases with normal uterine activity, uneventful course of first stage of labour and cooperative, vigorous patients. The indications for termination of delivery by vaginal operations in cases without impending fetal distress are discussed.
Special characteristics of cellular buffering must be taken into account in order to describe accurately acid-base relationships in the whole body. In particular, tissues other than blood are able to neutralize mineral acid independent of changes in Pco(2) and hence independent of large changes in extra- and intracellular pH. Although mechanistic details remain to be clarified, relationships that describe this tissue buffering in quantitative terms are well established. In this report, emphasis is placed on quantitative relationships that stress the need for diagnostic interpretation derived from acid-base changes within the whole body rather than simply within the blood compartment. Theoreticalproblems with respect ot buffering mechanisms in various body compartments are reviewed and analyzed.
The sequence of calculations that can be entered in the memory of a desk computer for the automatic calculation of acid base balance parameters using data obtained with Astrup's tonometric method is described. A statistical comparison is also made between manually obtained results and those obtained with computer assistance. For clinical purposes the comparison is satisfactory.
It is noted that rats with Heren carcinoma show alkalization of blood, decreased pH levels of the urine, hypokalemia, hypocalcemia, hypomagnesiemia, sodium and water retention, increased kalium level in the liver. Analogous changes are observed in rabbits with Brown-Pearce carcinoma. The organism of tumor-bearing rats responds to stress effects otherwise than the organism of normal animals.
Studies were performed to evaluate the effects of the chronic administration of furosemide on hydrogen and electrolyte excretion in dogs on a normal electrolyte diet and in the absence of electrolyte or volume depletion. Control daily excretion in five dogs averaged 64 meq for Na, 51 meq for K, 66 meq for Cl, and 17 meq for net H. Furosemide, 40 mg, in the drinking water 3 times daily was given for 4 days. On day 1 Na excretion averaged 128 meq, but thereafter was not significantly different from control levels. Over 4 days cumulative net H excretion increased 63.6 meq and plasma HCO3 rose 6.6 meq/liter. The same dogs were restudied by the same protocol except that, to obviate electrolyte depletion, NaCl and KCl were administered daily in quantities sufficient to replace urinary losses. All dogs remained in positive Na, K, and Cl balance. Body weight, hematocrit, plasma albumin, creatinine, and plasma renin activity were unchanged, indicating the absence of electrolyte or volume depletion. Nonetheless, cumulative net H excretion increased 6  12 meq and plasma HCO3 increased 4.3 meq/liter. Two adrenalectomized dogs receiving steroid replacement showed similar changes in net H excretion and plasma HCO3. These experiments suggest that chronic furosemide administration may enhance H excretion and generate alkalosis even in the absence of volume or electrolyte depletion and without increased aldosterone secretion.
The effect of parathyroid hormone (PTH) administration on urinary acidification was studied in intact and thyroparathyroidectomized dogs. PTH administration resulted in a significant increase in urine pH and HCO3 excretion. In dogs with maximally acid urine caused by Na2SO4 infusion PTH administration also led to a significant increase in urine pH and to a decrease in ammonium excretion. To examine the effect of PTH on H+ secretion in the distal nephron we measured the urine-blood (U-B) PCO2 gradient in dogs with maximally alkaline urine (urine pH greater than 7.8) before and after PTH administration. After infusion of the hormone, HCO3 excretion increased significantly but the U-B PCO2 gradient remained unchanged. The effects of PTH infusion on urinary acidification in animals with distal renal tubular acidosis caused by LiCl administration were also studied. PTH administration to these dogs increased HCO3 excretion to the same level seen in normal dogs. These data suggest that PTH does not inhibit distal H+ secretion but increases HCO3 excretion by depressing proximal HCO3 reabsorption.
The authors studied the effects of acute hypoxia of short duration in eight pregnant ewes that had been anaesthetised. They showed that during the experiment the E.E.G. as well as the pH and pCO and the maternal lactate levels were not changed and that therefore changes that can be found in the fetus are due solely to its own hypoxia and not due to transmission from the mother. In the fetus the trace flattens in about 30 minutes on an average. After this interval a moderate drop in pH occurs at the same time as an increase in lactacidemia and the relationship between lactate and pyruvate. The heart rate is changed in a variable manner: it accelerates if the basal rate is less than 180 beats a minute and slows if it is above 180. Blood pressure rises. Changes in the cardio-vascular system always precede those in the electroencephalograms.
Acid base equilibrium in experimental acidosis of cows with and without rumen fistula. Acta Physiol. Pol, 1977, 28, (1): 77-84. Symptoms of acidosis caused by administration of saccharose into the rumen were more significant and lasted longer in the cows without rumen fistula than in those with it. At the peak of acidosis of pH of arterial blood was 7.29 and it was by 0.07 below that in the group of cows with fistula. The alkali reserve was lower by 6 mEq and the bicarbonate level by 5.2. Characteristic differences were observed in oxygen utilization and nitrogen metabolism. Thus, the results obtained in experiments on the cows with rumen fistula do not reflect the normal metabolic processes.
The effect of rapid or slow infusion of hypertonic sodium bicarbonate on acid-base balance and serum osmolality was studied in 36 acidotic newborn dogs. Respiratory acidosis and hypoxia were produced by mechanically fixed hypoventilation. One group of animals breathed 100% O2 to prevent hypoxemia. Rapid infusion of HCO3- in acidotic and hypoxic animals resulted in only a transient (1 minute) and small (0.05 pH units) elevation of arterial pH followed by a continuous fall, resulting in a lower pH and a worsened metabolic condition than in the nontreated controls. In nonhypoxic acidotic animals, rapid infusion of HCO3- had little effect on arterial pH. PaCO2 increased suddenly by 17 Torr in hypoxic and, by 13 Torr, in nonhypoxic animals. There was a concomitant fall in PaO2 (15 Torr). Serum osmolality rose rapidly after rapid infusion of HCO3-. Rapid infusion of hypertonic bicarbonate into an animal or infant whose ventilation is fixed thus results in a less than predicted elevation of arterial pH. PaCO2 rises, PaO2 falls, and serum osmolality rises. The net result may be a worsening rather than an improvement in the animals' metabolic state.
Some kinetic aspects of renal tubular acidification were studied in proximal and distal tubules of the rat kidney by combining stationary microperfusion methods and continuous measurements of luminal pH changes of phosphate or bicarbonate buffers by means of antimony electrodes. The analysis included the measurement of steady-state pH, steady-state buffer concentrations and acidification half-times. From these data, net rates of tubular bicarbonate reabsorption and of H ion secretion were obtained since it was shown that the rate of phosphate  acidification provides a realistic estimate of H ion secretion. 2. Experiments were performed in control rats, in animals undergoing metabolic acidosis or alkalosis and in control and acidotic rats receiving the carbonic anydrase inhibitor Diamox. 3. In all experiments, the rates of tubular bicarbonate reabsorption and of phosphate acidification (H ion secretion) were proportional to luminal buffer levels. The changes of luminal acid concentrations followed first-order kinetics. 4. Steady-state transepithelial pH differences were reduced in metabolic alkalosis and after diamox but augmented during metabolic acidosis. 5. Acidification half-times were prolonged in metabolic acidosis and after Diamox but remained similar to control levels in metabolic alkalosis. 6. From the observation that both bicarbonate reabsorption and phosphate acidification are similarly affected by these experimental manoeuvres, it is concluded that H ion secretion plays a key role in both transport processes.
Renal cortical tubules of control and acetazolamide infused rats were perfused with 100 mM phosphate buffer at pH 5-5. The rate of alkalinization was measured by means of antimony micro-electrodes and was used to compute passive H ion fluxes from lumen to blood across the proximal and distal tubular epithelium. 2. The importance of other ionic movements that might contribute to pH changes of luminal buffers (chloride inflow into the lumen and bicarbonate diffusion across the epithelium) was assessed but found to be minor. H ion movements accounted for the majority of the observed pH changes. 3. H ion permeability of the tubular wall was calculated from the measured H fluxes and transepithelial concentration differences. It was 1-10 cm/sec, several orders of magnitude larger than those for other ions. However, such values are compatible with the mobility of protons in a medium of structure water within the limiting membrane. 4. A kinetic analysis of the mechanism of movement of H ions across the renal tubule is presented on the basis of experiments in which acidification and alkalinization of luminal buffers was followed in stationary microperfusions. The data are compatible with a pump-leak system in the proximal tubule, and with a model with low H ion permeability and a gradient dependent pump in the distal tubule.
In 61 patients with chronic cor pulmonale with compensation and decompensation of circulation, the stroke and minute heart volume were studied as well as the indices, characterizing the blood-gas contents and acid-base blood state. The minute heart volume in the patients examined proved to be with normal values. Stroke heart volume is decreased in all patients examined with chronic cor pulmonale. The acceleration of heart activity enables the maintenance of normal minute volume. Hypoxemia has a cardiac depressive effect as regards minute volume and heart rate. The moderate hypercapnia has a certain stimulating effect on heart. A direct proportional correlation exists between the hypercapnia degree and the tendency of minute volume increase and especially of heart rate. The campaign against hypoxemia is an essential element in the prophylaxis and early treatment of chronic cor pulmonale.
Replacing Cl- in the perfusion fluids decreased the luminal pH of rat ileum perfused in vivo. Varying the initial pH in Cl- depletion studies indicated an equilibrium pH near 6.6. Na+ depletion in Cl- deleted fluids partially inhibited luminal acidification. Addition of HCO3- accelerated Na+ absorption and decreased Cl- absorption. Luminal PCO2 was increased using fluids buffered to initial pH 6.6, suggesting secretion of HCO3- rather than OH-. The decreased HCO3- secretion using Cl- depleted fluids was not due to an acclerated rate of H+ secretion. Reaffirmed and expanded in this study is an ileal H+ secretory process that is partially related to Na+ absorption and direct HCO3- secretion that is related to Cl- and Na+ absorption.
A differentiation between lactate emia (lactic acid emia) and lactate acidosis (lactic acidosis) is made. The normal value for blood lactate concentration is 1-2 mmol/ The term lactate emia is used for lactate values between 2-6 mmol/ The limiting value for the diagnosis of lactate acidosis should be more than 7-8 mmol/1 for the blood lactate concentration. Furthermore the different buffer mechanisms are evaluated in respect to their influence on the pH of the blood and to lactate metabolism. Especially the mechanism of respiratory compensation for metabolic acidosis is discussed. It is stated that for the diagnosis of lactate acidosis the blood-pH and the bicarbonate concentration should be measured.
Acid-base status was studied in 30 diabetic mothers and their infants and in 30 healthy mothers and their babies after general or spinal anesthesia for cesarean section. A normal acid-base state was found for the diabetic subjects following general or spinal anesthesia. However, the infants of diabetic mothers given spinal anesthesia had an average pH of 7.20 and a base excess value of -5.67 mEq/l in umbilical-artery blood at delivery. These values were significantly lower than those observed in the infants of the other groups, where the average pH was between 7.28 and 7.30 and the base excess between -  187 mEq/l and   100 mEq/l. These findings were significantly related to maternal diabetes and maternal hypotension.
The aim of the present investigation was to examine the fetal and maternal blood glucose and insulin response following glucose infusion to the mother. The studies were performed on 11 primigravid patients with a gestational age of 38-40 weeks during the first stage of labor. Glucose was given intravenously by a bolus injection of 330 mg/kg body weight, followed by a glucose infusion of 27.5 mg/kg/min for 60 min. Glucose concentration, immuno-reactive insulin (IRI), pH and base excess of the maternal and fetal blood were measured before and during maternal glucose load. Maternal blood glucose rose within 10 min. up to 280.0 mg% (SD 25.9). This level could be fairly maintained throughout the experiment. The maternal glucose was after 60 min. infusion 326.5 mg% (SD 46.9). Fetal glucose concentration rose continuously from 65.8 mg% (SD 5.8) at control to 249.2 mg% (SD 23.3) after 60 min. The increase of maternal and fetal glucose was associated with an elevation of immuno-reactive insulin (IRI). The maternal insulin was 24.0 micronU/ml (SD 8.0). It was scattered over a wide range (55.4 micronU/ml-217.1 micronU/ml) after 60 min. glucose infusion. The fetal insulin was 17.0 micronU/ml (SD 5.2) at control and rose by 86.5% (SD 80.5) after 60 min. glucose load. One case of a mother with a subclinical diabetes mellitus deviated where the fetal insulin rose from 26.0 micronU/ml at control to 215.6 micronU/ml after 60 min. infusion. The increase of insulin per glucose rise was correlated to fetal body weight. During glucose infusion to the mother of both, fetal and maternal, acid base parameters remained unchanged. From these observations it may be concluded that in the human fetus insulin secretion following a single glucose load is generally low, however, it increases in cases where the maternal insulin response to glucose load is abnormal. This might be related to a chronic stimulation by glucose of the fetal pancreatic islet cells in poorly controlled diabetic and possibly prediabetic patients.
In experiment 1, weanling rats were given, for 7 weeks, a commercial rat diet supplemented with hydrochloric acid at levels up to 560 mmol.kg-1 dry matter. The supplement increased water intake but did not significantly affect food intake, live-weight gain, blood haemoglobin and haematocrit values or acid-base balance. In experiment 2, adult rats were given, for 9 weeks, a commercial rat diet supplemented with hydrochloric acid at levels up to 1250 mmol.kg-1 dry matter. Food intake and liveweight gain were not affected by hydrochloric acid concentration up to 625 mmole but at 938 mmol.kg-1 they were considerably reduced and there was 100% mortality of the rats. In experiment 3, weanling rats were given, for 12 weeks, a commercial rat diet supplemented with hydrochloric or lactic acid each at 300, 600 and 900 mmol.kg-1 dry matter. Lactic acid at the three levels and hydrochloric acid at the two lower levels did not affect food intake or live weight gain and had only a slight effect on blood acid-base balance. At a dietary concentration of 900 mmol.kg-1 dry matter, hydrochloric acid decreased food intake, induced a mild degree of metabolic acidosis and resulted in 30% mortality of the rats. In the three experiments, the acid treatments dnot directly affect the length or composition of the femur of the rats.
The efficiency of the daily mean of patients' results as a quality control tool for acid-base equilibrium has been studied in three one-month periods. Results for the first two periods were obtained in a stable patient population using tonometry in one period, direct measurement of PCO2 in the other; the third period corresponded to another patient population in which PCO2 was determined by direct measurement. These comparisons allowed demonstration that both methodology and patient populations influenced the optimal truncation limits used to exclude extreme values. Furthermore, the efficiency of the daily mean in itself was poor. Using a cusum plot of the differences of each daily mean from the monthly mean of the daily means, however, dramatically improved this efficiency. So modified, quality control using the daily mean of patients' results represents a useful tool, since the whole analytic process, from blood sampling to result, is checked.
Before and after a 5 day head-down tilt of 4.5 degrees blood samples were withdrawn from different areas of the cardiovascular system of healthy male volunteers. Blood was sampled by means of selective catheterization. Parameters of acid-base equilibrium and activities of aminotransferases and alkaline phosphatase were measured. After immobilization the most significant changes were observed in the blood outflowing from the brain in which significant metabolic acidosis and increased activity of aspartate aminotransferase occurred. A slight increase in the activity of aspartate aminotransferase was also observed in the blood outflowing from the liver and kidneys. It is concluded that brain is the organ which is subjected to short-term simulated weightlessness in the highest degree.
The possibility to calculate parameters of acid-base status derived by common laboratory devices without built-in computers is described. The calculation is carried out faster and more exactly than it is possible by nomograms, which is especially suitable when a great quantity of dates occurs. The number of programmable steps in some inexpensive pocket calculators is sufficient for this purpose; this type of "microcomputers" offers advantages of economy and small size so that calculations can be carried out immediately at the site where measurements are taken.
In 90 patients (three aging groups: from 20 to 29 years, from 60 to 69 years, from 80 to 89 years) with a physiologic aged status are investigated parameters of acid-alkaline equilibrium. There are no essential aging changes of the blood pH and other parameters, which characterize the acid-alkaline balance of the organism. The investigations in rats show, that with increasing age the possibilities of reserve of regulating mechanism in relation to the acid-alkaline equilibrium decrease.
Normal acid-base status of arterial blood (pHa =7.40, PaCO2=38.1 Torr) was demonstrated for conscious, restrained squirrel monkeys when environmental stimuli were minimized and monkeys are habituated to experimental procedures. These results indicate the potential for using squirrel monkeys in experiments in which normal acid-base status is a significant factor.
Measurements of pH, PCO2, PO2 and total CO2 were recorded simultaneously in samples of chorioallantoic fluid, amnionic fluid and blood of the chorioallantoic artery from chicken embryos on days 8, 10, 12, 14, 16, 17 and 18 of incubation. During the incubation period studied, PCO2 levels similarly increased in the blood and extraembryonic fluids. The pH of the blood and amnionic fluid remained approximately constant while the chorioallantoic fluid became progressively acidic. Increases of amnionic fluid and blood HCO-3 indicated that respiartory compensation processes regulate pH. In addition, the disappearance of chorioallantoic fluid HCO-3 suggested that reabsorptive processes may conserve these ions and contribute them to the amnionic fluid by either a direct transfer through the amnioallantoic membrane or by way of the chorioallantoic vascular system.
Twenty-two fattening pigs were stressed until their rectal temperatures had reached 42 degrees C. The means of stress included walking on moving conveyor belt at ambient temperatures between 22 degrees C and 27 degrees C and relative humidities between 69 and 98%, belt speeds of 0.7 m/s,   13 m/s or 0.7 m/s, and stimulation by means of a forcing rod. Rectal temperature, respiratory frequency, lactic acid level in blood plasma, pH, as well as pCO2 and base excess in the blood were measured prior to, during, and after stressing. Gasping was strongly pronounced due to severe alkalisis, but it was somewhat mitigated on running on the belt with exposure to additional stress on account of lactic acid accumulation in the plasma.
A graphical representation. When blood temperature is changed in closed system ('anaerobic') conditions, plasma pH and PCO2 vary but no titration by external CO2, acid or alkaline equivalents takes place. It is therefore assumed that the overall acid-base state undergoes no fundamental change. This is further justified by the constancy of osmotic relationships between plasma and red cells, and to a lesser extent of relative alkalinity and protein alpha imidazole (Reeves, 1972, 1976a, b). These considerations serve as a basis for a correction procedure of pH and PCO2 of blood in open systems in vivo to a standard temperature T* (25 degrees C, eventually 37 degrees C). The temperature-corrected values pH* and P*CO2, and the derived [HCO3]* can be represented on a temperature-independent bicarbonate-pH diagram. This permits an easier interpretation of blood acid-base changes occurring together with body temperature variations, such as in ectotherms, hibernators or in artificial hypothermia. Extension to intracellular pH is considered.
A technic is described for the measurement of cerebral surface pH in acute experiments in anesthetized dogs. During asphyxia and circulatory arrest, cerebral surface pH fell promptly and more profoundly than arterial blood or muscle surface pH; during hypovolemic hypotension (30 to 50 torr) cerebral surface pH declined later and less than muscle surface pH. The cerebral surface pH reflects the pH of the cortical interstitial fluid. Since the blood brain barrier is effectively impermeable to lactate, the changes recorded in the cerebral surface pH are a useful index of cortical intracellular metabolism.
An increase in breathing activity has often been described for the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle, for gravidity and after intramuscular application of corpus luteum and follicle hormone. The reason for this has been assumed to be a direct interaction of the hormones in the respiratory center. A shortly published paper dealing with 50 women under long-term treatment with a combination of oestrogenes and gestagenes for oral contraception leads the author to the assumption, that a metabolic acidosis is the primary reaction, followed by an increase in breathing activity for respiratory compensation. In a long-term study it is difficult to differentiate between primary and secondary effects. Therefore in the present experiments arterial blood has been analyzed for PaO2, PaCO2, pH and hemoglobin in 49 subjects on day 1 without hormone administration and on day 2 prior to (9.00 a.m.) after (1  100 a.m,   100 p.m, 4.00 p.m.) administration of a combination of oestrogene and gestagene. From the measured values O2-saturation, standard-bicarbonate, buffer bases and base excess have been calculated by the Thews nomogram. By comparison of the results before and after hormone administration it was shown, that the primary effect is a metabolic acidosis, partly compensated during the next 7 h by respiratory adaptation. There is no indication for a primary respiratory alkalosis.
The acid-base balance in small carnivores (mink, Mustela vison) was examined during 6 feeding periods, when the same animals were given different feeds during a prolonged time. The feeds consisted of normal farm feed to which different amounts of sulphuric acid-preserved feed and feed silaged with organic acids were added (Tables I--II). When the pH of the feed was decreased to below 5.5, the acid-base balance of the animals was changed and metabolic acidosis occurred (Tables III--V, Fig. 1). On neutralization of the acid-preserved feed a normal acid-base balance could be maintained. However, the growth of the animals was reduced after prolonged feeding with silage as they lost weight during the following periods (Table vii).
Twenty-nine infants and children with short (less than 30 minutes) first febrile convulsions were studied between 3 and 22 hours after convulsive episodes. Arterial and CSF acid-base variables, lactate and pyruvate concentrations, and lactate/pyruvate ratios were measured. Biochemical signs of cerebral hypoxia were found in only 2 patients, one of whom had short, repeated convulsions. Our findings indicate that hypoxic damage is unlikely to result from a short-duration febrile convulsion.
Twenty-two infants and children were studied after convulsions of varied cause and duration. Arterial and CSF acid-base variables, lactate and pyruvate concentrations, and lactate/pyruvate ratios were measured between 3 and 18 hours after convulsive episodes. Biochemical signs of cerebral hypoxia were found in 7 patients with prolonged (greater than 30 minutes) or recurrent short convulsions. These signs were absent in patients with single short convulsions. These findings indicate that cerebral hypoxia and possible brain damage is a hazard of prolonged or rapidly recurring short convulsions.
By means of the Astrup apparatus (Blood Microsystem BMS 2) acid-base indices in blood and cerebro-spinal fluid of clinically healthy Merino sheep at the age of one year (15 head) and of two or three years (41 head) were determined. Blood collected anaerobically from v. jugularis and liquor collected by means of the suboccipital punction in heparinized syringes and/or caplaris and liquor collected by means of the suboccipital punction in heparinized syringes and/or capillaries were examined immediately after the collection. Following indices were obtained and re-counted according to nomograms: actual pH, partial CO2 pressure--pCO2 base excess--BE, base buffer--BB, standard bicarbonate--SB, actual bicarbonate--AB, total CO2--tCO2 (Tables I, II). Indices of pH, pCO2, BE and BB indicated statistically significant differences in values when comparing liquor with venous blood (in younger ewes). As the values of the sheep cerebro-spinal fluid indices examined are not to be found in literature, the above stated values can be recommended to be used as basic values for a given age group.
Experiments were performed to determine the relative effects of a net extracellular-to-intracellular HCO3- flux and of elevated carbon dioxide tension (PCO2) on cellular acid-base regulation. Isolated rabbit hearts were perfused by recirculating a small volume of Ringer solution in which the PCO2 and the HCO3- concentration could be independently altered. Net HCO3- flux was assessed by the disappearance of HCO3- from perfusate. Between 40 and 100 Torr PCO2, a HCO3- flux into the cell occurs only when perfusate HCO3- concentration is increased. Therefore, by selective manipulation of perfusate HCO3- and PCO2 it is possible to induce hypercapnia with or without an accompanying HCO3- flux. When perfusate HCO3- concentration was increased from 20 to 36 mM, cellular HCO3- concentration increased from 22.5 +/- 0.8 to 26.1 +/-   10 mM at 40 Torr PCO2 and from 27.8 +/- 0.7 to 34.1 +/-   14 mM at 98 Torr PCO2. These increases can be accounted for by the amount of HCO3- that disappeared from the perfusate. The results suggest that most of the initial cell CO2 buffering is provided by the net HCO3- flux in addition to the passive physicochemical buffering.
Treatment of chronic uremia by hemodiafiltration requires replacement of the filtrate. Using Ringer's solution alone, there is a depression of pH because of bicarbonate loss. To bring the acid base status back to normal, sodium lactate in increasing concentrations (283 mg% = 32 mM/1, 361 mg% = 40 mM/1; 462 mg% = 51 mM/1; 508 mg% = 57 mM/1) was added to the replacement fluid. The optimal concentration is 450 mg% (=50 mM/1) sodium lactate, provided the following conditions are fulfilled: (a) substitution after the filter; (b) mixing ratio of blood and substitution fluid 1:2. Using 12-15 liters of substitution fluid during a 5 hr treatment, the added lactate amounts to 60 g (=0.54 M). With continuous addition of lactate, the serum concentration of lactate is 3.5 times normal and the concentration of serum pyruvate 4 times normal. An excess lactate concentration, according to Huckabee [1,2], was thus not observed. The sieving coefficients were the following: sodium, potassium, urea, lactate, pyruvate, and phosphate 1; chloride greater then 1; calcium and protein less than  Serum osmolality fell, on the average, 9 mOsmol/1 during diafiltration.
Blood samples were collected by microhematocrit tube from posterior medial margin of the shaved, but otherwise untreated, canine ear. Acid-base and blood gas values of these samples were compared with the values of samples obtained simultaneously from the carotid artery. The arterialized nature of capillary blood from the canine ear was demonstrated under various degrees of chemical restraint and during conditions of extreme hypoxic acidosis to hyperventilatory alkalosis. Once a week determinations of acid-base and blood gas status with such arterialized capillary blood from a group of awake dogs showed within-subject variance to be significantly less (P less than 0.05) than between-subject variance; thus, uniqueness of individual dogs was reliably revealed. This technique also was used to demonstrated breed differences for acid-base and blood gas characteristics.
Blood pH, aqueous pH, and intraocular tension were noted in 20 albino rabbits before and after administration of vitamin C in oral dosage of 7.5 gm/kg/day (in 4 equal divided doses for one week). A significant difference was noted in changes of blood pH and fall in intraocular tension but aqueous pH did not show any change. In 20 glaucoma patients there was no significant change in pH of blood of glaucoma after administration of vitamin C in 3.5 gm/kg body weight per day by oral route for one week (in 4 equal divided doses).
Twenty-one small premature infants with clinical features and radiological findings of type II RDS were studied. Correction of blood pH, corresponding with the decrease of blood PaCO2, was usually seen in the first eight hours of age. Clinical inprovement, as judged by the RDS score, was noted only after 12 hours of age. Complete recovery was the rule although signs of respiratory distress in a few infants lasted for 48-72 hours. The calculated AaDO2 and total Qs/Qt weer slightly higher (27.8%) than reported in normal infants and remained unchanged until after 48 hours of age when it decreased to 24.5%.
The effects of bilateral common carotid artery occlusion on brain metabolism and arterial acid-base balance were studied in normotensive and experimental renovascular hypertensive rats. One hour after carotid occlusion in hypertensive rats, supratentorial lactate increased to 383% and lactate-pyruvate ratio to 280% of the controls, while adenosine triphosphate (ATP) decreased to 69%. These metabolic changes were thought to be due to cerebral ischemia. Arterial pCO2 was lowered and the pH was raised in the hypertensive animals due to cerebral ischemia induced hyperventilation. In the normotensive rats, carotid occlusion had minimal effects on cerebral metabolism and arterial acid-base balance. These results suggest that hypertensive rats are more susceptible to cerebral ischemia caused by carotid occlusion than normotensive rats. Increased cerebrovascular resistance in hypertension is discussed as a causal factor in cerebral ischemia.
Acidification of the luminal solution by the isolated turtle bladder involves H(+) secretion by a pump at the luminal membrane. The OH(-) dissociated in this process reacts with CO(2) and forms HCO(3) (-) which moves passively out of the cell across the serosal cell membrane. In the present study, this exit step for HCO(3) (-) was inhibited by serosal addition of the disulfonic stilbene, SITS, an agent which is thought to bind to a transport protein at the serosal cell membrane. 90 min after serosal addition of 0.5 mM SITS, H(+) secretion decreased by > 80%. In contrast, luminal addition of SITS had no effect. During inhibition of H(+) secretion by serosal SITS, overall cell pH, measured by the 5, 5-dimethyl-2, 3-oxazolidinedione method, increased from 7.48+/-0.03 to 7.61+/-0.02. This increase of 0.13+/-0.02 pH U was associated with a much larger regional pH increase as judged from the decrement in the attainable pH gradient across the epithelium. After serosal SITS, this gradient was reduced from 2.88+/-0.06 to 2.09+/-0.11 pH U. In the absence of evidence for increased H(+) permeability or a change in the force of the H(+) pump, the gradient decrement of 0.79+/-0.08 U reflects a similar pH increment on the cytoplasmic side of the pump.SITS inhibits the exit of bicarbonate across the serosal cell membrane and, thereby, creates a compartment of high alkalinity in series with the pump. The increased electrochemical gradient across the active transport pathway is the primary factor in the inhibition of urinary acidification.
By use of the technique of flow dialysis, the membrane potential (deltapsi) and pH gradient (deltapH) have been measured in colicin Ia-treated Escherichia coli K-12 cells and in membrane vesicles prepared from such cells. Although such cells and vesicles are able to generate a transmembrane deltapH at pH 5.5, they do not generate a transmembrane deltapsi. Glucose-6-phospate uptake by cells is shown to be stimulated at pH 5.5 and inhibited at pH 7.5 by colicin Ia treatment. On the other hand, proline uptake is demonstrated to be inhibited progressively at pH 5.5, 6.6, and 7.5 in colicin Ia-treated cells. These data provide strong evidence for a colicin Ia-induced membrane deplorization and indicate that the membrane becomes permeable to ion(s) other than protons after treatment with colicin Ia.
In omnivorous creatures, the diet is acidogenic, especially as a result of the meat content, which gives rise to phosphoric and sulphuric acids, ie, to metabolic acidosis. In the short term, metabolic acids are buffered by tissue proteins and bicarbonate (the 'alkali reserve'). In the longer term, acid must be excreted, or neutralized with base which is also generated from the diet, by conversion of dietary amino-nitrogen to ammonia. The final steps of this process occur in the kidney, which converts circulating glutamine to ammonia, and to carbon products such as glucose and carbon dioxide, by metabolic reactions which adapt during acidosis to generate more ammonia and maintain an increased renal ammonia content. The complex mechanisms which govern the formation of ammonia, glucose and carbon dioxide from glutamine, involving the reactions of amino acids, the tricarboxylic acid cycle, and gluconeogenesis, are reviewed.
FHR monitoring and microanalysis of fetal blood are mutually complementary procedures, and optimal knowledge of the fetal state is achieved by making use of both, the former for the preliminary screening of all cases at risk and the latter for the purpose of deciding on obstetric management where pathological changes are evident in the FHR. The major difficulty in obtaining a precise value for the fetal acid-base balance lies in the occurence of "falsely abnormal" cases, ie cases in which the fetal pH falls during labor but the clinical condition at birth is good (APGAR greater than or equal to 7). In our own series the incidence of such cases among fetuses at risk was 1  12% (Tab. I). In the majority of these cases the fetal acidosis is thought to be a result of increased metabolic acidosis in the mother (maternogenic fetal metabolic acidosis). The importance of the maternogenic fetal acidosis during labor lies in the fact that unless it is recognised, rapid extraction of the fetus will appear necessary on clinical grounds, although it is in fact unnecessary, since this form of acidosis has no adverse effect on the fetus. Various parameters have been proposed for the differential diagnosis of the maternogenic fetal acidosis. These include the feto-maternal difference in base deficit (F/M deltaBD), the materno-fetal differences in pHqu 40 (M/F deltapHqu 40) the materno-fetal difference actual pH (M/F actual deltapH), and the materno-fetal difference in base deficit of the extra-cellular fluid (M/F deltaBDHb5). A critical analysis of these parameters has been carried out on the results of microtests performed during a 5 year period (1968-1972) at the First Clinic of Obstetrics and Gynecology of Milan University. The cases comprised 59 regarded as normal (normal course of pregnancy, spontaneous commencement of labor at term, clear amniotic fluid, regular FHR, spontaneous birth, APGAR at 90 sec between 8 and 10, weight at birth greater than 2500 g), and 335 considered to be at risk (maternal disease, presence of meconium stained amniotic fluid and/or abnormal changes in FHR). In all of these cases the FHR was recorded by cardiotokography, and the tracings were interpreted according to HON. Microsamples of blood were taken from both mother and fetus during labor and the following determinations were carried out: actual pH, pHqu 40, Hb concentration, hemoglobin oxygen saturation, base deficit Hb5 (BDHb5). The maternofetal differences were then calculated. The same determinations were carried out on samples of maternal blood and of arterial and venous cord blood taken immediately after delivery. The clinical condition of the infant was evaluated by the APGAR score at 90 seconds after birth.
The effects of a metabolic and respiratory acidosis and alkalosis on intracellular pH (pHi) and K+ have been compared in cardiac and skeletal muscle from the anesthetized rabbit. The extracellular space and pHi were calculated from the distribution volumes of [51Cr] EDTA and [14C]DMO, respectively. When pHe was varied by altering PCO2, the slope of the line relating pHi to the extracellular pH (pHe) was greater (P less than 0.05--0.001) than that obtained during metabolic changes of pHe in right and left ventricles, atria, diaphragm, and quadriceps. During metabolic acidosis and alkalosis, the slope of pHi/pHe line did not vary between tissues. During respiratory acidosis, there was no difference in slope between cardiac tissues, but it was less in left ventricle than quadriceps (P less than 0.001). In left ventricle intracellular K+ increased in a metabolic (P less than 0.05) or respiratory acidosis (P less than 0.02), whereas in diaphragm it decreased (P less than 0.02). Intracellular K+ correlated with pHe and pHE-PHi. Changes in pHi but not intracellular K+ could explain known differences in myocardial function in respiratory and metabolic acidosis.
In 14 patients undergoing surgery with methoxyflurane anaesthesia the development of metabolic acidosis was observed. As mechanisms causing such acidosis regional ischaemia and inhibition of lactic acid metabolism in the liver by breakdown products of methoxyflurane are discussed.
We studied the relative importance of hyperkalemia and mineralocorticoid deficiency in the metabolic acidosis of a patient with proved isolated hyporeninemic hypoaldosteronism and moderate kidney failure. The hyperkalemia and acidosis were severe in relation to the slight azotemia. Despite the systemic acidosis and urinary pH of 4.9, urinary ammonium excretion was distinctly blunted. Correction of the hyperkalemia by potassium-sodium exchange resin alone resolved the acidosis and restored the previously diminished urinary ammonium excretion to normal. Administration of mineralocorticoids only partially corrected the hyperkalemia and the acidosis. Hyperkalemia by itself, rather than hypoaldosteronism per se, caused the acidosis in this patient. Hyperkalemia apparently suppresses urinary ammonium excretion and thus interferes with urinary acidification.
Lung slices from term fetal rats were incubated in vitro at various pH values and the rates of the two de novo pathways for lecithin biosynthesis were determined by measuring the conversion of either 14C-choline (pathway 1) or 14C-methionine (pathway 2) to the phospholipid. It was observed that the choline pathway, but not phosphatidylethanolamine methylation, is pH-sensitive with maximum rates occurring at pH levels between 7.3 and 7.5; significantly less activity was found at pH levels between 7.0 and 7.2 and at pH levels between 7.6 and 8.0. Adjustment of the pH from 7.0 to 7.4 in vitro simulating the clinical correction of acidosis by alkali infusion was found to increase the conversion of choline to lecithin to a rate approximating that observed at pH 7.4. Since lecithins are the principal phospholipid components of pulmonary surfactant, and since pathway 1 is predominantly responsible for lung lecithin synthesis, the demonstration of impaired production with reduced pH offers a biochemical explanation for the pathophysiological effects of acidosis in the respiratory distress syndrome. A comparison of pH effects on choline pathway rate with the pH profiles of pathway enzymes suggests that these effects are mediated by the catalysts of lecithin synthesis.
We conducted a controlled, prospective trial to evaluate the effectiveness of rapidly infusing sodium bicarbonate (NaHCO3) and salt-poor albumin into high-risk, premature infants in the first 2 hours of life. Fifty-three infants, randomized into one of four treatment groups, received 8 ml. per kilogram of a solution containing either (A) glucose in water, (B) salt-poor albumin, (C) NaHCO3, or (D) a combination of albumin and NaHCO3. After the initial infusion, the babies received no colloid or alkali solutions until 4 hours of age. We managed them supportively with warmth, appropriate oxygen administration, isotonic fluid infusion, and close monitoring. Among the infants who received alkali, 14 of 26 acquired the respiratory distress syndrome (RDS), 11 died, and four had intracranial hemorrhage. Among babies who received no alkali, RDS occurred in 11 of 27, 5 died, and none had intracranial hemorrhage. These results do not support the common practice of rapidly infusing NaHCO3 into high-risk, premature infants, and they suggest that the early management of such infants needs renewed critical evaluation.
The effects of pH variation on ionic exchange and mechanical function were studied in the arterially perfused rat and rabbit septa. The pH and PCO2 of the control perfusate were 7.40 and 39 mmHg, respectively. In the rabbit septum a metabolic acidosis (pH equals 6.82, PCO2 equals 39 mmHg) caused a loss of 16% of control tension in 12 min. Na+ and K+ exchange were unaltered. A comparable respiratory acidosis (pH equals 6.81, PCO2 equals 159 mmHg) caused a 51% loss of tension in 2 min. Na+ exchange was unaltered but K+ efflux fell from 8.9 +/- 0.6 (mean +/- SE) to 4.9 +/- 0.3 mmol/kg dry wt per min (P less than 0.001, n equals 10). A net gain of K+ of 16.9 +/-   17 (n equals 14) mmol/kg dry wt occurred and was attributable to a delayed fall in K+ influx relative to efflux over 15 min. The net gain could not be mimicked by epinephrine administration or blocked by propranolol and was absent in the beating rat septum and the quiescent rabbit septum. These results suggest that the net uptake of K+, which appears to be dependent on a period of depolarization, and the changes of contractility are controlled by the H+ ion concentration at a cellular site whose exchange with the extracellular space is characterized by a considerable restriction of diffusion. Changes of contractility are not related to the net uptake of K+.
The electrolyte changes and renal hemodynamic adjustment to hypertonic sodium bicarbonate (NaHCO3) correction of a metabolic acidosis were studied in 4 neonatal lambs and in 2 controls. PAH clearance increased from 0.92 to   165 ml/min/kg (p less than 0.05),  urine flow from 0.37 to 0.61 ml/min/kg (p less than 0.05), and Na excretion from 8.4 to 23.7 muEq/min/kg (p less than 0.05) during the NaHCO3 infusion. These increases were transient and returned to pre-infusion levels following NaHCO3 infusion. Calculation of Na intake and output revealed a net retention of 5.1 mEq/kg in the study lambs which was reflected in a rise of serum Na and osmolarity (Osm) during the post-NaHCO3 -infusion period. The extraction ratio of sodium p-aminohippurate (EPAH) and its relationship to arterial pH were studied in 4 additional lambs. The EPAH did not change with metabolic acidosis but for unknown reasons, the infusion of NaHCO3 resulted in a temporary depression of EPAH (p less than 0.001).
In newborns with postpartum acidosis the subcutaneous interstitiel space pH was monitored continuously with the special electrode of Stamm and Moeller. This was compared with intermittent determinations of the pH in the capillary blood from the heel of the infant. The severity of the metabolic disturbance can be recognized in all test cases with both methods. The correction of the acidosis develops in a concordant manner, in a concordant magnitude and at a largely synchronous rate. The observations show that it is possible to monitor the postpartum adaptation phase by continuous pH monitoring in the interstitial space of the subcutaneous tissue and to observe the efficiency of the treatment of acidosis, administration of oxygen, or a buffer infusion.
A model of spontaneous lactic acidosis was developed in alloxan diabetic rabbits by infusing intravenously beta-hydroxybutyric acid followed by a continuous infusion of NaHCO3. In half of the animals, the arterial lactate/pyruvate ratio rose from 2.5 mM/0.19mM to 20.4 mM/0.28 mM, and arterial pH fell to 7.16. In animals with lactic acidosis, the calculated ratio in blood of NAD/NADH was 1437 +/- 230, versus a normal value of 6754 +/- 1250. Both arterial PO2 and blood pressure were normal. Continued infusion of NaHCO3 led to increased blood lactate levels, with cardiorespiratory arrest in 36% of animals. Lactic acidosis did not develop in normal rabbits who were similarly treated. It is concluded that spontaneous lactic acidosis can be produced in diabetic, but not in normal, rabbits by infusion of beta-hydroxybutric acid followed by infusion of NaHCO3.
A patient presenting with a deep metabolic acidosis after birth is described. Gas chromatographic analysis of short chain fatty acid and non volatile organic acids revealed the presence of both propionic and methylmalonic acid. In plasma obtained immediately after death the propionic- and methylmalonic acid concentrations were measured after separation of both acids by thin layer chromatography. The propionic acid concentration was about 5 mM while the methylmalonic acid concentration was 2.6 mM. The methylmalonic acid concentration in urine was 6.8 mM. Propionyl-CoA carboxylase activity measured in leucocytes and liver-mitochondria revealed normal values (53 pmoles/min/mg protein and 6.5 nmoles/min/mg protein respectively). 2-14C-Methyl-malonate oxydation in intact fibroblasts was totally blocked in the patient's cells. The methylmalonyl-CoA carbonyl mutase activity was found to be absent in the patient's fibroblasts. Addition of vit. B12 coenzyme to the incubation mixture stimulated 14C-succinate formation in the control cells but not in the patient's cells.
Mechanisms through which metabolic acidosis increases calcium mobilization have been investigated in thyroparathyroidectomized rats with induction of acute metabolic acidosis by infusing NH4C1 intravenously. Acute metabolic acidosis directly raised serum calcium concentration and augmented the effect of parathyroid hormone (PTH) to raise serum calcium concentration. The same effects of metabolic acidosis were observed in rats with surgically removed intestines and bilateral nephrectomy, suggesting that acute metabolic acidosis directly increases calcium mobilization from bone and augments the effect of PTH to mobilize calcium from bone. In the kidney, acidosis directly inhibited the tubular reabsorption of calcium, but augmented the effect of PTH to increase tubular reabsorption of calcium. Acidosis had no measurable effect on calcitonin action.
Effective renal plasma flow, glomerular filtration rate and cardiac output were measured in osmotically loaded dogs before and during comparable acute respiratory and metabolic acidosis. 2. Urine output increased in control dogs and in animals with metabolic acidosis, but declined with respiratory acidosis. Effective renal plasma flow and glomerular filtration rate declined with respiratory and metabolic acidosis. 3. When respiratory acidosis was buffered with sodium bicarbonate, urine volume increased and glomerular filtration rate and effective renal plasma flow were unchanged; with trihydroxymethylaminomethane, urine volume increased but glomerular filtration rate and effective renal plasma flow fell. 4. When metabolic acidosis was buffered with sodium bicarbonate, urine volume increased; with trihydroxymethylaminomethane, urine volume increased but glomerular filtration rate fell. Cardiac output declined only during metabolic acidosis, both buffered and unbuffered. 5. These studies demonstrate that, even with osmotic loading: (1) respiratory acidosis caused a decrease in glomerular filtration rate, effective renal plasma flow and urine volume; (2) metabolic acidosis depresses glomerular filtration rate and effective renal plasma flow but does not change urine volume even though cardiac output falls; (3) sodium bicarbonate is mor effective than trihydroxymethylaminomethane in preserving renal function during respiratory and metabolic acidosis.
The effect of metabolic acidosis of 4-6 h duration on cardiac output, blood pressure, heart rate, and hepatic and renal blood flow has been studied in the rat. 2. In anaesthetized rats, blood pressure and heart rate fell linearly with blood pH in both sham-operated and nephrectomized rats. There was no significant difference between the two groups in the effect of acidosis on either variable. 3. Cardiac output showed a significant fall with increasing acidosis in the conscious rat. 4. Estimated hepatic blood flow in conscious rats showed a significant positive correlation with blood pH in both sham-operated and nephrectomized animals. There was no significant difference in estimated hepatic blood flow between the two groups of animals at any blood pH. 5. In conscious rats, increasing acidosis caused a progressive decrease in estimated renal blood flow. 6. It is concluded that the increase in the previously described apparent renal contribution to lactate removal in the acidotic rat cannot be explained by any circulatory effect mediated by the kidney. The possible relevance of the findings to lactate homeostasis is discussed.
The isolated perfused kidneys of fed rats in normal acid-base status showed a constant rate of lactate removal from the perfusate between 5 and 90 min of perfusion at a perfusate pH of 7-4-7-5. 2. Lactate removal by kidneys of rats in normal acid-base status was stimulated within 30 min by a reduction in perfusate pH to 7-1-7-2, but depressed when perfusate pH was reduced further. 3. Kidneys taken from rats previously made acidotic and perfused with media of various pH values showed a progressive fall in the rate of lactate removal during the perfusion. 4. Glucose output by the kidneys of rats in normal acid-base status perfused with lactate as substrate was not affected by an alteration in perfusate pH. The kidneys of acidotic rats generally showed an increased rate of glucose output compared with those of control rats.
Lipolysis and cyclic AMP accumulation were studied in isolated rat fat cells at normal (7.4) and decreased (7.0, 6.6) pH. Acidosis inhibited lipolysis and cyclic AMP accumulation due to NA non-competetively. Maximal lipolysis (3 muM NA) was inhibited by 25% at pH 7.0 and by 61% at pH 6.6 Cyclic AMP accumulation 5 min after 3 muM NA was inhibited by 57% at pH 7.0 and by 83% at pH 6.6. Between 10 and 60 minutes of incubation NA-stimulated lipolysis was linear at pH 7.4, whereas a progressively increasing inhibition was seen at lower pH. The FFA production was inhibited to the same degree as glycerol production by acidosis. The fraction of FFA associated with the cells was the same at all pHs. Thus, we have no evidence that acidosis inhibits lipolysis via accumulation of FFA intracellularly. NA-induced accumulation of 3H-cAMP from 3H-ATP, endogenously formed by prelabelling the cells with 3H-adenine, was inhibited by acidosis both in the presence and absence of theophylline in the incubation medium (by 48 and 44% respectively at pH 7.0 and by 74 and 68% at pH 6.6). Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase in homogenates of fat cells was inhibited by decreasing the pH, whether measured at high or low substrate concentrations. Basal adenylyl cyclase activity in a cell membrane fraction from fat cells was affected to a minor degree, while NA-stimulated activity was inhibited by decreased pH. The response to 3 muM NA at pH 6.6 was inhibited by 43% relative to control. The results show that acidosis inhibits NA-induced cyclic AMP accumulation by interfering with the formation, rather than the inactivation of the nucleotide. Since NA-induced lipolysis is a cyclic AMP-mediated process it is suggested that at least part of the antilipolytic effect of acidosis is due to inhibition of cyclic AMP formation.
Myocardial cell pH was measured with 5, 5 dimethyl-2, 4-oxazolidinedione (DMO) in intact anesthetized dogs by a transient indicator dilution technique. Bolus injections of labeled DMO, vascular, extracellular and water indicators were made into the left anterior descending coronary artery, and blood samples were collected from the great cardiac vein. The steady state distribution of DMO between cells and plasma was calculated from the mean transit times of the indicator. Normal myocardial cell pH averaged 694 and changed by 58% of the concomitant alterations in plasma pH after infusions of acid or alkali. Myocardial ischemia induced by inflation of a balloon tip catheter in the left anterior descending coronary artery resulted in progressive decreases in cell pH to 6.59 by 1 hour. Infusions of sodium carbonate diminished intracellular acidosis. Hemodynamic studies during 4 hours of ischemia with blood pH at 7.55 to 7.60 indicated a significantly reduced left ventricular end-diastolic pressure and increased stroke volume by comparison with findings in animals given infusions of saline solution. Ventriculograms revealed improved wall motion in the ischemic segment after infusion of alkali. Precordial mapping showed a significant reduction in the number of leads with S-T segment elevation as well as in the sum of S-T segment elevations, but R wave amplitudes did not differ from those in control studies. Calculations of extracellular space, tissue water and cation content revealed a reduced gain of cell sodium ion and loss of cell potassium ion during ischemia after alkali treatment. The latter may account for the S-T segment responses, whereas enhanced ventricular performance may be related to reduced competition of hydrogen ion with calcium ion for binding sites on contractile protein.
In explanation of metabolic acidosis during parenteral nutrition, the authors considered the supply of H+ ions by fat emulsion, containing phospholipids of egg or soy. During intravenous infusions of 24 grams of lecithins to two healthy subjects, they observed an increased output H+ ions in urine, about 74,05 and 75,88 mEq, and a metabolic acidosis of the plasma. The theorically forcasted supply of production was 74,6 mEq. Indeed the metabolism of phospholipids supplies phosphoric ions (PO4H3), giving H+ ions at pH 7,40. The most used fat emulsions are able to give between 37 (intralipid 10%) and 61 (lipihysan 15%) mEq of H+ ions/liter.
The effect of metabolic and hypercapnic acidosis on myocardial blood flow was studied during intravenous infusions of hydrochloric acid solutions (n = 12) and during passive ventilation with 5% CO2 (n = 5) in anaesthetized, closed chest dogs. Below a pH of 7.2 metabolic acidosis at normal arterial CO2-tensions caused an increase of coronary blood flow and a decrease of coronary vascular resistance associated with a narrowed myocardial arteriovenous O2-difference, indicating vasodilation at unchanged myocardial oxygen consumption. In propranolol-pretreated dogs myocardial blood flow and coronary oxygen AV difference remained unaffected, suggesting that the coronary dilatory effect of metabolic acidemia involves beta adrenergic stimulation. Coronary vasodilation induced by increasing arterial pCO2 was found to the significantly greater as compared with the dilatory effect of metabolic acidosis at the same blood pH level. Blocking of beta receptors did not reduce the coronary response to increased arterial CO2-tensions. It is concluded that the coronary vasodilation observed during hypercapnic acidosis is neither mediated by a beta adrenergic stimulation nor dependent of the concomitant change in blood pH. The possible sites of the coronary dilatory actions of increased arterial CO2-tensions are discussed.
The dynamics of the glucose concentration and arterovenous glucose gradient was examined during different metabolic deviations in the acid-base balance. The metabolitic acidosis increased the level of sugar in the blood. A definite influence on the latter had the gravity of the acidosis and to a certain degree its pathogenetic form. The arterio-venous glucose difference changed from negative to positive with the increase of proton activity. The type of the peripheral hypoxic structure, formed  during the state of acidosis influenced both the glucose gradient and its quantitative relations to the acid-base and oxygen indices. The sugar content in the blood during metabolitic alcalosis was not changed significantly. There was an increase in the arterio-venous gradient and inverse correlation between the glucose level and the arterio-venous oxygen difference with the increase of the bicarbonate concentration.
A study was made of the acid-base status of Babesia canis infected dogs judged unlikely to recover after specific babesicidal drug therapy despite the use of blood transfusion and other conventional supportive measures. Such cases were invariably acidotic and responded well and often dramatically to supportive intravenous sodium bicarbonate administration. Elevated blood urea nitrogen, also responded gratifyingly to this procedure. The rationale is discussed in some detail.
In an attempt to examine the effects of mild and severe chronic metabolic acidosis on proximal tubule sodium reabsorption, 6 dogs were given 10 mEq. per kilogram per day and 5 dogs were given 20mEq. per kilogram per day of ammonium chloride for 3 days and compared to 12 normal dogs during a steady-state water diuresis and following the administration of ethacrynic acid (EA) intravenously (2 mg. per kilogram) utilizing standard clearance methodology, In the severely acidotic group (pH decrease is greater tthan 0.2) plasma pH was 7.08 +/- 0.06 and plasma bicarbonate was 6.3 +/-   10 Eq. per liter compared to a pH of 7.33 +/-0.02 and bicarbonate of 13.4 +/- 0.7 in mild acidosis (pH decrease is less than 0.2). During a steady-state water diuresis urine flow was 14.2 +/- 0.9 in severely acidotic compared to 10.5 +/-0.7 ml. per minute per 100 ml. glomerular filtration rate (GFR) in normal dogs (p is less than 0.01). Following EA sodium clearance increased 38.4 +/- 3.5 in severely acidotic dogs and 27.6 +/- 2.0 ml. per minute per 100 ml. GFR in normal dogs (p is less than 0.02). In mild acidosis, steady-state fractional urine flow and the increase in fractional sodium clearance following EA were not significantly different than normal dogs. We conclude that chronic metabolic acidosis leads to an increase in distal solute load and enhanced natriuretic effect of EA secondary to a decrease in proximal tubule sodium reabsorption which may be dependent upon the degree of reduction in the plasma bicarbonate level.
The ventilatory response to severe metabolic acidosis was studied by measuring arterial blood carbon dioxide tension and pH in sixty-seven patients with blood pH less than 7-10, none of whom had hypercapnia, pulmonary oedema, or chronic pulmonary insufficiency. The results were compared with those previously found in patients with uncomplicated diabetic ketoacidosis. 2. By that comparison, fifty-two of the sixty-seven patients with blood pH less than 7-10 were judged to have "appropriate hypocapnia", and fifteen had "submaximal hypocapnia". Thirteen of the latter fifteen had circulatory failture and/or acute hypoxia, and seven of nine in whom it was measured had plasma lactate greater than 9 mmol/ 3. Hyperventilation was therefore usually well sustained in these patients with severe metabolic acidosis, except in most of those with acute tissue hypoxia. The latter may have had insufficient time to achieve maximum hyperventilation in response to their acidosis, or perhaps their submaximal hypercapnia presaged imminent failure of the hyperventilatory response.
A study has been carried out on the parameters of the graph of the fetal heart rate (the basal rate and dips) in 44 cases of acute fetal distress with a pH lower than 7.2 in the blood and in 30 normal deliveries. The statistical analysis confirms that there is a significant rise in the number of heart rate abnormalities such as persistent bradycardia or persistent tachycardia and with dips during deliveries with fetal acidosis. The frequency of these abnormalities increases with the degree of acidosis. Sometimes the abnormalities in the fetal heart rate precede the appearance of the acidosis. All the same the discovery of these abnormalities does not by itself make a precise diagnosis of fetal distress because we do find these abnormalities in a certain number of cases even in normal deliveries. Only measuring fetal pH at a definite time can establish the diagnosis of fetal distress and the severity of the condition.
The changes of the coronary flows and of the cardiac nucleotide metabolism during acidosis and during alkalosis were studied in 50 perfused guinea pig hearts with and without hypoxia. At pH 7.0 the coronary flows increased, and at pH 7.8 a significant reduction of the flows took place. At 20% O2, acidosis elicited a further flow increase, whereas alkalosis inhibited the flow increase produced by hyoxia. The increases after adenosine injections and after coronary occlusions were greater during acidosis and smaller during alkalosis than at pH 7.4. The cardiac nucleotide contents did not clearly differ from the controls whereas adenosine exhibits higher levels in acidotic hearts. Alkalosis always induced a decreased production of adenine nucleoside irrespective of the presence or the absence of hypoxia. At 20% O2 a decreased ATP level and increased ADP- and CrP-contents could be observed during alkalosis.
The influence of severe arterial hypoxia and acidosis on the fibrillation threshold was checked in 22 cats. Two groups were formed: in 10 cats (group I) acidosis was produced by 2-N lactic acid infusion; in the second group of 12 animals the respirator was turned off for 60 seconds, thus producing a low arterial PO2. If hypoxia and acidosis were severe enough, the fibrillation threshold was significantly lowered in either group. The pathophysiological mechanisms of these findings are discussed.
Lactating white rats (Rattus norvegicus) were subjected to metabolic and respiratory acidosis and metabolic alkalosis. Before and during the various treatments, the acid-base status of heart blood and milk was determined. Acute metabolic acidosis lowered the pH of plasma and milk; Pco(2) and bicarbonate concentrations in plasma were lowered, and in milk Pco(2) was raised and the bicarbonate concentration remained unchanged. Respiratory acidosis and acetazolamide caused a drop in blood pH and in blood and milk bicarbonate concentrations; milk pH remained unchanged, but Pco(2) was raised in both plasma and milk. Acute metabolic alkalosis raised the blood pH and milk Pco(2); plasma Pco(2) and bicarbonate concentrations in blood and milk remained unchanged. The data show that greater changes occur in acid-base parameters of blood than milk when animals are exposed to acidifying and alkalinizing stimuli.
Protracted anaphylactic shock of guinea-pigs was accompanied by a marked decrease in blood pH, and an increase in hematocrit. Death ensued in 58.3% of the animals within 3 hr of observation. Infusion of adrenaline (20 mug/kg/min), after eliciting anaphylaxis, intensified the acidosis, and increased the lethality to 100%. Pretreatment with dibenamine (5 mg/kg) reversed the effect of adrenaline. Dopamine, infused in amounts of 200 mug/kg/min, acted similarly to the combination dibenamine/adrenaline. Hemoconcentration was neither prevented nor intensified by adrenaline. Dopamine, however, reduced significantly the anaphylactic increase in hematocrit.
Dogs under chloralose anasthesia were bled at a rate of 50 ml/min to a total of 25 ml/kg body weight and 2 minutes later a quick reinfusion of adequate volumes of blood, dextran, or Locke's solution was done. Within 2 minutes after reinfusion, the pH of arterial blood fell by 0.074--0.127; concurrently, PaCO2 rose by 9.2-12.9 mm Hg. A close correlation was demonstrated between these changes. After retransfusion, PaO2 and the arterial lactic acid level did not change significantly. Thus retransfusion acidosis in the dog appears after a brief hypotensive period, too, but cannot be attributed to a "washout" of lactate from the tissues.
NH3 production by renal cortical mitochondria was studied under conditions of metabolic acidosis induced in vivo and with pH manipulations of the media bathing mitochondria from normal rats. A HCO3- medium equilibrated with O2 and CO2 was utilized with glutamine concentrations of either 10 or 0.5 mM. With chronic acidosis NH3 production increased significantly at either substrate concentration. Similar results were obtained with rotenone in the media, both with chronic acidosis and with acidosis of 3 h duration, indicating that increased glutamine entry and/or phosphate-dependent glutaminase (PDG) activity accounts for the increased ammoniagenesis. In contrast to acidosis induced in vivo, mitochondria from normal rats subjected to a diminution in medium pH, either by manipulation of HCO3 concentration or PCO2, significantly decrease NH3 production. Mitochondrial studies with rotenone, as well as studies of solubilized PDG, suggest that a low pH diminishes NH3 production by directly altering PDG activity. Furthermore, regardless of the specifics of the mechanism, these studies indicate that adaptation to metabolic acidosis is not the immediate, direct result of a change in pH.
Cumulative dose-response curves of Ca2+-induced tension increments were studied in K+-depolarized helical strips of dog coronary arteries. Adenosine 10(-4) M reduced the Ca2+ sensitivity of the strips without altering the maximal tension with full Ca2+ activation. In contrast, acidosis of pH 7.05 significantly diminished the maximal tension with full Ca2+ activation. The relaxing effect of acidosis was almost completely abolished by 10(-4) M adenosine. It is concluded that adenosine inhibits Ca2+ influx, whereas acidosis depresses the contractile process of vascular smooth muscle directly.
Tris (hydroxymethyl) aminomethane (tromethamine or THAM) has been suggested as an effective substitute for sodium bicarbonate (NaHCO3) in the treatment of metabolic acidosis accompanying cardiac arrest. Even though several reports on its appraisal have been published, there is still no clear agreement on its therapeutic value. A double-blind study was therefore lndertaken to compare in 36 dogs the effectiveness of 0.6 M THAM, 0.3 M THAM, and NaHCO3 (0.892 mEq/ml) to correct metabolic acidosis produced during 3 minutes of cardiac fibrillation, followed by a 3-minute period of cardiac compression. The dogs were then defibrillated and observed for 45 minutes. One group of 8 dogs was treated with 0.9 percent NaCl infusion. Compared with 0.9 percent NaCl, both THAM and NaHCO3 were equally effective in correcting metabolic acidosis (p less than 0.05). Initially, 0.6 M THAM produced a more pronounced (p less than 0.05) elevation of blood pH, but this effect was not sustained during the later postdefibrillation period. There was little difference in the effect of either of these drugs on mean aortic pressure and total peripheral vascular resistance. It is concluded that adequate ventilation and effective cardiac compression are still the chief criteria on which the final outcome of cardiac resuscitation depends. Correction of metabolic acidosis is important supportive therapy, but either THAM or NaHCO3 can be used with comparatively equivalent effect.
Both the kidney and colon secrete bicarbonate and transport water and electrolytes. The respective contributions of these two organs to acid-base and electrolyte balance in normal man has thus been studied in eight healthy male volunteers who underwent simultaneous renal clearance studies, and colonic perfusion with a 0.9% saline or 7.2% mannitol solution, during metabolic alkalosis and acidosis, extracellular volume expansion, and control conditions. There was no influence of these acid-base conditions on electrolyte transport in the colon. In the urine, preferential loss of chloride over sodium averaged 81, 143 (P less than 0.001), and 141 (P less than 0.05) muequiv./min, during control, metabolic acidosis, and extracellular volume expansion conditions, respectively. During alkalosis more sodium than chloride was lost (146 muequiv./min) (P less than 0.001). Colonic pH averaged 7.41 during saline and 6.75 (P less than 0.005) during mannitol perfusion. Titratable acid was not produced in the colon during saline perfusion, and averaged 18 muequiv./min during mannitol perfusion. Urinary titratable acid increased from 19 to 25 muequiv./min (P less than 0.01) during volume expansion. With saline perfusion, bicarbonate secretion rate in the colon rose from 249 muequiv./min during control conditions to 289 muequiv./min during metabolic alkalosis (P less than 0.05). More bicarbonate was excreted in the urine during alkalosis when mannitol was introduced in the colon (243 muequiv./min) than when saline was perfused (152 muequiv./min) (P less than 0.05). This study indicates that the response of the human colon is trivial compared with that of the kidney during acute changes in acid-base balance.
Whole-body intracellular pH (pHi) was measured by the 14C-labelled DMO method in twenty-four control subjects, eighteen normal subjects with induced acute metabolic alkalosis, ten normal subjects with induced acute metabolic acidosis, twelve normal subjects with chronic acidosis and in fifteen patients with chronic renal insufficiency and acidosis. 2. The change in pHi per unit change in extracellular pH is significantly larger in acute metabolic alkalosis than in acute metabolic acidosis. In chronic metabolic acidosis, pHi decreased in proportion to the total amount of ammonium chloride administered; pHi was normal in patients with uraemic acidosis. 3. These observations confirm the role that tissue buffers play in the protection of the cellular environment in some forms of acidosis. When the acid load overwhelms tissue buffer capacity, pHi becomes a function of extracellular pH. 4. Cells seem more protected from acute acidosis than from acute alkalosis.
Leucocyte intracellular pH in patients with the metabolic acidosis of renal failure.  Human leucocytes were isolated from venous blood and resuspended in the subjects plasma. 2. Intracellular pH measurements were made in vitro by the dimethyloxazolidinedione technique in 13 healthy subjects and in 11 subjects with renal failure and metabolic acidosis. 3. The intracellular pH of the healthy subjects was found to be 7-07 (SD 0-04), significantly lower than that of the patients, which was 7-11 (SD 0-03). For all estimations plasma PCO2 was maintained at approximately 5-5 kPa. The methodological and possible metabolic reasons for this difference in intracellular pH are discussed.
The authors examined in dynamics the changes in the functional state of the adrenals on 240 rabbits, which served as models for acute metabolic deviations in the acid-base balance. The obtained results showed that the acute metabolic acidosis increased moderately the values of ACTH and 17-hydroxycorticosteroids in blood without changing their concentration on the adrenal tissue. It lowered strongly the content of catecholamines (adrenaline and noradranaline) in the adrenal medular part. The metabolic alkalosis raised the concentration of ACTH in blood plasma and increased the amount of corticosteroids in blood and adrenals. There was no well formed parallelism in normalizing acid-base and hormonal indices. As a consequence of this a stage of postaciodotic catecholamine adrenal deficit was formed as well as metabasic hypercorticism in the experimental animals.
CSF and blood acid-base values were measured in compensated metabolic acidosis, induced in anesthetized dogs by infusion of dilute HCl during hyperventilation. We observed cerebral blood flow-related steady-state differences in PCO2 between CSF and arterial venous blood from the brain. The steady-state values of CSF-blood PCO2 differences and blood H+ activity were intermediate to those observed by us previously during uncompensated acidosis and alkalosis (J. Appl. Physiol. 34: 249-254, 1973). These results are consistent with predictions of the "charged membrane hypothesis" proposed by us to explain CSF and blood acid-base relationship during uncompensated acid-base derangements (J. Appl. Physiol. 34: 243-248, 1973).
Eleven infants recovering from protein-calorie malnutrition secondary to acquired monosaccharide intolerance were found to have reduced plasma bicarbonate concentration associated with inadequate weight gain. Renal net acid excretion (NAE) was decreased to a mean of 34.2 micronEq/  173m2/min. Titratable acidity (TA) was markedly reduced, accounting for only 16% of NAE. This marked reduction in TA was associated with reduced mean phosphate (PO4) excretion (.074 mg/min) and a reduced mean serum PO4 (3.9 mg/dl), suggesting PO4 depletion. Two patients received intravenous phosphate loads, resulting in an increase in mean NAE from 35.1 to 89.7 microgEq/  173m2/min. A similar response was seen after oral PO4 supplementation. Three patients were studied after partial correction of their acidosis. At a relatively low plasma bicarbonate concentration (mean = 16.6 mmoles/liter) significant amounts of bicarbonate were detected in the urine (mean = 8.7 micronEq/  173m2/min), suggesting a defect in bicarbonate reabsorption. Five patients studied after complete recovery from malnutrition had normal NAE in response to ammonium chloride load. The reduction in NAE appears to be secondary to unavailability of urinary buffers and a reduction in bicarbonate reabsorption; both of these defects can be explained by phosphate depletion.
The factors controlling renal bicarbonate reabsorption and acid excretion under normal conditions and in the presence of metabolic acidosis and alkalosis are reviewed. The methods used to assess distal acidification and its limitations are also discussed. Measurement of urinary pCO2 in maximally alkaline urine (pH greater than 7.8) is a very useful qualitative method to assess distal acidification. The finding of a low urinary pCO2 in maximally alkaline urine indicates a distal acidification defect. We propose that both the secretory and gradient defect types of distal renal tubular acidosis are associated with a low urinary pCO2 when the urine is maximally alkaline. Sodium sulfate and neutral phosphate infusion may allow distinction between a secretory and gradient defect. Sodium sulfate lowers urine pH in the gradient defect but fails to produce the same response in the secretory defect. Neutral phosphate infusion when urine pH (6.8-7.4) is close to the pK of phosphate (6.8) results in an increase in urinary pCO2 in the gradient defect but not in the secretory defect. The mechanisms of generation, maintenance and treatment of metabolic alkalosis are also discussed.
In the lens, disorders of the metabolism occur, and, with them, active permeability (the cation pump with uptake of K and release of Na) changes to passive permeability and consequently Na ions enter with water. As a result, the lens increases in weight and a subcapsular (permeability) cataract develops. It is shown that the cattle lens in vitro increases in weight the lower the pH (6.5 greater than 7.5 greater than 8.5) of the surrounding fluid becomes. In a further experiment, 1 ml of buffered liquids with different pH were injected into the anterior chamber of the eyes of freshly slaughtered cattle. Here, too, the mechanically undamaged, untouched lens increased in weight more greatly as the pH (5.5 greater than 6.5 greater than 7.5 greater than 8.5) of the injected fluid was lowered. The significance of the lowering of the pH, e.g, in local inflammation (iritis, cyclitis, retinitis, etc.) or general acidoses (diabetes mellitus, galactosemia, hunger, extracorporeal circulation for atrophic kidney. Albright-, Love-, Fanconi-syndrome) for the appearance of incipient subcapsular clouding of the lens is pointed out.
NH4Cl-induced acidosis in rats resulted in renal enlargement and increase in activities of phosphate-dependent glutaminase and glutamic dehydrogenase. The renal enlargement was associated with protein synthesis but not deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis. In control rats histochemical activity of glutamic dehydrogenase was seen dominantly in the proximal straight tubule. In acidotic rats high activity was noted in the proximal convoluted tubule as well as in the proximal straight tubule. By electron microscopy reaction product was in mitochondria. The results suggest that urine ammonia is produced in mitochondria of epithelial cells in the proximal straight tubule in both normal and acidotic rats. Increased enzyme activity in acidotic rats is largely associated with epithelial cells of the proximal convoluted tubule.
Complex clinical and clinico-biochemical examination of the blood, urine and rumen liquor in a herd of dairy cows revealed chronical metabolic acidosis accompanied by rumen dysfunction and by a reduced butterfat content of milk. During the first examination of the acid-base state of the blood was almost at a standard level. An increased level of urea in blood plasma and a higher GOT transaminase activity testified to an excessive load on the liver. Urine pH was considerably deviated towards the acidic side and inorganic phosphorus was present in urine in a greater concentration. The pH of rumen liquor was slightly shifted towards alkalinity owing to the release of NH3 from urea in the food ration. The diagnosis--suspect chronical metabolic acidosis--was determined on the basis of the first examination. Chronical metabolic acidosis was definitely proved by the second examination when urea had been excluded from the feed ration. Repeated examinations revealed chronical metabolic acidosis which had originally been accompanied by a higher rumen liquor pH. On the basis of case histories and mechanisms of chronical acidosis, measures were proposed, resulting in an increase of the butterfat content of milk. Chronical metabolic disorders often follow a long-lasting latent pattern, manifesting themselves as a reduced milk yield and lower resistance; the clinical form of disease appears only at a later stage. The system of preventive diagnostics provides information on the changes in the composition of internal medium and of the faeces before a drop occurs in milk and fat production. These measures prevent metabolic disorders and high losses of produce which otherwise remain hidden for a long time.
Detailed studies, using gas chromatography and mass spectrometric methods, of the urinary organic acids excreted by a patient with proven pyruvate decarboxylase deficiency are reported. In addition to the greatly-increased levels of lactate and pyruvate, marked elevation in the levels of 2-oxoglutaric, malic, and isocitric acids were observed, with associated increases 2-hydroxyglutaric, fumaric, succinic, and glyceric acids, and reduced citric acid excretion. The levels of excretion during clinically static and acute periods are compared to those in a normal neonate and normal infants. The metabolites observed indicate a probable defect in the oxidation of pyruvate by pyruvate dehydrogenase and suggest the presence of secondary defects in the tricarboxylic acid cycle. Studies of this type may enable the relatively rapid identification of the probable underlying enzyme deficiency in cases of congenital lactic acidosis, prior to confirmatory enzyme studies.
A model for the study of an anion-gap acidosis not associated with hyperkalemia. To define the time course of the metabolic acidosis that follows a single grand-mal seizure, we obtained serial blood samples from eight consecutive patients. Immediately after a seizure, the mean (+/- S.E.M.) venous lactate concentration was 12.7 +/-   10 meq per liter, the mean carbon dioxide content 17.1 +/-   11 mmol per liter, and the mean arterial pH 7.14 +/- 0.06. Sixty minutes later their values were 6.6 +/- 0.7 meq per liter (P less than 0.005), 23.6 +/-   11 mmol per liter (P less than 0.005) and 7.38 +/- 0.04 (P less than 0.005) respectively. The spontaneous resolution of the acidosis was due, in large part, to the metabolism of lactate and to the concomitant removal of hydrogen ion. There was no change in the serum potassium concentration, despite the development of a severe systemic acidemia and the subsequent return to normal of the pH. We suggest that the patient with seizures may serve as a unique model of lactic acidosis.
The diagnosis of lactate acidosis is complicated by the fact that lactate determination is not a routine method in clinical chemistry. In fact, lactate analysis is performed only in special laboratories. Even in greater clinics this method is not routinely performed in differential diagnosis of acidotic states. Various diseases are accompanied by a lactate emia or even by lactate acidosis. Anaerobic synthesis of lactate is an emergency reaction to supply minimum energy to tissues with insufficient oxygen supply. The main diseases complicated by increased blood lactate concentrations are shock, circulatory collapse, cardiac failure and peripheral circularoty disturbance. Additionally diabetes mellitus, septical infections, and-the most prominent situation-biguanide intoxications are complicated by an increase in blood lactate concentration.
Several inherited metabolic diseases are accompanied by a greater or lesser increase in blood lactate concentration under certain metabolic conditions. These diseases are glycogenosis type I (glocuse-6-phosphate deficiency), fructose-1,6-diphosphatase deficiency, glucose-induced hyperlactate emia, idiopathic lactate acidosis. The conditions are discussed when hyperlactate emia develops. Very large increases in blood lactate concentration are found during muscular activity, lactate concentrations can be as much as 20 mmol/l under these conditions. Regarding these values, the increase in blood lactate concentration during intravenous carbohydrate infusion is minimum, even in the case of fructose infusions (1-4 mmol/l). Therapeutical measures for treatment of increased lactate concentration are discussed. A causal therapy is optimum; however, the precondition is a definite diagnosis. Besides bicarbonate infusions (or infusions of other alkalizing substances) dialysis seems to be a favourable therapy in certain cases. In future, prognosis of lactate emia should be better if the diagnostic measures and differential diagnosis are improved.
It has generally been thought that homeostatic mechanisms of renal origin are responsible for minimizing the alkalemia produced by chronic hypocapnia. Recent observations from this laboratory have demonstrated, however, that the decrement in [HCO(-) (3)], which "protects" extracellular pH in normal dogs, is simply the by-product of a nonspecific effect of Paco(2) on renal hydrogen ion secretion; chronic primary hypocapnia produces virtually the same decrement in plasma [HCO(-) (3)] in dogs with chronic HCl acidosis as in normal dogs (Delta[HCO(-) (3)]/DeltaPaco(2) = 0.5), with the result that plasma [H(+)] in animals with severe acidosis rises rather than falls during superimposed forced hyperventilation. This observation raised the possibility that the secondary hypocapnia which normally accompanies metabolic acidosis, if persistent, might induce an analogous renal response and thereby contribute to the steady-state decrement in plasma [HCO(-) (3)] observed during HCl feeding. We reasoned that if sustained secondary hypocapnia provoked the kidney to depress renal bicarbonate reabsorption, the acute salutary effect of hypocapnia on plasma acidity might be seriously undermined. To isolate the possible effects of secondary hypocapnia from those of the hydrogen ion load, per se, animals were maintained in an atmosphere of 2.6% CO(2) during an initial 8-day period of acid feeding (7 mmol/kg per day); this maneuver allowed Paco(2) to be held constant at the control level of 36 mm Hg despite the hyperventilation induced by the acidemia. Steady-state bicarbonate concentration during the period of eucapnia fell from 20.8 to 16.0 meq/liter, while [H(+)] rose from 42 to 55 neq/liter. During the second phase of the study, acid feeding was continued but CO(2) was removed from the inspired air, permitting Paco(2) to fall by 6 mm Hg. In response to this secondary hypocapnia, bicarbonate concentration fell by an additional 3.0 meq/liter to a new steady-state level of 13.0 meq/liter. This reduction in bicarbonate was of sufficient magnitude to more than offset the acute salutary effect of the hypocapnia on plasma hydrogen ion concentration; in fact, steady-state [H(+)] rose as a function of the adaptive fall in Paco(2), Delta[H(+)]/Delta Paco(2) = -0.44. That the fall in bicarbonate observed in response to chronic secondary hypocapnia was the result of the change in Paco(2) was confirmed by the observation that plasma bicarbonate returned to its eucapnic level in a subgroup of animals re-exposed to 2.6% CO(2). These data indicate that the decrement in plasma [HCO(-) (3)] seen in chronic HCl acidosis is a composite function of (a) the acid load itself and (b) the renal response to the associated hyperventilation. We conclude that this renal response is maladaptive because it clearly diminishes the degree to which plasma acidity is protected by secondary hypocapnia acutely. Moreover, under some circumstances, this maladaptation actually results in more severe acidemia than would occur in the complete absence of secondary hypocapnia.
To test the hypothesis that the increased incidence of hyaline membrane disease in second-born twins is related to acidosis at birth, umbilical arterial [H+] was measured in 26 sets of premature twins. Although overall Twin B had a lower Apgar score than Twin A, there was no difference in their [H+]. If the delivery interval was prolonged over 8 minutes then Twin B infants were more acidemic and had lower Apgar scores. Infants with hyaline membrane disease had lower Apgar scores, but were not more acidemic than infants without respiratory distress. Our data suggest that acidosis at birth is not an important factor in the development of hyaline membrane disease.
Infusions of fructose or sorbitol are used commonly in parenteral nutrition and may cause lactic acidosis. A case is reported in whom blood lactate concentration was monitored frequently over a 5-day period during intravenous feeding with a sorbitol-ethanol-amino acid mixture. During the first five infusions blood lactate rose only moderately, but with the final infusion lactate rose to 11-1 mmol/l and the patient had a severe metabolic acidosis. In retrospect the patient had shown deterioration in renal and hepatic function tests during the preceding 24 hr. On terminating the infusions the blood lactate concentration fell rapidly. It is suggested that great care should be exercised when using such infusions in ill patients and acid base status and renal and hepatic function should be monitored frequently.
Evidence is summarized indicating that mitochondrial respiration and citric acid cycle activity in the intact heart are controlled by the cytosolic phosphate potential and mitochondrial NAD oxidation-reduction state. Data are presented showing that the effect of respiratory acidosis is greater than that of metabolic acidosis in inhibiting left ventricular pressure development in the perfused rat heart, because of a greater fall of intracellular pH under the former conditions. Respiratory acidosis is shown to be readily associated with tissue hypoxia as a result of an increased vascular resistance and diminished flow rate through the coronary circulation. In nonischemic respiratory acidosis, the rate of ATP production is well balanced by the rate of ATP utilization, and tissue ATP and creatine-P levels remain approximately normal. Partially ischemic respiratory acidosis was associated with low tissue levels of ATP and creatine-P and high tissue levels of lactate and NADH. Ischemic areas with sharp border zones were visualized during and after an abrupt decrease of perfusion fluid pH by directly photographing NADH fluorescence from the surface of perfused hearts. Reversal of the hypodynamic state with partially ischemic respiratory acidosis could not be achieved by augmenting the coronary flow by means of an external pump. The demonstration of the existence of sharp zones of high pyridine nucleotide fluorescence adjacent to normal zones indicates a great heterogeneity of coronary perfusion and the existence of steep oxygen gradients in the intact heart.
The possibility that acidosis inhibits lipolysis indirectly by causing ionic shifts or by favouring the accumulation of an inhibitor has been tested in isolated fat cells. Lipolysis induced by 3 muM noradrenaline (NA) was inhibited by 40-60% and that induced by 1 mM theophylline (THEO) by about 75% when the pH was reduced to 6.6. Lipolysis induced by NA + THEO was inhibited by 20-30%. Changing the concentration of Ca++ or Mg++ did not alter the degree of inhibition. Reducing the K+-ion concentration enhanced the inhibitory effect of low pH on lipolysis induced by NA or NA + THEO, whereas cyclic AMP accumulation was uninfluenced. Omitting glucose from the incubation medium caused a slight enhancement of pH-induced inhibition of lipolysis (from 60 to 70%, p less than 0.01). Reducing the concentration of albumin, which binds inhibitory substances such as FFA, reduced lipolysis more at normal than at reduced pH. At high FFA/albumin ratios (5 or above) lipolysis was similar at normal and reduced pH. The antilipolytic effect of decreased pH was equally pronounced in perifused fat cells, where inhibitory substances are not allowed to accumulate. Our results suggest that the antilipolytic effect of acidosis is mainly a direct effect of the increase in H+ ion concentration. The inhibitory effect of acidosis on various responses to beta-adrenoceptor stimulation may be caused by a decreased formation of cyclic AMP in turn caused directly by the decrease in pH.
The renal and respiratory systems regulate acid base homeostasis by modifying the bicarbonate buffer pair HCO3- and CO2; other buffer systems adjust to alterations in this pair. The pH change following addition of metabolic acid, or base, is modified initially by the body's buffers. Subsequent respiratory compensation, by retention or excretion of CO2, modifies further this change before renal corrective responses finally occur. A primary respiratory acid base change is modified initially by cellular buffers, with renal compensatory mechanisms adjusting slowly to this change. However correction of the respiratory pH disorder only occurs with correction of the primary disease process. The body's capacity, therefore, to adjust to a matabolic acid base defect, appears greater than that observed with a primary respiratory pH abnormality. Treatment in all acid base disorders focuses initially upon the primary diseases process; thereafter therapeutic manipulation of the HCO3-, CO2 buffer pair, to aid the body's compensatory processes, can be considered.
The study included ten patients with severe metabolic acidosis (pH under 7.0) and clinical signs of shock. In four of them assisted ventilation was indicated as an urgency. In the other six patients assisted ventilation was used since the beginning, simultaneously with reposition of blood volume and administration of sodium bicarbonate. There were much better results with the latter management, with faster correction of the acidosis, without any complications and good survivorship.
Five male subjects performed exercise at 33, 66, and 95% of their maximum power output on three occasions in random order. Each study was preceded by a 3-h period in which capsules were taken by mouth, containing either CaCO3 (control, NH4Cl (acidosis), or NaHCO3 (alkalosis) in a dose of 0.3 g/kg body wt; preexercise blood pH was 7.38 +/- 0.015, 7.21 +/- 0.033, and 7.43 +/- 0.029, respectively. Exercise was continuous and maintained for 20 min at the two lower power outputs and for as long as possible at the highest. Compared with control (270 +/- 13 s), endurance time at the highest power output was reduced in acidosis (160 +/- 22 s) and increased in alkalosis (438 +/- 120 s). No differences were observed for central cardiovascular changes in exercise (cardiac output, frequency, or stroke volume). The respiratory changes expected from changes in blood pH were observed, with a higher alveolar ventilation in acidosis. At all power outputs arterialized venous lactate was lowest in acidosis and highest in alkalosis. Plasma glycerol and free fatty acids were lowest in acidosis. Changes in blood [HCO3-] and pH were shown to have major effects on metabolism in exercise which presumably were responsible for impaired endurance.
Occurrence in a starved patient. A 29-year-old woman with short bowel syndrome and prolonged starvation developed hyperchloremic metabolic acidosis after initiation of hyoeralimentation with a casein hydrolysate solution. The acidosis was not due to bicarbonate loss but was associated with diminished ability of the kidney to increase urinary acid excretion, particularly titratable acidity. Supplemental parenteral bicarbonate administration was necessary for two weeks until urinary acid excretion rose to normal.
Anaerobic glycolysis produces lactate, ATP, and water but there is no net change in the number of hydrogen ions: it does not produce lactic acid. The acidosis usually associated with hyperlactataemia is caused by hydrolysis of the ATP, with release of hydrogen ions. By contrast, ATP turnover by aerobic mechanisms is not acidifying because the released hydrogen ion is reutilised as more ATP is formed. Gluconeogenesis from lactate does not utilise hydrogen ions directly--in fact, it produces them. The associated net H+ utilisation is caused by the aerobic generation of the ATP and GTP required to drive glycolysis in reverse. It is suggested that only by understanding these important biochemical facts can the clinician found his diagnosis and treatment on a firm, rational basis.
The study is concerned with the acid-base balance in 92 patients with tick-borne encephalitis, tick-borne fever and meningitis of an obscure etiology. In many cases there was a shift in the direction of a metabolic acidosis, which was most vividly expressed in the meningitic form of tick-borne encephalitis. Some of the patients were treated by sodium bicarbonate which exerted a positive effect. The degree of changed indices of the acid-base balance and the time of their appearance helps in the diagnosis of tick-borne encephalitis correct evaluation of the severity of the condition and timely prescription of correction therapy.
Evidence for selective distal tubular dysfunction. A 61 year old male patient was studied who manifested dehydration, azotemia, acidosis and hyperkalemia six weeks after exposure to methicillin. Thyroid and adrenal glucocorticoid and mineralocorticoid function were normal. The dehydration was found to be caused by a profound sodium-losing nephropathy; urinary sodium ranged from 78 to 101 meq/day during a salt restricted diet. A distal renal tubular acidosis and a quantitively impaired ability to excrete potassium were also found. These defects were relatively unresponsive to mineralocorticoid or prednisone therapy. A renal biopsy specimen showed an interstitial nephritis which selectively affected distal tubules and was thought to be secondary to methicillin. The data suggest functional impairment specific for the distal tubule, but with only a modest decrease in the glomerular filtration rate.
To investigate whether fetal acidosis increases the placental transfer of lidocaine, resulting in higher fetal blood levels of the drug, lidocaine was infused intravenously into ten pregnant ewes to maintain plasma levels of 2-4 microgram/ml. After maternal-fetal equilibrium was reached, the fetus was made acidotic by infusing lactic acid intravenously. Fetal blood pH decreased from 7.35 to 7.10. With fetal acidemia, fetal blood lidocaine levels increased significantly from   160 +/- 0.11 microgram/ml to 2.72 +/- 0.26 microgram/ml. The fetal-maternal lidocaine ratio increased from 0.76 to   12 Correction of the acidosis by bicarbonate infusion returned the fetal-maternal ratios to control values. It is concluded that acidosis in the fetus may result in trapping of ionized lidocaine in the fetal circulation and increase the transfer of lidocaine across the placenta.
The value of a general pH analysis of the artery umbilicalis as a parameter of the postnatal diagnostic of the newborns is shown. The classification of the values in different grades of acidity and the relation to the Apgar score show, that the light and middle-heavy acidoses are not determined sufficiently by the Apgar score. The CTG-monitoring and the stimulation of the Oxytocin had no influence on the frequency of the different grades of the acidity. The meaning of the general blood-gas analysis in the artery umbilicalis for the morbidity of acidity and the check of the obstetrical activity of the clinic is shown.
1 - Five patients with severe metabolic acidosis secondary to methanol poisoning were studied before and after receiving 6.7 to 10 mEq NaHCO3/kg body weight. 2 - Two thirds of the infused HCO3- left the extracellular space and, since its apparent volume of distribution was much larger than under normal conditions, it largely overestimated HCO3- needs. On the contrary, the volume of distribution of the buffer base excess was found to be more stable and little affected by the acid-base status. 3 - Based on these observations, a simple method for estimating HCO3- needs in severe metabolic acidosis is proposed, requiring only the initial excess buffer base space which is calculated from body weight and blood buffer base excess values obtained before and after a first dose of bicarbonate.
The mathematical model of the respiratory control system in man of Middendorf and Loeschcke (1976 a, b) opens the possibility to stimulate the constellation of parameters in non-respiratory acidosis. Several investigators agree that the pH in CSF or in the extracellular fluid of the brain stays remarkably constant in this situation and it can be shown that this is a result of a precise control rather than the consequence of a sluggishly reacting system. Application of the model assuming constant extracellular brain pH allowed to calculate the relative sensitivities to pH changes of the central and the peripheral sensory mechanisms generating respiratory drive. Assuming air breathing and a normal critical arterial O2-pressure and otherwise normal parameters of respiration, circulation and blood composition (except diminished buffer base) the central chemosensitivity to a pH change turned out to be 25 times the peripheral. This factor is critically dependent on the ratio of the bicarbonate change in extracellular brain fluid to that in arterial blood. The coinciding data of Fencl (1971) and of Kronenberg and Cain (1968) were used for the calculation.
The results of studies presented may be interpreted in light of the dual contribution theory of regulation of CSF acid-base balance, indicating significant interaction between systemic and local CNS mechanisms in H+ homeostasis in the brain and CSF. Both systemic and local mechanisms are at work in H+ homeostasis in the brain and CSF and depending on the specific acid-base disorder or the duration of the imbalance one or the other of the two factors may be the dominant one in maintaining H+ levels in the "normal" range. These factors come into play only when there has been a change in central pH with the primary aim of bringing the CNS [H+] towards normal.
A basic premise in the utilization of the plasma anion gap in the assessment of acid-base disorders is that this parameter remains constant during hyperchloremic metabolic acidosis and metabolic alkalosis. Experimental data under in vitro conditions, however, cast serious doubt on this premise. The purpose of the present study was to characterize the plasma anion gap, estimated as (Na + K) - Cl + HCO3), in two large groups of dogs with graded degrees of chronic, HCl-induced metabolic acidosis or chronic, diuretic-induced metabolic alkalosis. The data indicate that the plasma anion gap decreases significantly in HCl acidosis and increases significantly in metabolic alkalosis; the predicted mean anion gap in animals with a plasma bicarbonate concentration of 10, 21 (normal), and 40 meq/liter approximated 13, 18, and 26 meq/liter, respectively. The observed variation in the plasma anion gap is interpreted as originating mainly from directional changes in the net negative charge of plasma proteins; these changes result from the titration process secondary to the altered plasma acidity and, in the case of metabolic alkalosis, from the additional effect of an increased plasma protein concentration.
Metabolic acidosis is known to be associated with increased blood potassium and phosphorus concentrations but the influence of mineral versus nonmineral acids on these variables remains undefined. Therefore, we infused anesthetized mongrel dogs with 0.45% saline (controls), the mineral acids HCl and NH4Cl, and the nonmineral acids lactic, beta-hydroxybutyric and methyl malonic for 1-3 h. Administration of both mineral acids was associated with significant increases in plasma potassium. In contrast, infusion of the three monmineral acids did not result in increases in plasma potassium; in fact, the levels decreased initially in the majority of the dogs. Phosphorus concentrations were increased by lactic and beta-hydroxybutric acids, were unchanged by NH4Cl and HCl, and were decreased by methyl malonic acid. Although the mechanisms responsible for these changes remain to be elucidated, the findings indicate that short-duration infusion of mineral and nonmineral acids has substantially different effects on plasma concentrations of these predominantly intracellular ions.
Substrate oxidation by rat kidney slices regulates renal ammoniagenesis from glutamine. At concentrations close to those expected in plasma, lactate alone, or combined with other renal fuels, inhibits ammoniagenesis markedly; glucose and citrate decrease ammoniagenesis slightly. However, lactate, citrate, and glucose inhibit ammoniagenesis of kidney slices from acidotic rats less than ammoniagenesis of kidney slices from control rats. Lesser inhibition of ammoniagenesis is seen also when acidotic slices rather than control slices are incubated in the presence of all the tested substrates combined in the same medium. In addition to decreasing the ammoniagenesis of renal slices from control rats, the presence of lactate causes an augmented accumulation of glutamate. In contrast, adding lactate to acidotic slices does not increase glutamate accumulation nearly as much. When glutamate is substituted for glutamine in the medium, lactate still decreases ammonia production, but to a lesser extent with acidotic slices. Changes in medium pH from 7.0 to 7.8 have no, or only small, overall effects on net renal slice ammonia production from glutamine under any of the circumstances tested. We conclude that lactate alone and combined with other substrates decreases ammoniagenesis primarily at the glutamate dehydrogenase step and that slices from acidotic rats are relatively resistant to substrate mediated inhibition.
In dogs with chronic hypochloremic metabolic alkalosis associated with ECFV contraction, plasma [HCO-3] ([HCO-3]p) normalizes during expansion of ECFV with a solution containing Cl- and HCO-3 in concentrations duplicating those in the plasma before expansion (isometric expansion). The kidney selectively rejects administered HCO-3 and retains Cl-. If this preferential Cl- less than HCO-3 reabsorptive selectivity were a characteristic renal response to ECFV expansion, isometric expansion during hyperchloremic acidosis would exacerbate the acid-base disturbance rather than correct it as it does in alkalosis. We examined the effect of isometric expansion in dogs with chronic hyperchloremic metabolic acidosis induced by HCl feeding or mineralocorticoid hormone deficiency. During expansion, as the expected decrease occurred in the fractional reabsorption of Na+, a lesser decrease occurred in fractional reabsorption of HCO-3, whereas a greater decrease occurred in fractional reabsorption of Cl-. The kidney selectively retained administered HCO3 and rejected Cl-. [HCO-3]p normalized. The shift to bicarbonate-selective from chloride-selective anion reabsorption during ECFV expansion in metabolic acidosis vs. metabolic alkalosis indicates that in response to ECFV expansion- the kidney selectively alters the ratio of bicarbonate to chloride concentration in the tubular reabsorbate in the direction that tends to normalize plasma acid-base composition, irrespective of the direction of deviation of the initial plasma bicarbonate concentration. The signal that initiates the shift in anion reabsorptive selectivity remains to be identified.
A patient who attempted suicide by ingesting a large amount of phenformin developed a severe lactic acidosis. After receiving hemodialysis on two successive days, she recovered without sequela. On both occasions, the dialyses temporarily improved the degree of acidosis. The amount of phenformin extracted during these two procedures was measured and found to be only   15% of the total amount of drug ingested. Therefore, it is felt that hemodialysis does not remove the offending drug but does play a supportive role in the management of these patients by temporarily ameliorating some of the biochemical abnormalities.
Twenty-six serial measurements of free bilirubin concentration and apparent association constant of bilirubin for albumin (Ka) at a bilirubin: albumin molar ratio of 0.8 were performed and compared with baseline values in 11 newborn infants with acidosis before treatment and during recovery from acidosis. When arterial pH was corrected from 7.12 +/- 0.02 (Mean +/- S.EM.) to 7.34 +/- 0.02, there was a significant decrease in serum free bilirubin concentration and a significant increase in the Ka at molar ratio 0.8. The data offer in vivo evidence that correction of acidosis in the neonate results in an improvement of the apparent bilirubin binding affinity of albumin.
Metabolic acidosis is common in babies fed cows' milk-based formulae. Therefore the effects of adding alkaline salts (sodium and potassium citrate) to a demineralised whey formula were studied in vitro and in 26 low birthweight babies fed on the formula or formula plus citrate. The alkali altered the pH and titratable acidity to a value nearer human milk but it increased the buffering capacity to a value further away. This may effect the bacterial flora of the intestine. The babies fed on formula plus citrate did not make greater gains in weight, length, head circumference, skinfold thickness, or midarm muscle circumference, although they had a greater blood base excess. Some of these babies developed a mild metabolic alkalosis and 3 had hyponatraemia despite their increased sodium intakes. These babies also had lower levels of plasma transferrin but showed no differences in urea, albumin, cholesterol, and calcium levels. No baby fed on the demineralised whey formula without added citrate had a base deficit exceeding 5 mmol/l; late metabolic acidosis is less common in babies fed on this formula and the routine addition of alkali can have untoward metabolic effects.
The effects of acidosis on myocardial function and calcium exchange have been studied in the isolated but arterially perfused interventricular septum of the rabbit. Temperature was 28 degrees C and stimulation rate 48 beats/min. Acidosis was induced either by increase of the perfusate PCO2 (pH reduced from 7.35 to 6.68) or by decrease of the bicarbonate-chloride ratio (pH 7.35 to 6.72). The effect on calcium efflux was assessed by introduction of acidosis at different times during the washout of 45Ca2+ from the muscle. The uptake of 47Ca2+ was recorded directly with a NaI crystal and counter. An increase of perfusate PCO2 caused a rapid fall in developed tension. The efflux of slowly exchanging 45Ca2+ and the uptake of 47Ca2+ were inhibited. There was no rapid displacement of calcium from the muscle. Decrease of the bicarbonate-chloride ratio caused a slower fall of developed tension and neither the efflux nor uptake of calcium were altered. These results suggest that developed tension and calcium exchange in the myocardium are more responsive to acidosis within the cell or cell membrane than to extracellular acidosis.
To evaluate the possibility of anaerobic metabolism occurring beneath pneumatic trousers because of the decreased circulation, 20 mongrel dogs were evaluated for central and femoral vein levels of lactic acid, potassium and central pH changes when the trouser pressure was both above and below systolic arterial pressure. The results indicate that if the systolic pressure is less than trouser pressure, there is a significant increase in both potassium and lactic acid levels. There was a drop in the central pH accompanying these metabolic changes. When the pneumatic trouser pressure was less than systolic arterial pressure, changes in anaerobic metabolism were present but not nearly as great. This change was much closer to that in the central circulation and may result from other factors. Based on these results, trouser inflation pressure should not exceed that required to achieve adequate arterial pressure. Deflation should be started as soon as possible and be gradual.
The mechanism of generation of metabolic acidosis in selective mineralocorticoid deficiency was investigated in bilaterally adrenalectomized (ADX) rats treated with dexamethasone and in sham-operated (S) rats. ADX rats had significantly lower plasma sodium and bicarbonate concentrations and significantly higher plasma potassium concentrations than S rats did. ADX rats developed negative sodium balance when fed a "zero" sodium diet. The minimum urine pH achieved during sodium sulfate infusion and during ammonium chloride administration was not significantly different between ADX and S rats. Bicarbonate reabsorption and urine minus blood PCO2 gradient were not different between ADX and S rats. For any given urine pH, absolute ammonium excretion was significantly lower in ADX than it was in S rats, both during sodium sulfate infusion and during chronic ammonium chloride administration. Glomerular filtration rate (GFR) was significantly lower in ADX than it was in S rats; ammonium excretion corrected for GFR was not different between the two groups. To determine the role of decreased distal sodium delivery (secondary to decrease in GFR and enhanced proximal sodium reabsorption which resulted from distal sodium chloride wastage) on ammonium excretion, ADX rats were fed 0.9% sodium chloride in an effort to keep body weight constant. Salt-loaded ADX rats had a plasma bicarbonate concentration higher than did S rats. Salt-loading also led to a significant increase in GFR; absolute ammonium excretion was significantly higher than that of other ADX rats with the same degree of acidosis. At comparable levels of GFR, there was no difference in ammonium excretion between ADX and S rats. Ammonium excretion was linearly related to GFR. ADX rats fed a zero potassium diet had significantly greater ammonium excretion than did all other groups of ADX or S rats receiving a normal potassium intake. These data suggest that volume contraction is a major factor responsible for the acidosis of selective mineralocorticoid deficiency.
Acid infusion studies were performed in nephrectomized rats and dogs with either intact parathyroid glands (intact) or after thyroparathyroidectomy (thyroparathyroidectomized [TPTX]) to determine the role of parathyroid hormone (PTH) in extrarenal disposal and buffering of acutely administered acid. 29 intact rats given 5 mM/kg HCl and 6 intact dogs given 7 mM/kg HCl developed severe metabolic acidosis but all survived. However, each of 12 TPTX rats and 4 TPTX dogs given the same acid loads died. Intact rats and dogs buffered 39 and 50% of administered acid extracellularly, respectively, whereas extracellular buffering of administered acid was 97 and 78% in TPTX rats and dogs, respectively. 17 TPTX rats and 6 TPTX dogs given synthetic PTH 2 h before acid infusion survived. The blood bicarbonate and extracellular buffering in these animals, measured 2 h after acid infusion, was similar to intact animals. Changes in liver, heart, and skeletal muscle pH determined from [(14)C]5,5-dimethyl-2,4 oxazolidinedione distribution seemed insufficient to account for the increased cell buffering of PTH-replaced animals. Indeed, muscle pH in TPTX dogs given PTH and acid was only 0.06 pH units lower than in control dogs given no acid, suggesting that another tissue, presumably bone, was the target for PTH-mediated increased cell buffering. This conclusion was supported by the observation that PTH did not alter the pH of intact rat diaphragms in vitro. These results indicate that PTH is necessary for the optimal buffering of large, acute acid loads presumably by increasing bone buffering.
The effects of systemic infusion of purified beta glucuronidase, lactic acid and a combination of these were studied in normal dogs from the viewpoints of hemodynamics and blood coagulation. In none of the groups was an obvious deterioration in arterial blood pressure, pulse rate, central venous pressure, portal venous pressure and electrocardiogram observed after the infusions. On the other hand, beta glucuronidase infusion with preceding acidosis caused substantial thrombocytopenia accompanied by a decrease in fibrinogen levels and abnormal thromboelastogram. A similar trend was found by the infusion of beta glucuronidase only. An intermediate abnormality was found by the infusion of lactic acid alone. Histologically, fibrin clots in the pulmonary arteries were often observed in the dogs of all groups, but the quantitative difference among the groups was difficult to evaluate. In the present investigation, shock could not be produced, but other data seemed to indicate that increased levels of acid hydrolases in the blood are concerned with deterioration and irreversibility of shock, especially in an acidotic condition.
A study was made of intra-erythrocyte acid-base balance in 7 subjects with metabolic and 3 with mixed acidosis in the course of acute haemodynamic pulmonary oedema. Comparison with plasma values showed that, in metabolic acidosis, the buffers (bicarbonate) are evenly involved in the maintenance of hydrogen ion balance, whereas in mixed forms a greater demand is made on non-bicarbonate bases. Examination of this phenomenon and its quantitative evaluation are geared to intra-erythrocyte determinations of the acid-base balance, particularly to the very important B.E. index.
An effective adjunct in the treatment of lactic acidosis. Severe lactic acidosis is associated with poor prognosis. Usually, the patient is treated with massive amounts of intravenous sodium bicarbonate, which in itself carries many undesirable consequences such as fluid overload and hypernatremia. We have successfully used peritoneal dialysis with a bicarbonate-buffered dialysate in the management of severe acidosis. Bicarbonate-buffered peritoneal dialysis provided an unlimited supply of physiologic buffer over a prolonged period without causing hypervolemia or hypernatremia. Furthermore, significant amounts of lactate were removed by dialysis. We, therefore, recommend the use of bicarbonate-buffered peritoneal dialysis as an adjunct in the treatment of severe lactic acidosis.
The effect of metabolic acidosis on the renin-aldosterone system remains unclear. In the present study anesthetized mongrel dogs (n = 19) were infused at similar rates with 0.45% NaCl (controls), HCl or NH4Cl (2.5mEq/kg) for 1--3 h. The induced metabolic acidosis in the two experimental groups was not associated with increases in plasma renin activity. Plasma cortisol (as a marker for ACTH secretion) and serum potassium concentration increased in both HCl- and NH4Cl-treated animals. Plasma aldosterone increased after 30 min in the HCl group and 60 min in the NH4Cl group and did not change in controls. These findings demonstrate that metabolic acidosis induced by HCl or NH4Cl is associated with increased aldosterone production without concomitant changes in plasma renin activity.
Metabolic complications secondary to acute arterial occlusions occurred in 7.5% of our cases. It is pointed out that the characteristic biochemical changes: 1) may already be detectable during the ischemic phase, and 2) are more pronounced after revascularization of the extremity. Their identification at the early stage is essential for preventing the serious outcome of the late stage. Amputation rates are quite high (40-50%) and mortality rates are similarly great (30-80%). The ischemic rhabdomyolysis which leads to the clinical and manifestations and biochemical alterations is the initiating pathogenic factor of this syndrome. Prophylaxis and management of these complications were reviewed.
The effects of metabolic and respiratory acidosis and alkalosis on cellular calcium metabolism were studied in rat kidney cells dispersed with collagenase. In both types of acidosis, the intracellular pH, total cell calcium, and the cell relative radioactivity after 60 min of labeling are significantly depressed. Kinetic analysis of 45-ca desaturation curves shows that acidosis decreases all three cellular calcium pools and depresses calcium fluxes between the superficial and cytosolic pools and between the cytosolic and mitochondrial pools. In alkalosis the intracellular pH, the total cell calcium, and the cell relative radioactivity are significantly increased. Kinetic studies show that in alkalosis, only the mitochondrial pool is consistently increased. Calcium exchange between the mitochondrial and cytosolic pool is increased in metabolic alkalosis only. These results suggest that hydrogen ion is an important modulator of calcium metabolism, and that the intracellular pH rather than extracellular pH is the critical factor in determining the calcium status of cells during altered acid-base conditions.
In bilaterally nephrectomized rats and in normal rats treated with 0.1 N HCl elevated levels of plasma total glycerol and lowered FFA and free glycerol are observed after a period of 25 h of starvation. In both cases the removal of intravenous lipid loads is slowed down, plasma LA is decreased after starvation and after lipid loads. The bicarbonate treatment of nephrectomized rats tends to normalize the plasma lipid levels and LA as well as the removal of intravenous lipid loads. The etiological importance of acidosis in uremic hypertriglyceridemia and possible clinical significance is pointed out.
In rumen acidosis, induced by infusion of saccharose solution and solutions of different volatile fatty acids and lactic acid into the rumen, and during induced disturbances of acid-base equilibrium in the arterial blood the motility of the dorsal sac of the rumen, the pH of rumen content and the indices of acid-base equilibrium in the arterial blood were investigated. The pH and the indices were determined by the micromethod of Astrup with an Acid-Base-Cart ABC-1 unit. During saccharose-induced acidosis of the rumen the pH of its content was decreased and its motility was strongly inhibited. Acidification of rumen content corresponded to the dissociation constant of a given acid. The motility of the rumen was inhibited most strongly by butyric acid, followed with regard of this effect by acetic acid, propionic acid and lactic acid. It was found that hydrogen ions as well as anions and non-dissociated forms of acids produced in the rumen were responsible for inhibition of this motility and that the rise in the concentration of hydrogen ions in the blood had no inhibitory effect on the motility of the rumen.
Blood acid-base equilibrium in experimental acidosis of the rumen in sheep. Acta Physiol. Pol, 1979, 30 (4): 543--55 Experimental acidosis of the rumen was induced in sheep infusing into it through a fistula a solution of saccharose and solutions of different volatile fatty acids and lactic acid. Arterial-blood acid-base equilibrium indices were determined by the Astrup micromethod with an Acid-Base-Cart ABC-1 unit. It was found that during saccharose-acidosis partly compensated metabolic acidosis develops and that acid-base equilibrium disturbances are caused by all volatile fatty acids and lactic acid. When they are infused in equimolar amounts into the rumen the strongest and earliest disturbances in that equilibrium are caused by acetic acid, followed by butyric, lactic and propionic acids.
Blood pH, bicarbonate, PCO2, serum calcium, alkaline phosphatase and red cell carbonic anhydrase were measured in 37 selected patients receiving anticonvulsants. Patients with metabolic acidosis showed a high incidence of hypocalcemia with increased alkaline phosphatase and a significant reduction of carbonic anhydrase-B activity. High iPTH levels were found in 13 patients, but this was not correlated with acid-base balance status. Anticonvulsant drugs seemed to inactive carbonic anhydrase-B activity. Metabolic acidosis might be one of the factors causing a disturbance of calcium metabolism in these patients.
Separate and combined effects of acute metabolic acidosis and hypocapnia were determined in skeletal and cardiac muscles of intact rats. Normocapnic metabolic acidosis, imposed by intraperitoneal injection of hydrochloric acid (6 mEq/kg), did not change skeletal muscle intracellular acid--base parameters. Hypocapnia, induced by mechanical hyperventilation, resulted in intracellular alkalosis within skeletal muscle during both respiratory alkalosis and compensated metabolic acidosis; changes of skeletal muscle intracellular bicarbonate concentration per unit change in carbon dioxide tension were identical during these two experimental procedures. These data suggest that processes other than physicochemical buffering neutralize protons taken into skeletal muscle cells during acute metabolic acidosis. The acid--base state of the heart was quite stable during these experimental manipulations; thus, it appears that cardiac muscle has an extraordinary buffering ability. Moreover, our data suggest that processes other than physicochemical buffering maintain cardiac intracellular pH normal during hypocapnia.
The role of the medullary H+-sensitive chemoreceptors on the drive of breathing was studied in 10 unanesthetized newborn animals (8 lambs and 2 kids). The experiment consisted of sequential measurements of ventilation (VE) during a progressive change in the arterial pH (pHa) and in the pH of the cisternal cerebrospinal fluid (pHCSF), induced by intravenous infusion of hydrochloric acid (HCl) followed after an 8-h steady state of acidosis by rapid bicarbonate [HCO3-] infusion. It is shown that a rapid change in [HCO3-]CSF occurs during the infusion of HCl or NaHCO3. As a consequence both CSF and arterial pH change in the the same direction and large changes in pHCSF (from 7.331 to 7.227) were observed. Such CSF acidosis did not contribute to further increase VE beyond the level by hyperventilation induced by the initial fall of pHa. The ventilatory response to the decrease in pHa was found to fall off with moderate to severe acidosis (pHa less than 7.20). In conclusion, this study demonstrates an instability of the pHCSF during neonatal metabolic acidosis and it suggests an immaturity of both the H+-sensitive medullary and peripheral chemoreceptors in the 8-day-old newborns.
Phosphorus-nuclear-magnetic-resonance measurements were made on perfused rat hearts at 37 degrees C. 2. With the improved sensitivity obtained by using a wide-bore 4.3 T superconducting magnet, spectra could be recorded in 1 min. 3. The concentrations of ATP, phosphocreatine and Pi and, from the position of the Pi resonance, the intracellular pH (pHi) were measured under a variety of conditions. 4. In a normal perfused heart pHi = 7.05 +/- 0.02 (mean +/- S.E.M. for seven hearts). 5. During global ischaemia pHi drops to 6.2 +/- 0.06 (mean +/- S.E.M.) in 13 min in a pseudoexponential decay with a rate constant of 0.25 min- 6. The relation between glycogen content and acidosis in ischaemia is studied in glycogen-depleted hearts. 7. Perfusion of hearts with a buffer containing 100 mM-Hepes before ischaemia gives a significant protective effect on the ischaemic myocardium. Intracellular pH and ATP and phosphocreatine concentrations decline more slowly under these conditions and metabolic recovery is observed on reperfusion after 30min of ischaemia at 37 degrees C. 8. The relation between acidosis and the export of protons is discussed and the significance of glycogenolysis in ischaemic acid production is evaluated.
We investigated the effect of repeated administration of sodium bicarbonate on acid-base balance and serum chemistry in a group of patients who developed cardiac arrest. A mixed acidosis persisted throughout the duration of resuscitation in the majority of patients in spite of the large ventilatory volume and multiple doses of bicarbonate they received. However, the repeated administration of bicarbonate prevented a severe fall in serum pH. Our study demonstrated the beneficial role of bicarbonate in the treatment of metabolic acidosis associated with cardiac arrest of prolonged duration. Analysis of our data strongly indicated that the primary factors which determine the serum pH during cardiopulmonary resuscitation are the duration of circulatory arrest, adequacy of ventilation and circulation, pH immediately before arrest, and quantity of bicarbonate administered and its volume of distribution in the various fluid and tissue compartments.
Ammonium chloride-induced metabolic acidosis decreases the growth of various experimental tumors. Spleen exhibits the same effects. There is a sex factor which seems to affect the growth of both tumor and spleen. The observed tumor inhibition appears to be related to a systemic impairment of the anabolic mechanisms. The decrease in tumor calcium suggests that this element may play a role in the tissue growth. The possible implication of cell membrane changes and of a block in glycolysis in the acidosis effects are discussed.
One of the dangers of topical therapy in thermal injuries is absorption of the therapeutic agent with subsequent metabolic and toxic complications. Two patients, one 30 years old with a 75% burn, the second 72 years old with a 35% burn, were treated topically with povidone-iodine ("Betadine", pH 2.43). In both patients severe metabolic acidosis developed which could not be attributed to sepsis, hypovolaemia, renal failure, diabetes, lactic acidaemia, &c. The acidosis associated with the 75% burn required large amounts of sodium bicarbonate to maintain pH at 7.35 and a serum-bicarbonate concentration of 15 mmol/l (meq/l); serum-iodine was 48000 mug/dl (normal 4-8.5mug/dl). Acidosis in the second patient was not as severe, and serum-iodine concentration reached 17600 mug/dl. The rate of urinary excretion of iodine was 50.8 +/- 7.4 mg/dl and seemed to be fixed. Haemodialysis was very effective in reducing serum-iodine concentration. Povidone was also systemically absorbed. The persistent acidosis could be caused by absorption of the iodine or the acidic povidone-iodine. Until the aetiology of the acidosis and renal damage is more clear, iodophors should not be used topically for burns greater than 20% of the body surface or in the presence of renal failure.
Platelet aggregation in response to adenosine diphosphate was studied in umbilical-vein blood from 24 term infants. The pH of platelet-rich plasma was experimentally reduced by adding increasing concentrations of lactic acid or by exposure to carbon dioxide. Aggregation was significantly impaired by acidosis and there was a significant positive correlation between falling pH and impaired platelet aggregation in both experiments. Impaired platelet aggregation secondary to acidosis may be a factor in perinatal intracerebral haemorrhage.
The effect of changes in PCO2 upon induction of arrhythmias in cat papillary muscles was studied. The average norepinephrine (NE) dose necessary to produce spontaneous contractions in muscles stimulated at rates of 10/min was higher at high PCO2. Whereas 2 100 +/- 295 X 10(-8) mol/litre of NE was necessary during acidosis, only 824 +/- 295 X 10(-8) mol/litre was necessary to produce spontaneous contractions in alkalosis. In quiescent muscles, the necessary doses in acidosis and alkalosis were 2 209 +/- 531 X 10(-8) and 518 +/- 159 X 10(-8) mol/litre respectively. With isoproterenol 458 +/- 84 X 10(-8) mol/litre was necessary to reach the end point at high PCO2, whereas only 131 +/- 52 X 10(-8) mol/litre was required at low PCO2. The lower sensitivity to catecholamine-induced arrhythmias with hypercapnic acidosis does not appear to be related to the re-uptake of the neurotransmitter by the nerve ending since it is also present with isoproterenol.
The urinary excretion of beta2-microglobulin was studied under normal conditions and during acidosis and alkalosis in 65 patients with renal stones. Eleven patients were studied under two of these conditions. Four out of 51 patients examined under normal conditions had an increased excretion of beta2-microglobulin in their urine. Four out of five patients with distal acidification defects were found to have an increased excretion of beta2-microglobulin during induced acidosis. During alkalosis, four out of eight patients with acidification defects increased their excretion of the protein. The tubular proteinuria that could be provoked during acute acidosis and alkalosis was considered to be secondary to changes in the acid-base status and may indicate a renal tubular defect.
The effect of acidosis on cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity in perfused hearts from normal and reserpinized rats has been investigated. The results were compared to the effect of acidosis on myocardial contractility under the same conditions. The results showed that acidosis increases the cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity in normal hearts. This increase was abolished when the hearts were depleted of norepinephrine by previous treatment with reserpine. As regards myocardial contractility, there was a similar decrease by acidosis either in normal hearts with increased cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity or in reserpinized hearts in which the increase in protein kinase activity was prevented. Two alternative hypotheses are suggested: (1) a dissociation between contractility and cAMP levels, or (2) a "blockade" by acidosis of the mechanical effect of increasing cAMP-dependent protein kinase activity.
The effect of acid-base alterations on spontaneous rate was analysed using isolated atria exposed to cumulative degrees of acidosis produced either by adding HCl or by increasing PCO2 in the incubation medium. Frequncy vs. pH curves were made to assess chronotropic response to acid-base changes. Heart rate was increased in alkalosis and decreased when the pH of the medium was lowered. Both "respiratory" and "metabolic" alterations affected the contraction rate to the same extent. Decreasing pH from normal values seemed to decrease heart rate more than the enhancement produced by the same change in pH towards the alkalotic side. When frequency was plotted as a function of hydrogen ion activity (aH+) a more linear relationship was obtained, either with pure "metabolic" or with "respiratory" acid-base alterations. Increasing (aH+) from normal values seemed to decrease heart rate to the same extent (respiratory alterations) or even less (metabolic alterations) than the enhancement produced by the same change in (aH+) towards the alkalotic side. Neither the increase in rate produced by alkalosis nor the decrease induced by acidosis were prevented by blocking the neurotransmitters by atropine or propranolol.
The urinary bladder of Bufo marinus excretes H+ and NH+4, and the H+ excretion is increased when the animal is placed in metabolic acidosis. The mitochondria-rich (MR) cells mediate the H+ excretion by the bladder. The purpose of this study was to determine if there is a change in MR cells of the bladder during metabolic acidosis. Bladders from normal toads and from toads that had been placed in metabolic acidosis were used. The bladders were mounted between plastic chambers and H+ excretion measured. The bladder was then fixed and prepared for scanning (SEM) and transmission (TEM) electron micrograph studies. SEM's at low magnification were used to count the various cell types and the TEM's were used to confirm the different cell types. Fields were randomly selected and a total of 2500 cells counted in each group. The bladders from toads in metabolic acidosis had a consistently higher ratio of MR cells to granular cell than did the normal bladders. These results indicate that during metabolic acidosis there is an increased number of MR cells in the bladder, and this increased the bladder's capacity to excrete H+.
The presence of severe ketoacidosis in the absence of hyperglycemia and glucosuria is reported in a young pregnant chronic alcohol abuser. The clinical presentation included an arterial pH of 7.15, a base deficit of 23 mEq/liter, a bicarbonate of less than 10 m Eq/liter, larger serum and urinary ketone levels, and hyperpnea with Kussmual-type respiration. Corrective therapy consisted of rapid fluid, electrolyte, bicarbonate, and glucose replacement with insulin supplementation. The ability of the fetus to tolerate the maternal metabolic derangements of "alcoholic ketoacidosis" as well as the stress of uterine contractions is discussed and contrasted with diabetic ketoacidosis.
Blood gas tensions and acid-base status were determined in six patients with tetanus before and after the onset of severe muscle spasms. Hypoxaemia and metabolic acidosis present in all the patients, were worsened by muscle spasms. It is suggested that frequent measurements of blood gases should be carried out where such facilities are available.
Detection of ketone bodies in the urine or plasma may be used as a rapid, inexpensive diagnostic approach. Understanding the causes of hyperketonemia can lead to identification and appropriate therapy for the underlying cause. At least one urinary ketone measurement should be a routine procedure in all severely ill patients in whom a complete understanding of the underlying pathological processes is not present.
Two groups of 27 and 23 patients with acne vulgaris were first treated for a period of one week with 1 g oxytetracycline a day p.o. In a second treatment period of 6 weeks the first group received 100 mg oxytetracycline a day p.o. and the second group a combination of 100 mg oxytetracycline and   12 g sodiumbituminosulfonates a day p.o. In the third treatment period, similarly continued for 6 weeks, the method was reversed. Gastric juice-insoluble preparations were used for the investigation. All criteria for a double-blind study were considered. Amount and composition of the skin surface lipids were analysed before beginning the treatment, at the end of the 2nd and at the end of the 3rd treatment period. The combination of both agents in gastric juice-insoluble preparations suppresses to a great extent the known effects brought about by the substances separately, namely the reduction in free fatty acids and the decrease in the skin surface lipids. The findings also show that the reduction of the free fatty acids was in a limited time observed only in patients treated with 100 mg oxytetracycline a day p.o. if they had been treated in the beginning of this therapy with a higher dosage of tetracycline.
Successful oral therapy with vitamin A palmitate in acne vulgaris requires 150,000-200,000 I.U. daily for months. Side-effects were evaluated in 22 patients and in addition in 54 patients receiving 400,000 and 300,000 I.U. respectively for 3-4 weeks (SGPT, GGPT, Quick, electrophoresis, creatinine, bromosulfthaleine excretion). The same tests were done in 32 patients, who had received vitamin A palmitate 150,000-200,000 I.U. daily for at least half a year. Clinical experience and the presented data allow the following conclusions: There is no risk of liver impairement when 150,000-200,000 I.U. are given daily over extended periods. Doses over 300,000 I.U. are accompanied with liver impairement. During long-term treatment y-GT test should be performed regularly. Contraceptive advices are recommended.
Two hundred and forty-one strains or resident skin bacteria comprising 93 isolates of Propionob acterium acnes and 148 of Micrococcaceae derived from 36 acne patients and 8 control subjects were screened for their ability to inhibit 32 indicator strains, including 20 strains of P. acnes and 12 strains of Staphylococcus epidermidis derived from patients with all grades of acne and from normal skin. Fifty-three strains (22%) showed some activity against at least one indicator strain. Both broad- and narrow-spectrum inhibition was detected. Inhibitory isolates of P. acnes outnumbered inhibitory Micrococcaceae by four to one. There was a low frequency of inhibition of S. epidermidis by Micrococcaceae (2.7%) and by P. acnes (  11%) and a higher frequency of inhibition of P. acnes by Micrococcaceae (9.5%) and by P. acnes (40.8%). Furthermore, 8  18% of the subjects sampled possessed strains inhibitory to P. acnes. The significance of this finding is, as yet, unknown. No difference in the prevalence of active strains in normal (20%) and acne (22.5%) skin was detected. These findings suggest that the possession of inhibitory strains and conversely the possession of sensitive strains does not predispose to acne.
Patients with chloracne were investigated and the results compared with data matched for age and site from patients with acne vulgaris. The ultrastructural appearances of pilo-sebaceous ducts in both groups were similar. The industrial group had significantly fewer C. acnes than the patients with ordinary acne. They also showed a significant increase in the surface lipid percentage composition of squalene, wax ester and cholesterol and this was associated with a significant decrease in the triglyceride free fatty acids and total triglyceride pool. We suggest that the acnegenic agent has produced its effect by modifying the metabolism of the pilo-sebaceous fluid.
It is argued that the close endocrine control of human sebaceous glands and the likely effects of acne on selection indicate that both gland and disease have persisted because they are biologically useful. Two possibilities are proposed: sebum may provide precursor substrates for metabolism and synthesis by the epidermis of compounds of both local and systemic importance; and the adjuvent properties of corynebacteria which colonise the active sebaceous glands of acne may facilitate certain general immunological membrane.
Histopathological sections of anetoderma-like scars from 10 patients with acne vulgaris showed a selective absence of elastic fibers around pilosebaceous follicles. This finding is similar to the histologic changes of "perifollicular elastolysis" reported by Varadi. Bacteria isolated by anaerobic and aerobic cultures of swabs of the skin surface and pus of these 10 patients, 12 others with active acne vulgaris and 8 normal subjects were studied with particular attention to Staphylococcus epidermis and Propionibacterium acnes. These organisms were analysed for production of an elastolytic enzyme which might play a role in the observed selective loss of elastic fibers. No elastolytic activity was produced by S. epidermidis or P. acnes isolated from any of these individuals. Thus, we cannot attribute the perifollicular loss of elastic fibers in acne scarring to an elastase produced by organisms. The observed absence of elastic fibers might result from tissue necrosis produced by leukocytes during the inflammatory phase, followed by collagenous scar formation without regeneration of elastic fibers.
A double-blind controlled clinical trial was performed to evaluate the effect of oral zinc sulphate, 0.6 g daily, on acne vulgaris. Twenty patients received zinc sulphate tablets and 19 were given placebo tablets. Thirteen of the zinc group and 12 of the placebo group received their medication throughout a 12-week period, while the remaining patients were treated for 4 or 8 weeks. In all patients the numbers or papular and pustular acne lesions on the face and the back were significantly reduced, while larger infiltrates remained practically unaltered during the trial, which was performed from March through May 1975. No statistically significant difference in the improvement of the groups was demonstrable. Pretreatment serum zinc values, which were normal in all patients, rose significantly in the zinc group as well as in the control group, but the increase in the former was significantly higher. The negative therapeutical results might be attributable to the limited number of patients or related to the zinc dosage. Furthermore, the results might have been influenced by the unexplained rise in serum zinc values in the control group. A possible weak beneficial effect of zinc might also have been camouflaged by the seasonal variation in the severity of acne which was noted in this study.
The detergent-soluble fraction of purified, concentrated comedo samples was analysed for protein by disc-gel electrophoresis and fluorescamine assay. Spectrophotometer scanning revealed a characteristic pattern of 14 peaks which was essentially uniform in comedones from individuals having acne, Favre-Racouchot syndrome, or prepubertal comedones. The pattern was different in material derived from keratinous cysts and the contents of follicles from the nose. The presence of small amounts of serum proteins, notably globulins, was detected by immunodiffusion.
In 25 of 35 cases of acne conglobata, a reduction in or lack of delayed reactivity was found by intracutaneous tests with a battery of antigens. On the basis of these findings as well as of normal T-cell function in lymphocyte culture and of negative Kveim-tests (in three cases), the possible immunological mechanisms are discussed.
A 58-year-old man with rheumatoid arthritis developed lichen planus during treatment with gold. Four months after cessation of treatment, a severe acne with comedones, papules, pustules, and small cystic elements broke out. No connection could be demonstrated between the eruption and other drugs or chemicals. Acne provoked by gold seems not to have been described elsewhere. The case history confirms that gold treatment, even in the same patient, can give rise to a wide range of skin disturbances, which in many cases do not break out until long after the drug has been withdrawn.
Several pathogenetic factors contribute to the development of acne vulgaris. These include genetic predisposition, hormonal influences, increasing sebaceous secretion, bacterial colonization of the follicle and keratinization defects in the follicular epithelium. Modern acne therapy can take specific forms on the basis of recent research on pathogenesis. Sebostatic therapy can be performed by the topical application of benzoyl peroxide or the systemic administration of hormones (oestrogens, antiandrogens). Local treatment with retinoic has proved optimal in achieving a comedolytic effect. Moreover, the long-term use of antibiotics--tetracyclines, erythromycin systemically or benzoyl peroxide topically--is beneficial in respect to a reduction in Propionibacterium acnes. Experiments with immunological therapy are still in the early stages. Optimum results are obtained by the rational combination of several therapeutic modalities adapted to the type of acne to be treated.
Delayed hypersensitivity reactions were investigated in 5 patients with febrile acne conglobata. Each of them had febrile periods, large abscesses and leukocytosis. They reacted negatively to tuberculin 10 TU/ml, to Schick toxin, to oidiomycin, to trichophytin as well as to 25 common contact allergens. DNCB did not induce sensitization in those 4 patients in whom it was carried out. However, the transforamtion of lymphocytes by phytohaemagglutinin (PHA) was normal. Five of 7 control patients with cystic or ordinary acne had positive tuberculin test reactions and 3 of them were sensitized to DNCB.
Skin surface lipids in female patients with acne were examined before and after treatment with the oral contraceptive SH 209 AB (2 mg cyproterone acetate and 0.05 mg ethinyl estradiol) by direct extraction with petrol ether and photometrical determination. A significant reduction in the skin surface lipids was seen, together with a remarkable alleviation of the disease.
A chromatographically purified component of human dialysable transfer factor, previously described as causing a non-specific stimulation of cell-mediated immunity, was used as a therapeutic agent in three cases of stage IV cystic acne. The treatment caused a marked strengthening of skin test responses and had a promising effect on skin eruption in each case.
The nitroblue tetrazolium (N.B.T.) test has been studied in 19 patients with moderate or severe acne vulgaris and 18 patients with subclinical or no acne. There was a significant elevation of the N.B.T. score in those patients with moderate or severe acne as compared with the control group. This is probably a result of the inflammatory reaction in and around the involved sebaceous gland follicles.
In spite of remarkable therapeutic results obtained by gestagens with antiandrogenic activity, usually combined with estrogen, in oily seborrhea, acne, Fox-Fordyce disease, androgenetic alopecia and hirsutism many dermatologist still hesitate to treat the named disorders by hormones. The reason for their hesitation appears to be the erroneous belief, that the named disturbances represent hormonal disorders the treatment of which does not belong to dermatology. After a survey on the mechanism of action of antiandrogens the basic difference between androgen dependent skin disorders and endocrinopathies with manifestation on the skin and its appendages is explained. Androgen dependent skin disorders, like oily seborrhea and most cases of acne are not the result of endocrine disturbances in the sense of an pathologically increased or decreased production of sexual hormons. Administering sexual hormons the physician takes advantage of the sebosuppressive effect of female sexual hormons as he does of the antiallergic activity of the hormon cortisol (and related compounds) in the treatment of eczemas. The antiandrogenic treatment of androgenetic alopecia, hirsutism and androgenetic acne--with their underlying hormonal disturbance, consisting in an increased production of androgens, represents an quasi etiological therapy. As in these cases the hormonal disturbances finds its expression mainly or exclusively in disorders of the skin or hair growth, the dermatologist, preferentially in cooperation with endocrinogists and/or gynacologists remains entitled to take over the treatment. The available drugs are discussed and suggestions are made for their appropriate use.
Photochemotherapy with psoralen and long-wave ultraviolet light, so-called PUVA-treatment, is currently being evaluated in many dermatologic departments. Side effects such as nausea, pruritus and erythema are well known. Recently the development of acneiform eruptions was reported in a British patient treated with PUVA (3). We found that 4 out of 80 patients treated in our clinic with 8-methoxy-psoralen according to the usual weight schedule (6) and long-wave ultraviolet irradiation developed perioral dermatitis, in 2 cases, together with acneiform eruptions localised to the forehead.
The serum levels of zinc, vitamin A and retinol binding protein (RBP) were studied in 75 acne patients before and during oral treatment with zinc, vitamin A or placebo. In the zinc-treated patients an increase in the mean serum zinc level was seen after 2 weeks, when also the first clinical improvement occurred. After 4 weeks the zinc level had increased by about 30% and no further significant increase was observed during 3 months of treatment. In 33 healthy subjects there was an increase of 14% after 4 weeks of zinc therapy. Vitamin A and placebo induced no significant changes in the serum zinc status. Prior to therapy the serum levels of vitamin A and RBP were lower in the acne patients than in the controls. Zinc + vitamin A treatment raised the serum RBP value to normal after 4 weeks. In patients given vitamin A alone, a probable increase in RBP was achieved. Zinc and placebo treatment did not change the serum level of RBP.
In a double-blind investigation of 54 patients suffering from acne vulgaris, the effect of 0.6 g of oral zinc sulphate daily versus placebo was studied. During the active treatment period of 6 weeks, the acne improved by about one-third, as rated with a score system. Clinical comparison with placebo showed the result of zinc sulphate therapy to be slightly, but statistically significantly better. Various methods for the clinical evaluation of acne were studied. Counting of acne lesions was found to be a more precise method than assessment according to the opinion of the patients and the assessment of colour photographs. The correlation between the results obtained by lesion counting and evaluation by photographs was low, as was also the reproducibility of photographic assessment.
Tablets containing 2 mg cyproterone acetate and 0.05 mg ethinyl estradiol in a calendar package of 21 days were used as an oral contraceptive to treat acne. The series comprised 20 patients. The women were 18--43 years of age, and all had acne which had previously been resistant to therapy. The treatment was continued for 6 months. Serum testosterone, 17-OHCS, 17-KS, serum ALAT and gamma-GT were recorded prior to the treatment at 3 and 6 months. Ten patients responded well to the treatment, 5 responded moderately well, 3 experienced no change, and 2 became worse. The serum testosterone level fell during the therapy and the ALAT level rose, though only one pathological ALAT value was recorded.
A twice daily application of 2% erythromycin base in hydroalcoholic solution accompanied by once daily use of 0.05% tretinoin (retinoic acid) solution was substantially more effective than tretinoin or erythromycin alone for treatment of inflammatory acne of moderate severity. Therapeutic enhancement by this combination can be attributed to the different modes of action, erythromycin acting chiefly by suppressing Propionibacterium acnes, while tretinoin is comedolytic. In addition, by altering the horny layer barrier, tretinoin doubtless increases the penetration of erythromycin.
Identical twins aged 17 and another pair aged 21 are described. One pair had febrile ulcerative conglobate acne; the other, cystic acne. The location of acne, the type of the lesions and the course of the disease were very similar in the two twins of each pair. The testosterone levels of the 17-year-old pair varied and their acne was in the active stage, while the 21-year-old pair had high testosterone levels and their acne was abating. The 17-year-old pair had negative Mantoux reactions and they reacted negatively to DNCB sensitization. The authors suggest that acne skin may have a certain genetically determined local factor, e.g. hormone receptor, which gives rise to acne in a certain hormonal situation.
Cimetidine, 1g orally per day, partially inhibited sebum excretion in patients with acne. Whether this was the result of H2-receptor blockade or an antiandrogen action is unknown.
Skin samples of interscapular region were taken from healthy women and patients with Acne vulgaris. The material was incubated with 3H-testosterone. The incubation of a part of the material was preceeded by an incubation with the unlabelled testosterone. An autoradiography was employed to detect and localize an uptake of 3H-testosterone in the skin. A significantly greater 3H-testosterone uptake was noted in the stratum basale and stratum spinosum of epidermis, sebaceous glands and hair sheaths and, in patients with Acne vulgaris, also within hair sacs and comedons.
Dermatological features of five 47,XYY males are presented. Port-wine stains were observed in 2 cases. As the incidence of port-wine stains among the general population is believed to be 0.5%, this result would seem to indicate that the association of 47,XYY males with port-wine stains is more than a coincidence, though the survey of previous studied failed to reveal any 47,XYY cases with port-wine stains.
Hormones play a major role in the development of acne vulgaris of pubertal onset. In addition to a seborrhoeic diathesis, an imbalance of oestrogens and androgens, as well as altered enzyme metabolism in the sebaceous glands are factors frequently implicated in the aetiology of this condition. There are many reports on hormonal treatment in the literature; the therapeutic regimes and results achieved varied greatly. The present report is concerned with a discussion of the results obtained in 50 patients with acne vulgaris treated with a drug containing oestriol.
Popular brands of soaps and shampoos were assayed for comedogenicity in the rabbit ear. Only a small number produced hyperkeratosis when applied at a 25% concentration. Bacteriostatic substances, especially hexachlorophene, were mildly comedogenic. Conventional soaps include salts of fatty acids; the latter are known comedogens. The obsessive use of soaps by patients with acne vulgaris may aggravate the disease and result in its extension to unusual locations.
Effects on rabbit ears. In a study to evaluate its acnegenic potential, increasing concentrations of 1,2,4-trichlorobenzene were applied topically to the ventral surface of the rabbit ear three times weekly for 13 weeks. Additional groups of rabbits received similar treatment with petroleum ether (solvent controls), received no treatment (negative controls), and received four once-weekly treatments with hexachlorodiphenyloxide, a known chloracnegenic agent (positive controls). Skin response to 1,2,4-trichlorobenzene was characterized grossly by dermal irritation directly related to the concentration of test material; there were the associated histologic changes of acanthosis and hyperkeratosis; there was no primary follicular involvement characteristic of acneform dermatitis. Dermal responses to hexachlorodiphenyloxide consisted of gross follicular enlargement, with waxy excretion on pressure, and severe scaling. The affected ear appeared thickened up to three times normal size and histologic sections showed primary follicular involvement characterized by marked thickening of the sheath and marked distention of the follicles with keratin, with resultant comedone formation, typical of chloracne.
The term acne mechanica designates local exacerbations due to pressure, friction, rubbing, squeezing, or stretching. Examples are given of various physical traumata that provoke lesions in acne patients. The precipitating causes of stress are diverse, they include articles of clothing (tight straps and belts), recreational accouterments (football shoulder pads), or occupational pressure (rubbing of back in truck drivers). Sealing acne-bearing skin under adhesive for two weeks regularly induced new inflammatory lesions, which derived from the rupture of microcomedones that are not visible to the naked eye.
Successful treatment of Acne conglobata is only possible by surgical excision. Two procedures are most favoured. Gross excision and fine trimming by dermabrasion with subsequent secondary reepithelization gives excellent results without scars: If a radical excision is preferred or if cartilage is exposed, a full thickness skin graft has to be applied. The results are good although slight difference in colour between facial skin and skin graft must be noted. For each of these two procedures a case is presented and treatment and results are discussed.
Various tetracyclines and erythromycins have been used rather empirically for the systemic treatment of acne vulgaris for more than a decade. It has been impossible to accurately evaluate clinically the numerous derivatives and to compare their effectiveness with other antibiotics such as clindamycin. As a substitute for this approach, this present study ranks these antibiotics, when given orally, as to their effectivensss in suppressing the fatty acids in sebum in normal volunteers. As a group, the tetracyclines were more effective than the erythromycins in decreasing the fatty acids, but clindamycin was significantly more potent than either.
This is the first American report, to our knowledge, of a case of acne aestivalis, which occurred in a woman with a recurrent acneform eruption in summertime. The histopathologic sequence was very similar to that found in cases of steroid acne; namely, local necrosis of the follicular epithelium was followed by the formation of a comedo. No cause was found. Treatment with tretinoin brought about regression of the lesions.
Plasma beta-MSH levels and sebum excretion rates (SER) were measured in thirty male and twelve female patients with acne vulgaris. The mean SER in both male and female patients was significantly increased as compared to normal control levels. Plasma beta-MSH levels were normal in male and female patients with acne and showed no correlation with the SER. The SER that occurs in acne cannot therefore be explained by an increased secretion of beta-MSH.
Propionibacterium species were quantified on the foreheads and cheeks of persons with and without acne in three age groups: 11 to 15, 16 to 20, and 21 to 25. Propionibacteria were virtually absent in the pubertal non-acne group compared to a geometric mean density of 114,800 per sq cm in the acne group. A similar sharp difference existed between the acne subjects and normals in the age range of 16 to 20 years: 85,800 organisms per sq cm compared to 588 per sq cm. Patients with acne and normal subjects over age 21 showed no difference in Propionibacterium levels. In acne patients, while there was a trend for lower levels, no significant difference was seen as the severity of inflammation increased.
Vitamin A acid represents the most effective therapeutic agent available for the topical treatment of acne vulgaris. This is also borne out by the results obtained in 152 patients over a two-year period. Clinical improvement is striking, long lasting remissions can be maintained by continuous treatment, and there appears to be an acceleration of the natural course to spontaneous remission of disease activity. Patients beyond their teens are more likely to remain symptom-free after adequate treatment than younger patients who may require prolonged maintenance treatment. Special attention is given to the appropriate care for Vitamin A acid treated skin and the general management of these patients is outlined. It is stressed that the patient be instructed, in detail, about the course of treatment and the necessity of staying under observation by an experienced dermatologist.
Twenty-five female patients, aged 14 to 49, and suffering from syptoms of virilization (hirsutism, acne, seborrhea and alopecia) were treated with an estrogen-progestogen combinantion, ie cyproterone acetate and ethinylestradiol, having antiandrogenic and antiovulatory action. Patients were submitted to monitoring by means of a series of laboratory tests in order to detect any toxic or hormonal effects that might occur. In most cases symptoms of virilization were significantly reduced, while untoward side effects were not noted.
In two cases we could demonstrate the complications, which might appear in the clinical course of severe forms of juvenile acne. Our first case deals with a young male patient with leukaemic reaction in his peripheral blood and bone-marrow (sternal puncture) and excessively raised erythrocyte-sedimentation-rate, who developed bilateral ileo-sacral-fusion arthritis. The second case dealt with a young female patient with spondylitis and an enormously raised erythrocyte-sedimentation-rate.
A review of its function in androgenetic alopecia, acne vulgaris, and idiopathic hirsutism including recent studies with antiandrogens. Current concepts of testosterone metabolism in the human skin are reviewed, and the role of dihydrotestosterone in the pathophysiology of androgenetic alopecia, acne vulgaris, and idiopathic hirsutism is discussed. The hypothesis is submitted that a temporary, increased dihydrotestosterone formation at specific skin target sites at different ages causes the normal development of certain sexual characteristics, as well as the androgen-dependent skin disorders. Future treatment of these conditions is discussed in light of recent studies with antiandrogens.
Sixty patients with severe pustular and cystic acne were treated for prolonged periods with clindamycin (150 mg to 300 mg daily). The average duration of therapy was five months, with 18 patients being treated for more than six months. Only two (3.4%) patients developed mild diarrhea, which was rapidly reversible on discontinuance of the drug. No other adverse reactions were observed. These data suggest that long-term, low-dose clindamycin therapy may be safe for severe pustular of cystic acne.
Comedones contain a considerable quantity of water. In some cases a water content of more than 40% can be detected. The comedo consists of two parts, an inner nucleus built up to unorganized materials and a capsule with concentrically arranged shells. The material of the nucleus contains small scales produced by normal keratinization. The materials of the capsule consists of larger scales, which result from hyperkeratosis. The nucleus of the comedo seems to be identical with the early comedo. A similar structure can be formed in vitro by adding water to sebum. Microorganisms have optimal growth conditions in the early comedo.
Groups of 20 males of high-school age with moderate acne were treated with oral tetracycline (500 mg/day), topical tetracycline (0.5% solution applied twice daily), or placebo for 8 weeks. The two panels treated with tetracycline showed a significant and equivalent reduction in acne severity as assessed by visual grading. The surface lipids in the panel treated with oral tetracycline showed a small but not statistically significant decrease in free fatty acid content, but the subjects receiving topical tetracycline showed no reduction in free fatty acids. Further, neither treatment was associated with a change in mass of surface lipid nor did the mass or weight percent of any component of the surface lipids change with the decrease in acne severity. These results show that acne severity can be reduced with tetracycline (both oral and topical) without any concomitant quantitative change in surface lipids.
A report is made on 80 male patients aged 19-25 and suffering from common acne, who were treated with vitamin A acid (Eudyna) partly as inpatients and partly as outpatients. All stages were present from acne comedonica to acne conglobata. The preparation was available in the form of cream and jelly, each containing 0.05% tretinoin. As a rule, the drug was applied once daily. At the end of the tretinoin treatment lasting for a maximum of 9 weeks, a decrease in comedones of more than 90% is reported. The tolerance of Eudyna was seen to be good to very good in more than two thirds of the patients.
Variability with age and with severity of acne. Lipogenesis from [14C] glucose was measured in skin biopsies from the shoulder-blade region of forty-two male subjects. In the acne age range, dermal lipogenesis showed an upward trend with increasing severity of acne; a similar trend was found in forehead sebum excretion rate, but no correlation was obvious between dermal lipogenesis (back) and sebum secretion rate (forehead) in the same subject. In older subjects, dermal lipogenesis was significantly increased in those with a past history of severe acne. At high rates of dermal lipogenesis there was a small but significant increase in wax ester labelling relative to triglyceride and squalene. No increase was found in squalene labelling relative to other lipids, either with increasing lipogenic rate or in severe acne. Dermal and epidermal lipogenesis rates showed no correlation with age. In dermis, however, there was a decrease in wax ester labelling relative to triglyceride, and a marked decrease in squalene labelling relative to both triglyceride and wax esters, with increasing age.
A review of seventy matched acne patients on clindamycin and seventy-two on tetracycline shows that nine patients on clindamycin had diarrhoea whereas no patients on tetracycline had any side effect; no frank pseudomembranous colitis was seen. Although we heed the side effects of clindamycin, it should not be withheld from patients with severe and resistant acne.
Deterioration of acne vulgaris or eruption of an acneiform exanthema could be established during treatment with vitamin B6 and/or vitamin B12 in 14 patients. Females were by far the more frequently affected. The appearance of skin symptoms, even outside the age groups typically affected by acne vulgaris is characteristic. The clinical appearance of acneiform exanthema occurring during treatment with vitamin B6 or B12 consists of loosely disseminated small papules or papulopustules on the face (especially on the forehead and chin), on the upper parts of the back and chest and spreading to the upper arm. The pathogensis of the change is not yet certain. The acneiform rash generally fades within a short time after vitamin B6 or vitamin B12 treatment has been stopped.
All tetracycline preparations seem to be systemically effective in acne. Quality and frequency of their side-effects, however, are different and should be carefully considered in each individual case. In an own study ninety-one patients treated with minocycline showed good response in 69% and moderate or no response in 31+. The main side-effects of the drug were nausea and giddiness, being of short duration in most cases. In patients with no response to a certain preparation change of the preparation may be helpful. Occasionally, acne does not respond to any tetracycline derivative. In these cases the use of non-tetracycline antibiotics, particularly of trimethoprim-sulphamethazol and lincomycines, is clearly effective. As a rule, we start treatment with tetracycline (500-750 mg/d) and reduce the dose to a minimum (ca. 100 mg/d), in order to withdraw the drug. In non-responsive cases another derivative and/or finally non-tetracycline antibiotics are administered for therapy.
A definition and classification of acneiform dermatoses is presented to distinguish these diseases from true acne. True acne is a follicular eruption which begins with a comedo, sometimes evolving into various inflammatory lesions. Members of true acne are acne vulgaris with its varieties, acne venenata, and comedonal acne due to physical agencies. Acneiform reactions begin with an inflammatory lesion, usually a papule or pustule. Comedones are uncommon and may follow pustules. Acneiform eruptions are almost always drug-induced, the commonest agents being corticosteroids and ACTH, iodides, bromides, anti-convulsive drugs, and INH. Topical treatment with VAA is indicated in every variety of true acne; VAA is helpful in acneiform dermatoses with secondary comedo formation, as for instance in steroid acne. Very satisfying results can be achieve with this regimen.
Topical tretinoin is a valuable therapeutic agent whose chief drawback has been local primary irritation. What were thought to be special difficulties with photosensitivity reactions and pigmentary changes in dark skin, really turn out to be other manifestations of the irritancy. Advances in the development of newer dosage forms and treatment regimens, together with expanded knowledge of the many factors which contribute to the problem, mean that there should be very few patients who cannot be treated with tretinoin. Only the rare patient with true hypersensitivity to the drug need be denied. Appropriate therapy still requires a modicum of personal attention to the individual patient's needs-but that is what the practice of medicine is all about.
Thirty patients with acne vulgaris were treated for 12 weeks with 0.025% vitamin A acid in a gel. The numbers of comedones, papules, and pustules were markedly reduced in 25 of the patients.
Ultrastructural findings in normal human sebaceous follicles, of comedones from acne patients, and from comedones during topical treatment with vitamin A acid (VAA) are described. In normal human sebaceous follicles, the two segments of the infundibulum-the acroinfundibulum and the infrainfundibulum-show differing ultramorphological patterns of keratinization. The incomplete horny layer of the infrainfundibulum is physiological and seems to be necessary for its normal function. On the other hand, no effective barrier function is established in this region. During comedo formation, excessive keratinization takes place in the infra-infundibulum, leading to a compact and coherent horny core. VAA-treatment leads to profound alterations of keratin production, with the appearance of small, irregular, non-coherent and foamy horny cells. The comedonal wall resumes almost physiological conditions. These changes are in agreement with experimental work using VAA in vivo and in vitro and may explain the therapeutic mechanism of action of this compound in the treatment of acne.
The effects of topically applied vitamin A acid and benzoyl peroxide were investigated. Short-term (a few days) and long-term (up to 800 days) treatment was analyzed histologically and autoradiographically. Labelled and unlabelled biopsies at various time intervals were taken from face, back, and acne lesions. Kinetics were followed with 3H-TdR and 3H-histidine. All keratinizing epithelia of epidermis and adnexa are stimulated by vitamin A acid. Labelling is high (up to 20-70% L.I) and occurs within a few days. Follicles and comedones can also be stimulated, but respond less and much later than epidermis. Transit time is shortened to 3-4 days. Lose, incoherent horny cells are produced, explaining the therapeutic benefits of vitamin A acid in acne. Benzoyl peroxide is less effective in stimulating epidermopoieses in epidermis, follicles, and comedones. This autoradiographic analysis parallels therapeutic results with these two exfoliants.
In the course of the last two years, a tremendous amount of controversy has been raised over dangers accompanying the use of the antibiotic clindamycin. The controversy has been stimulated by recent reports of fatalities from pseudomembraneous colitis associated with clindamycin therapy. Varying greatly in degree of severity, the colitis has been reported in as high as 10% of all patients using the drug. The pertinence of such data, however, in a young, healthy acne population receiving small maintenance doses is questionable. Nevertheless, because of these reports, the use of clindamycin in the treatment of many of the conditions for which it was previously considered indicated, including acne, is being seriously reevaluated.
In patients with facial acne good results were obtained by topical treatment with a 0-05 per cent solution of retinoic-acid (tretinoin) solution and with a 0-025 per cent solution. The improvement was judged by clinical assessment and by counts of comedones, papules and pustules before and after the 12-week trial. Side-effects such as irritation and erythema were less with the 0-025 per cent solution. The use of swabs impregnated with a constant volume of solution and sealed in a sachet proved to be a convenient method of application.  In the placebo group, swabs impregnated with the solvent only showed virtually no effect on facial acne.
High daily doses of tetracycline (in most instances 2,000 mg) were administered over periods of 3 to 33 months to 31 patients suffering from unusually severe, disfiguring, and treatment-resistant forms of acne (papulopustular, cystic, and conglobated). The acne cleared in 14 patients, improved greatly in 13, improved only insignificantly in 3, and failed to improve in  Side-effects occurred in 15 of the 31 patients but necessitated cessation of treatment in only three.
Mean concentrations of testosterone in sera collected from pubertal boys at the onset of acne were significantly higher than levels from stage-matched control pubertal boys who did not develop acne (P less than .0025). This longitudinal study indicated that acne occurred when other androgen-produced pubertal changes began. Androstenedione and dehydroepiandrosterone levels did not differ between the two groups.
Measurements were made of the proportions of octadeca-5,8-dienoic acid and octadeca-9,12-dienoic acid in the scalp surface lipids of 6 normal subjects, 5 subjects with slight acne, and 9 subjects with severe acne. The group averages for the delta5,8 isomer were: 0.74,  0.85, and 0.61% and for the delta9,12 isomer were 0.56, 0.27, and 0.19%, respectively. The differences in the levels of the delta9,12 isomer between the normal subjects and the groups with slight and with severe acne were statistically significant (p less than 0.02 and 0.001), respectively) but there was no significant difference in the content of the delta5,8 compound. The ratio of the delta5,8/delta9,12 isomers showed no correlation with the rate of sebum production in 12 subjects.
Stickl's method of oral treatment of acne vulgaris with antigens has been carried out on 26 test persons. During the treatment the number of comedones increased significantly and the number of papules decreased significantly. Biochemically, a significant increase of the free fatty acids and a significant decrease of the triglycerides could be demonstrated in the skin surface lipids, the total amount remaining unchanged. The following important conclusions for the pathogenesis of acne may be drawn:  The living conditions for Corynebacterium acnes on the surface of the skin or in the ducts of sebaceous glands respectively are influenced by the immunological system of the host. 2. The free fatty acids have a comedogenic effect in vivo. 3. The free fatty acids are not responsible for the development of inflammatory acne efflorescences.
A controlled non-blind multicenter trial was conducted in 211 acne patients to test the activity of topical retinoic acid against sulfur-resorcinol--salicylic acid and placebo. Uniform evaluation criteria were used. After 8 weeks' treatment in comparable groups of patients, retinoic acid proved to be superior to the standard and to the placebo. The difference was statistically significant. Side effects were present in a number of patients treated with the active substances and with the placebo (mainly erythema), but rarely was the treatment discontinued.
A syndrome of arthralgia associated with one form of acne is described. Orthopaedic surgeons should be alert to the association of profound arthralgia and myalgia with this particular variant of acne vulgaris. Thirteen patients are described, all of whom are adolescent boys with a chronic moderately active acne which suddenly became extremely aggressive and toxic. The symptoms and signs included proximal arthralgia and myalgia, fever, elevated sedimentation rate, and altered immunoglobulins. Control of acne and conservative physical therapy resulted in complete resolution of the musculoskeletal complaints.
A group of 135 college students with acne was evaluated in a 12-week, double-blind study comparing placebo, oral tetracycline 0.5 gm daily, and a new topical tetracycline preparation. The topical tetracycline preparation containing n-decyl methyl sulfoxide to enhance penetration, produced statistically significant improvement of acne as compared to placebo after 7, 10, and 12 weeks of treatment. Oral tetracycline, 0.5 gm daily, was statistically significantly more effective for acne than placebo after 4, 7, 10, and 12 weeks of therapy. The placebo group also had marked improvement which may have been related to sun exposure. Emotional stress produced by final examinations had no apparent effect on the patients given placebo, oral, or topical tetracycline. Side effects of the topical tetracycline included a slight yellowish discoloration of the skin in 25% of the subjects and transient stinging or tingling sensation after application in 36%.
A group of 75 subjects with moderate or severe acne was divided by random selection into three treatment groups. One group was treated with a topically applied placebo liquid and with 500 mg of orally administered tetracycline hydrochloride daily; one group received orally administered lactose capsules and topically applied placebo liquid each day; and one group was treated with orally administered lactose capsules and with a topical preparation containing tetracycline hydrochloride and n-decylmethyl sulfoxide, an agent intended to enhance antibiotic penetration. At the conclusion of the 13-week study and at several points during the study, the conditions of the subjects receiving topically or orally administered tetracycline hydrochloride were significantly (P less than .05) more improved than the conditions of the subjects receiving lactose capsules and the topically applied placebo liquid. However, there was no significant difference between the effects of topically and orally administered tetracycline hydrochloride.
A double-blind prospective study was undertaken to compare low-dosage tetracycline hydrochloride and clindamycin hydrate hydrochloride in the treatment of patients with pustular acne. Clinical improvement was noted in 93.7% of those receiving tetracycline and in 92.8% of those receiving clindamycin. Of those patients who were receiving clindamycin, two patients developed diarrhea and one patient developed pseudomembranous colitis. We conclude, therefore, that clindamycin should not be used as a primary drug in the treatment of acne.
The incidence of eczema was assessed in acne patients and their first degree relatives and compared with control (non-acne) subjects and their relatives. It was found that there was a statistically decreased incidence of endogenous eczema in the acne patients.
No mycoplasmas and no chlamydiae were found in cultures of 75 uninflamed comedones, 72 papulopustular lesions, and 7 cystic lesions from 14 subjects with acne. Chlamydial serologic tests were negative for 11 subjects and showed antibodies in 3 subjects to 3 different antigenic types of trachoma agent. These results are viewed as substantial evidence against the possibility that either mycoplasmas or chlamydiae play an important part in the pathogenesis of acne.
A theory concerning the pathogenesis of acne vulgaris is offered and, based on the theory, a rationale for treatment is presented. Acne vulgaris should be regarded as a cosmetically unacceptable biological variation in most cases, a syndrome rather than a disease. One must not lose sight of the occasional case in which it is the marker of an endocrine disorder.
The frequency of acne appears to be increased in boys and men of the XYY genotype. This report describes severe acne in a retarded man in whom chromosomal analysis with differential banding suggested duplication of the distal portion of the long arm of a number 13 chromosome, a partial trisomy 13. In addition to retardation and seizures, his malformations, which included narrowed temples, ear anomalies, hexadactyly, and hernias, were consistent with those reported previously in patients with partial trisomy for the distal segment of chromosome 13. This patient and one recently reported retarded boy with chronic acne and trisomy 8 mosaicism suggest that the association of acne and chromosomal abnormality may not be limited to Y chromosome excess.
We have used surface microscopy to measure the pil-sebaceous duct orifices at different sites in 150 subjects. Our data have shown that there are more pilo-sebaceous units on the face compared to the back and that these exists are smaller on the face. Despite the small exit the sebum excretion rate per gland on the forehead was not significantly different from that on the back. Thus the number of pilo-sebaceous duct units and the pilo-sebaceous canal exit size are possible factors in the localization of acne.
In 80 industrial workers producing herbicides (2,4,5-trichlorphenoxyaceticacidsodium and sodiumpentachlorphenolate) in Czechoslovakia the following signs of intoxication caused by 2,3,6,7-tetrachlordibenzodioxin were found: Dermatological: Chloracne and Porphyria cutanea tarda. Internal: Disorders of the metabolism of porphyrins, fats, carbohydrates, plasmaproteins. Neurological: Mainly lesions of the peripheral neurone. Psychiatric: Neurasthenic syndrome and organic lesions. Differences from the usual course of chloracne were observed. Porphyria cutanea tarda acquisita was most obvious, one patient suffered and died from severe atherosclerosis, hypertension and diabetes. Many patients developed polyneuropathy, as verified both by EMG and autopsy. Two patients died from bronchogenic carcinoma.
Ozone therapy using the Vapozone 9, an instrument in normal commercial usage, has been carried out on the forehead of 16 male test persons on 7 consecutive days. Before the treatment began and at the end of the treatment period the skin surface lipids on the unchanged skin (casual level) and two hours after defatting the skin (replacement sum) were taken by direct extraction and analysed by means of thin layer chromatography. The results of these investigations rule out a decrease in the free fatty acids by this therapy. As a result of this finding it may assumed that no desinfecting effect on the corynebacterium acnes and other lipasereleasing microorganisms can be attributed to ozone therapy.
Eighty-three patients with moderately severe acne were entered into a double-blind study utilizing clindamycin and placebo. Counts of comedones and pustules were made at intervals during a 13-week period. Clindamycin resulted in noticeable improvement of acne in 85% of subjects while in the placebo group improvement was present in 38%. There was also an unexplained reduction of total comedone count in the clindamycin-treated group. Severe side effects occurred in two of 44 patients receiving clindamycin (diarrhea, 1 and rash, 1); although an additional eight patients receiving clindamycin experienced mild diarrhea, discontinuation of therapy was not required. Clindamycin appears to be a valuable additional drug in the treatment of acne.
Topical antibiotics were used on patients with acne vulgaris. Corynebacterium acnes organisms from open comedones were quantitated during treatment, and the progress of the disease was evaluated. Clindamycin lotion completely suppressed the growth of C acnes organisms, whereas erythromycin and tetracycline did not depress the C acnes counts. Taken as a group, these antibiotics gave a substantial improvement of the disease on the treated side as compared with paired untreated sides  of the face and back.
The successful management of acne involves a careful detailing of the factors involved in pathogenesis to ensure confidence and co-operation with the now quite successful therapeutic measures available.
R factors are known to be the most important mechanism of antimicrobial resistance of intestinal flora. Short courses with therapeutic doses (1000 mg/day) of tetracycline select for strains containing transferable resistance factors to more than one antimicrobial agent. In this report we show that long term treatment with very low doses (100 mg/day) of tetracycline for acne vulgaris has an equally strong effect favouring establishment of resistent strains and R factors in the intestinal flora of patients.
Two unwanted contaminants, 3,4,3',4'-tetrachloroazoxybenzene (TCAOB) and 3,4,3',4'-tetrachloroazobenzene (TCAB), formed in the commercial synthesis of 3,4-dichloroaniline or of herbicides made from 3,4-dichloroaniline, were responsible for three outbreaks of acne among chemical workers. TCAOB and TCAB are approximately isosteric to 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin and 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzofuran, two well-known contaminants that cause acne. All four of these agents are potent inducers of hepatic aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase activity and compete for stereospecific binding sites in the hepatic cytosol, which are thought to be the receptor sites for the induction of this enzyme. Among the chlorinated azoxy and azobenzenes, the potency of a congener to induce aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase activity correlates with its binding affinity for the hepatic cytosol specific binding sites and its capacity to induce acne; this relation between structure and activity parallels that observed for the chlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxins and dibenzofurans.
Results of blood chemistry studies using an automated multiple analysis system and blood cell counts for 325 patients receiving long-term low-dosage tetracycline hydrochloride therapy continuously for three years or longer revealed minimal changes in all but one patient. This patient developed a transient hyperbilirubinemia with mild juandice while taking 500 mg of tetracycline daily.
Acne infantum, a variety of acne affecting the newborn and children, appears to be very rare in dark-skinned populations and has not been described in this population group in South Africa. A case of acne infantum in a dark-skinned Indian child is reported. The recent literature is reviewed and comment is made on the classification and pathogenesis of the disorder.
The effects of oral zinc sulfate (corresponding to 135 mg of zinc daily) alone and in combination with vitamin A (300,000 international units) daily on acne lesions have been compared with those of vitamin A alone and of a placebo. The number of comedones, papules, pustules, and infiltrates were counted at each visit. After four weeks, there was a significant decrease in the number of papules, pustules, and infiltrates in the zinc-treated groups. The effect of zinc plus vitamin A was not better than zinc alone. After 12 weeks of treatment, the mean acne score had decreased from 100% to 15%. The mechanism for the effect of zinc therapy in acne, to our knowledge, is not presently known.
The currently widely held theory that intrafollicular free fatty acids (FA) are the primary agents instigating inflammatory changes in acne is based on circumstantial evidence. There is no direct evidence that FA in physiologic concentrations are inflammatory. In the present study the quantities of FA present in isolated pilosebaceous ducts and in isolated comedones were analyzed. Using these values, the effect of FA on intracutaneous injection into human skin was investigated. The range of FA in 257 isolated pilosebaceous ducts from skin of the upper back of 10 male subjects was 0.19 to 2.43 mug, with an average of 0.89 +/- 0.75 mug of FA per duct. The mean FA content in 45 open comedones was 63.6 +/- 24.8 mug per comedone. Fatty acids for intracutaneous testing were isolated from human skin surface lipids and from hydrolyzed triglycerides purified from pooled isolated sebaceous glands. Twenty-six subjects received 100 mug of FA intracutaneously in the upper back. The response to FA injections could not be distinguished from the response to saline control injections. By 24 hr no erythema, induration, or any visible marks of inflammation were present in the skin of any of the subjects tested. At the histologic level a mild inflammatory infiltrate consisting perdominantly of lymphocytes was slightly more marked in the FA injection site than in the saline control injection site. Increasing the amount of FA injected to 500 mug still produced no visible inflammatory response in human skin. We conclude that intracutaneous injections of FA in physiologic concentrations do not produce more than a very mild inflammatory reaction in human skin and suggest that the role of Propionibacterium acnes in the pathogeneisis of acne may be more complex than merely as a source of intrafollicular lipases.
Relation to mammography and treatment of acne. This communication reports cases of 16 women in who cancer of the breast developed after radiation therapy for acne or hirsutism, suggesting another group at higher risk than is generally expected for cancer of the breast. It is prudent to regard the carcinogenic effect of radiation on the breast as proportional to dose without a threshold. Mammography in young women should be ordered only selectively, not for screening.
While there is no single treatment plan that will work for every patient, acne can be controlled and long-term scarring can be minimized. Treatment must be individualized. Remember, there may be a "flare" when intensive therapy begins. Useful treatment methods include ultraviolet light, cleansers and soaps, peeling and drying agents, benzoyl peroxide preparations, abrasive soaps and scrubs, retinoic acid and oral antibiotics. The therapeutic choice depends upon the extent and severity of the disease.
A micronized benzoyl peroxide, in a magnesium aluminum silicate-alcohol gel, appears to achieve dramatic objective improvement of the comedo and papular stages of acne, as well as associated seborrhea. Burning sensations and excessive erythema, found with similar modalities, have been virtually eliminated.
The need for a "comedogenic-free" cosmetic for acne patients led to this study using the only available mode, the rabbit. To facilitate the formulation of this benign cover-up, a range of cosmetics and ingredients was tested. Many cosmetics, fractions, and modifications of lanolins were comedogenic, as were emulsifiers such as butyl sterate, isopropyl myristate and sodium lauryl sulfate. From this data we incorporated non-comedogenic, into an acceptable cosmetic formulation for patients. The use of this formulation in susceptible acne-prone women reduced the rate of "acne cosmetica" in our clinic patients from 25% to less than 5%. We were unable to confirm a recent study suggesting that sulfur was a potent acnegen.
The enigmas of why acne usually starts and stops at certain ages, why and how it so often cures itself, are recalled and some explanatory hypotheses are mentioned. Certain other enigmas are mentioned including why some patients have much oil and little acne, and some vice versa; why some blackheads and whiteheads initiate inflammation and suppuration and others not; why cysts and why scars form in some patients and not in others. Enigmas such as these show that acne is not only a common disease that supplies the practitioner's bread and butter, but one offering almost unequaled opportunities for research.
The view is advanced that sebum as originally produced must contain materials, other than lipids, which may serve as a selective substrate for growth of bacteria and yeasts. Growth of large numbers of P. acnes and P. granulosum in some follicles is considered to place those follicles at risk of undergoing pathological changes. Deleterious products of bacterial growth could be not only lipase and free fatty acids, but also other enzymes as well as bacterial antigens and unspecified toxins or irritants. The possibility is suggested that follicles heavily infested with P. acnes and P. granulosum may be identified by their reddish fluorescence under ultraviolet light, thus permitting identification and study of those which are at risk. Antibiotics may be helpful in reducing the formation of harmful bacterial products during continued growth of the organisms. The eventually self-limiting nature of the disease may be due to the immune response to bacterial products, or to an accommodation of the follicular epithelium to the long-continued presence of irritant materials within the follicle.
Patients with acne vulgaris, particularly those with severe inflammatory forms of the disease, are known to have high titers of serum antibodies, and intensified immediate hypersensitivity reactions to P. acnes antigens. The significance of this fact has not been clarified, but it is possible that antigen-antibody reactions involving P. acnes in the perifollicular dermis could intensify the inflammatory response in certain forms of acne. Further studies utilizing newer, more sophisticated techniques are needed to identify the role of P. acnes antigens in affecting such fundamental phenomena as chemotaxis, cell-mediated immunity, activation of the complement cascade and reticuloendothelial system stimulation. Answers to these basic questions have the pathogenesis of that common but even more complex disease, acne.
Oral tetracycline eliminated the histochemical staining for nonspecific esterase in human sebaceous glands after two weeks of administration. This evidence offers further support for the hypothesis that the clinical benefits of tetracycline result from suppression of follicular esterase-lipases, probably those from C. acnes.
This report presents the results of a 13-week study done on 300 patients with acne vulgaris treated with a tetracycline topical lotion alone. The vehicle used was an aqueous-ethanol solution containing the penetration enhancer, n-decyl methyl sulfoxide. On a 0-8 grading scale, 81% of the patients improved by one or more grade points, 57% by two or more points and 31% by three or more points. Analysis indicated that concomitant variables such as severity, age, type of acne, sex and season of the year did not alter the conclusion as to efficacy. Detailed statistical analysis indicates that the conclusion is valid that the tetracycline preparation is beneficial in the treatment of acne vulgaris. No adverse reactions were observed in the patients treated. Hemograms, blood studies and urinalyses were completed on 37 patients. No disturbing trends were uncovered.
Structural differences between untreated and tretinoin treated acne, uniquely evident with the scanning electron microscope, provide insight into the disease and its response to the drug. Early tretinoin therapy is characterized by the appearance of loosely adherent, parakeratotic cells which account for comedo expulsion and a disrupted skin surface. Persistence of the follicular and comedonal alterations account for the prophylactic value of long-term therapy. Meanwhile, the structure of the stratum corneum returns toward normal, with the clinical accommodation to the topical tretinoin.
Our approach to a patient who fails to respond to antibiotics is as follows: First, take a careful history. Look for use of cosmetics and topical corticosteroids, anticonvulsive agents and systemic corticosteroids. Inquire about marked increases in emotional or psychological stresses accompanied by noticeable seborrhea. Probe the patient about habits of leaning on or squeezing acne areas, and most importantly, inquire how often and in what manner the patient washes. In the physical examination, look for evidence of sinus tract formation--extending, tunneling lesions with openings to the surface. Use Wood's light examination for the density of follicular fluorescence to rule out failure to properly absorb an antibiotic; fluoresce the oral mucosa to rule out failure to comply when the antibiotic is a tetracycline. Culture the surface aerobic flora on routine media with and without the antibiotic in question to settle any question of malabsorption. A systematic approach to these possibilities will usually uncover the factor or factors responsible for therapeutic failure. Clinical improvement promptly follows, once proper measures are initiated to neutralize the aggravating forces.
Physical-mechanical exfoliation with the nonwoven polyester fiber web sponge is an effective adjunct to the treatment of comedonal and pustular acne. Precisely controlled epidermabrasion is achieved by varying pressure, velocity, duration and frequency of use. Side effects are negligible and patient acceptance is high. Effectiveness is not dependent upon erythema and scaling since the web sponge mechanically removes keratin excrescences and trapped hairs in pilosebaceous ducts.
Forty-seven patients with acne, unresponsive to tetracycline and erythromycin, were treated with 100 mg minocycline daily. About one-quarter showed a 50% improvement or better. Five patients became dizzy during the first week of therapy, making it necessary to stop the medication in four instances. Two patients stopped treatment after several months because of esophagitis in one and headaches in another. Vestibular side effects are the most common complication of treatment. Patients should be warned about this side effect and if it occurs should avoid driving or handling machines. In some instances, dizziness may be so severe that the drug will have to be discontinued.
A double-blind, random distribution study showed that a lower than recommended dose of minocycline--50 mg twice daily--was as effective as a dose of 250 mg twice daily of tetracycline for treatment of acne vulgaris in comparable patient groups, and that minocycline produced no vestibular side effects at the lower dosage. Like tetracycline, minocycline did not produce the phototoxicity associated with demeclocycline or the life-threatening colitis associated with clindamycin. Patients in this study did not develop a resistance either to minocycline or to tetracycline. Studies of the use of minocycline in patients who have developed tetracycline resistance and long-range studies of patients on the new lower dose of minocycline are now underway.
The pathogenesis of acne is briefly reviewed and photographic evidence related to the production of follicular plugging is presented. One simple method of demonstrating this plugging for experimental use is described. Although juvenile acne is a benign, self-limited disease, it is extremely common and sometimes devastating. It is hoped that this presentation will lead to better understanding of its management.
Tetracycline was compared to clindamycin as adjunctive therapy in the treatment of moderate to moderately severe acne under double-blind controlled conditions. Both antibiotics were efficacious and differences were not appreciable. Lesion counts of both comedones and pustules were reduced and clinical improvement was noted in the majority of subjects. Side effects were not a problem. The place of clindamycin in the therapeutic armamentarium of the dermatologist is discussed.
A controlled clinical trial against retinoic acid. In a double-blind, randomized, group-comparative clinical trial, 31 patients with acne vulgaris received topical treatment for 6-8 weeks with a lotion containing either 0.05% retinoic acid or 0.1% of the retinoic acid derivative Ro 11-1430. The side-effects erythema, desquamation and burning were significantly less frequent with Ro 11-1430 than with retinoic acid. The treatments appeared to be approximately equally effective in reducing the number of acne elements, but due to the limited number of patients studied, the trial was admittedly not sufficient to detect differences with regard to therapeutic efficacy.
In severe forms of acne (grade IV) there is probably an inmunological alteration consisting of: 1) Alterations in the IgG. 2) They may be produced in small quantity or destroyed more rapidly. 3) Cellular immunity is normal using PHA and diminished with habitual tests. 4) It is necessary to normalize these globulin levels before or during specific medication, with antibiotics or sulfa drugs. 5) Essential aminoacids should be given so as to raise the inmunoglobulins to normal levels. The administration of commercial inmunoglobulins should be avoided, because, for genetic reason, they could produce autoimmunity or isosensibility and diminished the levels one is trying to raise.
As a result of this clinical study with the Buf cleansing system, I believe that it offers several advantages:(1) it is effective with minimal daily use; and (2) patients report that their skin feels smoother and they are easily able to control the irritative potential by experimentally titrating their own levels of application. Based on this sampling of acne patient, I conclude that the buf cleansing system is a useful addition to the treatment modalities now available for acne.
According to the results obtained in a recent clinical trial over a four-year period retinoic acid represents the most effective single agent available for the topical management of acne vulgaris. Retinoic acid yields impressive therapeutic results not only in patients with manifest acne, but, provided it is applied early enough, it is also effective in preventing the severe inflammatory manifestations of this disease. In medium to severe cases of inflammatory acne, topical retinoic acid therapy should be combined with a low-dose, long-term systemic tetracycline regimen. The course of treatment may extend over months or years, depending on the severity of the condition. Particularly patients in the acne-prone age group are candidates for long-term therapy. Retinoic acid therapy, alone or in combination with tetracyclines, proved far superior to conventional regimens with respect to the effective treatment and prophylaxis of acne.
Eight cases of acne fulminans (acute febrile ulcerative acne) are compared with 13 previously reported cases. This rare disorder of male teenage patients is characterized by the sudden appearance of highly inflammatory, tender, ulcerative and crusted lesions on the back, chest, and face: it is one of the most scarring acute dermatologic disorders of young patients. At the onset of the disease, all patients showed febrile temperatures and marked leukocytosis; other systemic symptoms occurred with varying frequency. Polyarthralgia was noted in half of our series. Investigations of potential trigger mechanisms (eg, septisemia due to Corynebacterium acnes, immunologic defects, altered polymorphonuclear leukocyte function, Shwartzman phenomenon) did not yield any clues regarding the pathogenesis of this disease. Clinical and laboratory findings suggest that acne fulminans is not directly related to acne conglobata.
The serum levels of zinc and retinol-binding protein (RBP) have been determined in 173 patients with acne and compared with those of a control group. The RBP is a specific transport protein and its level in plasma reflects the amount of vitamin A available to the tissues. Patients with severe acne were found to have lower levels of RBP than either patients with mild acne or healthy subjects of the same age. In the case of males with severe acne, the mean serum zinc level was significantly lower than that of the control group. No such difference was observed for girls. The observed condition of low levels of zinc and vitamin A in the serum of patients with severe acne may provide a rationale for the clinically good effect of oral zinc treatment.
When echinoderm sperm are treated with the detergent Triton X-100 at pH 6,4 in 10 mM phosphate buffer, the membranes are solubilized, but the actin which is located in the periacrosomal region remains as a phase-dense cup. These cups can be isolated free from the flagella and chromatin and can be solubilized by increasing the pH to 8.0 and by changing the ionic strength and type of buffer used. Since the actin does not exist in the "F" state in unreacted sperm, and since the actin remains as a unit that does not diffuse away, it must be present in the mature sperm in a bound or storage state. The actin is, in fact, associated with a pair of proteins whose mol wt are 250,000 and 230,000. When the isolated cups are digested with trypsin, these high molecular weight proteins are digested, thereby liberating the actin. The actin will polymerize if heavy meromyosin or subfragment 1 is added to a preparation of isolated cups. Evidence is presented that this pair of high molecular weight proteins is similar in molecular weight and properties to erythrocyte spectrin. Attempts at transforming the storage form of actin in the cup into filaments were only moderately successful. The best conditions for filament formation involve incubating the cup in ATP and divalent salts. Careful examination of these cups reveals that the actin polymerized preferentially on either end of oriented filaments that already exist in the cup, indicating that self-nucleation is inefficacious. I conclude that the actin can exist in the storage form by its association with spectrin-like molecules and that the actin in this state polymerizes preferentially onto existing filaments.
The role of calcium and magnesium-ATP on the structure and contractility in motile extracts of Amoeba proteus and plasmalemma-ectoplasm "ghosts" of Chaos carolinensis has been investigated by correlating light and electron microscope observations with turbidity and birefringence measurements. The extract is nonmotile and contains very few F-actin filaments and myosin aggregates when prepared in the presence of both low calcium ion and ATP concentrations at an ionic strength of I = 0.05, pH 6.8. The addition of   10 mM magnesium chloride,   10 mM ATP, in the presence of a low calcium ion concentration (relaxation solution) induced the formation of some fibrous bundles of actin without contracting, whereas the addition of a micromolar concentration of calcium in addition to   10 mM magnesium-ATP (contraction solution) (Taylor, D. L, J. S. Condeelis, P. L. Moore, and R. D. Allen. 1973. J. Cell Biol. 59:378-394) initiated the formation of large arrays of F-actin filaments followed by contractions. Furthermore, plasmalemma-ectoplasm ghosts prepared in the relaxation solution exhibited very few straight F-actin filaments and myosin aggregates. In contrast, plasmalemmaectoplasm ghosts treated with the contraction solution contained many straight F-actin filaments and myosin aggregates. The increase in the structure of ameba cytoplasm at the endoplasm-ectoplasm interface can be explained by a combination of the transformation of actin from a less filamentous to a more structured filamentous state possibly involving the cross-linking of actin to form fibrillar arrays (see above-mentioned reference) followed by contractions of the actin and myosin along an undetermined distance of the endoplasm and/or ectoplasm.
Reconstituted actomyosin (ATP phosphohydrolase, EC 3.613) (0.400 mg F-actin/mg myosin) in 10.0 muM ATP loses 96% of its specific ATPase activity when its reaction concentration is decreased from 42.0 mug/ml down to 0.700 mug/ml. The loss of specific activity at the very low enzyme concentrations is prevented by the addition of more F-actin to 17.6 mug/ml. It is concluded that at low actomyosin concentrations the complex dissociates into free myosin with a very low specific ATPase activity and free F-actin with no ATPase. The dissociation of the essential low molecular weight subunits of myosin from the heavy chains at very low actomyosin concentrations may be a contributing factor. Actomyosin has its maximum specific activity at pH 7.8-8.2. The Km for ATP is 9.4 muM, which is at least 20-fold greater than myosin's Km for ATP. The actin-activated ATPase of myosin follows hyperbolic kinetics with varying F-actin concentrations. The Km values for F-actin are 0.110 muM (4.95 mug/ml) at pH 7.4 and 0.241 muM (10.8 mug/ml) at pH 7.8. The actin-activated maximum turnover numbers for myosin are 9.3 s-1 at pH 7.4 and 1  16 s-1 at pH 7.8. The actomyosin ATPase is inhibited by KCl. This KCl inhibition is not competitive with respect to F-actin, and it is not a simple form of non-competitive inhibition.
As previously reported when a specific thiol group, S2, of myosin reacts with N-ethylmaleimide (NEM), its Ca2+-ATPase activity is decreased. Therefore, the reactivity of S2 can be estimated by measuring the decrement of the enzymatic activity. Using the change in the reactivity as a structural probe, we investigated whether F-actin affects the conformation around the region containing S2 under physiological conditions (at neutral pH and low ionic strength).  Experiments were carried out with heavy meromyosin (HMM), S1 of which had heen blocked with NEM, to observe the reactivity of S2 alone. In the experiments done in the presence of F-actin, the Ca2+-ATPase activity was measured using the heavy meromyosin fraction after actin had been removed by centrifugation and gel filtration. 2. ATP and other nucleotides activated the reactivity of S2 in the presence of Mg2+. On the other hand, F-actin markedly activated the reactivity of S2 which had been increased by ATP, but not by the other nucleotides. 3. The above cooperative action of F-actin with ATP was not observed in the presence of Ca2+ instead of Mg2+, or above 0.2 M KCl. These results suggest that the S2 region of the myosin molecule is a key region in the molecular interaction of the actin myosin-ATP system under physiological conditions.
Phallotoxins bind to filamentous actin (F-actin) from liver or rabbit muscle with Kdiss approximately 10(-8) M. By this combination the structure of F-actin is stabilized to such an extent that it will be resistant to the depolymerizing action of 0.6 M KI and of deoxyribonuclease I, to denaturation by heat (70 degrees C), and to local ruptures caused by ultrasonication or by cytochalasin B. The structural features of phallotoxins essential for affinity to F-actin are specific.
In the cytoplasm of well-spread cultured normal fibroblasts, actin is organized into a network of cables that run the length of the cell just inside the adherent cell membrane. A diffuse matrix replaces the cables in fibroblasts that have become tumorigenic as a result of oncogenic transformation. We have found a similar disruption in actin organization in cultured skin fibroblasts (passage 6-10) obtained by biopsy from patients with the inherited colonic cancer, adenomatosis of the colon and rectum (ACR). Because ACR is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait, about half the children of ACR patients will develop colon cancer, but they typically remain asymptomatic until at least the second decade of life. Actin distribution within cultured cells from children of ACR patients was identical either to that seen in cultured cells from normal persons or to that seen in cultured cells from ACR patients. The two different patterns were independent of age, sex, drug treatment, or infections of the donors. Apparently, this class of colonic carcinoma is accompanied by a systemic aberration in the organization of fibroblast cytoplasm, and this aberration can be detected by immunofluorescent localization of actin within cultured skin fibroblasts, prior to manifestation of any colonic symptoms.
Motile extracts have been prepared from Dictyostelium discoideum by homogenization and differential centrifugation at 4 degrees C in a stabilization solution (60). These extracts gelled on warming to 25 degrees Celsius and contracted in response to micromolar Ca++ or a pH in excess of 7.0. Optimal gelation occurred in a solution containing 2.5 mM ethylene glycol-bis (beta-aminoethyl ether)N,N,N',N'-tetraacetate (EGTA), 2.5 mM piperazine-N-N'-bis [2-ethane sulfonic acid] (PIPES), 1 mM MgC1(2), 1 mM ATP, and 20 mM KCI at ph 7.0 (relaxation solution), while micromolar levels of Ca++ inhibited gelation. Conditions that solated the gel elicited contraction of extracts containing myosin. This was true regardless of whether chemical (micromolar Ca++, pH >7.0, cytochalasin B, elevated concentrations of KCI, MgC1(2), and sucrose) or physical (pressure, mechanical stress, and cold) means were used to induce solation. Myosin was definitely required for contraction. During Ca++-or pH-elicited contraction: (a) actin, myosin, and a 95,000-dalton polypeptide were concentrated in the contracted extract; (b) the gelation activity was recovered in the material sqeezed out the contracting extract;(c) electron microscopy demonstrated that the number of free, recognizable F-actin filaments increased; (d) the actomyosin MgATPase activity was stimulated by 4- to 10-fold. In the absense of myosin the Dictyostelium extract did not contract, while gelation proceeded normally. During solation of the gel in the absense of myosin: (a) electron microscopy demonstrated that the number of free, recognizable F- actin filaments increased; (b) solation-dependent contraction of the extract and the Ca++-stimulated MgATPase activity were reconstituted by adding puried Dictyostelium myosin. Actin purified from the Dictyostelium extract did not gel (at 2 mg/ml), while low concentrations of actin (0.7-2 mg/ml) that contained several contaminating components underwent rapid Ca++ regulated gelation. These results indicated : (a) gelation in Dictyostelium extracts involves a specific Ca++-sensitive interaction between actin and several other components; (b) myosin is an absolute requirement for contraction of the extract; (c) actin-myosin interactions capable of producing force for movement are prevented in the gel, while solation of the gel by either physical or chemical means results in the release of F-actin capable of interaction with myosin and subsequent contraction. The effectiveness of physical agents in producting contraction suggests that the regulation of contraction by the gel is structural in nature.
The low pH-induced aggregation of intramembrane particles in human erythrocyte membranes was studied in native membranes and in a reconstituted model system. A significant difference in such aggregation was found when samples of freshly prepared ghosts were compared to ghosts receiving pretreatments that removed most of spectrin-actin from underneath the membrane. All conditions effective in aggregating particles are equally effective in precipitating extracted mixtures of spectrin and actin. In Band 3-lipid recombinants, the pH-induced aggregation of particles was duplicated only in samples containing spectrin-actin that equilibrated with these recombinants in sucrose gradients. Therefore, it was proposed that spectrin-actin components, through their associations with the underlying intramembrane particles, could impede particle lateral mobility and also determine particle redistribution in erythrocyte membrane.
Between the acrosomal vacuole and the nucleus is a cup of amorphous material (profilactin) which is transformed into filaments during the acrosomal reaction. In the center of this cup in untreated Thyone sperm is a dense material which I refer to as the actomere; it is composed of 20-25 filaments embedded in a dense matrix. To visualize the substructure of the actomere, the profilactin around it must be removed. This is achieved either by demembranating the sperm with Triton X-100 and then raising the pH to 8.0, or by adding inophores to intact sperm at pH 8.0. Under these conditions, the actomere remains as a unit while the rest of the profilactin is solubilized or polymerized. When demembranated sperm are incubated under conditions in which the actin should polymerize, filaments grow from the end of the actomere: the actomere thus appears to behave as a nucleating body. This observation is strengthened by experiments in which untreated sperm are incubated in seawater or isotonic NaCl at pH 7.0 and the ionophore X537A is added; in this case, only a partial polymerization of the actin occurs and the acrosomal vacuole does not fuse with the cell surface. The actin filaments that do form, however, are attached to the apical end of the actomere. In fact, the elongating filaments push their way into and frequently through the acrosomal vacuole. Thus, it appears that the sperm organizes the actin filaments by controlling their nucleation. My model is that the cell controls the ammount of unbound actin such that it is slightly above the critical concentration for polymerization. Then, spontaneous nucleation is unfavored and polymerization would proceed from existing nuclei such as the actomer.
We have studied the destruction of purified muscle actin filaments by osmium tetroxide (OsO4) to develop methods to preserve actin filaments during preparation for electron microscopy. Actin filaments are fragmented during exposure to OsO4. This causes the viscosity of solutions of actin filaments to decrease, ultimately to zero, and provides a convenient quantitative assay to analyze the reaction. The rate of filament destruction is determined by the OsO4 concentration, temperature, buffer type and concentration, and pH. Filament destruction is minimized by treatment with a low concentration of OsO4 in sodium phosphate buffer, pH 6.0, at 0 degrees C. Under these conditions, the viscosity of actin filament solutions is stable and actin filaments retain their straight, unbranched structure, even after dehydration and embedding. Under more severe conditions, the straight actin filaments are converted into what look like the microfilament networks commonly observed in cells fixed with OsO4. Destruction of actin filaments can be inhibited by binding tropomyosin to the actin. Cross-linking the actin molecules within a filament with glutaraldehyde does not prevent their destruction by OsO4. The viscosity decrease requires the continued presence of free OsO4. During the time of the viscosity change, OsO4 is reduced and the sulfur-containing amino acids of actin are oxidized, but little of the osmium is bound to the actin. Over a much longer time span, the actin molecules are split into discrete peptides.
Using glutaric dialdehyde, the muscle proteins myosin, actin, actomyosin and heavy meromyosin subfragment-1 (S-1) have been immobilized on capron fibers. The ATPase activity of myosin and its capability to interact with actin have been preserved whereas the ATPase activity of its subfragment decreased significnatly. Immobilization on capron fibers changes the pH dependence of the ATPase activity of myosin and of S-1 shifting the maximum towards the acid zone (pH 5.5) and increases the thermal stability of the enzyme. Calcium ions produce a stimulatory effect on ATPase; Mg2+ions yield no effect on myosin and S-1 but enhance the activity in the case of immobilized actomyosin though to a lesser degree than the ions of Ca2+. Immobilized actin retains its ability to form actomyosin complex.
Normal swine testes, congenital cryptorchid swine testes, and normal human tests were exposed to HMM (heavy meromyosin) after either glycerination or saponin treatment in order to determine whether the fine filaments composing the crystalloids in the Sertoli cells of the cryptorchid swine testes bind HMM to form arrowhead complexes. Short bundles of microfilaments observed in the basal part of the Sertoli cells in both normal and cryptorchid testes also bind HMM. Similar bundles of HMM-bound filaments are observed in the vicinity of spermatocytes. The periodicity of the arrowhead complexes is about 35 nm, and all arrowheads on a given filament point in the same direction. In addition, the polarity of the HMM-bound filaments in a given crystalloid or bundle is uni-directional. A mechanism for the formation of the swine crystalloids has been strongly support this hypothesis. Fine filaments of Charcot-Boettcher's crystalloid in human Sertoli cells did not bind HMM. Therefore the fine filaments of the human crystalloid are not actin-like in nature.
While modification of six lysyl residues causes a near maximal decrease in Ca2+, K+, and actin + Mg2+ -activated myosin ATPase activities in rabbit skeletal muscle myosin, it takes nearly twice this number of modified lysyl groups to cause a similar alteration in canine cardiac myosin where trinitrophenylation is nonspecific. It appears that there are several rapidly reacting lysyl residues in cardiac myosin;  the active site of cardiac myosin is protected by ATP after modification of a limited number of these rapidly reacting lysyl groups. In both myosins, after a charge modification of these rapidly reacting lysyl groups, 6 in rabbit skeletal muscle myosin and 10 in canine cardiac myosin, there is a decrease in Ca2+, K+, and actin + Mg2+ -stimulation of myosin but an activation of Mg2+ -stimulated myosin ATPase activity, thus making actin + Mg2+ -stimulated myosin ATPase activity more like activation with K+ or Ca2+ as compared to activation with Mg2+ alone.
The state of actin in the isolated cortex of the unfertilized sea urchin egg can be controlled by experimentally manipulating the pH of the isolation medium. Cortices isolated at the pH of the unfertilized egg (6.5--6.7) do not contain filamentous actin, while those isolated at the pH of the fertilized egg (7.3--7.5) develop large numbers of microvilli which contain bundles of actin filaments. Cortices that are isolated at pH 6.5 and then transferred to isolation medium buffered at pH 7.5 also develop actin filaments. However, the filaments are not arranged in bundles and microvilli do not form. Although the cortical granules in cortices isolated at pH 6.5 discharge at a free Ca++ concentration of approximately 10 micrometer, actin polymerization is not induced by increasing the Ca++ concentration of the isolation medium. These results suggest that the increase in cytoplasmic pH which occurs following fertilization induces the polymerization of actin in the egg cortex.
Glycerinated diploid microplasmodia of Physarum flavicomum exhibited ATP-dependent contractility typical of actomyosin controlled systems. Actin was isolated from microplasmodia, haploid amoebae-swarm cells, and rabbit skeletal muscle, by classical methods as well as ATP-DEAE cellulose chromatography, and isoelectric focusing. Actins from all three sources had isoelectric points in the pH 6.5-7.0 range, and behaved similarly during the various isolation procedures. SDS-gel electrophoresis revealed that the actin from microplasmodia and muscle had a molecule weight of about 46,000 daltons while the amoebae-swarm cells possessed proteins of molecular weights of about 46,000 and 51,000 daltons.
Ultrastructural and immunohistochemical findings in normal thymus and in myasthenia gravis. Samples of normal human thymus of different ages (4-63 years old) were studied by immunofluorescence microscopy (using antibodies to smooth muscle myosin, to actin from the chicken gizzard, and antibodies to myosin from human striated muscle) as well as by routine electron microscopy. Thymus tissue from myasthenia gravis patients was also investigated for comparative reasons. Epithelial cells reacted with anti-smooth, but not with anti-striated muscle myosin, whereas myoid cells reacted with antibodies to striated, but not to smooth muscle myosin. Both epithelial and myoid cells displayed a strong immunoreactivity with antiactin. Corresponding to this immunoreactivity, both cell types contained bundles of thin, actin-like filaments. Myoid cells occurred in the rounded and elongated variety, and they were a normal constituent of all thymuses investigated in this study. Ultrastructurally, this non-innervated, striated muscle-like cell type possessed bundles of thin and thick filaments as well as Z lines in a rather disorganized arrangement, resembling striated muscle after denervation or various other pathologic conditions. There were no overt differences in the number and structure of myoid cells between healthy and myasthenic patients.
Immunofluorescence studies on human liver from alcoholic patients demonstrate that alcoholic hyaline (Mallory body) binds immune sera containing anti-actin antibodies. These findings, establishing that alcoholic hyaline is endowed with contractile proteins, strongly support the actin microfilament nature of the Mallory body.
Nervous tissue pieces from the caudate nucleus and the substantia nigra of the rat were incubated in cold glycerol solutions of decreasing concentrations and then transferred into standard phosphate buffer (pH 7.0) or into tris-K+-Mg++-Ca++ buffer (pH 7.9) containing HMM, prepared from rabbit skeletal muscle by tryptic digestion. As controls, pieces were immersed for an identical period in the same buffers (1) without HMM or (2) with HMM to which had been added 2.5 mM Na+ pyrophosphate or 5 mM ATP. In control neurons smooth-surfaced microfilaments, about 50 A in diameter, were observed. After reaction with HMM, the microfilaments were increased in number and density and in width to 180-200 A. A meshwork was formed. Arrowheads pointing in the same direction were spaced at regular intervals (300-350 A) among short segments of the surfaces of the microfilaments, depending upon the plane of section. More often, however, typical arrowheads were not observed, and the surfaces of the microfilaments were seen coated with polarized side-arms cross-bridging the spaces between adjacent elements at more or less regular intervals. When cross-sectioned, the microfilaments appeared as dense dots from which a material of lesser electron density radiated. Following incubation in HMM solutions containing Na+ pyrophosphate or ATP, no arrowhead structures were seen. Of particular interest was the structural relation of the actin-like filaments with occasional, tapered myosin-like filaments, and with the plasma membrane, which served as anchor points. Mitochondria and smooth ER membranes were observed to be attached to the actin-like filaments or enmeshed in the network. The microtubules, as well as most of the neurofilaments, were disrupted by the glycerination procedure at 4 degrees, and thus no precision about the structural relationship of the actin-like filaments with the latter elements could be added. The role of the actin-like filaments in the transport of material, by a mechanism of chemomechanical transduction, throughout the neuron from sites of synthesis to functional locations, and between several functional locations, is discussed.
To identify structures involved in the translocation of the synaptic vesicles towards the presynaptic membrane, an ultrastructural study has been undertaken by means of (1) the E-PTA stain and (2) the HMM-labeling procedure. Using serial sections of E-PTA stained nervous tissue, especially those made in transversal and tangential planes, the geometric order of the presynaptic grid and of its constituents has been described in detail. It consisted of dense projections having the shape of small truncated pyramids cut parallel to their hexagonal bases which rested on the electron-lucent presynaptic membrane. The dense projections were arranged at the points of equilateral triangles. Around each dense projection, six asymmetric hexagonal holes were seen to be arrayed in an hexagonal pattern, forming thus the presynaptic sieve. From the spiny tops of the dense projections, which appeared as specialized structures of the dense material coating the inner surface of the plasma membrane at the level of the synaptic cleft, fine filaments, 40--60 A in diameter, radiated and formed a three-dimensional meshwork pervading the presynaptic bag. The dense cytoplasmic coating delineating the plasma membrane served as anchor points for these microfilaments. Upon incubation with rabbit skeletal muscle HMM the microfilaments underwent specific structural changes, consisting of: (1) a striking increase in diameter; (2) the association of periodic and polarized substructures with their surfaces. The synaptic vesicles and mitochondria were seen to be attached to the numerous HMM-decorated filaments or enmeshed in the network formed by these filaments. The actin-like filaments were anchored to the plasma membrane at many points and to the presynaptic dense projections. Following incubation in the buffer alone or in buffer HMM solutions containing Na+ pyrophosphate or ATP, no arrowheaded structures were observed. Thus, a network consisting of actin-like filaments was demonstrated in the presynaptic bag. Of particular interest was the structural relation of the actin-like filaments with the occasional, tapered myosin-like filaments. The role of the presynaptic actin-like network in the transport of synaptic vesicles towards the presynaptic membrane by a mechanism of chemomechanical transduction is discussed. In the postsynaptic dendrite or dendritic spine, a filamentous network was observed to be attached to the subsynaptic web by means of the E-PTA stain and of the HMM-labeling procedure. The occurrence of an actin-like meshwork in the postsynaptic region is suggested to produce changes in the macromolecular configuration of the postsynaptic membrane by a "mechanoenzyme" system similar to that described in the mitochondrial membrane.
125I-labelled sheep anti-rabbit gamma-globulin antibodies were used to locate rabbit antibodies to smooth- and striated-muscle actomyosins at the surface of trypsin-dissociated embryonic chick cells. Statistical analysis of electron microscope autoradiographs revealed that the plasma membrane of these cells was significantly labelled with both antibodies. Further tests revealed that there were a significantly greater number of antigenic sites present on the cell surface for the gizzard smooth-muscle antibodies than for those against pectoralis straited-muscle actomyosin. It was further shown that both the rate and extent of binding of the 125I-labelled smooth-muscle actomyosin antibodies to the cells were greater than for anti-straited-muscle gamma-globulins. Binding of the former was reduced to a level similar to that of 125I-NIS conjugate by preincubation of the gamma-globulins with smooth-muscle heavy meromyosin, while a simiar reduction was observed when anti-pectoralis actomyosin was treated with actin. It was concluded that actin- and myosin-like proteins must now be considered as integral components of the plasma membrane.
Protein synthesis elongation factor Tu from E. coli shares several physical, chemical, and functional properties with actin-like proteins. Limited tryptic degradation indicates that the two polypeptides have a similar molecular architecture. These observations suggest that they could have evolved from a common ancestor, although more information will be necessary to prove or disprove this hypothesis. A partial sequence, comprising 22 aminoacid residues from the aminoterminal end of the large tryptic fragment of elongation factor Tu is presented.
A light and electron microscope study. Fluorescein-labeled heavy meromyosin subfragment-1 (F-S-1) has been purified by ion exchange chromatography and characterized in terms of its ability to bind specifically to actin. F-S-1 activates the Mg++-adenosine triphosphatase activity of rabbit skeletal muscle actin and decorates actin as shown by negative stains and thin sections of rabbit actin and rat embryo cell microfilament bundles, respectively. Binding of F-S-1 to cellular structures is prevented by pyrophosphate and by competition with excess unlabeled S- The F-S-1 is used in light microscope studies to determine the distribution of actin-containing structures in wnterphase and mitotic rat embryo and rat kangaroo cells. Interphase cells display the familiar pattern of fluorescent stress fibers. Chromosome-to-pole fibers are fluorescent in mitotic cells. The glycerol extraction procedures employed provide an opportunity to examine cells prepared in an identical manner by light and electron microscopy. The latter technique reveals that actin-like microfilaments are identifiable in spindles of glycerinated cells before and after addition of S-1 or HMM. In some cases, microfilaments appear to be closely associated with spindle microtubles. Comparison of the light and electron microscope results aids in the evaluation of the fluorescent myosin fragment technique and provides further evidence for possible structural and functional roles of actin in the mitotic apparatus.
With immunofluorescence technique by using specific antibodies, polymerized actin (F-actin) was found to be present in the peripheral parts of the cells in all layers of epidermis from lesional skin taken from twelve psoriatics, whereas normal epidermis from the same individuals showed no such reactivity. This finding might have some bearing on the induction of these lesions.
Experiments have been carried out on the capping by lectins and antibodies of surface receptors of mouse splenic T and B lymphocytes and other cells, in which the surface distribution of the lectin or antibody, and the intracellular distribution of myosin or actin, were determined on the same cells by a double fluorescence technique. For this purpose, a general method for intracellular staining was developed which is intended to preserve sensitive antigens and fragile ultrastructural elements. The method involves mild formaldehyde fixation of the cells or tissues, infusion with concentrated sucrose, rapid freezing, and the preparation of frozen sections thinner than 1 micrometer thickness. The immunofluorescent or other appropriate fluorescent reagents are then applied to the thawed section. In the present experiments, intracellular actin was detected using a fluorescent staining method based on the interaction of F-actin with heavy meromyosin, while intracellular myosin was detected by an indirect immunofluorescence procedure. Our findings were that the formation of a cap by each of the lectins or antibody reagents was always accompanied by a concentration of myosin and actin directly under the cap. These and other results suggest that capping is an active process in which actin and myosin participate directly in the formation of all caps. This proposal carries important new implications for the molecular mechanism of capping.
Six fetal and 10 neonatal rat or mouse stomachs and a 14-week human fetal stomach were examined for immunofluorescence reactivity with four sera containing parietal cell antibody (PCA) and four other sera containing smooth muscle antibody (SMA). In rat and mouse stomachs, parietal cells first reacted with PCA in 19-day fetal stomachs and with SMA in two-day neonatal rat stomachs or newly-born mouse stomachs. SMA reactivity with fetal rodent stomachs was restricted to the cytoplasm of smooth muscle, the apices of gastric mucosal cells, and the cytoplasm of fibroblasts surrounding invaginating gastric pits. In the 14-week human fetal stomach, parietal cells stained with PCA but not with SMA. Specificity of the staining reactions was established by the complete inhibition of PCA staining by serum absorption with a gastric microsomal fraction but not with actin. Conversely, the SMA staining was abolished by serum immunoabsorption with actin but not with microsomal fraction. These observations, indicating that the development of the parietal cell microsomal antigen precedes that of actin, may be used to distinguish between the staining of parietal cells by SMA and PCA.
Axonally transported proteins were studied in guinea pig retinal ganglion cells using the standard radioisotopic labeling procedure. Two slowly moving groups of proteins were identified in guinea pig retinal ganglion cells. The more slowly moving group of proteins, designated slow component a (SCa) was transported at 0.2-0.5 mm/day. Five polypeptides contained greater than 75% of the total radioactivity transported in SCa. Two of these polypeptides correspond to the subunits of tubulin, while the other three correspond to the slow component triplet. The other slowly moving group of proteins, which is designated slow component b (SCb), was transported at approximately 2 mm/day. Twenty labeled polypeptides were identified in SCb. The major labeled polypeptides transported in SCb differ from those transported in SCa. One of the polypeptides transported in SCb co-migrates with skeletal muscle actin in SDS-polyacrylamide slab gels. This polypeptide behaved identically to skeletal muscle actin on DNaseI affinity columns. Since DNaseI is a highly specific affinity ligand for actin, we conclude that the labeled SCb polypeptide which comigrates with actin in SDS-gels is actin. Between   14 and 5.7% of the total radioactivity transported in SCb is attributable to action. Detailed comparison of the distribution of total radioactivity in the optic axons with the distribution of radioactive actin in the optic axons at post-injection times between 6 and 77 days showed that actin was transported specifically in SCb, and not in SCa. Furthermore, analyses of the proteins transported in the fast component of guinea pig retinal ganglion cells by DNaseI affinity chromatography failed to reveal an actin-like moiety. Slow component a, SCb and the fast component are the major components of axonal transport in guinea pig retinal ganglion cells. Thus, in these neurons, actin is transported principally and possibly only in SCb. Guinea pig retinal ganglion cell axons project principally to the lateral geniculate nucleus and superior colliculus. The fate of actin axonally transported to the region of the axon terminals was studied by determining the kinetics by which radioactivity associated with actin accumulates and then decays in the superior colliculus. The results of these studies indicate that labeled actin has a half-life in the superior colliculus of approximately 28 days.
Incubation of rat neural lobes with heavy meromyosin (HMM) after prolonged glycerination, induced characteristic arrowhead decoration of a number of microfilaments at different levels of the neurosecretory axons. In non terminal sections of axons the labelled microfilaments showed preferential relationships with microtubules in addition to occasional contacts with the axolemma and various axonal organelles. In axonal endings, they were mainly associated to microvesicles and appeared to be anchored on the axolemma facing the perivascular space at the level of membranous densifications.
We have studied actin-containing filaments in spindles in Haemanthus endosperm cells glycerinated by various methods; the actin-containing filaments were identified by their reaction with rabbit skeletal muscle heavy meromyosin (HMM) to form 'decorated' filaments. Actin-containing filaments in the spindle were seen in amongst microtubules in bundles (both non-kinetochore microtubule bundles and kinetochore microtuble bundles) and were also seen not associated with microtubules. There were very few extra-spindle actin-containing filaments in these cells. Actin-containing filaments seemed to interact with microtubules, because the filaments remained close to and parallel to microtubules even when the microtubules were sharply curved. Because of the close association between microtubules and actin-containing filaments we could not identify all the actin-containing filaments present in microtubule bundles: microtubules obscured actin-containing filaments. We studied Haemanthus endosperm cells as they were glycerinated. For some of these observations we used phase-contrast microscopy. Glycerination caused the cells to shrink, initially, and this was followed by rapid expansion, but the cells did not expand to as large a volume as before glycerination. Spindle structure was maintained despite these changes in cell size. Evidences for this are that relative chromosome positions were maintained during glycerination, that spindle birefringence was maintained during glycerination, and that individual chromosomal spindle fibres remained birefringent during glycerination. Electron-microscopic observations supported this in that kinetochore microtubule bundles and non-kinetochore microtubule bundle were maintained during glycerination, as was the helical arrangement of spindle ribosomes into polyribosomes. One-step glycerination procedures were used (cells were treated with mixtures containing 25% glycerol, Triton-X-100 and HMM), and such procedures might be of general use. Living cells were embedded in fibrin clots in making light-microscopic observations; this procedure, too, might be of general use.
Application to actin cables in Chara. A liquid barrier filter for use in fluorescence microscopy of strongly autofluorescent plant tissues is described. The filter consists of a methanol solution of cupric chloride and ferric chloride and isolates fluorescein fluorescence from the strong red autofluorescence of photosynthetic plant tissues. Subcortical actin cables in the giant alga Chara are being visualized through use of this filter together with heavy meromyosin labeling.
An electron microscopic study was performed on the trabecular meshwork of two monkeys (cercopithecus aethiops). Specimens from one animal revealed numerous cytoplasmic filaments of 45-65 A thickness in endothelial cells both on the trabeculae in the wall of Schlemm's canal after conventional glutaraldehyde and osmium fixation. Using a histochemical technique it was shown in specimens from the other animal that these filaments consist of actin material. This evidence of intracellular actin filaments in the trabecular endothelium indicates that these cells have contractile properties, and the possible significance of this finding for the regulation of outflow facility of aqueous humour is suggested.
The production of actin antisera in rabbits was described and their reaction in various immunological tests were compared with the results obtained with human anti-actin sera (smooth muscle antibodies). Even if the sera may react with different antigenic determinants of actin as suggested by results in immunoprecipitation and blocking experiments, the rabbit and human sera can be used for studies of cells with equal or similar results. A prerequisite was that the rabbit anti-actin titres were high. The difficulty in obtaining strong anti-actin sera in rabbits was confirmed.
The purpose of this study was to gain information which might be helpful in understanding the influence of palate surgery on abnormal maxillary growth. The finding of actin-rich cells in the granulation tissue of palatal wounds supports the hypothesis that one of the functions of those cells is contraction--and the latter subsequently leads to convergence of the wound margins and aberrations in growth of the underlying skeletal tissue. Much additional information is needed for final proof of that hypothesis. At present little is known about the initiation, regulation, or control of the proposed contractile phenomena, or the process of aberrent maxillary growth. Such information will be necessary for further development of clinical techniques that will allow normal maxillofacial growth after surgery on the palate at an early age.
Complex formation with fibrin. Guinea pig megakaryocytes were isolated from femoral marrow and cultured in the presence of radioactive amino acids. Radioactivity was incorporated into several proteins including a 42 000 dalton polypeptide identified as actin by DNAase agarose affinity chromatography. Quantitative immunoelectrophoresis of megakaryocyte extract revealed that 3.0% of the total solubilized cellular protein was fibrinogen. Immunoabsorption studies using anti guinea pig fibrinogen beads failed to reveal the presence of newly synthesized radioactive fibrinogen in the cellular extract, however, radioactive actin was detected in the eluates obtained from the immune beads. When guinea pig fibrinogen was clotted with thrombin in the presence of radioactive megakaryocyte extract, a complex formed between a high molecular weight species of fibrin and actin. No actin fibrinogen complex was detected. The results suggest that actin synthesized by megakaryocytes complexes with fibrin formed from a relatively large pool of non-radioactive intracellular fibrinogen.
Conformational changes associated with the functional states of the molecule of troponin were studied using SH-direct fluorogenic reagents, N-(p-(2-benzimidazolyl)phenyl) maleimide (BIPM) and N-(1-anilinonaphthyl-4) maleimide (ANM).  The fluorescence parameters of ANM-troponin, intensity, and polarization, did not change on combining it with tropomyosin alone, but markedly changed when F-actin was further added to the system. 2. The conformation around the dye-labeled sulfhydryl group(s) was shown to be susceptible to Ca2+ in terms of fluorescence intensity of the label, thermal transition of the conformation, and the microenvironment near the label. 3. On addition of Ca2+, the fluorescence characteristics of the two systems, ANM-troponin . tropomyosin and ANM-troponin . tropomyosin . F-actin complexes, were altered in opposite directions. When BIPM was used in place of ANM, similar changes were observed: a simple decrease in the intensity when pCa was decreased from 7.4 to 5.5 in the system without F-actin and a sigmoidal increase in the range from pCa 7 to 6 in the system with F-actin. Heavy meromyosin, when added to the latter complex (the reconstituted thin filaments), made the profile of its Ca2+ concentration dependence of fluorescence similar to that of the former complex. When tropomyosin was labeled in place of troponin, similar results were obtained. The data obtained imply that the Ca2+-induced conformational changes of troponin are markedly modified when detached from actin, and that heavy meromyosin weakens the interaction of the troponin . tropomyosin complex with F-actin.
Two human sera with antibodies against smooth muscle were used to investigate the distribution of actin in moving oral epithelial cells by immunocytochemical methods. Epithelial outgrowths from explants of rat and human oral mucosa  showed a constant positive staining in the peripheral parts of the marginal cells but not in the more central parts of the epithelial sheet. This is in agreement with theories of the importance of the marginal cells in the migratory behavior of the epithelial outgrowth. Subcultured epithelial cells from the human explants showed positive staining of fine fibers in the cytoplasm. During healing of experimental oral wounds from humans and monkeys actin fibers could be demonstrated in only one of 18 cases in the epithelial cells adjacent to the wound, though positive staining of various cells was seen in the underlying tissue. This is in contrast to the evidence presented in previous studies of cells taking part in the re-epithelialization process.
Addition of low concentrations (0.2--2.0 mM) of EGTA to rabbit skeletal muscle G-actin in the presence of ATP caused increase in viscosity. The effect is probably due to chelation of Ca2+. EGTA-polymerized actin was sedimented in the ultracentrifuge as a pellet which could be depolymerized in the presence of Ca2+ and then repolymerized. Electron microscopy indicated that formation of filamentous actin which appears to be somewhat more flexible than F-actin obtained by polymerization with KCl. The EGTA-polymerized actin was dissociated by DNAase I faster than KCl-polymerized actin. F-Actin can thus be stable also in very low ionic strength media if Ca2+ is removed whereas for G-actin to be the only form of the protein in such media, micromolar concentrations of Ca2+ must be present.
We purified actin antibodies by affinity chromatography from the serum of rabbits immunized with glutaraldehyde-fixed chicken gizzard actin filaments and used this anti-actin to localize actin in myofibrils and fixed cultured cells at each stage of the cell cycle. By double immunodiffusion the anti-actin reacted with both smooth and skeletal muscle actin. Several blocking and absorption experiments demonstrated that the antibodies also bound specifically to actin in nonmuscle cells. The same structures stained using either the direct or the indirect fluorescent antibody technique; and, while the indirect method was more sensitive, the direct method was superior because there was no detectable nonspecific staining. As expected, anti-actin stained the I-band of myofibrils. It also stained stress fibers and membrane ruffles in HeLa cells. Some PtK-2 cells have straight stress fibers which stained with anti-actin, but in confluent cultures all PtK-2 cells have, instead, sinuous phase-dense fibers which stained with antibody. At prophase the whole cytoplasm stained uniformly with anti-actin. During metaphase and anaphase, anti-actin staining was concentrated diffusely in the mitotic spindle. In contrast, fluorescent heavy meromyosin stained discrete fine spindle fibers in these fixed cells. During cytokinesis, anti-actin stained the whole cytoplasm uniformly and was not concentrated in the cleavage furrow.
In continuous lines of cultured Drosophila cells two forms of cytoplasmic actin, designated II and III, are detected after a 25- to 120-min pulse label with [35S]methionine. However, only one of these, actin II, accumulates in the cell. With the use of a pulse-chase protocol and two-dimensional gel electrophoresis, it has been found that actin III is synthesized as a precursor of the more stable cytoplasmic actin II. The half-life of actin III was estimated to be approximately 50 min.
The tissue and developmental specificities of the three Drosophila isoactins, originally identified in primary myogenic cultures and in the permanent Schneider L-2 cell line, have been investigated. Of these three isoactins (I, II, and III), actins I and II are stable and actin III is unstable. Two-dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoretic analyses of total cellular extracts after 1-h [(35)S]methionine pulses were performed on a large variety of embryonic, larval, and adult muscle and nonmuscle tissues. The results suggest that isoactins II and III are generalized cellular actins found in all drosophila cell types. Actin I, on the other hand, is muscle-associated and is found exclusively in supercontractile muscle (such as larval body wall and larval and adult viscera) including primary myogenic cell cultures. Although actin I synthesis is not detectable during very early embryogenesis, it is detectable by 25 h and actin I is a major stable actin in all larval muscle tissues. Actin I is synthesized in reduced amounts relative to the other actins in late third instar larvae but is again a major product of actin synthesis in the adult abdomen. A stable actin species with the same pI as actin III has been identified in the adult thorax and appears to be unique to flight muscle tissue. This new stable form of thoracic actin may be the result of a stabilization of the actin III found in other tissues or may be an entirely separate gene product.
The effect of thrombin stimulation on actin organization in human platelets has been analyzed by using the DNase I inhibition assay, which is selective for unpolymerized and filamentous actin. The results provide biochemical evidence for the suggestion that stimulation leads to rapid polymerization of actin. The measurements also reveal changes in the polymerization state of actin occurring after cell lysis. These changes are influenced by the concentration of free calcium in the extracts.
A fibrillar protein complex, possessing ouabain-insensitive Ca2+-ATPase activity was isolated from human erythrocyte membranes by using a low ionic strength extraction procedure. Mg2+-ATPase activity was revealed upon addition of rabbit skeletal muscle actin, thus demonstrating the presence of a myosin-like protein in the crude extract of the erythrocyte membrane. Upon sodium dodecylsulfate gel electrophoresis, the extract showed mainly the doublet of subunit molecular weight bands of 230 000 and 210 000, and more than 10 faster moving bands. Gel filtration of the erythrocyte membrane extract on Sepharose 4B furnished 4 fractions. Fraction I, containing the doublet and 80 000, 60 000 and 46 000 subunit molecular weight bands was 5-fold purified with respect to Ca2+-ATPase activity, but was devoid of actin-activated Mg2+-ATPase activity. Fraction II, containing only the doublet, was devoid of Ca2+ and actin-activated Mg2+-ATPase activity. The 210 000 subunit molecular weight protein could be phosphorylated in the presence of Mg2+ in the crude extract and Fraction I but not in Fraction II.
Beta-Actinin, a regulatory protein of muscle, greatly decreased the dynamic rigidity modulus of an acto-heavy meromyosin solution. However, it was found that the mechanical mixing procedure used resulted in fragmentation of the decorated F-actin particles and beta-actinin inhibited the reassociation of the fragmented particles. This was the reason for the decrease of the dynamic rigidity modulus of the acto-heavy meromyosin complex caused by beta-actinin. When beta-actinin was added to the acto-heavy meromyosin solution in the presence of ATP, it did not affect the visco-elasticity. F-actin particles dissociated by ATP were not fragmented by the mixing procedure, which was responsible for the apparent inactivation of beta-actinin in the presence of ATP.
Actin, myosin, and a high molecular weight actin-binding protein were extracted from rabbit alveolar macrophages with low ionic strength sucrose solutions containing ATP, EDTA, and dithiothreitol, pH 7.0. Addition of KCl, 75 to 100 mM, to sucrose extracts of macrophages stirred at 25 degrees caused actin to polymerize and bind to a protein of high molecualr weight. The complex precipitated and sedimented at low centrifugal forces. Macrophage actin was dissociated from the binding protein with 0.6 M KCl, and purified by repetitive depolymerization and polymerization. Purified macrophage actin migrated as a polypeptide of molecular weight 45,000 on polyacrylamide gels with dodecyl sulfate, formed extended filaments in 0.1 M KCl, bound rabbit skeletal muscle myosin in the absence of Mg-2+ATP and activated its Mg-2+ATPase activity. Macrophage myosin was bound to actin remaining in the macrophage extracts after removal of the actin precipitated with the high molecular weight protein by KCl. The myosin-actin complex and other proteins were collected by ultracentrifugation. Macrophage myosin was purified from this complex or from a 20 to 50% saturated ammonium sulfate fraction of macrophage extracts by gel filtration on agarose columns in 0.6 M Kl and 0.6 M Kl solutions. Purified macrophage myosin had high specific K-+- and EDTA- and K-+- and Ca-2+ATPase activities and low specific Mg-2+ATPase activity. It had subunits of 200,000, 20,000, and 15,000 molecular weight, and formed bipolar filaments in 0.1 M KCl, both in the presence and absence of divalent cations. The high molecular weight protein that precipitated with actin in the sucrose extracts of macrophages was purified by gel filtration in 0.6 M Kl-0.6 M KCl solutions. It was designated a macrophage actin-binding protein, because of its association with actin at physiological pH and ionic strength. On polyacrylamide gels in dodecyl sulfate, the purified high molecular weight protein contained one band which co-migrated with the lighter polypeptide (molecular weight 220,000) of the doublet comprising purified rabbit erythrocyte spectrin. The macrophage protein, like rabbit erythrocyte spectrin, was soluble in 2 mM EDTA and 80% ethanol as well as in 0.6 M KCl solutions, and precipitated in 2 mM CaCl2 or 0.075 to 0.1 M KCl solutions. The macrophage actin-binding protein and rabbit erythrocyte spectrin eluted from agarose columns with a KAV of 0.24 and in the excluded volumes. The protein did not form filaments in 0.1 M KCl and had no detectable ATPase activity under the conditions tested.
Alveolar macrophage myosin Mg-2+-adenosine triphosphatase requires a cofactor for activation by actin. The interactions were analyzed between actin, myosin, and a recently discovered high molecular weight actin-binding protein (Hartwig, J. H, and Stossel, T. P. (1975) J. Biol Chem.250,5696-5705) of rabbit alveolar macrophages. Purified rabbit alveolar macrophage or rabbit skeletal muscle F-actins did not activate the Mg2+ATPase activity of purified rabbit alveolar macrophage myosin unless an additional cofactor, partially purified from macrophage extracts, was added. The Mg2+ATPase activity of cofactor-activated macrophage actomyosin was as high as 0.6 mumol of Pi/mg of myosin protein/min at 37 degrees. The macrophage cofactor increased the Mg2+ATPase activity of rabbit skeletal muscle actomyosin, and calcium regulated the Mg2+ATPase activity of cofactor-activited muscle actomyosin in the presence of muscle troponins and tropomyosin. However, the Mg2+ATPase activity of macrophage actomyosin in the presence of the cofactor was inhibited by muscle control proteins, both in the presence and absence of calcium. The Mg2+ATPase activity of the macrophage actomyosin plus cofactor, whether assembled from purified components or studied in a complex collected from crude macrophage extracts, was not influenced by the presence of absence of calcium ions. Therefore, as described for Acanthamoeba castellanii myosin (Pollard, T. D, and Korn, E. D. (1973) J. Biol. Chem. 248, 4691-4697), rabbit alveolar macrophage myosin requires a cofactor for activation of its Mg2+ATPase activity by F-actin; and no evidence was found for participation of calcium ions in the regulation of this activity. In macrophage extracts containing 0.34 M sucrose, 0.5 mM ATP, and 0.05 M KCl at pH 7.0,the actin-binding protein bound F-actin into bundles with interconnecting bridges. Purified macrophage actin-binding protein in 0.1 M KCl at pH 7.0 also bound purified macrophage F-actin into filament bundles. Macrophage myosin bound to F-actin in the absence but not the presence of Mg2+ATP, but the actin-binding protein did not bind to macrophage myosin in either the presence or absence of Mg2+ATP.
When stoichiometric amounts of tropomyosin (TM) are bound to F-actin in the presence of 2 mM ATP, the MG2+-activated acto-heavy meromyosin (HMM) ATPase is inhibited by about 60% in 5 mM MgCl2-30 mM KCl. If the concentration of MgCl2 is reduced to 1 mM, the inhibition disappears because TM no longer binds to F-actin. Increasing the concentration of KCl to 100 mM restores both the binding and the inhibition. Thus, the binding of TM alone to F-actin causes significant inhibition of the ATPase provided that the HMM is saturated with ATP. (When the HMM is not saturated, TM activates the ATPase). When TM alone can bind stoichiometrically to F-actin, addition of troponin I (TN-I) increases the inhibition from 60% to about 85%, but the TM binding to F-actin is not affected. Under conditions such that TM alone neither inhibits the acto-HMM ATPase nor binds to F-actin, the inhibition caused by TN-I plus TM still approaches 100%. Direct binding studies under these conditions show that TN-I induces binding between TM and F-actin. A dual role for TN-I is proposed: first, TN-I can induce TM to bind to F-actin, causing inhibition of the ATPase; and second, TN-I can itself enhance the inhibition of the ATPase in a cooperative manner. The addition of TN-C in the absence of CA2+ has only a limited effect on the first role, but seems to be able to block completely the cooperative inhibition caused by TN-I such that the residual inhibition is a function only of the TM which remains bound.
Distribution of actin control and myosin control in the animal kingdom. The control systems regulating muscle contraction in approximately 100 organisms have been categorized. Both myosin control and actin control operate simultaneously in the majority of invertebrates tested. These include insects, chelicerates, most crustaceans, annelids, priapulids, nematodes, and some sipunculids. Single myosin control is present in the muscles of molluscs, brachiopods, echinoderms, echiuroids, and nemertine worms. Single actin control was found in the fast muscles of decapods, in mysidacea, in a single sipunculid species, and in vertebrate striated muscles. Classification is based on functional tests that include measurements of the calcium dependence of the actomyosin ATPase activity in the presence and the absence of purified rabbit actin and myosin. In addition, isolated thin filaments and myosins were also analyzed. Molluscs lack actin control since troponin is not present in sufficient quantities. Even though the functional tests indicate the complete lack of myosin control in vertebrate striated muscle, it is difficult to exclude unambiguously the in vivo existence of this regulation. Both control systems have been found in animals from phyla which evolved early. We cannot ascribe any simple correlation between ATPase activity, muscle structure, and regulatory mechanisms.
We measured the binding of [14C]iodoacetamide labeled heavy meromyosin subfragment-1 (S-1) to F-actin by sedimenting the actin-S-1 complex and assaying the radioactivity remaining in the supernatant. The apparent dissociation constants (Kd) at 25 degrees, pH 7.0, were 0.01 to 0.04 muM at 0.027 and 0.08 ionic strengths and 0.07 to 0.14 muM at 0.14 ionic strength. Kd was not altered when the troponin-tropomyosin complex was bound on the actin, nor was it affected by free calcium concentration in the range 10(-4) to 10(-9) M. Measurements of the displacement of labeled S-1 from actin by native S-1 showed labeling had not altered Kd. In control experiments we found that at the low actin concentrations used (0.001-0.5 muM) not all of the actin sedimented and, furthermore, the data suggested that some of the S-1 in the supernatant was bound to supernatant actin. Our estimation of Kd, based on the assumption that all the supernatant S-1 was free, therefore resulted in an apparent Kd greater than the true Kd. We minimized the effect of the supernatant actin artefact by using only the data for high ratios of S-1 to actin, where no less than 75% of the actin sedimented; we estimate that the true Kd values could not be less than half the apparent Kd values.
The cyclic peptide phalloidin, one of the toxic components of Amanita phalloides prevented the drop of viscosity of F-actin solutions after the addition of 0.6 M KI and inhibited the ATP splitting of F-actin during sonic vibration. The data concerning ATP splitting are consistent with the assumption (a) that only 1 out of every 3 actin units of the filaments needs to be combined with phalloidin in order to suppress the contribution of these 3 actins to the ATPase activity of the filament and (b) that all actin units of the filaments can combine with phalloidin with a very high affinity. -halloidin did not only stabilize the actin-actin bonds in the F-actin structure but it also increased the rate of polymerization of G-actin to F-actin. The ability of F-actin to activate myosin ATPase was not affected by phalloidin. The tropomyosin-troponin complex did not prevent the stabilizing effect of phalloidin on the F-actin structure.
The bindings of troponin components to actin and tropomyosin has been studied by cosedimentation with actin and affinity chromatography. It is shown that troponin binds to actin and tropomyosin in the presence and absence of calcium but the binding to actin is sensitive to ionic strength. Troponin-I + C binds to actin-tropomyosin in the absence of calcium but not to actin or tropomyosin alone. Troponin-I binds to actin and the binding is improved in the presence of tropomyosin even though troponin-I does not bind to tropomyosin alone. Troponin-C does not bind to actin or tropomyosin. The results suggest that the binding of troponin by actin is influenced by tropomyosin. A model of regulation by troponin is proposed.
The effect of F-actin upon the binding of ADP to rabbit skeletal muscle myosin, heavy meromyosin, and subfragment 1 was studied by equilibrium dialysis, ultracentrifuge transport, and light scattering techniques. Both myosin and H-meromyosin (HMM) bind a maximum of approximately   16 mol of ADP/mol of protein, while S-1 binds approximately 0.9 mol of ADP/mol of protein. The affinity for ADP of all three preparations was similar at a given ionic strength (approximately 10(6) M-1 at 0.05 M KCl) and decreased with increasing ionic strength. Under conditions similar to those used for the measurement of ADP binding, the binding sites of myosin, HMM, and subfragment 1 (S-1) are saturated with actin at molar ratios of 2, 2, and 1 mol of actin monomer/mol of protein, respectively, as determined by light scattering, ultracentrifuge transport, and in the case of myosin by ATPase measurements. F-actin was found to inhibit ADP binding, but even at an actin concentration at least twice that required for saturation of myosin, HMM, or S-1, significant ADP binding remained. This ADP binding was inhibited by 10(-4) M pyrophosphate. The observations are consistent with the formation of an actomyosin-ADP complex in which actin and ADP are bound to myosin at distinct but interacting sites.
The extent of actin polymerization has been studied for samples in which the bound nucleotide of the actin was ATP, ADP, or an analog of ATP that was not split (AMPPNP). The equilibrium constants for the addition of a monomer to a polymer end were determined from the concentration of monomer coexisting with the polymer. An analysis of these results concludes that the bound ATP on G-actin provides little energy to promote the polymerization of the actin. AMPPNP was incorporated into F-actin and the interaction of F-actin - AMPPNP with  myosin was studied. F-actin - AMPPNP activated the ATPase of myosin to the same extent as did F-actin - ADP. However, the rate of superprecipitation was slower in the case of F-actin - AMPPNP than in the control.
Time-dependent fluorescence depolarization and lifetime studies have been made on myosin subfragment 1 to obtain information about mobility changes and dye environment changes when different nucleotides are added. Data are reported for static and actively hydrolyzing systems containing G- and F-actin. Preliminary data indicate that myosin labeled with the fluorophore 1, 5 IAEDANS and treated with DTT preserves its actin-activated Vmax. S1 prepared in this manner gives lifetime changes which are nearly identical for all systems studied. S1 labeling without DTT addition gives a pattern of lifetimes similar, though not identical to ESR work. Either type of labeling produces no observable change in the polarization decay, and we set an upper limit of 15% length change for the elongate S An unusually long fluorescence decay lifetime for the S1-Mg++ ATP-G-actin system is found which may indicate a new acto-S1 state stabilized by G-actin. The method for obtaining the bound fraction of S1's in the presence of actin is presented and applied to the S1-F-actin-Mg++ ATP system. Qualitative agreement is obtained with other methods.
G-actin has been nitrated with tetranitromethane in conditions that lead to the modification of one tyrosine residue. The reactive residue was found by earlier workers to be Tyr-69. The nitrated actin is conformationally similar to native G-actin, as judged by sedimentation velocity and circular dichroism analysis. A small proportion only is in the form of covalently linked dimers and trimers. The nitrated G-actin will polymerise to form filaments, indistinguishable in the electron microscope from those of native F-actin, but the polymerisation process is slower. Reduction of the nitrophenol group to the corresponding aminophenol leaves the properties of the protein in respect of polymerisation unchanged. When a dansyl group is introduced at the same point, however, the ability of the actin to polymerise is lost. The nitrated actin and its reduced counterpart will also bind heavy meromyosin, and the characteristic arrowhead formation of the bound molecules along the filaments can be seen in the electron microscope. Neither of the modified F-actins, however, significantly activates or inhibits the myosin ATPase activity. The fluorescence of nitrated actin is strongly quenched through the presence of the nitrophenol chromophore. In soluble complexes with heavy meromyosin the fluorescence is indistinguishable from the sum of the separate contributions of the two protein components. There is thus no measurable excitation transfer between any tryptophan residues on the myosin heads, such as that inferred to be present in the ATPase site, and the nitrotyrosine in position 69 of the actin sequence. Implications of this observation are considered in relation to the different interaction sites in myosin and in actin. The activation of heavy meromyosin ATPase by copolymers containing actin and nitroactin in different proportions has been measured, and is not proportional to the fraction of native actin. The results are consistent with the view that the function of actomyosin depends on the interaction of the myosin heads with more than one actin subunit.
Solution of thrombosthenin, the contractile protein complex isolated from pig platelets, have been studied by analytical ultracentrifugation and zone sedimentation in sucrose density gradients. Freshly prepared thrombosthenin in 0.6 M KCl shows a prominent peak in the ultracentrifuge with S degrees 20w about 5.5 and higher molecular weight aggregates (greater than 100S) sedimenting quickly to the bottom of the cell. Short term storage of high ionic strength solutions of thrombosthenin induces actomyosin-like gel formation and these gels dissociate with ATP and Mg2+ ions into two components of S degrees 20w 8.0 and S degrees 20w50. The supernatant,  after actomyosin gel removal, contains only the S degrees 20w5.5 protein. From results of Ca2+ ATPase activity measurements and SDS polyacrylamide gel electrophoretic mobilities of dissociated thrombosthenin separated into fractions in sucrose density gradients, it is concluded that the S degrees20w5.5 protein species is the myosin-like protein of thrombosthenin. The S degrees 20w8.0 protein is not fibrinogen but also has myosin-like properties and is believed to be myosin dimer. Species of higher S values seen in the presence of ATP and Mg2+ in the analytical ultracentrifuge and located in the higher density zones of the sucrose gradients all gave in SDS polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis a single band of molecular weight 46-47,000 daltons. These subunit proteins appear to be derived from a range of polymeric variants of the F-actin-like protein of the contractile complex. All these higher density F-actin-like proteins readily form superprecipitates and display syneresis when combined with rabbit skeletal muscle myosin or platelet myosin. They are also all capable of conferring upon these two myosins a Mg2+ activated ATPase activity. It is suggested that in thrombosthenin solutions a myosin monomer-dimer equilibrium state exists which can be directionally influenced by a number of factors. The coexistence in the solution of F-actin and Mg2+ ATP, for example, increases the propensity of the myosin-like protein to form the higher molecular weight aggregate. Such aggregation may be the initiating mechanism for the intracellular organization of the thick filaments of the actomyosin complex, preparatory to a contractile event.
Visualisation by electron microscopy and immunofluorescence. Confirming our previous ultrastructural and biochemical studies, the combined electron microscopy and immunofluorescence investigations show that phalloidin causes a characteristically striking increase of actin filaments within rat hepatocytes. Filaments are localized mainly at the level of special junctional complexes between contiguous cells and around bile canaliculi.
Effects of urea and MgCl2 on F-actin. Asakura, Taniguchi and Oosawa [1]proposed that muscle actin polymer under sonic vibration is in a different state from that of the ordinary double stranded helical structure (F-actin), characterised by partially interrupted structures of F-actin, a state of "f-actin". In order to confirm different states for actin polymers [1, 2], physicochemical studies were made by measurements of viscosity, flow birefringence, electric birefringence, fluorescence, electron microscopy, quasielastic light scattering and ATP splitting. The following results were obtained. (1) F-actin polymers can undergo two processes of depolymerization upon treatment with urea and various salts as judged by measurements of flow birefringence and viscosity: one is a rapid process in a solution containing K+ or Ca2+ and urea; the other is a slow process following a brief rapid one in a solution containing Mg2+ and urea. (2) In the presence of Mg2+ and a suitable concentration of urea, F-actin (FMU-actin) appeared to exhibit different properties than ordinary F-actin; it had lower viscosity and lower flow birefringence and it had on the whole a more flexible polymer structure, also judging from experiments of quasielastic light scattering, electric birefringence. The different structure was confirmed directly be electron microscopic observation. The aromatic side chains of FMU-actin were also more mobile than those of F-actin judging from fluorescence measurements. The transformation between F-actin and FMU-actin was reversible. (3) The state of FMU-actin polymers was also characterized by ATP splitting; FMU-actin split about one mole of ATP into ADP and inorganic phosphate per mole of actin monomer at room temperature, where F-actin did not. A molar excess of Mg2+ with respect to actin monomer at room temperature, where F-actin did not. A molar excess of Mg2+ with respect to actin monomer is required for ATP splitting. F-actin in solutions containing K+ or Ca2+ and urea did not split ATP. FMU-actin activated on Mg-ATP-ase of myosin at nearly the same rate as that of F-actin. (4) We have postulated a flexible filament model (f-actin). The relationships between the structure of f-actin and its functional role for force generation during contraction are discussed.
Evidence for the existence of two types of bovine platelet actin. Bovin platelet actin prepared by Spudich's method (Spudich, J. A. (1972) Cold Spring Harbor Symp. Quant. Biol. 27, 585-594) separated into two peaks on a Sephadex G-200 column. The actin of both peaks had a mol. wt. of 42 000 on sodium dodecyl sulfate-polyacrylamide gel and activated myosin ATPase, although in a quantitatively different manner. Actin eluted in the first peak (probably an oligomeric form) was not polymerized in 2 mM MgCl2 and 0.05 M KCl, while that of the second peak went through normal G-F transformation. If CaATP was present in the incubation mixture neither actin was attacked by thrombin. However, if EDTA was added, thrombin split G-actins and the pattern of cleavage was the same as that found for muscle actin in our earlier studies, ie the final split products were two actinopeptides and two larger fragments of 26 500 and 11 000 daltons. It is suggested that the possible attraction of membrane-associated platelet actin for thrombin may have an importance in thrombin-induced platelet aggregation.
If we select for consideration any reaction M1 in equilibrium M2 in the myosin-ATPase cycle, the question arises as to the relations between the rate constants for (1) M1 equilibrium M2, (2) AM1 in equilibrium AM2 (A = actin), (3) A + M1 in equilibrium AM1, and (4) A + M2 equilibrium AM2, with actin and myosin either (a) in solution or (b) in the myofilament structure. It is shown here, by means of examples, that a single so-called potential of mean force, W, and structural free energy, Am, suffice to determine the reaction free energy surfaces for all of these transitions (W for the solution case, W + Am for the structured case). In fact, Am is the same for all reactions in the myosin-ATPase cycle. Of course, though indispensable as the starting point and adequate for qualitative understanding, the reaction free energy surface does not provide (without additional theory) the actual values of the rate constants or of the corresponding basic free energy changes in the myosin states involved. These rate constants and free energies are discussed, in a preliminary way, in two other papers.
Oriented immobilized F-actin (IA) threads were prepared by extrusion of the concentrated F-actin solutions through a capillar into an aceton-water mixture containing glutaraldehyde. Myosin ATP-ase activity was activated by IA in the presence of Mg+2 and inhibited in the presence of EDTA. ATPase activity of IA at high temperature (55) was about 0.054 min(-1) and was not affected by a deformation of threads. Mechanical properties of IA threads were changed when treated by reagnets influencing intra- and inter-molecular interactions of actin molecules, and these changes themselves were highly dependent on IA threads deformation.
Evidence for the similarity of key intermediates in contractile and transport ATPase. The effects of D2O on the elementary steps in the contractile and transport ATPase [EC 3.613] reactions were studied, and the following results were obtained:  The rate of H-meromyosin ATPase in the steady state decreased in D2O to 60% of that in H2O. Deuterium oxide did not affect the size or rate of the initial burst of Pi liberation, ie the amount or rate of formation of the reactive myosin-phosphate-ADP complex, MADPP. Moreover, neither the rate of change in the fluorescence spectrum of H-meromyosin induced by ATP (the rate of formation of the second enzyme-ATP complex, M2ATP) nor the rate constant of decomposition of MADPP into M degrees + ADP + Pi was affected by D2O. However, the equilibrium constant of the step M2ATP in equilibrium MADPP decreased in D2O to about 1/2 the value in H2O. 2. In the case of the Na+-K+-dependent ATPase reactin, neither the rate constant of formation of the second enzyme-ATP complex, E2ATP, nor that of decomposition of a phosphorylated intermediate, EADP approximately P, was affected by D2O. However, the equilibrium constant of the step E2ATP in equilibrium EADP approximately P decreased in D2O to about 1/2.5-1/4 of the value in H2O. These results suggest a similarity between the modes of binding of phosphate in MADPP in the myosin ATPase reaction and in EADP approximatley P in the Na+-K+-dependent ATPase reaction.
Tropomyosin is a regulatory protein associated with F-actin in many actomyosin contractile systems. If in vitro conditions are such that tropomyosin binds only slightly to F-actin, then the addition of myosin heads can induce stoichiometric binding between them. This suggests that formation of rigor bonds between actin and myosin heads may cause some change in the actin, stabilizing the appropriate binding site for tropomyosin.
The simplest interacting unit of actomyosin, viz, single myosin heads (subfragment 1) with actin monomers, has been studied at physiological ionic strength, by isolating the actin molecules from each other on a solid support. The interaction is characterized by a binding constant of 10(5) to 10(6) M-1 in the temperature range 4-30degrees C. It is endothermic with a standard enthalpy of 24 +/- 10 kcal mol-1, and a standard entropy of 110 +/- 40 eu. It is thus, like many protein-protein association processes, entropy-driven. Despite the high affinity of the association, which is comparable in its binding constant to that of subfragment 1 with F-actin, there is only very small activation of myosin ATPase. The ionic-strength dependence of the interaction shows unusual features. Binding of the proteins of the relaxing system to the monomeric actin was also examined: troponin binds both in the presence and absence of calcium ions, but neither tropomyosin nor the tropomyosin-troponin complex was found to bind significantly. Monomeric actin has also been examined as a function of ionic strength by spectroscopic methods; it appears that conformational differences between the G and the F state are the consequence of polymerization, and not of the change in ionic strength required to being the conversion about.
Cytochalasin B stimulated polymerization and decreased the concentration of G-actin remaining in equilibrium with F-actin filaments. Polymerization in the presence of cytochalasin B gave rise to a smaller increase of viscosity but to the same increase in light scattering, compared to polymerization in the absence of cytochalasin B. Cytochalasin B reduced the viscosity of F-actin and caused the appearance of ATP hydrolysis by F-actin. The cytochalasin B-induced ATPase activity was inhibited by concentrations of KCl higher than 50 mM. The cytochalasin B-induced ATPase activity was enhanced by ethyleneglycol bis(alpha-aminoethyl ether)-N,N'-tetraacetic acid and reduced by MgCl2 at concentrations higher than 0.75 mM. The findings suggest that the stability of actin filaments is reduced by cytochalasin B.
Cytoplasmic actin has been isolated from Acanthamoeba castellanii by a new method, employing chromatography on DEAE-cellulose, that improves the yield by more than 20-fold over the previously reported method. This procedure should be particularly useful for isolating actin from cells in which it is present in relatively low concentration because the method does not depend initially on the polymerization of actin or its interaction with myosin. Systematic comparison of the properties of purified Acanthamoeba actin and rabbit skeletal muscle actin shows them to be similar in many ways: viscosity of F-actin, stoichiometry of bound nucleotide, stoichiometry of binding of muscle heavy meromyosin and myosin subfragment 1 in the absence of ATP, and ability to inhibit the KATPase activity of heavy meromyosin. The amino acid compositions of Acanthamoeba and muscle actin are also quite similar, but significant differences, especially the presence of epsilon-N-methyllysines in Acanthamoeba actin, have been confirmed. In addition to this structural difference, we find that Acanthamoeba actin is only one-third as effective as muscle actin as an activator of the MgATPase of muscle heavy meromyosin and subfragment  For Acanthamoeba actin, as for muscle actin, this activation exhibits hyperbolic dependence on actin concentration; ie the double reciprocal plot of ATPase activation versus actin concentration is linear. From these plots we find that the two actins give the same extrapolated ATPase activity at infinite actin concentration (Vmax) but differ by a factor of three in the concentration of actin needed to produce half-maximal activation (Kapp).
Actin, myosin, and a high molecular weight actin-binding protein were purified from chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) leukocytes. CML leukocyte actin resembled skeletal muscle and other cytoplasmic actins by its subunit molecular weight, by its ability to polymerize in the presence of salts, and to activate the Mg2+-ATPase activity of rabbit skeletal muscle myosin. CML leukocyte myosin was similar to other vertebrate cytoplasmic myosins in having heavy chains and two light subunits. However, its apparent heavy-chain molecular weight and Stokes radius suggested that it was variably degraded during purification. Purified CML leukocyte myosin had average specific EDTA- AND Ca2+-activated ATPase activities of 125 and 151 nmol Pi released/mg protein per min, respectively and low specific Mg2+-ATPase activity. The Mg2+-ATPase activity of CML myosin was increased 200-fold by rabbit skeletal muscle F-actin, but the specific activity relative to that of actin-activated rabbit skeletal muscle myosin was low. CML leukocyte myosin, like other vertebrate cytoplasmic myosins, formed filaments in 0.1 M KCl solutions. Reduced and denatured CML leukocyte-actin-binding protein had a single high molecular weight subunit like a recently described actin-binding protein of rabbit pulmonary macrophages which promotes the polymerization and gelation of actin. Cytoplasmic extracts of CML leukocytes prepared with ice-cold 0.34-M sucrose solutions containing Mg2+-ATP, dithiothreitol, and EDTA at pH 7.0 underwent rapid gelation when warmed to 25 degrees C. Initially, the gel could be liquified by cooling to ice-bath temperature. With time, warmed cytoplasmic extract gels shrunk ("contracted") into aggregates. The following findings indicated that CML leukocyte actin-binding protein promoted the temperature-dependent gelation of actin in the cytoplasmic extracts and that CML leukocyte myosin was involved in the contraction of the actin gels: (a) Cytoplasmic extract gels initially contained actin as their major polypeptide component and consistent of tangled thin filaments; (b) Contracted aggregates of cytoplasmic extract gels contained by large quantities of myosin as well as actin; (c) Purified actin-binding protein underwent a temperature-dependent, reversible aggregation and caused low concentrations of purified muscle or CML leukocyte actins to gel in sucrose solutions; (d) The gels formed from purified actin plus purified actin-binding protein slowly contracted in the presence but not in the absence of purified CML leukocyte myosin; (e) Rabbit antiserum against purified CML leukocyte actin-binding protein but not against purified CML leukocyte myosin inhibited the gelation of warmed CML leukocyte extracts. Antiserum against CML leukocyte myosin had no effect on the gelation of CML leukocyte extracts but partially curtailed the contraction of the CML leukocyte extract gels and of gels formed from purified CML leukocyte actin-binding protein plus rabbit skeletal muscle actin.
A protein fraction from the cellular slime mold Dictyostelium discoideum confers Ca2+-sensitivity on the activation of purified myosin adenosinetriphosphatase (ATP phosphohydrolase, EC 3.613) from Dictyostelium by purified Dictyostelium actin. That is, the fraction inhibits the actomyosin adenosine triphosphatase activity in the absence of Ca+ but not in the presence of Ca2+. This Ca2+-sensitizing factor affects only the actin-activated myosin adenosine triphosphatase and not the enzyme activity of myosin alone. The Ca2+-sensitivity is conserved when muscle actin replaces Dictyostelium actin, but is lost when muscle myosin replaces Dictyostelium myosin. The factor appears to be a protein since it is nondialyzable, is heat labile, and can be precipitated with ammonium sulfate. The factor can be purified 70-fold on an actin-affinity column.
A single cycle of adenosine 5'-triphosphate (ATP) hydrolysis by a complex of actin and myosin subfragment one (acto-S-1) was studied in a stopped-flow apparatus at low temperature and low ionic strength, using light scattering to monitor the interaction of S-1 with actin and fluorescence to detect the formation of fluorescent intermediates. Our results show that the addition of a stoichiometric concentration of ATP to the acto-S-1 causes a cycle consisting of first, a rapid dissociation of the S-1 from actin by ATP; second, a slower fluorescence change in the S-1 that may be related to the initial phosphate burst; and third, a much slower rate limiting recombination of the S-1 with actin. This latter step equals the acto-S-1 steady-state adenosine 5'-triphosphatase (ATPase) rate at both low and high actin concentrations, and like the steady-state ATPase levels off at a V max of 0.9s-1 at high actin concentration. Therefore, the release of adenosine 5'-diphosphate and inorganic phosphate is not the rate-limiting step in the acto-S-1 ATPase. Rather, a slow first-order step corresponding to the previously postulated transition from the refractory to the nonrefractory state precedes the rebinding of the S-1 to the actin during each cycle of ATP hydrolysis.
The regulatory proteins tropomyosin and troponin bind to filamentous actin and slow down but do not prevent the depolymerization. In the absense of ATP, heavy meromyosin binds tightly to actin filaments and blocks completely the DNAase I: actin filament interaction. Addition of ATP releases heavy meromyosin; DNAase I is then rapidly inhibited and the actin filaments are depolymerized.
Heavy meromyosin treated with the ATP analog, 6,6'-dithiobis(inosinyl-5'-yl imidodiphosphate), (slppNHp)2, in the presence of adenyl-5'-yl imidodiphosphate at 0 degrees loses its EDTA-ATPase activity and actin binding ability in a parallel manner. Studies with myosin show that under the above conditions (slppNHp)2 reacts preferentially with the single cysteines of the alkali light chains (Mr = 20,700 and 16,500) suggesting a role for these subunits in regulating actin-myosin interaction and ATP cleavage.
Immobilization of myosin, actin, actomyosin and subfragment S1 on kapron fibre was achieved with the help of glutaric aldehyde. The ATPase activity of myosin and its ability to interact with actin is preserved; while the ATPase activity of S1 subfragment decreases considerably. The immobilization on kapron fibre changes the pH-dependance of ATPase activity of myosin and that of subfragment S1, shifting the maximum to low pH zone (pH 5.5), and increases the thermostability of the enzyme. The ions of Ca++ in all cases act as an activating agent on ATPase while the ions of Mg++ either do not affect myosin and subfragment S1 at all, or increase the activity in the case of the immobilized of actomyosin but to a lesser degree than the ions of Ca++. The immobilized actin preserves its ability to form actomyosin complex.
Actin can be cleaved by trypsin or chymotrypsin into a large, autonomous fragment with approximately 80% of the mass of the undegraded polypeptide. The protease-resistant cores obtained with either enzyme are very similar. Although the fragment does not bind calcium ions and fails to polymerize to the filamentous form of actin or to stimulate myosin adenosine triphosphatase (ATP phosphohydrolase, EC 3.613) activity, it retains the full capacity to bind ATP. This observation suggests that it represents an independent functional unit. Cleavage of globular actin with either trypsin or chymotrypsin occurs with half-times of 3 min, while that of filamentous actin proceeds with reaction half-times of 20 min for trypsin and nearly 2 hr for chymotrypsin. Denaturation and renaturation of the trypsin-resistant core shows that approximately 20% of the molecules refold to functional forms which indicates that the fragment can be considered as an independent unit of folding as well.
The interaction between paramyosin and myosin has been studied by enzymological methods. Clam adductor paramyosin inhibits the actin-activated, Mg2+-requiring ATPase of both clam adductor and rabbit skeletal muscle myosins. Myosin and paramyosin must be rapidly coprecipitated for this inhibition. Incubation with F-actin in the absence of ATP does not alter this effect. This inhibition follows a hyperbolic function with respect to paramyosin concentration. Slow precipitation by dialysis of myosin and paramyosin together leads to copolymers with actin-activated ATPase equivalent to that of slowly formed myosin filaments. Both kinds of slowly formed filaments have enzymatic properties distinct from those of the rapidly precipitated proteins. Paramyosin is competitive with F-actin for their effects upon myosin. The apparent affinity of myosin for F-actin is markedly reduced by association with paramyosin, but the extrapolated maximal velocity of actomyosin is unaffected. The specificity of this inhibition is strongly suggested by marked quantitative differences between native and cleaved paramyosins. No inhibition of intrinsic myosin ATPase by paramyosin is seen. These studies suggest that at least two types of condition-dependent association between myosin and paramyosin are possible. One class of interactions is associated with enzymic inhibition in rapidly coprecipitated filaments, whereas slowly formed cofilaments exhibit catalytic activity similar to that of identically treat-d myosin and have a characteristic 14.5 nm axial repeat.
The immunogenicity of smooth muscle actin is increased by ageing at 4 degrees for at least a week. Rabbits lacking natural smooth muscle antibodies were injected with 1 mg of aged purified actin in adjuvant. Fourteen out of thirty-six rabbits produced serum antibodies which precipitated with actin solution, but not with smooth muscle tropomyosin, myosin, light or heavy meromyosin or with other unidentified non-actin proteins in crude extracts. Analysis of crude actin extract before and after precipitation by antiserum (i) by Sephadex G-200 chromatography and (ii) for its stimulating effect on myosin ATPase activity showed that actin was selectively removed. The precipitate itself, analysed on SDS-polyacrylamide gel, showed one band in the actin position, and otherwise only bands representing immunoglobulins. The antiserum also inhibited the ability of actin to stimulate myosin ATPase activity, and prevented polymerization of G-actin to F-actin, as shown by viscosity and EM studies. On immunoflouresence with cryostat tissue sections or cell cultures, anti-actin serum stained smooth muscle fibres and many non-muscle cells, in the latter staining the microfilaments. The staining was prevented by absorbing the antiserum with actin (16 mug per 5 mul serum), and was abolished by pretreatment of the cells with cytochalasin B. No species specificity was demonstrated for these anti-actin antibodies.
Low concentrations (greater than or equal to 10(-7) M) of cytochalasin B reversibly inhibit the temperature-dependent gelation of actin by an actin-binding protein. The cytochalasin B concentrations which maximally inhibit actin gel formation are 10-fold lower than the concentrations which maximally impair phagocytosis by intact macrophages. Cytochalasin B also prevents the polymerization of monomeric actin in sucrose extracts of macrophages in the absence but not the presence of 0.1 M CKl. 10(-6) M cytochalasin B dissolves macrophage extract gels and gels comprised of purified actin and actin-binding protein by dissociating actin-binding protein from actin filaments. This concentration of cytochalasin B, however, does not depolymerize the actin filatments.
Natural actomyosin, actin and myosin, have been pressurized at up to 150 MN/m2 for 1 h at 0 degrees C and examined 3-5 h later. Pressurization of myosin resulted in the formation of aggregates with a molecular weight approximately that expected for a dimer, whereas with F-actin depolymerization occurred. With actomyosin, a gel to sol transition was promoted. Viscosity and light-scattering measurements indicated that pressurization results in a large measure of disaggregation of actomyosin in solution. Pressurization of actomyosin resulted in a greater decrease in the calcium-sensitive, than in the calcium-independent, Mg2+ ATPase activity. The Ca2+ and K+-EDTA ATPase activities of myosin were inhibited to about the same extent.
Human skeletal natural actomyosin contained actin, tropomyosin, troponin and myosin components as judged by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis in sodium dodecyl sulfate. Purified human myosin contained at least three light chains having molecular weights (+/-2000) of 25 000, 18 000 and 15 000. Inhibitory and calcium binding components of troponin were identified in an actin-tropomyosin-troponin complex extracted from acetone-dried muscle powder at 37 degrees C. Activation of the Mg-ATPase activity of Ca2+-sensitive human natural or reconstituted actomyosin was half maximal at approximately 3.4 muM Ca2+ concentration (CaEGTA binding constant equals 4.4 - 10(5) at pH 6.8). Subfragment 1, isolated from the human heavy meromyosin by digestion with papain, appeared as a single peak after DEAE-cellulose chromatography. In the pH 6-9 range, the Ca2+-ATPase activity of the subfragment 1 was   18- and 4-fold higher that the original heavy meromyosin and myosin, respectively. The ATPase activities of human myosin and its fragments were 6-10 fold lower than those of corresponding proteins from rabbit fast skeletal muscle. Human myosin lost approximately 60% of the Ca2+-ATPase activity at pH 9 without a concomitant change in the number of distribution of its light chains. These findings indicate that human skeletal muscle myosin resembles other slow and fast mammalian muscles. Regulation of human skeletal actomyosin by Ca2+ is similar to that of rabbit fast or slow muscle.
Sera raised against actin and myosin, extracted from white muscle of fish, were used for the immune-histochemical characterization of muscle fibers. It appeared that both, the actin- and the myosin serum are specific for white muscle fibres in fish. Further it was found that in both, the A- and the I-band of the sacromeres, fibre type specific proteins are present. The classification of muscle fibre types obtained with the antisera was compared with the classification obtained with some enzyme histochemical reactions. Muscle fibres that reacted positively with the two sera, also showed a high histochemical myofibrillar ATP-ase activity. The correlation with a low succinate dehydrogenase- and a high lactate dehydrogenase activity was not always found.
It has been postulated that, during the hydrolysis of ATP, both normal and SH1-blocked heavy meromyosin undergo a rate-limiting transition from a refractory state which cannot bind to actin to a nonrefractory state which can bind to actin. This model leads to several predictions which were studied in the present work. First, the fraction of heavy meromysin or subfragment 1 which remains unbound to actin when the ATPase equals Vmax should have the same properties as the original protein. In the present study it was determined that the unbound protein has normal ATPase activity which suggests that it is unbound to actin for a kinetic reason rather than because it is a permanently altered form of the myosin. Second, if the heavy meromyosin heads act independently half as much subfragment 1 as heavy meromyosin should bind to actin. Experiments in the ultracentrifuge demonstrate that about half as much subfragment 1 as heavy meromyosin sediments with the actin at Vmax. Third, the ATP turnover rate per actin monomer at infinite heavy meromyosin concentration should be much higher than the ATP turnover rate per heavy meromyosin head at infinite actin concentration. This was found to be the case for SH1-blocked heavy meromyosin since, even at very high concentrations of SH1-blocked heavy meromyosin, in the presence of a fixed actin concentration, the actin-activated ATPase rate remained proportional to the SH1-blocked heavy meromyosin concentration. All of these results tend to confirm the refractory state model for both SH1-blocked heavy meromyosin and unmodified heavy meromyosin and subfragment  However, the nature of the small amount of heavy meromyosin which does bind to actin in the presence of ATP at high actin concentration remains unclear.
Actin activates the overall rate of hydrolysis at a rate-limiting step which follows these exchange reactions. Thus, actin, by decreasing the turnover time of hydrolysis, would be expected to proportionately decrease the time available for oxygen exchange. Using subfragment 1 of myosin, the turnover time of hydrolysis can be varied over a wide range by changing the concentration of actin. An estimate for the rate constant of exchange can then be obtained by relating these turnover times to measured values for oxygen exchange (incorporation of 18O from H218O into the inorganic phosphate (Pi) released by hydrolysis). The results of such an experiment, with turnover times between 0.2 and 25 s, indicate that, for each gamma-phosphoryl group, one oxygen from the medium is added rapidly (to cleave the phosphoryl group or form a pentacoordinate phosphroyl complex); two more oxygens exchange with a rate constant, kc, of about 1 s-1; and a fourth oxygen exchanges slowly with ke about 0.2 s- The higher value is about 18 times smaller than the rate constant, 5-3, for the reverse cleavage step of the myosin pathway, which is postulated to be responsible for oxygen exchange. The data, then, indicate that the rate-limiting step for oxygen exchange is not k-3, but may be the rate of rotation of oxygens around the phosphorus atom, with one oxygen severely restricted by its binding to the active site. The finding that kc differs for the four oxygens in each phosphate group is related to past observations on myosin-catalyzed oxygen exchange.
From Acanthamoeba castellanii, we have purified four proteins each of which alone causes a solution of F-actin to gel. The four active proteins have subunit molecular weights of about 23,000, 28,000, 32,000 and 38,000, respectively; the last three may be dimers in their native proteins. Together, these four proteins account for about 97% of the gelation activity of the whole extract; not more than about 3% of the total activity of the unfractionated extract can be due to a 250,000-dalton polypeptide. Another protein fraction, purified by agarose chromatography, induces shrinking (syneresis) of gels formed from F-actin and any of the gelation factors. That fraction contains a high Ca2+-, low (K+,EDTA)-ATPase and a major polypeptide of 170,000 daltons both of which bind to actin in the shrunken gel pellet. The active fraction does not contain the previously described Acanthamoeba myosin (Pollard, T. D, and Korn, E. D. (1973) J. Biol. Chem. 248, 4682-4690).
F-Actin (FA) and pyruvate kinase (PK) [EC 2.7140] were immobilized on PAB-cellulose. HMM-Subfragment-1 (S-1) was applied to a column of immobilized FA and PK, and eluted with 1-  15 muM ATP and 1 mM PEP in 50 mM KCl, 2 mM MgCl2, and 10 mM Tris-HCl at pH 7.8 and 4 degrees. The size of the initial burst of Pi liberation of S-1 applied to the column was 0.5 mole/mole S- The burst size of S-1 decreased with increase in the fraction number, and S-1 in later fractions showed a burst size of 0.1-0.3 mole/mole. On the other hand, the rate of the ATPase [EC 3.613] reaction in the steady state was almost independent of the burst size, and increased slightly with increase in the fraction number. The ATPase activity of S-1 with a burst size of less than 0.2 mole/mole was scarcely activated by FA. Usually, the dependence on the burst size of S-1 of its ATPase activity in the presence of FA was sigmoidal, and marked activation by FA was observed when the burst size was larger than 0.3-0.4 mole/mole. Similar results were obtained with S-1 fractions separated by the ultracentrifugation method described in our previous paper ((1976) J. Biochem. 79, 419-434).
Subfragment-1 of HMM was prepared by tryptic [EC 3.4.2  14] digestion of HMM, which had been modified with 1 mole of CMB per mole of HMM at a specific SH group, SHr. S-1(T) obtained from CMB-HMM retained almost all the CMB, and the amount of bound CMB was about 0.8-0.9 mole per 2 moles of S-1(T). S-2 of CMB-HMM contained no bound CMB. The ATPase [EC 3.613] activity of HMM increased gradually with increase in the concentration of FA, and the acto-HMM ATPase was inhibited by excess substrate or removal of Ca2+ ions in the presence of RP. The ATPase activity of CMB-HMM increased to a maximum level on adding a small amount of FA, and the acto-CMB-HMM ATPase showed neither substrate inhibition nor Ca2+ sensitivity in the presence of RP. On the other hand, the dependence on the concentration of FA of the ATPase activity of acto-S-1(T) was unaffected by modification of S-1 with CMB. The Ca2+ sensitivity of the ATPase activity of acto-S-1(T) in the presence of RP was also unaffected by the modification. Acto-S-1(T) dissociated almost completely, while acto-CMB-S-1(T) was only 50% dissociated on adding ATP. More than 80% of the bound CMB was contained in S-1(T) undissociated from FA. Furthermore, superprecipitation of actomyosin induced by ATP was completely inhibited by adding about 2 moles of CMB-S-1(T) per mole of actin monomer. On the other hand, about 90% of the burst size of Pi liberation was retained in S-1(T) dissociated from FA. It was concluded that the two heads of the myosin molecule are different: one shows the initial burst of Pi liberation, and does not contain the SHr group which binds CMB (head B), and the other does not show the initial burst and contains the SHr group (head A). It was also concluded that modification of head A of HMM or myosin with CMB increases its binding strength to FA, and consequently the substrate inhibition and Ca2+ sensitivity of acto-HMM or actomyosin ATPase at head B are lost on modification of head A with CMB. CMB-S-1(CT) was prepared by chymotryptic [EC 3.4.2  11] digestion of CMB-myosin, and separated into two fractions by ultracentrifugation of acto-CMB-S-1(CT) in the presence of ATP. Three components of CMB-S-1(CT) with molecular weights of 9, 2.4, and   12 X 10(4) were separated by SDS-polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis. The ratios of the peak areas of the three components in electrophoretograms were the same in CMB-S-1(CT) and in the two fractions (1 : 0.18 : 0.09), indicating that heads A and B have the same subunit structure.
Actin-like (A-L) fraction from normal E. coli was compared with the protein from a potassium-transport mutant strain, and the cell-swelling reaction of both strains was studied. Findings were: (a) The membrane fraction of the mutant by SDS electrophoresis is deficient in the A-L fragment relative to normal whereas the soluble supernatant contains an excess. (b) Important catalytic differences exist between the A-L fractions of the two strains. The parent strain accumulates potassium in low K+ and the A-L fraction polymerizes in low K+. But the A-L fraction from the mutant fails to polymerize in low K media in the K+ concentration region where the mutant fails at K+ uptake. (c) The parent cell swells during low K+ uptake whereas the mutant does not. It is constructed from this that the differences in the characterization of A-L fraction relative to normal are related to the loss of cell-swelling in the mutant and hence to the loss in alkali cation selectivity. Thus two physical mechanisms, one macroscopic and dependent on the Gregor relation for swelling equilibria in ion exchange resins, and one more microscopic based on the dielectric dependence of the coulomb force between ion pairs, could underly regulation of ion selectivity by cell swelling. A similar proposal is made for the regulation of electron transport and oxidative phosphorylation in mitochondria. These findings and interpretations justify a new hypothesis to the effect that cell hydration is regulated by contractile proteins. The hypothesis fits together important observations hitherto unexplained, to wit: (1) The "missing link" as to the role of intermediate metabolism in biological ion exchange. (2) The swelling of bacterial protoplasts and its relation to (Mg2 + Ca2+)ATPase activity. (3) The swelling-contraction cycles of mitochondria and their role in electron transport. (4) The role of ATPase's in transport. (5) The significance of actomyosin fibers in nerve endings. (6) The significance of altered actomyosin structures in the cancerous cell.
Biochemical and structural properties of native filaments and purified proteins. Calcium regulation of actomyosin activity in the nematode, Caenorhabditis elegans, has been studied with purified proteins and crude thin filaments. Actin and tropomyosin have been purified from C. elegans and shown to be similar in most respects to actin and tropomyosin from rabbit skeletal muscle. The actin comigrates with rabbit actin on polyacrylamide-sodium dodecyl sulfate gel electrophoresis, forms similar filaments and paracrystals, and activates the Mg2+-ATPase of rabbit myosin heads as efficiently as rabbit actin. Nematode tropomyosin has a greater apparent molecular weight (estimated by mobility on polyacrylamide-sodium dodecyl sulfate gels) than the rabbit protein, yet it forms Mg2+-paracrystals with a slightly shorter periodicity. Native thin filaments extracted from nematodes activate rabbit myosin subfragment 1 Mg2+-ATPase in a calcium sensitive manner; the extent of activation is threefold greater in 0.2 mM CaCl2 than in the absence of calcium. This observation suggests that the thin filaments contain components which are functionally equivalent to vertebrate troponins. Calcium is also required for maximal activation of the Mg2+-ATPase of purified nematode myosin by pure rabbit F-actin. C. elegans therefore has both myosin and thin filament-linked calcium regulatory systems. The origin of the actin, tropomyosin, and myosin from different tissues and the use of genetic analysis to answer questions about assembly and function in vivo are discussed.
The Ca2+-activated myosin ATPase and the amino acid compositions of actin and myosin were determined for preparations from chronically failing dog hearts. Hypertrophy and congestive heart failure were produced by combined tricuspid valve insufficiency and pulmonary artery stenosis. Control, shamoperated, and noncardiac circulatory failure (inferior vena cava constriction) dogs also were studied. All hearts were divided into right ventricle, septum and left ventricle and each sample was individually analyzed. Calcium-activated ATPase decreased in the failing hearts and showed a distinct gradient of depression from right to left ventricles. There were no changes in ATPase activity among the other groups. The amino acid composition of actin was the same regardless of origin. The amino acid composition of myosin was unaltered except that cystine/2 residues were markedly decreased in failing heart myosin. The same gradient of depression was present as was found for Ca2+-activated myosin ATPase. This study suggests that protein metabolism is abnormal and that altered proteins are produced in hypertrophy and congestive heart failure. It appears that these changes do not affect all proteins, since actin was normal by the parameters studied. It is clear that the stressed ventricle is the most severely involved, but the entire heart is altered to some degree. Thus, we conclude that altered protein metabolism may be an important primary factor in the genesis of heart failure.
In vertebrate smooth muscle actomyosin and myofibrils a myosin light chain of molecular weight about 20,000 becomes phosphorylated at the same Ca2+ concentration as required to stimulate the actin-activated ATPase activity of myosin. Further, the degree of phosphorylation in the preparations as well as in various reconstituted actomyosins is proportional to their measured Ca2+ sensitivity. The phosphorylation process is very rapid and is essentially completed before the rise in ATPase activity. The enzyme responsible for the observed myosin phosphoylation is a specific myosin light chain kinase which is routinely co-purified with myosin. This kinase is normally present in actomyosin and its removal together with tropomyosin leads to a complete loss of the actin-activated ATPase activity. It is suggested that the Ca-dependent phosphorylation of the light chain via the light chain kinase represents the initial step in the activation of myosin that leads to contraction. Relaxation is probably effected by an as yet uncharacterised light chain phosphatase.
In the presence of the regulatory protein complex tropomyosin-troponin ATPase activity of vertebrate skeletal muscle actomyosin is either higher or lower than in the absence of tropomyosin-troponin. The actual behavior depends on ionic strength, Ca2+ concentration, ATP concentration (determining the amount of rigor complexes present), and the ratio between actin and myosin. This effect of the myosin-actin ratio implies that under certain conditions cooperativity in actin-myosin interaction can be seen.
Biochemical schemes for the actomyosin ATPase cycle as well as the cooperative regulation of ATPase activity are incorporated into a model of the contractile process of intact muscle. This model is shown to describe accurately the tension developed by skinned muscle fibers in the absence of Ca. This work adds to the evidence that the extrapolation of results from purified protein systems to intact muscle may be valid. Extensions to the case of Ca-activated tensions are discussed.
The binding of 125I-labeled muscle tropomyosin to Acanthamoeba and muscle actin was studied by ultracentrifugation and by the effect of tropomyosin on the actin-activated muscle heavy meromyosin ATPase activity. Binding of muscle tropomyosin to Acanthamoeba actin was much weaker than its binding to muscle actin. For example, at 5 mM MgCl2, 2 mM ATP, and 5 micronM actin, tropomyosin bound strongly to muscle actin but not detectably to Acanthamoeba actin. When the concentration of actin was raised from 5 micronM to 24 micronM in the presence of 80 mM KCl, the binding of tropomyosin to Acanthamoeba actin approached its binding to muscle actin. As with muscle actin, the addition of muscle heavy meromyosin in the absence of ATP induced binding of tropomyosin in Acanthamoeba actin under conditions were binding would otherwise not have occurred. The most striking difference between the interactions of muscle tropomyosin with the two actins, however, was that under conditions where tropomyosin was found to both actins, its stimulated the Acanthamoeba actin-activated heavy meromyosin ATPase but inhibited the muscle actin-activated heavy meromyosin ATPase.
Myosin, HMM and HMM S1 catalyze 18O-exchange between P1 and H218O of the medium at an intermediate stage of ATP hydrolysis ("intermediate 18O-exchange") in the presence of Mg2+. Natural complexes of actomyosin and acto-HMM S1 do not catalyze intermediate 18O-exchange but facilitate "direct" or "medium" 18O-exchange (KH2P18O4 in equilibrium H2O) even without ATP. Reconstituted complexes of actomyosin, acto-HMM, acto-HMM S1, PABC-HMM S1, congo-myosin and TNP-myosin do not catalyze direct 18O-exchange in the presence of Mg2+ and absence of ATP. From the data obtained a hypothetical sequence of phosphorylation and 18O-exchange reactions in myofibril action has been suggested.
The rate of actin polymerization, the rate of nucleotide splitting and the rate of the nucleotide exchange have been measured simultaneously. Correlation of these three measurements demonstrated that nucleotide splitting and exchange were mainly connected with the association and dissociation reactions of actin protomers at the ends of actin filaments and were not caused by release and rebinding of nucleotide molecules at the binding sites along the filament. The observation made by others that the nucleotide exchange was accelerated in the presence of ATP was explained by the translocational head-to-tail polymerization of actin: Due to the simultaneous lengthening of the filament at one end and shortening at the other, nucleotide molecules are incorporated at one end and released at the other. In the absence of ATP, where the head-to-tail polymerization mechanism was not operative nucleotide exchange was brought about by the slow process of length fluctuation of polymers.
The interaction of actin with myosin was studied in the presence of ATP at low ionic strength by means of measurements of the actin-activated ATPase activity of myosin and superprecipitation of actomyosin. At high ATP concentrations the ATPase activities of myosin, heavy meromyosin (HMM) and myosin subfragment 1 (S-1) were activated by actin in the same extent. At low ATP concentrations the myosin ATPase activity was activated about 30-fold by actin, whereas those of HMM and S-1 were stimulated only several-fold. This high actin activation of myosin ATPase was coupled with the occurrence of superprecipitation. The activation of HMM or S-1 ATPase by actin shows a simple hyperbolic dependence on actin concentration, but the myosin ATPase was maximally activated by actin at a 2:1 molar ratio of actin to myosin, and a further increase in the actin concentration had no effect on the activation. These results suggest the presence of a unit for actin-myosin interaction, composed of two actin monomers and one myosin molecule in the filaments.
Millimolar concentrations of Ca2+ stimulate actin polymerization whereas micromolar concentrations of Ca2+ depress polymerization. This latter effect leads to a reduction of ATPase (ATP phosphohydrolase, EC 3.613) activity of actin during sonication at low Mg2+ concentrations and in the absence of KCl. In the presence of KCl (90 mM) there is activation of ATPase activity by micromolar Ca2+ concentrations. These Ca2+ effects are half-maximal at a Ca2+ concentration of 2-10(-7) M. They can be explained by assuming that that ATPase activity is optimal in a medium range of actin polymer stability and that micromolar Ca2+ concentrations tend to labilize and depolymerize F-actin.
A new, simple method for the isolation of actin from myxomycete plasmodia has been developed. Plasmodium myosin B was incubated at 55 degrees C for 15 min in the presence of ATP or was treated with 90% acetone. By this treatment myosin was denatured completely. Actin was then extracted with a dilute ATP and cysteine solution from the heat- or acetone-treated myosin B. The method is simple and almost pure actin was obtained in high yield. The purified G-actin polymerized to F-actin on addition of 0.1 M KCl or 2 mM MgCl2. The viscosity of the purified F-actin was 8-10 dl/g. The F-actin activated muscle myosin ATPase, and actomyosin synthesized from the F-actin and muscle myosin showed superprecipitation on addition of ATP.
The Ca2+-ATPase activity of cardiac myosin is increased in thyrotoxic animals. However, the physiological significance of this observation is uncertain since, in living muscle, Mg-ATP is hydrolyzed by myosin under the stimulating influence of actin. In this study, we have compared the actin-activated ATPase activity of myosin from euthyroid (myosin-N) and thyrotoxic (myosin-T) rabbits and the derivatives of myosin-N and myosin-T formed by blocking the most rapidly reacting class of thiols (SH1) with N-ethylmaleimide (NEM). Also, we have studied the activity of these myosins in the presence of a complex of troponin and tropomyosin that confers calcium sensitivity on the system. Vmax for the actin-activated ATPase of myosin-T was about 168% greater than for myosin N. The apparent dissociation constant for actin, Kapp, for myosin-T was about 42% of the normal value. After NEM modification, Vmax and Kapp for NEM-modified myosin-T and myosin-N decreased, becoming essentially the same for both myosins. In the presence of troponin-tropomyosin complex, the actin-activated ATPase of myosin-T exhibited calcium sensitivity that could be reduced by thiol modification. These results suggest that the SH1 thiols or the region near these groups are important to the actin-activated ATPase of myosin-N and are essential to the increased activity of myosin-T. Also, they suggest that the changes in the enzymatic properties of myosin induced by thyroxine may be responsible for altering the contractile properties of the heart.
Observations on its presence, stability, and assembly in plasmodial extracts and development of an improved purification procedure. Actin is readily extracted from plasmodia of Physarum polycephalum by low ionic strength solutions which do not solubilize the plasmodial myosin. The actin in such extracts exists predominantly as a monomer which slowly denatures, apparently via removal of bound nucleotide, and is subsequently proteolyzed. However, the native monomeric actin can be induced to assemble into polymeric arrays under appropriate solvent conditions. Actin assembly is dependent on the addition of ATP and is a function of KCl and CaCl2 concentrations. These observations have allowed the development of an improved actin purification scheme which is simple, rapid, and efficient, yielding approximately 60 mg of protein from 100 g of plasmodium. The actin thus obtained is pure, stable, and comparable to that obtained by previously described procedlres. Furthermore, the observations suggest that actin polymers may be metastably assembled in vivo and raise the possibility that actin assembly, and plasmodial movements, could be regulated via alterations in intracellular concentrations of nucleotide and/or divalent cation.
Evidence of beta and gamma forms and similarity of properties with sarcomeric actin. Human blood platelet actin was purified using 30% sucrose to extract actomyosin and potassium iodide to dissociate actomyosin and to depolymerize actin. Pure actin thus obtained resembles skeletic muscle actin in its polymerization properties, CD spectra and ability to activate myosin myosin Mg2+-ATPase. Isoelectric focusing gel analysis shows that human blood platelet actin exists in beta and gamma forms. The ratio of beta to gamma forms is of 5 in purified actin, in whole cell extract and in all the fractions studied.
The influence of the DTNB light chain of myosin on its enzymatic activities was examined by studying the superprecipitation of actomyosin and the actin-activated ATPase of heavy meromyosin (HMM) [EC 3.613]. Although the Ca2+-, Mg2+-, and EDTA-ATPase activities of control and DTNB myosin were practically the same, the superprecipitation of actomyosin prepared from actin and DTNB myosin occurred more slowly than that of control myosin. The apparent binding constant obtained from double-reciprocal plots of actin-activated ATPase of DTNB HMM was lower than that of control HMM. Recombination of DTNB myosin and HMM with DTNB light chains restored the original properties of myosin and HMM. The removal of DTNB light chain from myosin had no effect on the formation of the rigor complex between actin and myosin. These results suggest that the DTNB light chain participates in the interaction of myosin with actin in the presence of ATP.
The preparation, structural and steady-state kinetic characteristics of contractile proteins from the leg muscle of frogs Rana temporaria and Rana pipiens are described. Actin and myosin from the two frog species are indistinguishable. The proteins have structural and steady-state kinetic properties similar to those from rabbit fast-twitch skeletal muscle. Chymotrypsin digestion of frog myosin or myofibrils in the presence of EDTA yields subfragment 1, which is separated by chromatography into two components that are distinguished by their alkali light-chain content.
Dissociation of binding from gelation by Ca2+-activated proteolysis. Chicken gizzard filamin has been digested with purified Ca2+-activated protease. The subunits of (Mr = 250,000) of the protein are cleaved asymmetrically into two fragments, heavy merofilamin, Mr = 240,000, and light merofilamin, Mr = 9,500. Digestion is complete at substrate to enzyme ratios of 100:1 and requires Ca2+ concentrations in excess of 0.3 mM. Heavy merofilamin binds to F-actin as evidenced by cosedimentation with F-actin, by direct observation under the electron microscope, and by its ability to inhibit actin activation of heavy meromyosin ATPase. Heavy merofilamin does not form a gel when mixed with actin, except at very low concentrations of KCl. Thus, actin binding and gelation are separable activities of filamin. We speculate that Ca2+-stimulated proteolysis may play a role in the regulation of actin-filamin interactions.
Nucleotide levels in parietal cells. Adenine and pyridine nucleotide levels as well as those of phosphate, phosphocreatine, lactate, pyruvate, beta-hydroxybutyrate, acetoacetate, glucose, and glycogen were measured in histologically defined parietal and mucous cell sections of biopsies of dog gastric mucosa at rest, and in various secretory states. As a result of stimulation of secretion, there appeared to be no change in adenine nucleotide levels, or phosphocreatine, but there was a rise in inorganic phosphate and a fall in phosphorylation potential. However, there was a marked increase in NADH, but no change in NADPH with onset of acid secretion. The increase in the lactate to pyruvate ratio showed that the increased NADH level occurred in the cytoplasm and these data are discussed with reference to change in cell pH.
Evidence for the occurrence of the cycle in brain. Cell-free extracts of rat brain catalyze the reactions of the purine nucleotide cycle. Ammonia is formed during the deamination but not the amination phase of the cycle. The activity of adenylate deaminase in brain is sufficient to account for the maximum rates of ammonia production that have been reported. The activity of glutamate dehydrogenase is not sufficient to account for these rates of ammonia production. The activities of adenylosuccinate synthetase and adenylosuccinase are nearly sufficient to account for the steady state rates of ammonia production observed in brain. Demonstration of the cycle in extracts of brain is complicated by the occurrence of side reactions, in particular those catalyzed by phosphomonoesterase, nucleoside phosphorylase, and guanase.
The enhancement of the longitudinal proton relaxation rate of solvent water protons which occurs when Mn(II) is bound to the "tight" metal ion site of unadenylylated glutamine synthetase (GS) was used to determine the binding constant of L-methionine (SR)-sulfoximine to GS-Mn(II) complexes. The binary enhancement for GS-Mn(II) is 22 at 24 MHz, 25 degrees C. The enhancement is lowered in the presence of the sulfoximine and the computed dissociation constant is 30 muM with epsilont, the enhancement for the ternary complex, equal to 3.0. Titration curves for the sulfoximine were also obtained in the presence of Mg-ADP, Mg-ADP plus Pi, and Mg-ATP. The dissociation constants were 9, 5, and 0.8 muM, respectively. The progressive tightening of the dissociation constants is symptomatic of conformational changes at the active site as the total subsite occupied by ATP is filled. The number of rapidly exchanging water molecules drops from 2 to approximately 0.1 when saturating concentrations of L-methionine (SR)-sulfoximine and nucleotide are present. The kinetically determined KI value of approximately 4 muM for the sulfoximine is about three orders of magnitude tighter than thee Km' value of approximately 3 mM for L-glutamate. The previously mentioned dissociation constants obtained by enhancement titrations are also orders of magnitude tighter than Km'. These data suggest that L-methionine (SR)-sulfoximine is a "transition-state" analogue for the glutamine synthetase reaction. ...
Unconjugated sulfobromophthalein (BSP) inhibits state III respiration of rat liver mitochondria. It competitively inhibits the translocation into mitochondria of citrate, malate, phosphate and adenosine diphosphate, as studied by the inhibitor stop method. A double-beam spectrophotometric study strongly suggests that glutamate translocation is similarly inhibited. After perfusion of 65 mumol/hr/100 g for 90 minutes, bile flow is inhibited by 82% and liver adenosine triphosphate (ATP) falls by 60%. The amount of mitochondrial BSP can be computed form the amount of [35S] BSP still bound to mitochondria that are prepared at the end of such experiments; the amount of BSP lost during the isolation procedure is estimated from parallel experiments following binding of BSP in vitro. Comparison of the kinetic constants of mitochondrial transport and of their inhibition by BSP on the one hand and of liver concentration of substrates and BSP on the other gives rise to the conclusion that a strong inhibition of transports, mainly of phosphate, occurs in vivo and is responsible for the concomitant decrease in bile flow.
The effects of a variety of purine and pyrimidine nucleotides were tested for their capacity to inhibit mammalian soluble guanylate cyclase activity. Adenosine 5'-tetraphosphate (ATetP), ATP, ADP, AMP, guanosine 5'-tetraphosphate (GTetP) and GDP were found to inhibit soluble guanylate cyclase activity from rat lung and other mammalian tissues. The corresponding cytosine and thymine nucleotides showed little or no inhibitory activity, except for thymidine 5'-tetraphosphate, which inhibited glanylate cyclase activity but to a lesser extent than did the purine nucleoside tetraphosphates. ATetP and GTetP were found to be potent inhibitors of soluble guanylate cyclase activity from rat, guinea pig and mouse lung, rat heart and rat brain. Both purine nucleoside tetraphosphates were competitive inhibitors of the rat lung soluble enzyme. ATetP and GTetP had Ki values of 1 muM and 2.5 muM, respectively. The experimental data suggest that purine nucleoside tetraphosphates, and perhaps other purine nucleotides, may play a biologic role in modulating mammalian soluble guanylate cyclase activity.
The value of the adenylate energy charge, ie ([ATP] + 1/2[ADP])/([ATP] + [ADP] + [AMP]), during batch culture of Beneckea natriegens remained relatively constant during the exponential and early stationary phases of the growth cycle. During exponential growth the intracellular ATP content remained constant, the amount of ATP in the culture increasing proportionally with growth; these conditions were unaltered during growth in the presence of added cyclic AMP. On cessation of growth, significant variation in bacterial ATP content was observed depending on whether growth of the cultures terminated due to exhaustion of carbon or nitrogen from the medium, and on the presence or absence of added cyclic AMP.
The behavior of a model for the partial depletion of adenine nucleotides in the perfused rat heart has been compared for ischemic and high coronary flow anoxic conditions. The accumulation of noradrenaline in the interstitial fluid greatly activates adenylate cyclase ultimately resulting in the degradation of 1  102 micronmol/g dry wt of ATP to adenosine, inosine, and hypoxanthine in 30 min. The high coronary flow rate during anoxic perfusion promotes washout of the noradrenaline from the interstitial fluid so that the hormone accumulates to only one fifth of its highest level in ischemia. This results in only slight activation of adenylate cyclase and in insignificant degradation of ATP in 2 min. The behavior of the model has been examined for two aerobic conditions--a transition from light to heavy work (2 min) and a transition from substrate-free to glucose perfusion (12 min), In both cases adenylate cyclase was not activated above its basal activity, and insignificant depletion of adenine nucleotides is predicted by the model.
Kinetic properties and binding of specific inhibitors.  A procedure for preparation of sonic submitochondrial particles competent for adenine nucleotide transport is described. ADP or ATP transport was assayed, in the presence of oligomycin, in a saline medium made of 0.125 M KCl, 1 mM EDTA, 10 mM 4-morpholinopropane sulfonic acid buffer, pH 6.5. 2. Sonic particles transport ADP and ATP by an exchange diffusion process. Externally added ADP (or ATP) is exchanged with internal ADP and ATP with a stoichiometry of one to one. The V value for ADP transport 5 degrees C was between 2 and 3 nmol/min per mg protein. 3. The transport system in sonic particles is specific for ADP and ATP. It is strongly dependent on temperature. The activation energy between 0 and 9 degrees C is approx. 35 kcal/mol. The optimum pH is 6.5, 4, Like in intact mitochondria, externally added ADP is transported into sonic particles faster at a given concentration than externally added ATP. The V value for ADP transport is   15-2 times higher than the V value for ATP transport. 5. The transition from the energized to the deenergized state in sonic particles results in a decrease of the pH gradient across the membrane (internal pH less than external pH) and in a 2-4 fold increase in the Km value for ATP. This latter effect is opposite that found for transport of added ATP in intact mitochondria (Souverijn, J.H.M, Huisman, L.A, Rosing J. and Kemp, Jr, A. (1973) Biochim. Biophys. Acta 305, 185-198). Energization has no effect on the V value of ATP transport in sonic particles. 6. In contrast to intact mitochondria, inhibition of ADP transport in sonic particles by bongkrekic acid does not have any lag-time and does not depend on pH. The inhibition caused by bongkrekic acid is a mixed type inhibition with a Ki value of   12 micronM. Atractyloside and carboxyatractyloside do not inhibit ADP transport in sonic particles, unless the particles have been preloaded with these inhibitors during the sonication. 7. Palmityl-CoA added to sonic particles inhibits efficiently ADP transport. The mixed type inhibition found with palmityl-CoA has a Ki value of   16 micronM. 8. [3H]Bongkrekic acid binds to sonic particles readily and with high affinity. Bongkrekic acic binding to sonic particles does not depend on pH and it has a saturation plateau, corresponding approximately to   13 mol of site per mol of cytochrome a. The number of [3H]atracytloside binding sites is much lower (one-fifth of the bongkrekic acid). External carboxyatractyloside does not compete with [3H]bongkrekic acid for binding to sonic particles. However, when carboxyatractyloside is present inside the particles, it inhibits the binding of [3H]bongkrekic acid.
The chromatographic properties on thin layers of poly(ethyleneimine) cellulose of sixteen compounds containing the pyridine and/or adenine ring have been studied. Chromatographic mobilities have been examined as a function of the concentration of lithium chloride or sodium formate buffer in the chromatographic solvent. These data provide a rationale for the development of rapid and simple separation methods that should prove useful in the study of pyridine and adenine nucleotide metabolism.
A computer technique for determination of the distribution of adenine nucleotides among compartmented, protonated, and metal-chelated species has been developed for the perfused rat heart. This procedure requires knowledge of tissue levels of creatine, creatine phosphate, ATP, ADP, and AMP and the glycolytic and respiration rates. The method is applicable to any physiological state of the organ and has been applied to transient behavior in aerobic, anoxic, and ischemic hearts. The results suggest that ADP uptake and ATP export by mitochondria are normally linked and equal in rate during aerobic metabolism or short-term anoxia but become separate and unequal during ischemia, so that mitochondrial adenine nucleotides, primarily AMP, accumulate.
Crude extracts of Rhodospirillum rubrum catalyzed the formation of acid-volatile radioactivity from (35S) sulfate, (35S) adenosine-5'-phosphosulfate, and (35S) 3'-phosphoadenosine-5'-phosphosulfate. An enzyme fraction similar to APS-sulfotransferases from plant sources was purified 228-fold from Rhodospirillum rubrum. It is suggested here that this enzyme is specific for adenosine-5'-phosphosulfate, because the purified enzyme fraction metabolized adenosine-5'-phosphosulfate; 3'-phosphoadenosine-5'-phosphosulfate, however, only at a rate of 1/10 of that with adenosine-5'-phosphosulfate. Further, the reaction with 3'-phosphoadenosine-5'-phosphosulfate was inhibited with 3'-phosphoadenosine-5'-phosphate whereas this nucleotide had no effect on the reaction with adenosine-5'-phosphosulfate. For this activity with adenosine-5'-phosphosulfate the name APS-sulfotransferase is suggested. This APS-sulfotransferase needs thiols for activity; good rates were obtained with either dithioerythritol or reduced glutathione; other thiols like cysteine, 2'-3'-dimercaptopropanol or mercaptoethanol are less effective. The electron donor methylviologen did not catalyze this reaction. The pH-optimum was about 9.0; the apparent Km for adenosine-5'phosphosulfate was determined to be 0.05 mM with this so far purified enzyme fraction. Enzyme activity was increased with K2SO4 and Na2SO4 and was inhibited by 5'-AMP. These properties are similar to assimilatory APS-sulfotransferases from spinach and Chlorella.
Methods for measurements of catabolic reduction charge (defined as NADH/(NADH+NAD+)) and anabolic reduction charge (defined as NADPH/(NADPH + NADP+)) are described using [14C]nicotinamide labeling of Escherichia coli cultures. Together with these parameters the adenylate energy charge (ATP + 1/2ADP)/(ATP + ADP + AMP) was measured using labeling with [2-3H]adenine. These three charges were found under different exponential growth conditions to have values independent of the growth conditions: catabolic reduction charge, 0.05; anabolic reduction charge, 0.45; and adenylate energy charge, 0.9. The charges were examined during interruption of growth primarily affecting catabolism, respiration, or anabolism, leading to changes of the charges. The changes of charges are evaluated as a possible regulation of the metabolic rates utilizing or producing the nucleotides by their respective charges.
A decrease of glutamine synthetase (E. C. 6.312.) activity was observed under the assimilation of ammonium nitrogen in Chlorella. At the same time a decrease of ATP content in Chlorella cells took place. The ATP content was 7-fold decreased, while ADP and AMP contents were 4-fold and 3-fold increased respectively, after 15 min. of Chlorella incubation on "ammonium" medium. Further incubation for 45 min, resulted in gradual increase of ATP content and in decrease of ADP and AMP contents. The value of energy charge in ammonium assimilating Chlorella cells sharply decreased for first 15 min. of incubation and then it normalized gradually. The experiments with glutamine synthetase preparation, isolated from ammonium assimilating cells, have shown that ADP and AMP are strong inhibitors of the enzyme in the presence of Mg2+, and only ADP produces the inhibitory effect in the presence of Mn2+. No enzyme reactivation was observed after the transfer of ammonium assimilating cells into nitrogen-free medium or nitrate medium, the enzyme activity increasing at the expense of enzyme protein synthesis denovo.
The thermodynamics associated with the Mn2- -ATP, Mn-ADP- and Mn-AMP complex formation reactions determined from K potentiometric measurements at I = 0.2 are reported for the temperature range 1--45 degrees C. The K values increase with the length of the phosphate chain and with temperature. The limits and the best conditions for use of the "pH stat" titration method are discussed. Comparison with the results obtained by potentiometric and calorimetric methods in the case of Mg-nucleotide complexes is made.
Enthalpic variations in the formation of adenine nucleotide-manganese complexes, as measured by microcalorimetry, are reported. All the results are obtained in the temperature range 6--30 degrees C at I =0.2 and pH values 7.00 or 7.50. All the reactions are endothermic and the deltaH values increase with the length of the phosphate chain and with temperature. The deltaH values are compared with those previously obtained for adenine nucleotide-manganesium complexes. The comparison between calorimetric and potentiometric deltaH values is made. The divergence observed between these results at low temperature leads us to assume the formation of nucleotide aggregates induced by the presence of manganese ions. This hypothesis is confirmed by differential ultraviolet spectra.
The adenylate energy charge of human ejaculated spermatozoa was studied when the sperm motility was perturbed by varying pH, prolonged incubation, and caffeine. Between pH 8 and 9, which was optimal for the sperm motility, the energy charge was in the physiological range of 0.8 to 0.9. Above pH 9, the mobility, ATP content, and adenine nucleotide pool declined rapidly but the energy charge was maintained slightly below 0.8. Below pH 8, the motility also dropped drastically, but the ATP, nucleotide pool, and energy charge fell only slightly. Prolonged incubations of the spermatozoa decreased the motility, ATP, and nucleotide pool. However, the energy charge would remain above 0.6. Caffeine stimulation of the motility caused a rapid fall of ATP and the reduction of the physiological energy charge by 0.2 unit, unless glucose was added. Imidazole which reduced the caffeine-stimulated motility did not alter the physiological energy charge of the spermatozoa. The study showed that the spermatozoa could maintain the energy charge above 0.6 under stress.
The effects of adenosine diphosphate and triphosphate on the periodic  acid oxidation of the phenothiazine tranquilizing drugs were studied. The principal effect was a marked reduction in the rate of formation and decay of the drug free radical. The oxidation rates of the nucleotide free drugs seemed to be most strongly influenced by the inductive effects of substituents at the 2-position of the phenothiazine nucleus. However, the oxidation rates of the drugs in the presence of nucleotide were most strongly influenced by the substituents at the 10-position. Variations of the structure of substituents at the 10-position have only a modest effect on the electronic state of the phenothiazine nucleus. Therefore, the marked effect of structural variation in the 10-substituents in the presence of nucleotide on the periodate oxidation rate most likely is an expression of steric effects related to an interaction between drug and nucleotide.
Muscle biopsies were taken from the m. quadriceps femoris of man immediately after termination of dynamic and isometric exercise. These were analyzed for adenosine triphosphate (ATP), adenosine 5'-diphosphate (ADP), adenosine 5'-phosphate (AMP), phosphorylcreatine (PC), creatine, pyruvate and lactate. Regardless of type, intensity, and duration of the preceding exercise, a general pattern of the relation between high-energy phosphates and lactate content could be observed. PG showed a nonlinear relationship to the muscle lactate content. The ratio of ATP to ADP appeared to decrease linearly when lactate content increased. The relationships are believed to be the consequence of a steady-state condition where muscle pH is one of the major determining factors.
The contents of adenine nucleotides as well as steady-state concentrations of a number of glycolytic, pentose phosphate-pathway and tricarboxylic acid-cycle intermediates were measured in extracts of livers from normal and phenobarbital-treated rats that were perfused with p-nitroanisole. Metabolites were measured in livers that were freeze-clamped during periods of maximal rates of drug metabolism. Treatment of rats with phenobarbital increased rates of p-nitroanisole O-demethylation approx. fivefold. The concentrations of lactate, xylulose 5-phosphate and ribulose 5-phosphate were increased by phenobarbital treatment, whereas that of fructose 1,6-bisphosphate declined. Perfusion of livers with p-nitroanisole produced significant increases in 6-phosphogluconate and ribulose 5-phosphate in livers from phenobarbital-treated rats, but not in livers from control rats. Treatment of rats with phenobarbital caused [NADP(+)]/[NADPH] to change in the direction of more oxidation, as calculated from measured concentrations of 6-phosphogluconate and ribulose 5-phosphate; however, the [NADP(+)]/[NADPH] ratio calculated from ;malic' enzyme was not changed. Additions of p-nitroanisole produced a reduction of NADP(+) as calculated from 6-phosphogluconate dehydrogenase activity, but did not alter the [NADP(+)]/[NADPH] ratio calculated from substrates assumed to be in equilibrium with ;malic' enzyme. Activities of both glucose 6-phosphate dehydrogenase and ;malic' enzyme were increased by phenobarbital treatment. NAD(+) became more reduced as a result of phenobarbital treatment; however, perfusion of livers with p-nitroanisole did not cause a change in the oxidation-reduction state of this nucleotide. Concentrations of adenine nucleotides in livers were not altered significantly by treatment of rats with phenobarbital; however, a significant decline in the [ATP]/[ADP] ratio occurred during mixed-function oxidation of p-nitroanisole in livers from phenobarbital-treated rats, but not in livers from normal rats. Perfusion of livers with two other substrates for mixed-function oxidation, hexobarbital and aminopyrine, produced an increase in the [NADP(+)]/[NADPH] ratio calculated from ;malic' enzyme. In contrast with livers perfused with p-nitroanisole, there was no significant change in adenine nucleotides in livers exposed to hexobarbital or aminopyrine. Addition of 2,4-dinitrophenol (25mum) to the perfusate containing aminopyrine decreased the [ATP]/[ADP] ratio and tended to prevent the oxidation of NADPH observed with aminopyrine alone. Thus in the presence of an uncoupler of oxidative phosphorylation, NADPH generation may exceed its utilization via mixed-function oxidation.
Evidence has accumulated that several factors, which have been proposed as mediators of exercise hyperemia, can modulate adrenergic neurotransmission in blood vessels. Adenosine and the adenine nucleotides depress the response of isolated blood vessels of the dog to nerve stimulation more than that to exogenous norepinephrine; this difference is explained by a decreased release of the neurotransmitter. Potassium, hyperosmolarity, and acidosis also depress adrenergic neurotransmission in isolated veins. These results are consistent with the hypothesis that metabolic changes in the vicinity of the adrenergic neuroeffector junction are capable of decreasing the output of neurotransmitter to the blood vessels in the exercising muscle.
Cooling of rats under conditions of hypercapina and hypoxia induced no changes in the content of adenine nucleotides in the brain and skeletal muscles and decreased their concentration in the liver and myocardium. The content of creatine phosphate increased in the brain, but had no changes in the other tissues. 48 hours after cooling the amount of adenine nucleotides in the brain was higher as compared with the initial values, that was due to an increase in the ATP concentration; in the other tissues the contents of adenine nucleotides did not differ from that of the intact rats. The repeated action (48 hours after the first influences) caused no changes in the contents of adenine nucleotides in skeletal muscles and decreased them in the myocardium and liver. In the brain their amount and the content of creatinephosphate were increased as related to the intact rats. In the brain and myocardium the level of NADPH decreased after the first action and 48 hours after impact it restored up to the inital values. After repeated impact the level of NADPH in the brain restored up to initial values, in the myocardium it was increased.
In rat-liver nuclei, isolated by the non-aqueous technique, the concentrations and labelling rates of the purine moiety of acid-soluble nucleotides were determined and compared with corresponding data for non-fractionated tissue and nuclei-free cytoplasm. Livers were used from untreated rats, from rats with a highly stimulated synthesis of NAD and from rats following a heavy metabolic load with adenosine. Under all circumstances, the nuclear and cytoplasmic concentrations of nucleotides (e.g. ATP and its dephosphorylated forms, pyridine nucleotides) and of free glucose were practically identical. Specific radioactivities after a pulse with formate also indicated a nucleo-cytoplasmic equilibrium for purine-containing nucleotides. It is concluded that precursor pools for nuclear biosyntheses as well as energy supply for other nuclear activities may be determined by an analysis of the non-fractionated tissue.
Glutamine synthetase (L-glutamate:ammonia ligase (ADP-forming), EC 6.312) from Anabaena cylindrica was inhibited by alanine, glycine, serine and aspartate. The effects of alanine and serine were uncompetitive with respect to glutamate, while those of glycine and asparatate were uncompetitive with respect to glutamate, while those of glycine and aspartate were non-competitive and mixed type respectively. Different pairs of amino acids and their various combinations caused a cumulative inhibition of the enzyme activity. Glutamine synthetase was also inhibited by ADP and AMP and both nucleotides affected the enzyme competitively with respect to ATP and non-competitively for glutamate. Inorganic pyrophosphate, between 2 and 3 mM, produced a very pronounced inhibiton of enzyme activity. The inhibition by PPi was uncompetitive for ATP. Various combinations of the adenine nucleotides, PPi and Pi exerted a cumulative inhibitory effect on the enzyme activity, as did the amino acids, in different combinations with either adenine nucleotides, PPi or Pi. The effects of the adenine nucleotides and the amino acids were more pronounced at higher concentrations of ammonia. Except for serine similar responses of these effectors were obtained with increasing concentrations of Mg2+. It is proposed that changes in the free concentrations of Mg2+ are important in energy-dependent regulation of the enzyme activity in this alga.
Freshly isolated sarcoplasmic reticulum vesicles contain 0,05 mol of tightly bound ADP and 0,03 mol of tightly bound ATP per mol of Ca2+, Mg2+-ATPase (ATP phosphohydrolase, EC 3,613). These values were increased to 0.1-0.2 mol ADP and 0.2-0.3 mol ATP per mol of ATPase after incubation of vesicles in the presence of MgATP and Ca2+ at 25 degrees C and pH 7.0. Half-maximal enrichment of tightly bound nucleotides was obtained with 2.5 mM ATP and 0.32 microM free Ca2+. Uncoupling of calcium transport from ATPase activity by mild acidic conditions or with ethylene glycol bis(beta-aminoethyl ether)-N,N,N',N'-tetraacetic acid at pH 7.0 decreased the ability of the membranes to be enriched with tightly bound nucleotides and also decreased the content of tightly bound nucleotides of previously enriched membranes. Tightly bound [3H]nucleotides could only be partially displaced by reincubation under enrichment conditions. Tightly bound nucleotides are associated with energized calcium translocation but do not appear to be directly involved in the catalytic cycle.
The reactions of adenosine 14C-and gamma 32P-labelled ATP with isolated membranes from catecholamine storage vesicles of the bovine adrenal medulla were studied. In presence of Mg2+ about twice as much of 32P-radioactivity combined with the membrane as 14C-adenosine compounds at 31 degrees C and also at 0 degrees C, while in the absence of Mg2+ the amounts of 14C and 32P incorporated were similar for both substances. Autoradiography of the SDS-polyacrylamide gel after electrophoresis of the 32P-ATP-treated membrane protein showed two distinct zones corresponding to protein bands. Sonication released twice as much 32P-ATP as 14C-ATP from the space within the membrane particles indicating that at least half of the ATP present in space did not contain its original terminal phosphate group. About 40--45% of the 32P-radioactivity was incorporated in the membrane lipids, whereas only small amounts of 14C-radioactivity were extracted with lipids. About 1/3 of the incorporated 14C-radioactivity was not extractable with acids. The same amount remained in the 32P-ATP treated preparation acid-stably bound after extraction of the lipids and hus must be firmly bound ATP. When the reaction of the membrane preparation with labelled ATP was performed at 0 degrees C the fractions of the acid-stably bound 32P- and 14C-radioactivity increased. About 1 nmole/mg of protein (10--15%) of the bound 32P-radioactivity was exchangeable against unlabelled ATP, while only a very small fraction (less than 0.5 nmol/mg protein) of the 14C-radioactivity was exchanged against unlabelled ATP. Preincubation of the membrane particles with ATP-Mg2+ at 0 degrees C induced 30% inhibition of the ATPase activity and abolition of the net uptake of catecholamines. Different Km values obtained from initial velocity studies of ATPase activity and the overall-incorporation of 32P-radioactivity indicated that a direct correlation between these processes did not exist. Different strong inhibitory effects exerted by ADP on the ATPase activity and net uptake of catecholamine at the one hand and the overall 32P-and 14C-incorporation at the other hand supported that view. It is concluded that small fractions of the observed 32P-and 14C-incorporation can be involved in the ATP hydrolyzing reaction.
Lactate and O2 uptake and glucose output were studied in isolated livers from starved rats at perfusate flow rates varying from 100 to 7% of "normal" (1  125-0.75 ml/min per 100 g body wt.). 2. With moderate diminution of flow rate, lactate and oxygen uptake fell more slowly than would be expected if uptake purely depended on substrate supply. 3. Use of a mathematical model suggests that the intrinsic capacity of the liver for lactate uptake is unaffected until the flow rate falls below 25% of "normal". 4. Some lactate uptake was always observed even at 7% of the "normal" flow rate. 5. At flow rates below 33% of the "normal", lactate was increasingly metabolized by pathways other than gluconeogenesis, which became a progressively less important consumer of available O2. 6. ATP content decreased with diminution of flow rate, but substantially less markedly than did lactate uptake and glucose output. 7. Intracellular pH fell from a mean value of 7.25 at "normal" flow rate to 7.03 at 7% of the "normal" flow rate.
Adenine nucleotide inhibition of NADP+-dependent dehydrogenases and NADPH-cytochrome c reductase. Perfusion of rat livers with 10 mM-fructose or pretreatment of the rat with 6-aminonicotinamide (70 mg/kg) 6 h before perfusion decreased intracellular ATP concentrations and increased the rate of p-nitroanisole O-demethylation. This increase was accompanied by a decrease in the free [NADP+]/[NADPH] ratio calculated from concentrations of substrates assumed to be in near-equilibrium with isocitrate dehydrogenase. After pretreatment with 6-aminonicotinamide the [NADP+]/[NADPH] ratio also declined. Reduction of NADP+ during mixed-function oxidation may be explained by inhibition of of one or more NADPH-generating enzymes. Glucose 6-phosphate dehydrogenase, 6-phosphogluconate dehydrogenase, isocitrate dehydrogenase and "malic" enzyme, partially purified from livers of phenobarbital-treated rats, were inhibited by ATP and ADP. Inhibitor constants of ATP for the four dehydrogenases varied considerably, ranging from 9 micrometer for "malic" enzyme to   185 mM for glucose 6-phosphate dehydrogenase. NADPH-cytochrome c reductase was also inhibited by ATP (Ki 2.8 mM) and by ADP (Ki 0.9 mM), but not by AMP. Concentrations of ATP and ADP that inhibited glucose 6-phosphate dehydrogenase and the reductase were comparable with concentrations in the intact liver. Thus agents that lower intracellular ATP may accelerate rates of mixed-function oxidation by a concerted mechanism involving deinhibition of NADPH-cytochrome c reductase and one or more NADPH-generating enzymes.
1) The rate of 2,3-bisphosphoglycerate breakdown is independent of pH value. 2) The adenine nucleotide pattern at alkaline pH values with its characteristic lowering of ATP and the accompanying accumulation of fructose-1,6-bisphosphate is caused by a relative excess of the activity of the hexokinase-phosphofructokinase system as compared wity pyruvate kinase. 3) The breakdown of adenine nucleotides proceeds via AMP mainly through phosphatase and not via AMP deaminase. 4) The constancy of the sum of nucleotides as long as glucose is present is postulated to be due to resynthesis via adenosine kinase which competes successfully with adenosine deaminase. 5) A procedure is given to calculate ATPase activity of glucose-depleted red cells. The results indicate that the ATPase activity is less at lower pH values and declines with time. An ATPase with a high Km for ATP is postulated. 6) During glucose depletion ATP production is mostly derived from the breakdown of 2,3-bisphosphoglycerate and the supply from the pentose phosphate pool both of which proceed at a constant rate. The contribution of pentose phosphate from the breakdown of adenine nucleotides amounts to 40% of the lactate formed at pH 6.8 and is about twice the lactate at pH 81
Platelet ultrastructure, adenine nucleotide metabolism, and the release reaction. The ultrastructure and adenine nucleotide metabolism of platelets from patients with acute leukemia were studied to elucidate possible mechanisms for the platelet dysfunction observed in this clinical setting. Nonstimulated (resting) platelets from leukemic patients varied greatly in size; exhibited marked variation in the number of alpha granules present per cell; had poorly delineated circumferential bands of microtubules; and often grossly dilated open channel systems or cytoplasmic vacuolization. The intracellular concentrations of ATP and ADP were significantly below normal, and the specific radioactivity of ATP and ADP of nonstimulated platelets in leukemia was equivalent to or exceeded that seen in stimulated normal platelets. Addition of ADP or collagen to platelets from leukemic patients was followed by retarded and incomplete shape change, delayed and incomplete centripetal migration of subcellular organelles, impaired degranulation, and the formation of loose aggregates composed of relatively few platelets. Stimulation of "leukemic" platelets with collagen led to the release of significantly subnormal amounts of ATP and ADP and no significant change in the specific radioactivity of the intracellular nucleotides. In contrast to the results in normal platelets, the conversion of ATP to inosine monophosphate and hypoxanthine in platelets in leukemia failed to increase significantly with collagen stimulation. The results indicate that abnormalities exist in the storage pool of adenine nucleotides and the release mechanism of platelets in acute leukemia. These defects appear to contribute to an impairment in the release reaction in these platelets. Many of the ultrastructural and metabolic defects seen in acute leukemia occur in platelets in preleukemia.
Human metaphase chromosomes were stained with silver following a pretreatment with a heated alkaline solution. The most conspicuous feature of the stained metaphases was the omission of silver staining in the secondary constrictions of chromosomes 1,9 and 16, and on the distal Yq. Our evidence indicates that the negative silver binding is due to the preferential removal or alteration of non-histone proteins associated with these regions. The cytochemical significance of these findings is discussed.
During growth of Monosporium olivaceum its energy charge, E.C, (ie the adenylates ratio ATP + 0.5 ADP/ATP + ADP + AMP) increased from an initial value of 0.59 up to 0.85 after 25 hr of growth and then decreased to 0.5 The increase of energy charge was followed by the decrease of the activity of the 11 alpha-hydroxylase of cortexolone. This occured very clearly in the starved mycelium. Highest hydroxylation activity was observed when the lowest E.C. level (0.39-0.33) was reached.
Proteolytic aspartate and alanine aminotransferase, beta-D-galactosidase, N-acetyl-beta-D-glucosaminidase activities, contents of phosphocreatine, AMP + IMP, ADP, ATP were studied in the rat musculi gastrocnemius after denervation and blockade of axoplasmic flow, the latter being caused by 0.05 M colchicin solution applied to the sciatic nerve. Two weeks after denervation and the axoflow disturbance all the indices (except the N-acetyl-beta-D-glucoseaminidase activity) showed uniform changes. A month following the colchicin blockade the phosphocreatine and adenylates contents became normal. A conclusion is made on significance of the axoplasmic flow as a factor performing the trophic function of the nervous system.
Adenosine and the adenine nucleotides have a potent depressant action on cerebral cortical neurons, including identified corticospinal cells. Other purine and pyrimidine nucleotides were either weakly depressant (inosine and guanosine derivatives) or largely inactive (xanthine, cytidine, thymidine, uridine derivatives). The 5'-triphosphates and to a lesser extent the 5'-diphosphates of all the purine and pyrimidines tested had excitant actions on cortical neurons. Adenosine transport blockers and deaminase inhibitors depressed the firing of cortical neurons and potentiated the depressant actions of adenosine and the adenine nucleotides. Methylxanthines (theophylline, caffeine, and isobutylmethylxanthine) antagonized the depressant effects of adenosine and the adenine nucleotides and enhanced the spontaneous firing rate of cerebral cortical neurons. Intracellular recordings showed that adenosine 5'-monophosphate hyperpolarizes cerebral cortical neurons and suppresses spontaneous and evoked excitatory postsynaptic potentials in the absence of any pronounced alterations in membrane resistance or of the threshold for action potential generation. It is suggested that adenosine depresses spontaneous and evoked activity by inhibiting the release of transmitter from presynaptic nerve terminals. Furthermore, the depressant effects of potentiators and excitant effects of antagonists of adenosine on neuronal firing are consistent with the hypothesis that cortical neurons are subject to control by endogenously released purines.
Until now the interferon-mediated 2'-5' adenine oligonucleotide inhibitors (2-5A) of cell-free protein synthesis have not been detected in intact cells. Here we report their natural occurrence in interferon-treated, EMC virus-infected mouse L cells in amounts consistent with the idea that they play a part in the inhibition of virus growth.
The obligate intracellular bacterium Rickettsia typhi was examined for its ability to generate and maintain an adenylate energy charge in an extracellular environment. Freshly purified organisms were incubated, at 34 degrees C and pH 7.4, with or without glutamate and various other metabolites, and the levels of ATP, ADP, and AMP were determined. Of the metabolites tested, glutamate and glutamine were the most effective for the generation of ATP. In the presence of glutamate, there was a rapid increase in the level of ATP, followed by a moderate decrease during 150 min of incubation. The energy charge increased from a level of 0.2 to 0.5 to about 0.7 to 0.75, and then slowly declined to about 0.45 to 0.6. In the absence of glutamate, after an occasional initial surge in ATP level as the temperature was changed from 4 to 34 degrees C, there was a sharp decline in both ATP and energy charge (to 0.1 and sometimes to 0.01). The rickettsiae maintained their ability to regenerate their energy charge upon the addition of glutamate for about 30 min, but this ability declined with further incubation. In contrast to Escherichia coli, the decline in ATP in R. typhi was accompanied by a sharp increase in the level of AMP and the total adenylate pool. No adenine or adenosine was recovered from rickettsiae incubated with labeled AMP, ADP, or ATP. From these experiments and the demonstration reported elsewhere that rickettsiae transport the adenine nucleotides, it can be concluded that the adenylate energy charge in R. typhi is governed by the salvage of the adenine nucleotides rather than their unphosphorylated precursors. Thus, R. typhi undergoes greater shifts in energy charge than other bacteria, a phenomenon which may account for their instability in an extracellular environment. Under optimal conditions the adenylate energy charge of R. typhi approaches levels that border on those generally regarded as adequate for growth.
The adenine nucleotide pools were studied in toxigenic (NRRL 3240) and non-toxigenic (NRRL 3537) strains of Aspergillus flavus group in relation to aflatoxin biosynthesis. The levels of ADP and AMP were comparatively low in the non-toxigenic strain throughout the growth period. In the toxigenic strain the levels of ADP and AMP increased significantly during the stationary phase. The ATP content of the toxigencic strain had higher ATP levels during the stationary phase compared to the toxigenic strain. The inorganic phosphate levels of the non-aflatoxigenic strain were higher when compared with the aflatoxigenic strain. High levels of inorganic phosphate have been reported to be inhibitory for secondary biosynthesis including aflatoxins. The energy charge values of the non-toxigenic strain, compared to the toxigenic strain, were lower during exponential phase but higher during stationary phase. The observed changes have been correlated with aflatoxin biosynthesis.
RNA isolated from starved and refed Tetrahymena pyriformis GL, pulse labeled with H3(32)PO4, contains an RNA molecule of 2.4 x 10(6) molecular weight which can be identified by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis. This RNA has been shown to be a precursor of the mature 25S rRNA and 17S rRNA by a kinetic analysis of its synthesis, by hybridization competition with pure 25S rRNA and 17s rRNA, and by two-dimensional fingerprint analysis. The 5'-terminal nucleotide was isolated from the total digestion products of the 35S rRNA precusor and shown to be pppAp by analysis of the products of snake venom phosphodiesterase digestion. Low, but significant yields of the 5' terminus pppAp were also isolated from the 17S rRNA demonstrating that the primary transcript of the rRNA gene in T. pyriformis contains the 17S rRNA at its 5' end.
Adenine nucleotides were immobilized on modified Sepharose 4B or Dextran T40 with glutaraldehyde and reduced with KBH4. Binding was dependent on pH and the nature of the amino group on the modified polysaccharide. ATP bound to soluble dextran retained coenzyme activity with glycerol kinase. Binding is proposed to occur via a Schiff base.
Restoration of blood flow after 15 or 45 min. of ischemia induced an immediate recovery of phosphocreatine level and adenylate energy charge whereas ATP and total adenine nucleotides remained significantly below their normal values. These results prove that oxidative phosphorylations are not impaired but that a pool of myocardial adenine nucleotides is lost during ischemia which cannot be restored shortly after reperfusion. The significance of energy charge as a regulatory parameter in the myocardium is discussed.
A series of 2'-5'-linked oligo(adenylic acid) triphosphate (2'-5' A) inhibitors of protein synthesis were described recently. These inhibitors are synthesized from ATP by an enzyme activated in interferon-treated cell extracts or rabbit reticulocyte lysates by double-stranded RNA. We show here that 2'-5' A is a potent inhibitor of protein synthesis in intact cells of different origin (human, monkey, hamster, and mouse). At a concentration of 10 nM (in AMP equivalents), protein synthesis is inhibited by 50-85%. There is also a secondary effect on the total RNA synthesis which becomes evident several hours after inhibition of protein synthesis. All of these effects, however, are transient and, after a recovery period, both RNA and protein synthesis resume rates comparable to the appropriate controls. A nuclease activity is detected in cells after treatment with 2'-5'A. The total polyadenylylated RNA is much reduced in comparison to that from untreated cells, and electrophoretic analysis in polyacrylamide slab gels provides evidence for its degradation. Similarly, there is an apparent degradation of ribosomal RNA. Consistent with these results, extracts from cells that had been treated with 2'-5'A manifest an enhanced nuclease activity in vitro on incubation with exogenous RNA. Here, we propose that, as in cell-free systems, the mechanism of action of 2'-5'A in intact cells involves activation of a nuclease. This activation is transient, but the nuclease remains sensitive to further activation by the inhibitor.
We have examined the accumulation of polyphosphorylated nucleotides in Bacillus subtilis in relation to the function of the rel gene. Our results are as follows. (i) During inhibition of isoleucine activation by O-methylthreonine, wildtype B. subtilis cells accumulate unusual nucleotides with the chromatographic and chemical properties of pppApp, ppApp, pppGpp, ppGpp, pGpp, and ppGp. (ii) During the carbon source downshift elicited by inhibiting glucose uptake, we observed accumulation of the polyphosphorylated guanosine but not adenosine nucleotides. (iii) At the end of long phase in sporulation medium, we observed a small transient accumulation of the polyphosphorylated guanosine but not adenosine nucleotides. (iv) We were unable to detect a nucleotide with chromatographic behavior expected for pppAppp under any conditions. (v) The rel mutant of Swanton and Edlin (Biochem. Biophys. Res. Commun. 46-583-588, 1972) did not accumulate any of these polyphosphorylated nucleotides under any of the conditions examined. (vi) the rel mutant is unimpaired in sporulation. We conclude that one or more of the nucleotides we have detected may be involved in controlling the specificity of transcription during the stringent response, but none of them are required for sporogenesis.
The biochemical function, adenylate energy charge (AEC), correlates with the viable count of S. mutans. AEC may be used to estimate the percent viable fraction of bacteria in dental plaque samples. An interactive computer program designed to process the AEC data is described.
The insect group which includes cicadas harbours intracellular bacterial symbionts which are passed on from generation to generation in the form of a 'symbiont ball' inserted between the egg membrane and the rear pole of the egg cell. Bioluminiscence methods can be used to measure the oscillations in ATP, ADP and AMP levels in egg systems which have been separated into a host and a symbiont part (Euscelidius variegatus, Euscelis incisus), and which are exposed to constant light or light-dark variations under otherwise constant conditions (26 degrees C, 70% relative humidity, 7000 lux). The energy charge can be calculated from the ATP, ADP and AMP concentrations. Comparisons of such curves suggest an 'antagonistic' relationship in the energy metabolism of the host and symbiont parts of the egg. The minima of oscilaltions in the host's energy metabolism generally occur at the same time as the maxima in the endocytobionts energy metabolism. Antagonistic correlations between the nucleus/cytoplasm and mitochondria/plastids were also observed in the eucyte system. Analogies between the two systems can be explained satisfactorily by the endosymbiont theory of the origin of eucytes. It follows that insect endocytobioses can serve as an experimental model for the biochemical analysis of the eucyte system.
Among the precursor substances tested 1-14C-glycine is the most suitable for measuring rates of AN biosynthesis in rat hearts in vivo. 2. Continuous i.v. infusion of ribose for 24 hours stimulates AN biosynthesis in normal hearts and amplifies the enhancement of this process in hearts of isoproterenol-treated rats. The isoproterenol-induced decline of myocardial ATP is prevented by long-term application of ribose. 3. Elevation of the available PRPP pool mainly mediated by ribose and release of feedback inhibition of PRPP amidotransferase activity by the isoproterenol-induced ATP decline appear to be the optimal conditions required for maximal stimulation of myocardial AN biosynthesis.
Functional capacities in Escherichia coli cells starved for glucose were examined by comparing protein synthesis, utilization of new substrates, and maintenance of viability with the adenylate energy charge of the culture. When growth ceased because of glucose exhaustion in an E. coli culture, the energy charge dropped from 0.90 to about 0.80. During this time, the viable-cell count and the capacity for protein synthesis and for induction of new enzymes were maintained only if other substrates were available in the medium. The culture could be maintained for many hours without growth or death if glucose was added slowly; the energy charge in this case stabilized at about 0.80. A consistent transient decrease in the energy charge to around 0.80, accompanied by a decrease in protein synthesis, was also observed during the adaptation from glucose to other substrates during diauxic growth on glucose and glycerol or lactose.
Beef heart mitochondrial ATPase (F1) contained 2 mol of ADP and 1 mol of ATP/mol of enzyme, which resisted removal by Sephadex chromatography with dilute buffers or repeated precipitation with ammonium sulfate. The native enzyme also contained two apparently equivalent binding sites, which participated in readily reversible binding of adenyl-5'-ylimidodiphosphate (AMP-P(NH)P), with a Kd of   13 mum. The failure of AMP-P(NH)P to compete effectively with ADP for binding sites on F1 may be related to the failure of the analog to inhibit oxidative phosphorylation. Virtually complete removal of all adenine nucleotides from F1 occurred when the enzyme was chromatographed on columns of Sephadex equilibrated with 50% glycerol. No loss in ATPase activity was observed following removal of nucleotides from the enzyme, which was then capable of binding more than 4 mol of ADP and almost 5 mol of AMP-P(NH)P/mol of protein. Subsequent chromatography on columns of Sephadex equilibrated with dilute buffers containing Mg2+ removed only   15 mol of ADP and no AMP-P(NH)P from the enzyme. Reconstitution of F1 with ADP or with almost 5 mol of AMP-P(NH)P resulted in preparations that exhibited an undiminished capacity to restore oxidative phosphorylation in F1-deficient submitochondrial particles.
The tightly bound nucleotides of the beff-heart mitochondrial ATPase are released during cold inactivation followed by ammonium sulfate precipitation. During incubation at 0 degrees C the sedimentation coefficient (S20W) of the ATPase first declines from 12.1S to 9S. Prolonged incubation or precipitation with ammonium sulfate leads to dissociation of the 9S component into subunits with S20W of 3.5S. The 9S component still bears bound nucleotides which exchange more extensively and rapidly with added nucleotides than those bound to the active 12.1S component. The bound nucleotides are lost when the 9S form dissociates into the smaller subunits. Thus, firm binding of nucleotides is a property of the quarternary structure of the enzyme. The exchangeability of the nucleotides bound to the ATPase of chloroplast membranes is greatly increased in membranes illuminated in the presence of pyocyanine. Pi can exchange into both the beta and gamma positions of the bound nucleotides when the membranes are energized in the presence of Mg2+. The exchange of the nucleotides and the incorporation of Pi are insensitive to the inhibitor Dio-9 but are inhibited by the uncoupler S13. This inhibition by S13 parallels that of the inhibition of photosynthetic phosphorylation. These findings are discussed with regard to our hypothesis that electron transfer causes release of preformed tightly bound ATP from the ATPase by inducing a conformational change.
We decribed the preparation of adenine 1-oxide nucleotides by oxidation of the natural compounds with monopermaleic acid in aqueous solutions at neutral pH, with an overall yield after chromatographic purification between 75 and 80%. If irradiated, the adenine 1-oxide nucleotides undergo a photochemical rearrangement reaction, the main photoproducts in aqueous solution at alkaline pH being the corresponding isoguanine nucleotides. The modified ring vibration pattern of the 1-oxide analogues as well as the 13C chemical shift indicate a loss of aromaticity as compared to the natural compounds. Coupling constant measurements show that the dihedral angle between the 31POC and OC13C planes is around 180degree, ie, trans, as in the natural adenine nucleotides. The modified adenine nucleotides were tested as potential substrates and/or inhibitors of mitochondrial processes, as substrates of varous phosphotransferases from mitochondria or cytosol, and as allosteric effectors in the reactions catalyzed by glutamate dehydrogenase and phosphofructokinase. Although the adenine 1-oxide nucleotides are not recognized by the translocase system of the inner mitochondrial membrane, they are good substrates for mitochondrial phosphotransferases located in the intermembrane space. Similarly, they participate in the phosphoryl group transfer reactions catalyzed by pyruvate kinase, phosphofructokinase, and hexokinase. As allosteric effectors, the modified nucleotides are less active than the natural compounds, probably because of a lower binding capacity to the allosteric sites of the regulatory enzymes.
Tightly bound adenine nucleotides are removed from multiple binding sites on beef heart mitochondrial ATPase (F1) by chromatography on columns of Sephadex equilibrated with 50% glycerol. Release of nucleotides from the enzyme is associated with large decreases in sedimentation velocity (from 1  19 S to 8.4 S) which may be observed in concentrated solutions of polyols. Polyol-induced conformational changes are reversed when the enzyme is returned to dilute buffers. The nucleotide-depleted enzyme restores oxidative phosphorylation in F1-deficient submitochondrial particles. Reconstitution of nucleotide-depleted F1 with the ATP analog (adenylyl-imidodiphosphate (AMP-PNP), almost 5 moles of AMP-PNP per mole of enzyme, results in preparations with substantially inhibited ATPase activity which nevertheless restores oxidative phosphorylation and the 32Pi-ATP exchange reaction in F1-deficient submitochondrial particles. Incubation of the analog-labeled enzyme with ATP and Mg++ results in partial displacement of the analog and a time-dependent recovery of ATPase activity.
The effects of ischemia on myocardial adenine nucleotide metabolism and coronary flow during cardiac hypertrophy were studied in 140 rats and 20 guinea pigs, respectively. During increased periods of ischemia, the initially lower ATP contents decreased significantly as did the initially elevated ADP levels, whereas AMP, adenosine, and inosine, and hypoxanthine showed a continually rising elevation compared with the normal hearts. The sum of ATP, ADP, AMP, and their degradation products in the hypertrophied myocardial tissues started to decline after 5 min of ischemia. The remainder was found in the 0.9% NaCl solution in which the rat hearts were incubated, in the form of hypoxanthine, which was the largest fraction, followed by inosine and adenosine, which was the lowest fraction. In normal hearts, these changes occurred only after 60 min of ischemia. The coronary flow of the isolated guinea pig hearts increased significantly with decreasing content of the oxygen gas phase in the Krebs-Henseleit perfusion medium. These changes were more significant in normal than in hypertropheid hearts despite the clear initial elevations of the coronary flow in these hearts at 95% oxygen saturated perfusion, as well as the essential increases of the adenosine content in the myocardial tissues and in the perfusates during the development of the hypoxemia. Consequently, these results significantly demonstrate the curtailed compensation possibilities of hypertrophied hearts for the maintenance of their functions during the development of ischemia in comparison with normal hearts, a factor obviously caused by the ineffecient utilization of their energy supply even without ischemia.
Comparative investigation of the effect of nitrofurans on the metabolism of adenylic nucleotides of Staphylococcus aureus at 36 degrees and 40 degrees C was made. It was shown that increasing of the cultivation temperature intensified the bacteristatic effect of nitrofurans. The use of nitrofurans at supraoptimal temperature intensified the activity of ATP-ase and considerably decreased the ATP, ADP and increased the AMP of Staphylococcus aureus.
The turnover of free adenine nucleotides was studied in the perfused rabbit heart by the decline in radioactivity 3 h 30 after administration of a single pulse of tritiated adenine. The radioactivity of the perfusate was followed during the experiments. About 7% of the labelled adenine nucleotides were renewed by hour and 1,5% of the radioactivity was lossed by hour in the perfusion fluid.
Adenine mononucleotides of transulucent and white parts in the adductor muscle of Japanese oyster are identified and measured after the separation on PEI-cellulose column. The studies are performed on oysters kept in aerated sea water aquarium. Results obtained for both tissues are compared each other and with the literature data.
The in vitro sulfation of glycoproteins, mucopolysaccharides and lipids was studied with rat stomach, duodenum and colon mucosal scrapings. In the presence of Na2 35SO4, the incorporation of label was colon greater than stomach greater than or equal to duodenum. In the presence of [35S] 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate (PAP35S), the incorporation of label was colon = stomach greater than duodenum. The 35S was incorporated into glycoprotein, mucopolysaccharide and sulfatide. It is suggested that the availability of PAPS may be an important factor in determining the differences in sulfation previously observed histochemically in several species, namely that in vivo colonic mucosa far exceeds stomach mucosa in synthesis of sulfated polyanions.
The effects of various substrates and alternative substrates on the hydrolytic activity of beef heart mitochondrial ATPase was examined. It was found that ATP or ADP, ITP hydrolysis showed positive cooperativity. IDP inhibited ITP hydrolysis and caused positive cooperativity. When ITP was present during an ATP hydrolysis assay, the rate of ATP hydrolysis was stimulated. IDP had no effect on ATP hydrolysis rates. A nonhydrolyzable ITP analog, inosine 5'-(beta, gamma-imido)triphosphate (IMP-P(NH)P), was synthesized and purified. It was found to be a potent competitive inhibitor of ITP and GTP hydrolytic activity. However, this beta-gamma-imido-bridged ITP analog was found to change the ITP and GTP hydrolysis kinetics from linear to positively cooperative. This compound inhibited ATP hydrolysis at substrate concentrations of 100 muM and lower, and stimulated ATP hydrolysis at substrate concentrations between 100 muM and 2 mM. IMP-P(NH)P had no effect on ATP hydrolysis when the substrate concentration was above 2 mM. In the presence of the activating anion, bicarbonate, IMP-P(NH)P inhibited ATP hydrolysis competitively, and induced positive cooperativity. IMP-P(NH)P had no effect on the ATP equilibrium Pi exchange, the ITP equilibrium Pi exchange, or ATP synthesis catalyzed by beef heart submitochondrial particles.
In the present work, the transported fluid and the tissue content of ATP, ADP and AMP has been evaluated in the jejunum rat intestine which was everted and incubated in vitro both at 28 degrees C and at 38 degrees C for 1 h. The energy-rich phosphates have been measured in the tissue at the beginning and at the end of the experiment as well as in vivo. These determinations have been made in the total intestine and in the scraped mucosa. ATP and ADP content are higher in vivo and lower but constant at 28 degrees C in vitro; on the contrary, at 38 degrees C in vitro, the initial and final content of these adenilic nucleotides are both lower than at 28 degrees C. Under all these conditions the AMP content does not vary appreciably. Wet weight to dry weight ratios ahve been reported for mucosal and submucosal tissues in unincubated and incubated intestines. In some experiments, fluid transport (measured as an actual serosal volume increase) was determined every 20 min during a 1-h incubation. At 28 degrees C, fluid transport is constant throughout the time of the experiment, but at 38 degrees C, there is a progressive decrease of the transported fluid. Fluid transport and ATP content of the intestine seem to be directly related. The transport activity which is lower at 38 degrees C than at 28 degrees C, seems to be due to a low availability of energy-rich phosphates.
beta-Naphthoquinone-4-sulfonate was used for chemical modification of amino groups of myosin. The reagent was found to affect also the sulfhydryl groups if the reaction was not prevented by previous disulfide exchange with cystamine. When cystamine protection was employed the ATPase (ATP phosphohydrolase, EC3.613) activity was enhanced in the presence of Mg2+ and decreased in the presence of K+ or Ca2+, a pattern typical of myosin with blocked essential amino groups. On addition of ATP or ADP a blueshift was observed in the fluorescent emission spectrum of beta-naphthoquinone-4-sulfonate bound by myosin, presumably owing to conformational changes in the environment of essential amino groups induced by the binding of nucleotides.
1) During the development of myocardial hypertrophy induced by 3,3',5-triiodo-L-thyronine the enhancement of de novo synthesis of adenine nucleotides occurs very early and precedes the increase of protein synthesis. In this respect there is a striking parallelism with other types of cardiac hypertrophy. 2) The acceleration of adenine nucleotide synthesis under these experimental conditions seems to be due to a greater availability of cardiac 5-phosphoribosyl-1-pyrophosphate. 3) The triiodothyronine-induced enhancement of adenine nucleotide synthesis can be attenuated by beta-receptor-blocking agents.
Studies on three models of cardiac hypertrophy (aortic constriction, application of isoproterenol, daily administrations of 3,3'5-triiodo-L-thyronine, respectively) reveal that the enhancement of de novo synthesis of adenine nucleotides occurs very early during the development of cardiac hypertorphy and always precedes the increase of protein synthesis. Therefore, it seems likely that the accelerated synthesis of adenine nucleotides is an important factor among those metabolic processes involved in the stimulation of protein synthesis in the hypertrophying heart. 2. As far as the mechanism for the observed enhancement of adenine nucleotide synthesis is concerned, it has been demonstrated that the available pool of 5-phosphoribosyl-l-pyrophosphate, an essential precursor substance of de novo synthesis, is increased in the hypertrophying heart due to isoproterenol and 3,3'5-triiodo-L-thyronine, respectively.
The influence of clofibrate on the glycolytic pathway in liver was studied. The changes in the activity of glucokinase and hexokinase were not significant. A reduction of phosphofructokinase (p less than 0.05) and pyruvate kinase activity was found (p less than 0.0005) during clofibrate feeding. An in vitro inhibition of these enzymes could not be demonstrated by clofibrate up to a concentration of 2.5 mM. Crossover plots of glycolytic intermediates indicate that the reduced pyruvate kinase activity may influence the glycolytic pathway in vivo. Clofibrate feeding induces a lower ATP:ADP ratio, a lower adenylate energy charge and elevates AMP levels in rat liver. This may possibly stimulate the hepatic glycogenolysis and the glucose utilisation by this organ.
Mouse peritoneal macrophages elicited by intraperitoneal injection of sodium caseinate exhibit low levels of ecto-5'-nucleotidase (E. C. 313.5) activity in contrast to macrophages obtained by peritoneal lavage. When elicited cells were cultured under standard conditions in the presence of serum, a 2.5-fold increase in 5'-nucleotidase activity was observed over a period of 48 hours. Addition of adenosine monophosphate to the culture medium led to an augmented (5-fold) increase in the specific activity (per unit cell protein) as well as an absolute increase (per culture plate) of 5'-nucleotidase. Other adenosine-containing compounds also had stimulatory effects. The levels of this enzyme thus appear to be regulated by the extracellular levels of adenosine nucleotides. The product of the enzymatic reaction--adenosine--when added to the medium exhibited a toxic effect on these cells--as did adenosine monophosphate. However, the former substance did not augment the increase in enzyme activity during culture. The toxic effect could be suppressed when the cells were cultured in the presence of uridine 5'-monophosphate. The latter substance also depressed the stimulation of enzyme activity due to AMP.
Energy transfer inhibitors that inhibit the ATPase activity of soluble chloroplast coupling factor 1 (CF1) (e.g. phloridzin and tentoxin) do not inhibit energy-dependent adenine nucleotide exchange. Energy transfer inhibitors that block proton flux through the hydrophobic protein proton channel (CF0) (e.g. dicyclohexylcarbodiimide and triphenyltin chloride) also block light-dependent adenine nucleotide exchange. 2. Tentoxin, at relatively high concentrations, stimulates an energy-independent exchange of adenosine diphosphate. 3. High concentrations of tentoxin elicit a Ca2+-dependent ATPase activity with soluble CF1, but has no effect on the Ca2+-dependent ATPase activity of membrane-bound CF 4. The trypsin-activated, Ca2+-dependent, membrane-bound ATPase is not affected by high concentrations of tentoxin, whereas the dithiothreitol-activated, Mg2+-dependent ATPase is markedly inhibited. 5. The reconstitution of chloroplasts, partially depleted in CF1, with soluble CF1 is correlated with the loss of tentoxin-induced, Ca2+-dependent ATPase activity associated with soluble CF  1
The conformationally restricted adenine nucleotide analogs 8,3'anhydro-8-oxy-9-(beta-D-xylofuranosyl)adenine-5'-O-tri(di)-phosphate (I), and 8,2'-anhydro-8-oxy-9-(beta-D-arabinofuranosyl) adenine-5'-O-tri(di)-phosphate (II), were prepared chemically as their alpha-32P-labelled compounds and compared with syn-structured 8-bromo AT(D)P in mitochondrial adenine nucleotide translocation. The experimental findings demonstrate that the heterocycle-ribose orientation affects the carrier mediated adenine nucleotide transport very strongly, ie a non fixed adenine heterocycle in the anti region is prerequisite for the bound nucleotide to induce the transfer action of the adenine nucleotide carrier.
Exclusion for ration of protein for 21 days leads to a rise in the ATP-ase activity, stimulated by ions both of Ca and Mg. Concurrently, a fall of the protein content in the study organs, particularly in the liver, is noted. Exclusion of protein from the diet resulted in substantial changes in the content of the adenyl system. The proportion of ATP declined in all of the investigated organs, parallel with a rising ADP concentration. The AMP increases both in the liver and heart.
The effect of Cd2+ on the respiration of rat liver mitochondria was investigated. The uncoupling effect of Cd2+ was partially restored by the addition of Mg2+. The influence of Cd2+ on adenine nucleotide concentrations in the reaction mixture consisting of mitochondria and ATP was also studied using high performance liquid chromatography. In the presence of added Mg2+, a two-fold increase in AMP concentration was brought about by the addition of Cd2+. There was a concomitant decrease in ATP. In the prence of added ADP, an increase in AMP concentration was also brought about by addition of Cd2+. The results are discussed in relation to ATPase and adenylate kinase activity in mitochondria.
The syn-anti equilibrium about the glycosidic bond in adenosine and some related analogues was studied by means of 1H NMR spectroscopy, with the aid of several model analogues fixed in given conformations either by intramolecular bonding, or by introduction of a bulky substituent. A model unambiguously and exclusively in the syn conformation is 8- (alpha-hydroxyisopropyl) adenosine; while one fixed in the anti conformation is 8,5'-anhydro-8-oxoadenosine. A new analogue, fixed in the high anti conformation, is 8,2-'O-isopropylidenearabinofuranosyladenine. Several additional new model compounds were synthesized and their properties are described. With the aid of these models, the syn-anti dynamic equilibrium was examined for adenosine and some related compounds in different solvent systems, and the conformer populations evaluated quantitatively. The validity of the procedure applied, and the accuracy of the results are critically examined, and compared with findings obtained by other procedures. Available literature data on the syn-anti equilibrium in other 8-substituted adenosines are re-analyzed in the light of the present results. An analysis is also presented of the interdependence of the various conformational parameter, i. e. conformation about the glycosidic bond and those of the sugar ring and exocyclic carbinol group, in adenosine and 2',3'-O-isopropylidenadenosine.
The purpose of the present study was to investigate the interactions between ATP, ADP and calcium binding by rat heart sarcoplasmic reticulum vesicles (SR), and to re-evaluate the assay method used to study calcium binding. Calcium binding or transport was studied by the Millipore filtration method. Rat heart SR has an unusually high Mg2+ stimulated ATPase activity (  137 +/- 0.16 mumol Pi per min per mg at 25 degrees C) so that previous incubation with ATP in calcium binding studies releases ADP and Pi. By maintaining ATP at high and ADP at low concentrations with an ATP-regenerating system (phosphoenolpyruvate and pyruvate kinase), calcium binding capacity was increased by two to three times that of a non-ATP-regenerating system and there was a direct relationship between the amount of Ca-binding and SR protein concentration. When Ca2+ and Mg2+ concentrations were controlled and ATP and ADP concentrations were varied independently the initial rate of Ca-binding was inhibited 25% by 1 mmol.litre-1 ADP and 48% by 3mmol.litre-1 ADP. ATP limited the initial rate of Ca-binding only at ATP levels below 2mmol.litre- At low ATP concentrations Ca-release was observed. However, in the presence of an ATP-regenerating system no Ca-release was observed, even at low concentrations of ATP. This study shows that ADP is an inhibitor of Ca-binding by rat heart SR. However, the possibility that high ADP concentrations in the presence of Pi from ATP hydrolysis, could facilitate calcium release cannot be excluded. In addition to the possible physiological importance, these effects must be regarded when assaying rat cardiac SR calcium binding.
The hydrolysis of diadenosine tetraphosphate, a compound previously described by others to occur in liver at concentrations of around 0.1 mu M, is carried out by a specific enzyme. This enzyme has been partially purified from rat liver extracts, and the following properties have been found. The Km value for diadenosine tetraphosphate is 2 mu M; the products of hydrolysis are ATP and AMP; the Km value for diguanosine tetraphosphate is 2 mu M; none of the following substances were substrates of the enzyme: diadenosine triphosphate, diguanosine di and triphosphates, adenosine tetraphosphate, ATP, ADP, NAD+, NADP+ and bis-p-nitrophenylphosphate. Cyclic AMP was not an inhibitor of the reaction. The enzyme requires Mg2+ ions, is maximally active at a pH value of approximately 8, and has a molecular weight of 22000 as estimated by filtration on Sephadex G-100. The activation energy of the reaction was of 10250 cal times mol-1 (42886 J times mol-1). Particularly striking is the inhibition by adenosine tetraphosphate (Ki equals 48 nM) and guanosine tetraphosphate (Ki equals 14 nM). Other nucleotides tested were also competitive inhibitors with Ki values in the 10--100 mu M range.
In a mutant strain (bd) of Neurospora, the biological clock is visibly expressed at the growing front of a mycelial mat by sequential periods of conidiating (spore-forming) and non-conidiating growth. The edges (8 mm) of the mycelium at different ages were sampled during a 31 h period, and the adenine nucleotide levels were enzymatically assayed. In the edge region, the total adenosine 5'-monophosphate (AMP) level showed an oscillation, with a minimum of 0.5 mumol/g (residual dry weight) and a maximum of 6.0 mumol/g. The total adenosine 5'-triphosphate level and the total adenosine 5'-diphosphate level showed no obvious oscillation. The oscillation in AMP content had many of the properties of a circadian rhythm. Its period was about 22 h long, it was phase-shifted by light, and it was damped out by continuous illumination. The oscillation in AMP level led to an oscillation in the overall cellular energy charge from 0.65 to 0.93. However, the energy charge calculation does not take into account any possible compartmentalization of AMP, and therefore must be interpretated cautiously. It is suggested that the underlying cause of the oscillation in AMP level could be a rhythmic, partial uncoupling of mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation.
Electron spin resonance is used to detect RNA's that contain polyadenylate tracts. The method depends on the ability of RNA's that contain polyadenylate sequences to associate with poly(2'-deoxy-2'-fluoro)uridylic acid, which has been spin-labeled with 4-(2-iodoacetamido)-2,2,6,6-tetramethylpiperidinooxyl. The formation of the hybridization product can be detected by monitoring the decrease in mobility of the spin probe.
Concomitant with glucose-induced insulin release, there occurred an increase of ATP from 4.40 plus or minus 0.21 to 23.16 plus or minus 0.52 pmol/100 islets/min (P less than 0.001) in the effluent from perifused rat islets. There is a linear relationship between circulating ATP and insulin levels both in the stimulated and basal state (r = 0.689, P less than 0.01). Islets incubated with labeled adenine for a short period of time (37.5 min) showed no release of radioactivity upon subsequent glucose-induced insulin release. Islets incubated for a prolonged interval with labeled adenine (150 min) showed an increase in acid soluble radioactivity in the effluent during glucose-induced insulin release. Following incubation of the islets with labeled adenine for 150 min, approximately 5% of the homogenate radioactivity was found in the secretory granules. Using column chromatography to separate the adenine nucleotides, the distribution of radioactivity among the various nucleotides in the secretory granule fraction was found to be: AMP 54.42 plus or minus 4.96%, ADP 14.20 plus or minus   163%, ATP 15.39 plus or minus 3.84%, and cAMP 16.07 plus or minus 2.11%. The distribution of radioactivity in the effluent adenine nucleotides after glucose-induced insulin release was: AMP 32.83 plus or minus 4.62%, ADP 24.52 plus or minus 2.77%, ATP 28.13 plus or minus 5.45%, and cAMP 26.01 plus or minus 3.34%. The absolute levels of adenine nucleotides in the secretory granules were ATP 4.19 plus or minus 0.88, ATP madp 7.94 plus or minus 2.20 and cAMP 4.46 plus or minus   174 pmol/ug prot. The levels in the islet effluent were ATP, 15.30 plus or minus 2.70, ATP qDP, 29.43 plus or minus 3.49 and cAMP 7.66 plus or minus   193 pmol/100 islets/min for the first ten min of glucose-stimulated insulin release. Thereafter there was a rapid decline in effluent cAMP while ATP and ADP remained in essentially equivalent amounts. The distribution of radioactivity and absolute levels of the adenine nucleotides in the effluent reflects that found in the secretory granules, confirming previous observations that insulin release is occurring by exocytosis.
Myocardial mitochondrial function and high energy phosphate levels were measured in normal swine, in swine after either 5 or 10 minutes of ischemic ventricular fibrillation (IVF) while on cardiopulmonary bypass, and in swine defibrillated after either 5 or 10 minutes of IVE. The damage to myocardial mitochondria induced by IVF, such as partial uncoupling, decreased oxygen uptake, and loss of cytochrome oxidase activity, was completely reversed almost instantly by coronary artery perfusion and the restoration of sinus rhythm. After either 5 or 10 minutes of IVF followed by coronary artery reperfusion and defibrillation, myocardial creatine phosphate (CP), adenosine monophosphate (AMP) and adenosine diphosphate (ADP) return to normal levels very rapidly. However, adenosine triphosphate (ATP) levels remain significantly lower than control levels. If the bioenergetic mechanisms of swine and human myocardium are similar, it appears that IVF at least for a 10 minute period produces no damage to myocardial mitochondria that is not corrected by perfusion of the coronary arteries and re-establishment of sinus rhythm. Furthermore, sinus rhythm can be re-established and maintained despite signficantly lower levels of myocardial ATP.
ATP, ADP, AMP and cyclic AMP inhibit NAD-dependent isocitrate dehydrogenase (L-s-isocitrate : NAD-+ oxidoreductase, EC   1  1  141) from rhizobia but have no effect on the enzyme from corresponding bacteroids. This was observed using three rhizobial strains two of which are effective, and one ineffective, with Lotus pedunculatus. Using partially purified enzyme from each of the three rhizobial strains it was found that the adenine nucleotides inhibit the enzyme by competing with NAD-+, not with isocritrate. The rate of reaction catalysed by the enzyme (expressed as activity per mg protein) in cell-free extracts of each of the effective rhizobial strains was about three times that of the reaction in extracts of the corresponding bacteroids. No correlation was found between effectiveness and NAD-dependent isocitrate dehydrogenase activity in the rhizobial cells.
Rat ascites hepatoma cell DNA polymerases (EC 2.7.7.7), especially low molecular weight polymerase, could incorporate a significant amount of single nucleotide into acid-soluble products in the absence of the other three deoxynucleoside triphosphates when activated DNA was used as a template.  This relaxed requirement for deoxynucleotides was not observed when poly[d(A-T).d(T-A)] was used as a template.  Nearest-neighbour base analyses of the products formed in the presence of a single deoxynuclesode triphosphate revealed that the reaction is not of a terminal transferase-type but a very limited repair synthesis in which one or a few triphosphates are incorporated at numerous 3'-hydroxyl ends.
Syntheses and biological activities of 12 N6-substituted adenosine 5'-phosphates and 15 cyclic 3',5'-phosphates are described. Included among these are the cyclic phosphates of the naturally occurring anticodon adjacent modified nucleosides, N6-(delta2-isopentenyl)adenosine and N-(purin-6-ylcarbamoyl)-L-threonine ribonucleoside. Also reported in this paper are the 5'-phosphates and cyclic phosphates of the cytokinins, N6-benzyladenosine, kinetin ribonucleoside, 3-(chloro-trans-2-buten-2-yl)adenosine,6-o-chlorophenylureidopurine ribonucleoside, and 6-allylureidopurine ribonucleoside. The 5'-nucleotides were prepared by direct phosphorylation of the corresponding ribonucleosides with POCl3 and triethyl phosphate. These compounds were converted to the cyclic 3',5'-phosphates by cyclization of the corresponding 5'-nucleotides with dicyclohexylcarbodiimide. Comparison of the cytotoxicity of the ribonucleosides with their 5'-nucleotides and cyclic 3',5'-nucleotides showed that some of the 5'-phosphates and cyclic phosphates were almost as active as the parent nucleosides. The 5'-nucleotides and the cyclic phosphates were more soluble than the parent nucleosides. The cyclic 3',5'-nucleotides were examined as alternate activators of cAMP-dependent protein kinase from beef heart. While all of the analogs studied showed some activity toward this enzyme, several compounds were more effective than cAMP itself. The analogs were also tested as substrates for cyclic 3',5'-nucleotide phosphodiesterase from beef heart. The N6-alkyl-cAMP analogs were poor substrates for the enzyme, while N6-carbamoyl-cAMP derivatives were inert toward this enzyme. These compounds did not inhibit the phosphodiesterase. Some of the cyclic phosphates exhibited marginal effect in the inhibition of glycogen synthesis in skin slices.
Procedures are given for the syntheses of alpha,omega-dinucleoside 5'-polyphosphates as inhibitors of adenylate kinases. The following order for the ability of inhibiting pig muscle adenylate kinase was observed: Ap5A greater than 1:N6-etheno-Ap5A greater than Ap6A greater than Gp5A greater than Ap4A greater than Up5A. The synthesis of adenosine tetraphosphate, the starting material for Ap5A, is also described. 2. One molecule of pig muscle adenylate kinase binds one molecule of Ap5A. The difference spectrum of Ap5A-adenylate kinase with its maximum of 5050 M-1 - cm-1 at 271 nm, as well as the fluorescence properties of 1:N6-etheno-Ap5A can be used for kinetic and binding studies. 3. The specific binding of the negatively charged Ap5A was exploited in the preparation of human muscle adenylate kinase. The enzyme was purified to homogeneity with an overall yield of 65%, the absolute value being 70 mg per kg of muscle. 4. The effect of Ap5A on adenylate kinase in extracts of various cells and cell organelles was tested. A ratio of 1:50 (mol/mol) for Ap5A to other nucleotides was used for suppressing the adenylate kinase activity in extracts of mammalian and insect skeletal muscel, of human erythrocytes and of Staphylococcus aureus. A ratio of 1:5 was found to be necessary for the adenylate kinase from tobacco leaves and spinach chloroplasts, and a ratio of 2:1 was needed for suppressing the adenylate kinase from bovine liver mitochondria, human kidney homogenate and from Escherichia coli. Ap5A appears not to be metabolized in any of the above extracts. These results indicate that Ap5A can be used for evaluating the contribution of adenylate kinase to the production of ATP fro ADP in energy-transducing systems. 5. Contaminating adenylate kinase can be inhibited by a concentration of Ap5A which does not interfere in the study of many (phospho)kinases and ATPases. The applications of Ap5A in the assay for nucleoside diphosphokinase and in the study of mechanical and biochemical properties of contractile proteins are representative examples. The use of Ap5A makes it possible to study the effect of ADP per se in such systems. 6. Sepharose-bound Ap5A was used for removing traces of adenylate kinase from samples of myosin and creatine kinase. 7. In the presence of Ap5A the activity of creatine kinase was measured in hemolytic serum of venous blood, in plasma of capillary blood and in samples of whole blood after complete hemolysis had been induced. The clinical significance of these findings are shown for cases of myocardial infarction and muscular dystrophy.
Adenosine 3',5'-monophosphate (cAMP), its dibutyryl derivative (Db-cAMP) and other adenine nucleotides have been micro-injected into the hypothalamic region of the unanaesthetized cat and the effects on body temperature, and on behavioural and autonomic thermoregulatory activities observed. 2. Db-cAMP and cAMP both produced hypothermia when applied to the pre-optic anterior hypothalamus. With Db-cAMP the hypothermia was shown to be dose dependent between 50 and 500 mug (0-096-0-96 mumole). 3. AMP, ADP and ATP also produced hypothermia when injected into the pre-optic anterior hypothalamus. 4. The order of relative potencies of the adenine nucleotides with respect both to the hypothermia produced and to the autonomic thermoregulatory effects observed were similar. Db-cAMP was most potent and cAMP least. 5. Micro-injection into the pre-optic anterior hypothalamus of many substances including saline produced in most cats a non-specific rise in body temperature apparently the result of tissue damage. Intraperitoneal injection of 4-acetamidophenol (paracetamol 50 mg/kg) reduced or abolished this febrile response. 6. The hypothermic effect of the adenine nucleotides has been compared with the effects produced in these same cats by micro-injections of noradrenaline, 5-hydroxytryptamine, a mixture of acetylcholine and physostigmine (1:1), EDTA and excess Ca2+ ions. 7. It is concluded that as Db-cAMP and cAMP both produce hypothermia, it is unlikely that endogenous cAMP in the pre-optic anterior hypothalamus mediates the hyperthermic responses to pyrogens and prostaglandins.
In the presence of purified Escherichia coli lysyl-tRNA synthetase [L-lysine:tRNALys ligase (AMP-forming) EC 61  16], L-lysine, and ATP, addition of the nucleotide ppGpp results in formation of a unique product-A(5')ppp(5') Gpp. The same compound is also formed very rapidly in a cell-free protein-synthesizing system when ppGpp is added. The possible significance of this reaction in the rapid turnover of ppGpp and as a more general mechanism by which an AMP residue is activated and introduced onto a 5'-diphosphorylated species, including the 5'-end of an RNA, is further discussed.
Cyclic AMP placed in the bottom of the modified Boyden chemotaxis chamber is weakly chemotactic for rabbit peritoneal neutrophils. Dibutyryl-cyclic AMP under similar conditions gives a biphasic response, being weakly chemotactic at low concentrations and inhibiting cell movement at higher concentrations. When mixed with the cells in the upper compartment of the chemotaxis chamber, cyclic AMP and dibutyryl-cyclic AMP enhance neutrophil spontaneous motility; on the other hand, dibutyryl-cyclic AMP mixed with the cells in the upper compartment consistently inhibits neutrophil chemotactic responsiveness, while cyclic AMP has a variable effect on chemotaxis. The effect of ADP and ATP was to inhibit chemotaxis and spontaneous motility. AMP is totally without effect.
ATP, ADP and pyrophosphate accelerate the exchange of carbonate of the transferrin-iron-carbonate ternary complex, while AMP, cyclic AMP and phosphate have no effect. 2. ATP promotes carbonate exchange without removing iron from transferrin, whereas pyrophosphate effectiely attacks both the anion and iron components of the ternary complex. 3. Transferrin readily takes over iron from its ATP or pyrophosphate complex. 4. Neither ATP nor pyrophosphate can substitute for carbonate of the ternary complex. These results fit in well with the concept that ATP may play a direct role in the iron uptake by reticulocytes.
Incubation of liver slices and isolated liver cells with adenosine cyclic-3',5'-monophosphate at concentrations which inhibit lipogenesis was found to expand the pool size of the noncyclic adenine nucleotides in the intact cells of the preparations. This observation led to studies which demonstrated that adenosine and adenosine-5'-monophosphate also inhibited lipogenesis and expanded the adenine nucleotide pool size. It is proposed but not proven that the increase in intracellular nucleotides produced by adenosine-5'-monophosphate, adenosine cyclic-3',5'-monophosphate, and adenosine may have an adverse effect upon the synthesis of fatty acids. Because of the expansion of the adenine nucleotide pool size, high concentrations of adenosine cyclic-3',5'-monophosphate should not be used to investigate the mechanism responsible for hormonal regulation of lipogenesis. As an added complication, exogenous adenosine-5'-monophosphate was found to produce a small but significant increase in the intracellular concentration of adenosine cyclic-3',5'-monophosphate of isolated liver cells. This effect also may be a factor in the inhibition of lipogenesis by adenosine-5'-monophosphate. Low concentrations of N6, O2'-dibutyryl adenosine cyclic-3',5'-monophosphate were found to inhibit lipogenesis without increasing the intracellular adenine nucleotide content of either liver slices or isolated liver cells. It is concluded that studies on the mechanism of glucagon regulation of lipogenesis should be carried out with glucagon or low concentrations of N6, O2'-dibutyryl adenosine cyclic-3',5'-monophosphate.
Citrate synthase from two typical facultative methylotrophs, but not from four obligate methylotrophs or from two restricted facultative methylotrophs, is inhibited by 0.1 mM-NADH. ATP or ADP (both at 10mM) inhibits all the citrate synthases, whereas 2-oxoglutarate (10mM) inhibits those from only three of the eight methylotrophs.
The influence of catecholamines (adrenaline and noradrenaline) on 32Pi incorporation into intracellular phosphate and adenylic nucleotides has been studied on rat myocardium slices; consequently, the turn-over of nucleotides could be determined and compared under the influence of these two hormones. 2. In order to specify the site of action of these catecholamines, several inhibitors and activators of energetic metabolism were included in the incubation medium: 3'5'-AMP, caffein, ouabain, oligomycin, rotenone + antimycin. 3. Both catecholamines favour Pi exchanges between intra and extracellular spaces; ATP turn-over is greatly increased, while ADP turn-over is slightly decreased, and 32P-incorporation into ADP is increased. 4. 3'5'-AMP and caffein are without effect on Pi penetration; however, caffein increases catecholamine effects on this penetration. ATP turn-over is slightly increased by 3'5'-AMP or caffein. 5. Ouabain decreases ATP turn-over but does not prevent the adrenaline induced acceleration. Inhibitors of oxidative phosphorylation and electron transport decrease ATP-turn-over severely; this inhibition is not released by catecholamines. 6. It is concluded that the catecholamine effects observed are dependent on the oxidative phosphorylations process. The increase of Pi exchange by catecholamines may be related to the increase of extracellular space and cation translocations we observed with the hormones.
Glutamate oxidation by mitochondria in the presence of arsenite and dinitrophenol is diminished by ADP, AMP, GDP and cyclic 3',5'-AMP. Mechanism of inhibition is noncompetitive and atractyloside-sensitive. Alpha-ketoglutarate is a more powerful inhibitor of glutamate oxidation. Inhibitions produced by alpha-ketoglutarate and nucleotide are not additive. Phosphate reverses inhibition of glutamate oxidation produced by nucleotides but only slightly that produced by alpha-ketoglutarate. It is concluded from the results obtained that GDH remains in intact mitochondria under effective control exerted by purine nucleotides (AMP, GDP, ADP, cAMP), alpha-ketoglutarate and phosphate, functioning mainly in the direction of reductive amination of alpha-ketoglutarate.
Uncoupled oxidative phosphorylation in isolated guinea pig brown-adipose-tissue mitochondria is reflected by a low phosphorylation state of adenosine phosphates in the mitochondrial matrix and in the extramitochondrial space during oxidation of succinate or glycerol 1-phosphate in the presence of serum albumin and 100 muM ADP. Recoupling of respiration and phosphorylation in the mitochondria is indicatdd by a dramatic increase in the phosphorylation state of adenine nucleotides in both compartments, when substrates inducing substrate level phosphorylation are respired. In this case ATP/ADP ratios in the extramitochondrial compartment are 10-15 times higher than in the mitochondrial matrix. 2. Recoupling mediated by substrate level phosphorylation depends on the presence of extramitochondrial adenosine phosphate and on intact adenine nucleotide translocation. In the presence of substrate level phosphorylation the amount of extramitochondrial ADP required to restore energy coupling can be extremely low (20 muM ADP or 10 nmol ADP/mg mitochondrial protein respectively). If substrate level phosphorylation is prevented by rotenone or in the presence of atractyloside, 20-50 times higher amounts of extramitochondrial adenine nucleotides are necessary to cause coupled oxidative phosphorylation. The recoupling effect of ATP is significantly stronger than that of ADP. 3. GDP (100 muM) causes a rapid increase of the ATP/ADP ratio in both compartments which is independent of substrate level phosphorylation as well as of the extramitochondrial adenosine phosphate concentration and the adenine nucleotide carrier. 4. The amount of extramitochondrial adenosine phosphate in guinea pig brown-adipose-tissue (18 nmol/mg mitochondrial protein or 2.5 mM respectively) would suffice for recoupling of oxidative phosphorylation mediated by substrate level phosphorylation under conditions in vitro; this suggests that substrate level phosphorylation is of essential importance in brown fat in vivo with respect to energy conditions in the tissue during different states of thermogenesis.
Testicular and cauda epididymal sperm were obtained via catheters previously implanted in the rete testis and proximal vas deferens of bulls and were used to examine the relationships among sperm motility, cyclic adenosine 3':5'-monophosphate (cAMP) level, adenine nucleotide levels, and rates of glucose and oxygen consumption. Testicular, cauda epididymal, and ejaculated sperm contain cAMP-stimulated protein kinase, adenylate cyclase, and nucleotide phosphodiesterase. Treatment of the nonmotile testicular sperm with phosphodiesterase inhibitors resulted in a doubling of cellular cAMP concentration and a 25% increase in their glucose consumption. No change in motility, ATP level, or rate of oxygen consumption was observed. Sperm in neat cauda epididymal semen had flagellating tails but no progressive motility. Dilution of these sperm into glucose-containing buffer resulted in an increase in intracellular cAMP concentration and a decrease in ATP level with concomitant increases in ADP and AMP levels. These biochemical changes occurred within 30 s after dilution and apparently preceded the initiation of progressive motility by most cells. Since sperm in neat cauda epididymal semen became progressively motile when diluted with neat cauda epididymal plasma as well as accessory sex gland fluid or buffer, composition of the fluid surrounding the sperm is not responsible for the initiation of progressive motility upon dilution nor does cauda epididymal plasma contain an inhibitory factor. Perhaps release from contact immobilization provides the stimulation for the initial acquisition of progressive motility by cauda epididymal sperm. We conclude that during epididymal passage sperm develop from a cell physically unresponsive to changes in cAMP concentration to a form which initiates progressive motility upon changes in cAMP concentration.
Adenylate kinase activity of intact mitochondria is strongly inhibited by Ap5A, ie p1,p5-Di (adenosine-5') pentaphosphate, whereas oxidative phosphorylation is not affected. Therefore, Ap5A is a useful tool to distinguish between oxidative and non oxidative ATP generating reactions.
The synthesis of ribosomal precursor RNA in Novikoff hepatoma (N1S1) cells is very sensitive to cordycepin (3'-dA). The synthesis of hnRNA, however, is resistant to inhibition concentrations of 3'-dA that completely block the synthesis of 45S ribosomal RNA precursor. We have examined the RNA polymerases present in these cultured cells with regard to their sensitivity to cordycepin 5'-triphosphate (3'-dATP) in an effort to explain the differential inhibition of RNA synthesis observed in vivo. RNA polymerases I and II were characterized on the basis of their chromatographic behavior on DEAE-Sephadex, as well as the response of their enzymatic activities to ionic strength, the divalent metal ions Mn2+ and Mg2+, and the toxin alpha-amanitin. For both enzymes the inhibition of in vitro RNA synthesis by 3'-dATP was competitive for ATP. The km values for ATP and the K1 values for 3'-dATP for the two enzymes were quite similar. RNA polymerase II, the enzyme presumed responsible for hnRNA synthesis, was actually slightly more sensitive to 3'-dATP than RNA polymerase I, the enzyme presumed responsible for ribosomal precursor RNA synthesis. Similar data were obtained when the RNA polymerases were assayed in isolated nuclei. These results indicate that the differential inhibition of RNA synthesis caused by 3'-dA in vivo cannot be simply explained by differential sensitivity of RNA polymerases I and II to 3'-dATP.
Changes in the adenine nucleotide metabolism after an oral glucose load were studied in the liver of normal and alloxan-diabetic rats. Changes in the energy charge were positively correlated with those in the blood glucose and plasma immunoreactive insulin levels. One hour after an oral glucose load when the plasma immunoreactive insulin levels increased maximally, the energy charge increased maximally from 0.846 to 0.867 (P less than 0.001). The increase in the energy charge was accompanied by a concomitant decrease in the ADP levels (P less than 0.05). The respiratory control ration, state 3 respiration per unit of cytochrome a (+a3), and DNP-induced ATPase activity per unit of cytochrome a (+a3) increased significantly. The adenylate kinase and pyruvate kinase activities in the liver remained unchanged. On the other hand, the energy charge in the liver of alloxan-diabetic rats did not increase significantly after an oral glucose load. It was suggested that an increase in the energy charge of the liver is attributable to the more rapid flux of intermediary metabolism in the enhanced ADP-phosphorylating reactions by mitochondria, owing to an elevated level of insulin available to the hepatic cells.
The preparation of model compounds 1-(2',6'-dichlorobenzyl)-3-halogenopyridinium and the study of their properties were achieved. Their chemical reduction to the corresponding 1,4-dihydropyridines is proved by spectroscopic analysis. 3-Iodopyridine--adenine dinucleotide was prepared by enzymic transglycosidation while the 3-chloro, 3-bromo and 3-iodo pyridine--adenine dinucleotides were synthesized from 3-amino-pyridine--adenine dinucleotide. The 3-halogenopyridine--adenine dinucleotides were proved to be active as hydrogen acceptors with alcohol as a substrate. The absorption band at 290 nm of cinnamaldehyde appeared to be a very sensitive tool for studying the enzymic reaction. With the alcohol dehydrogenase from yeast, only slight activity was detected. 3-Halogenopyridine--adenine dinucleotides are competitive inhibitors with respect to nicotinamide--adenine dinucleotide with alcohol dehydrogenase from yeast, lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase. The use of 3-iodopyridine--adenine dinucleotide as a heavy-atom derivative for X-ray structure determination is proposed.
The synthesis of nucleic acids and proteins in whole cells of Ehrlich ascites carcinoma was inhibited by adenosine and by several natural-adenosine-related compounds. The inhibitory effect of adenosine was more pronounced than that of other nucleosides tested (guanosine, inosine, cytidine, uridine and thymidine). The synthetic processes examined were only moderately inhibited by adenine nucleotides (ATP, ADP, AMP, NAD, cyclic 3',5'-AMP and its dibutyryl derivative). Respiration and aerobic glycolysis were not affected significantly by the nucleoside tested.
The administratio prior to irradiation of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) or other adenosine nucleotides, singly or in combination, increased the radioresistance of mice. Post-irradiation treatment with the adenosine nucleotides had no effect on the survival of the irradiated mice. Dose reduction factors of 2.32 could be obtained by pretreatment of mice with the following combination of protective agents: S-2(4-aminobutylamino)ethyl phosphorothioic acid(WR 2822), cysteamine (MEA) and ATP. Since cyclic AMP levels were unchangd in the spleen or gut by administration of cysteamine and other protectors it is unlikely that the increase in preotection was due to changes in cyclic AMP levles. The calcium salt of ATP provided a higher level of protection than the ATP alone, indicating that the protective mechanism of ATP is probably not related to anoxia.
The investigations carried out have shown that not only AMP but ADP also undergoes direct deamination in both soluble and mitochondrial fractions of rat brain tissue. Deamination of AMP is stimulated by the addition of ATP and the activity of one of the isoenzymes of AMP-aminohydrolase is markedly enhanced by both yeast and brain hexokinase. Activation by hexokinase is mainly due to its SH groups, through which hexokinase reacts with AMP-aminohydrolase, forming, probably, a protein-protein complex in which AMP aminohydrolase activity is considerably increased. Hexokinase does not affect the deamination of ADP and NAD. Further experiments are needed to find out whether the activation of AMP-aminohydrolase is accomplished by hexokinase itself or by an other protein contaminating it. Deamination of NAD, in contrast to AMP and ADP, takes place only in mitochondria and does not occur in the soluble fraction. In mitochondria besides deamination, AMP and ADP undergo intensive dephosphorylation, while the deamination of NAD is not accompanied by an increase of phosphate, i. e. mitochondria lack enzymes which breakdown NAD to mono nucleotides. Our data indicate that the formation of deamino -NAD from NAD and reamination of deamino-NAD by aspartate to NAD by the formation of intermediary NAD-succinate is of greater importance. The formation of the latter and that of deamino-NAD from NAD as well as the presence of preformed deamino-NAD in mitochondria have been demonstrated by Movsessian. The occurrence of these processes in mitochondria and their role in the formation of ammonia from amino acids is of importance in as much as oxaloacetate formation and its conversion to aspartate, which is necessary for the reamination of deamino-NAD, are localized in mitochondria. The main source of the amino nitrogen of aspartate is known to be glutamate, which incorporates the amino nitrogen of most amino acids. alpha-Keto-glutarate, which is necessary  for the synthesis of glutamate, is also formed in mitochondria are the most favourable site for the formation of ammonia from amino acids with the participation of pyridine nucleotides. Of the purine mono and dinucleotides studied deamino-NAD is most effective in the formation of ammonia from amino acids in mitochondria since in contrast to purine mono nucleotides, deamino-NAD and NAD are not dephosphorylated in mitochondria. According to some authors the reamination of IMP by aspartate is of importance in the formation of ammonia from amino acids in brain tissue. In our studies, however, IMP was not effective in the formation of ammonia from aspartate in mitochondrial fractions. IDP was found to be more effective. IMP and IDP may probably participate in the formation of ammonia in the soluble fraction, where nucleotidase activity is considerably low.
Effect of substrate substituents on affinity on affinity for the adenine nucleotide sites. Nineteen derivatives of adenosine 5'-phosphate (AMP) bearing acylaminomethyl, acetoxy, or alkylaminomethyl substituents on the phosphate-ribose bridge (5' and O-5' positions) of AMP together with 2',3'-O-ethylidene, 2',3',-O-isopropylidene, and 2',3'-di-O-acetyl derivatives of AMP have been synthesized. Their substrate and/or competitive inhibitor properties with pig rabbit muscle AMP kinases indicate that all the substituents except 2',3'-O-ethlidene with the pig enzyme permitted binding of AMP at its enzymic site. Determination of enzyme-inhibitor dissociation constants showed that several compounds with substituents on the ribose-phosphate bridge bind as well or better than AMP. The affinity is ascribed in part to interaction between substituents and a lipophilic region of the enzymes adjacent to the ribose-phosphate bridge in the enzyme-AMP complexes. The enzyme-inhibitor dissociation constants reveal a structural dissimilarity between the pig and rabbit enzymes in the vicinity of the lipophilic region. The substrate and inhibitor properties of eight ATP derivatives gave evidence that affinity of ATP for its substrate site on the AMP kinases is compatible with acetyl- or chloroacetylaminomethyl groups at the phosphate-ribose bridge or with 2',3'-O-ethylidene or isopropylidene residues. The yeast hexokinase-ATP complex tolerated an acetylaminomethyl group at C-5' or a benzoylaminomethyl group adjacent to O-5'. The present findings regarding substituent tolerance could be used in the design of adenine nucleotide site-directed irreversible inhibitors.
A concept is presented for testing the dimensional restrictions of enzyme-active sites by stretching the substrate or cofactor by known magnitude. These restrictions of enzyme-active sites specific for purine cofactors were tested by the synthesis and evaluation of lin-benzoadenosine 5'-triphosphate, 5'-diphosphate, and 3',5'-monophosphate with respect to enzyme binding and activity. These "stretchedout" (by 2.4 angstroms) versions of the adenine ribonucleotides bind strongly, slow the enzymatic rates, and have useful fluorescence properties.
After prelabeling the adenine nucleotides (ATP, ADP, AMP) of isolated perfused guinea pig hearts with either 14C-adenine or 14C-adenosine for 35 min, labeled adenosine, inosine, hypoxanthine and cyclic 3'5'-AMP (cAMP) were continuously released into the cardiac perfusate. Determination of the specific activities (SA) of the adenine nucleotides, cAMP, and their breakdown products (adenosine, inosine, hypoxanthine) in tissue and perfusate revealed: Under steady state conditions the SA of adenosine and cAMP in the perfusate were of the same order of magnitude and proved to be many times higher than the SA of the respective precursor adenine nucleotides. This difference was observed regardless whether adenine or adenosine was used as prelabeling substances. The SA of inosine and hypoxanthine in the perfusate were constantly lower than the SA of adenosine. Cardiac ischemia of 6 min, which resulted in a markedly increased formation of adenosine, led to a pronounced decrease in the SA of adenosine released from the heart. Our findings provide evidence that at least two different adenine nucleotide compartments of the heart severe as precursors for the formation of adenosine and cAMP, one characterized by a high, the other by a lower SA. Under normoxic conditions adenosine and cAMP released into the cardiac perfusate are derived mainly from a nucleotide fraction of high SA, which appears to be rather small. During ischemia a second compartment of much lower SA in addition contributes to the formation of adenosine.
A practical synthesis of 3'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate (IV) in yields of 68-72% from adenosine 2',3'-cyclic phosphate 5'-phosphate (II) is described. Reaction of II with triethylamine-N-sulfonic acid affords adenosine 2',3'-cyclic phosphate 5'-phosphosulfate (III) which, on treatment with ribonuclease-T2, provides IV. Spleen phosphodiesterase, on the other hand, converts III to 2'-phosphoadenosine 5'-phosphosulfate (V). The biological activity of IV, measured by sulfate transfer to [6,7-3H2]estrone as mediated by bovine adrenal estrone sulfotransferase (3'-phosphoadenylyl-sulfate:estrone 3-sulfotransferase, EC 2.8.2.4), is identical with that obtained with a sample of IV prepared by an established biochemical procedure. By contrast, V exhibits approximately one-third the activity of the natural isomer.
Adenosine and the adenine nucleotides caused a greater relaxation of strips of canine saphenous vein and tibial artery when they had been contracted by nerve stimulation than by exogenous norepinephrine. An infusion of adenosine into the dogs' lateral saphenous vein, perfused at constant flow, caused a greater relaxation of this vein when constricted by electrical stimulation of the lumbar sympathetic chain than by exogenous norepinephrine. That this difference was due to inhibition by these compounds of the output of neurotransmitter from the sympathetic nerve endings was demonstrated by column chromatographic analysis of the radioactivity in the superfusion fluid of vein strips, previously incubated with tritiated norepinephrine. Both adenosine and adenosine triphosphate (10(-5) M) reduced the efflux of 3H-norepinephrine during nerve stimulation with electrical impulses. Adenosine also reduced the efflux caused by potassium (30 mM), but not that caused by tyramine (6 X 10(-6) M). Theophylline antagonized the inhibitory effect of adenosine on the sympathetic neurotransmission. We found that at 4 X 10(-4) M adenosine triphosphate still caused a decreased efflux of neurotransmitter during electrical stimulation, but with adenosine the 3H-norepinephrine efflux no longer decreased and the overflow of deaminated compounds increased. Furthermore, the same concentration of adenosine increased the efflux of 3H-norepinephrine and deaminated compounds in unstimulated strips, and the increase of 3H-norepinephrine was enhanced after monoamine oxidase inhibition. Thus, we conclude that at higher concentrations adenosine increases the intraneuronal leakage of norepinephrine out of the storage vesicles.
A model is proposed for the partial depletion of the adenine nucleotide pool in the ischemic perfused rat heart which involves seven enzymes: adenylate cyclase, 3',5'-cyclic AMP phosphodiesterase, 5'-nucleotidase, adenosine kinase, adenosine deaminase, purine nucleoside phosphorylase, and inorganic pyrophosphatase. The computer implementation of this model is in terms of rate laws, several of which were obtained by a systematic least-squares fitting procedure. Depletion of the adenine nucleotide pool is initiated by the release of endogenous noradrenaline into the interstitial fluid, which results from a fall in tissue PO2, and the subsequent activation of adenylate cyclase. In this model the substrate for 5'-nucleotidase is a membrane-bound AMP pool formed by hydrolysis of extracellular fluid and functions as a vasodilator; excess adenosine is incorporated into the tissue by a "permease" with Michaelis-Menten kinetics and converted to AMP, inosine, and hypoxanthine. Alternative mechanisms, such as the deamination of AMP by adenylate deaminase and conversion of AMP to adenine by AMP pyrophosphorylase, were rejected primarily on qualitative biochemical grounds.
1) Changes in the rates of biosynthesis of adenine nucleotides in rat hearts under various experimental conditions are paralleled by corresponding alterations in the concentration of cyclic AMP. 2) Pentoses and pentitols cause an acceleration of the de novo synthesis of adenine nucleotides in the normal heart and a further amplification of the increase of adenine nucleotide synthesis in isoproterenol-stimulated hearts. 3) The enhancement of de novo synthesis of adenine and nucleotides induced by isoproterenol as well as by pentoses and pentitols appears to be causally related to a greater availability of 5-phos-phoribosyl-1-pyrophosphate.
Transplantable mammary adenocarcinomas and livers of C3H mice fed a stock diet or a linoleate rich diet (15% corn oil) contain similar amounts of oleate (ca 3 mg/gm tissue). On feeding either a high carbohydrate, fat free or a high carbohydrate, saturated fat-containing (15% hydrogenated coconut or cottonseed oil) diet for 6 weeks, oleate levels increased 2-fold in tumor and 5-fold in liver. The specific activity of stearoyl-CoA desaturase in liver microsomes was similar to that in the corresponding fractions of mammary glands of lactating mice. In liver, this activity was enhanced 2- to 3-fold by feeding a high carbohydrate, fat free or a high carbohydrate, saturated fat diet. The desaturase activity in mammary tumor microsomes, while only 10% of that in hepatic microsomes, remained unaltered regardless of the type of diet fed. These observations suggest that (a) a major portion of the oleate in the mammary tumor is not produced within the tissue, (b) dietary adaptation is not a general characteristic of stearoyl-CoA desaturase in neoplastic tissues, and (c) enhanced desaturase activity in liver is directly related to the absence of linoleate or oleate, or to a large decrease in oleate in the diet.
The authors report two cases of periarteritis nodosa associated with carcinoma. The first case was a man with an anaplastic bronchial carcinoma, the second was a woman with a rectal adenocarcinoma. Study of the association of certain collagen diseases with carcinoma was made to emphasize the great rareness of this association.
The postulate that low intracellular pH acts as a preconditioner for the destructuve effects of hyperthermia (42 degrees C) was examined, using  a heat-sensitive line of malignant cells derived from rat mammary gland (SDB). Intracellular pH (pHi) was measured indirectly, from the distribution of the weak, non-metabolizable organic acid 5,5-dimethyl-2,4-oxazolidinedione (DMO) between intra- and extra-cellular water. Respiration, aerobic and anaerobic and anaerobic glycolysis of the cells were studied at normal pHi (pH 7-0-7-4) or at low pHi (pH 6-2-6-6) and at 38 degrees C or 42 degrees C over 6 h in Warburg manometers; the ability of the cells to replicate in culture was examined after 3 h or 6 h incubation in the flasks. The relationship between pHi and extracellular pH (pHe) depended upon the buffer system used and the exact pH in question; no assumption regarding pHi based only on pHe measurement could be made. At 38 degrees C and low pHi, the Pasteur effect became negative due to a relatively greater inhibition of anaerobic than aerobic glycolysis. Respiration was unaffected and cell replicative ability unimpaired. At 42 degrees C and normal pHi, respiration was totally inhibited after 4 h and the Pasteur effect was decreased, in this case due to a compensatory increase in aerobic glycolysis without alteration in anaerobic CO2 production. Low pHi in the presence of hyperthermia enabled cell respiration to continue at a reduced level with no further change in glycolysis. There was delayed cell replication after 3 h at 42 degrees C and inability to multiply following 6 h hyperthermia: low pHi did not influence these results. It is concluded that with these cancer cells, pHi values maintained in the region of 1-0 pH unit below normal for 6 h had no deleterious effect on the cells. No sensitizing effect of the low pHi for the destructive effect of hyperthermia on the cells was observed.
Tumor incidence was studied in 1,2-dimethylhydrazine (DMH) injected male rats assigned at weaning to isoenergetic casein-sucorse deits containing 7.5%, 15%, or 22.5% protein with or without 2.5% urea. Twenty rats fed each diet were given weekly intraperitoneal injections of DMH (15 mg/kg body weight/week) for the first 24 weeks and 20 were given saline. Of 96 DMH-injected rats necropsied after 28 weeks, 88 were necropsied during the 32nd or final week of the experiment. Adenocarcinomas of the small and large intestine were larger and significantly more numberous in rats fed 15% and 22.5% dietary protein. Keratin producing papillomas of the sebaceous glands of the external ear were observed first at 21 weeks in DMH-injected rats fed 22.5% protein. These were subsequently observed in some rats from all DMH-treated groups. As time progressed, the ear tumors increased in size and number in all groups but the greatest incidence was in the group fed 22.5% protein. No tumors were observed in saline-injected rats. Urea feeding did not increase the number of tumors nor cause changes in pH, urease activity or ammonia concentration of contents of the colon or cecum, or blood cholesterol. As dietary protein increased, cecal ammonia concentrations rose while both colon and cecal pH dropped. Portal blood urea and cholesterol reose as dietary protein was increased. DMH-treated rats had significantly higher concentrations of colon and cecal ammonia and lower blood cholesterol. Altough the rats fed 7.5% protein gained significantly less weight during 0 to 6 weeks of feeding, their weight gain was significantly higher during 6 to 26 weeks. No tumors were found in rats necropsied at 16 weeks.
The local graft-vs-host reaction (GVHR) test was used to assess the cellular immune competence of lymphocytes obtained from 29 patients with malignant tumors of the gastrointestinal tract before and after removal of the tumor. Prior to removal most patients showed impairment of cellular immune competence; 10 to 14 days after surgery there was an improvement in a considerable number of patients. However, when tested four months later, the GVHR was again negative in some patients. The possible factors leading to deficiency in cellular immune competence and the value of the local GVHR test in the long-term follow-up of patients who have had malignant disease are discussed.
The study of the gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase (GTase) in colon of adult rats showed that in the sequence: duodenum, jejunum, ileum, cecum and colon, the colon has the lowest activity. There are, on the other hand, relatively small differences between GTase activities in the ascending, transverse and descending portions of the large intestine. GTase activity in the colon of neonatal rat is several times higher than in the colon of adult rats. Colon adenocarcinoma induced by 1,2-dimethylhydrazine were found to have a much higher GTase activity than the homologous normal tissue. Because these tumors resemble human colonic adenocarcinomas, it is suggested that the assay of GTase levels of human colon mucosa might be of potential value in the diagnosis of neoplastic changes.
We have used indirect immunofluorescence to study antibody responses directed against membrane antigens expressed on in vitro and in vivo T1699 mammary adenocarcinoma cells. IgG1, IgG2a, IgG2b, IgG3, IgA, and IgM antibodies were present in the serum of DBA/2 mice bearing T1699 tumors; IgG2a and IgG2b antibodies were readily detected on the cells in situ. Lesser amounts of the other classes and subclasses could be detected by indirect immunofluorescence measurements on in vivo tumor cells and with low pH eluates of in vivo cells tested on the in vitro line of T1699. The antigenic determinants on in situ tumor cells are not saturated with antibody as these cells demonstrated enhanced fluorescence of all immunoglobulin classes and subclasses when treated with autologous serum. Experiments with thymus-depleted mice indicated that immunoglobulin production was strongly dependent on thymus-derived cells for all immunoglobulin classes and subclasses except IgG2b. Our studies suggest that IgG2a may be active in the macrophage-mediated cytotoxic reaction and IgG2b in the immediate hypersensitivity reaction to T1699 cells. These results provide further evidence for an active role of tumor-specific antibody in the host defense to the T1699 adenocarcinoma in situ.
Soluble and membrane-bound neutral arylamidases from renal cell carcinoma were partially purified and their properties were compared. Soluble neutral arylamidase was a heat labile and SH-dependent metalloenzyme. Membrane-bound neutral arylamidase was a rather heat stable metalloenzyme and was activated by Co2+ with changing KM and VMAX. KM values for soluble and membrane-bound neutral arylamidases were different. L-Methionine (5mM) did not affect the enzymic activity of soluble neutral arylamidase, but inhibited 82 percent of the enzymic activity of membrane-bound neutral arylamidase. Molecular weights of soluble and membrane-bound neutral arylamidases by Sephadex G-200 gel filtration were 140000 and 240000, respectively. Soluble and membrane-bound neutral arylamidases from renal cell carcinoma appear to be distinct enzymes.
We have recently described the presence of a guanylate cyclase [GTP pyrophosphate-lyase (cyclizing), EC 4.612] inhibitor (GCI) in an aqueous extract of the balsam pear (Momordica charantia abbreviata). Because the guanylate cyclase-cyclic GMP system is though to be involved in cell growth, DNA and RNA synthesis, and possible malignant transformation, we examined the effect of the aqueous extract containing GCI on an undifferentiated adenocarcinoma of the rat prostate and concanavalin-A-stimulated [3H]thymidine incorporation into cultured splenic lymphocytes, a process thought to be mediated by cyclic GMP. The results demonstrate that the extract of the balsam pear blocks both the growth of the rat prostatic adencarcinoma in vitro and [3H]thymidine incorporation into DNA. DNA histograms from flow cytometry indicated that the extract containing GCI inhibited in the G2 + M phase of the cell cycle, a presumed locus of cyclic GMP effects. In addition, guanylate cyclase activity was significantly greater in the tumor than normal prostate tissue and was decreased by the extract containing GCI. Cyclic GMP levels in the tumor in culture wer also decreased by addition of the extract. It remains to be determined whether or not the anti-tumor agent and GCI are the same substance.
The mitotic rate in the crypts of Lieberkhn of the descending colon and in dimethylhydrazine-induced adenocarcinomata of the descending colon of rat was measured using a stathmokinetic technique. 2. Intraperitoneal injection of a small dose (10 microgram/kg) of serotonin resulted in an increase in the tumour cell mitotic rate. 3. Blockade of serotonin receptors by 2-bromolysergic acid diethylamide and depletion of tissue serotonin levels following injection of DL-6-fluorotryptophan both result in a decrease in the tumour cell mitotic rate. 4. Treatment with serotonin, 2-bromolysergic acid diethylamide and DL-6-fluorotryptophan were all without effect on the colonic crypt cell mitotic rate.
Highly purified fractions of gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase [gamma-glutamyltrinsferase; (5-glutamyl)-peptide:amino-acid 5-glutamyltransferase, EC 2.3.2.2] from normal and malignant rat mammary tissue were prepared. Analyses by isoelectric focusing indicate the existence of at least 12 enzymatically active species. The gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase from the tumor tissue had a greater proportion of the activity concentrated in the more negative species than the enzyme from normal tissue. Treatment of the two enzyme preparations with neuraminidase (acylneuraminyl hydrolase, EC 3.2118) greatly reduced this difference. When whole tissue homogenates were treated with papain to solubilize the enzyme and then focused, the same relationship held. The neuraminidase activities in the two homogenates were similar, but the sialytransferase activity (CMP-N-acetylneuraminate:D-galactosyl-glycoprotein N-acetylneuraminyltransferase, EC 2.4.99.1) of the tumor homogenate was 13 times that of the normal mammary homogenate. These observations suggest that the gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase of the tumor is more heavily sialylated than that from the normal tissue, possibly reflecting the greater sialyltransferase activity of the tumor.
This article deals with a case of pleural metastases of an adenocarcinoma starting at an unknown point in a 59-year-old patient without notable circulatory antecedents, shown by a recurrent phlebitis having several sites over two months and a hemothorax.
The article presents a case of a young pregnant woman with vaginal carcinoma who had been exposed to diethylstilbestrol (DES) in utero. Surgical excision of the lesion was attempted but failed. Interstitial irradiation was then applied and proved successful. The patient's infant, as well as two subsequent children, were delivered by cesarean section after normal pregnancies. There was no evidence of metastatic disease or recurrence in 11 1/2 years following the initial diagnosis. Since 1965, a rising incidence of vaginal adenocarcinoma in women who were exposed to (DES) in utero has been reported. These women should be examined regularly after menarche for prompt evaluation and treatment of precancerous lesions such as adenosis, cervical erosion or transverse ridges. Since most of these patients are young, a conservative treatment is recommended. Extensive surgery and pelvic irradiation is indicated, however, in the cases of widespread disease.
Experiments were done to determine 1) whether the respiratory burst of superoxide anion (O2-) production in polymorphonuclear leukocytes (PMN) is triggered during antibody-dependent killing of tumor cells and 2) whether O2- production is essential for cytotoxicity. Three parameters of the respiratory burst (1-14C-glucose oxidation, oxygen consumption, and O2- release) were increased 2.5- to 7.3-fold during killing of antibody-primed tumor cells by human PMN. Added catalase and superoxide dismutase did not inhibit lysis, possibly because these enzymes were unable to diffuse into the inter-plasma-membrane space between killer and target cells. Evidence for an O2- requirement for cytotoxicity was the fact that concentrations of amobarbital or phenylbutazone sufficient to inhibit the cyanide-insensitive respiration of PMN also inhibited cytotoxicity. Also, hypoxic conditions inhibited cytotoxicity from 29 to 73%. The requirement for oxygen was most likely related to O2- generation and not mitochondrial respiration since cyanide and azide, which inhibit mitochondrial respiration, increased cytotoxicity.
A method for the purification of a membrane-bound glycoprotein, gamma-glutamyltranspeptidase ((gamma-glutamyl)-peptide:amino-acid gamma-glutamyltransferase, EC 2.3.2.2), from a transplantable rat mammary tumor (13762 MT) is described. The properties of the tumor enzyme were compared with those of gamma-glutamyltranspeptidase similarly isolated from mammary tissue of nonpregnant multiparous rats. Evidence has been presented elsewhere that the mammary and tumor enzymes exist as groups of species differing in isoelectric point and that the tumor enzyme contains more of the those species with lower isoelectric points. In this study the normal and tumor enzyme preparations are found to be identical or very similar in regards to the effect of papain on molecular size, the ratios of the enzymatic activities as measured with various amino acids, the Km for gamma-glutamyl-p-nitroanilide, and the Ki for inhibition by glutathione. Neuraminidase treatment had no effect on these catalytic properties. The properties observed were generally similar to those previously reported for highly purified rat kidney preparations.
A cell line, designated as OUR-10, has been established from a renal carcinoma in a Japanese woman. This cell line forms monolayers of polygonal epithelial cells with scattered round or dendritic cells and exhibits multilayering. With electron microscopy, differentiated surface structures that resemble the microvilli characteristic of renal carcinomas can be seen even at the 60th transfer. The cells have a hypodiploid karyotype with modal numbers of 39 and 40. No marker chromosomes were seen, but definite nonrandom loss of three chromosomes in Group D and one in Group E were recognized. The doubling time was estimated as approximately 32 hr in exponentially growing cultures, and the cells formed colonies in soft agar with an average efficiency of 25%. Heterotransplantation into the cheek pouch of immunosuppressed hamsters produced tumors that were histologically similar to the original cancerous tissue. The electrophoretic mobility of gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase extracted from the cells coincided with that of a novel isozyme found in human renal carcinoma tissue, and the genetic phenotype of the glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase was proved to be the B phenotype. The antigenic structure of HLA was determined as HLA-A2, 11; B5, 40, which was the same as that of peripheral blood lymphocytes of the woman with renal carcinoma.
A case of hypernephroma is presented in which the initial finding was heavy bleeding from a vaginal tumor. Fewer than 90 cases of genital metastases in males or females have previously been reported.
The parameters of cell population kinetics of symmetrical 1,2-dimethylhydrazine-induced colonic neoplasms and their adjacent colonic mucosa in the mouse were analyzed using the fraction labeled-mitoses curve method and compared with those of three groups of epithelial cells in the crypt of the descending colon of normal mouse. The analysis of three groups of epithelial cells in the crypt of normal mouse indicates that differentiation of epithelial cells was associated not only with a smaller proliferative pool of cells but also with a shortening of the duration of G2 phase and a prolongation of mitotic time. Other parameters of cell cycle did not change significantly. The mean cell cycle time of neoplastic cells in chemically induced colonic neoplasms was similar to that of epithelial cells in normal colon, but the variance was much greater in neoplastic cells. In neoplastic cells, the proliferative pool was greater, the G1 phase prlonged, and the S phase and the mitotic time became shorter as compared to epithelial cells in normal colon. The duration of G2 phase of neoplastic cells fell between the values of presumptive stem cells and differentiating cells in normal colon, compatible with the hypothesis that neoplastic cells are transformed stem cells defective in cellular differentiation. In the colonic mucosa immediately adjacent to neoplasms, the fraction-labeled-mitoses curve showed a flat second wave, indicating that the group of cells initially labeled by the pulse became a mixture of cells, some continuing the proliferative cycle normally, some going out of cycle, some slowing down in their passage from S through G2 to M, and some being arrested in mitotic phase. Such heterogeneous behavior of cells may be closely related to expansion of neoplasms. With some assumptions, however, cell cycle parameters of those normally cycling cells were estimated: the cell cycle time and the duration of G1 phase and mitotic phase were prolonged as compared to neoplastic cells and epithelial cells of normal colon.
The following enzymatic activities were measured in serum of patients with benign and malignant ovarian tumors before treatment: alkaline and acid phosphatases, aspartyl (AspAT) and alanyl (AlAT) aminotransferases, leucyl (LAP) and alanyl (AAP) aminopeptidases, lactate dehydrogenase (LDH), gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, cathepsin, alkaline ribonuclease (RNase) and beta-glucuronidase. It was shown that at least three determinations (phosphatases and LAP) are practically useless in a discrimination between the examined groups. RNase in combination with AspAT (AlAT) or RNase with AAP and LDH were found to give the best results as marker enzymes.
Up to a 50% rate of thyroid gland tumours was induced in Sprague-Dawley rats after s.c. administration of di-isopropanolnitrosamine (DIPN). The neoplasms occurred both unilaterally and bilaterally, and were identified histologically as adenomas and adenocarcinomas of follicular epithelium origin. In a few instances, adenomas were observed as early as 18 weeks after commencement of treatment. Most adenocarcinomas could be observed macroscopically, and frequently demonstrated infiltration into the surrounding muscles.
Tissue analyses and tumour regression studies using the oncolytic antibiotic, adriamycin (14-hydroxydaunomycin), and its DNA complex at adriamycin dosages of 5 mg/kg and 10 mg/kg were made on C3H mice with transplanted mammary adenocarcinoma. Chemical analysis indicated a significantly lower (P < 0.05) uptake of adriamycin into cardiac tissue for the adriamycin-DNA complex. Tumour regression was comparable for both the complex and free adriamycin. Results suggest an advantageous role for the adriamycin DNA complex in the chemotherapy of metastatic breast carcinoma.
A greater than expected incidence of adenocaricinoma of the uterine cervix is reported. Among 41 cases of cervical carcinoma, 14 (34%) were adenocarcinoma. Clinicopathologic data for these cases are summarized. Eleven of the 14 cases were pure adenocarcinomas; 3 were mixed adenosquamous carcinoma. The value of cytopathology is demonstrated in the 7 of 9 pretreatment cervical cytologies whereby adenocarcinoma was indicated (an accuracy rate of 78%). The other 2 revealed abnormal cells in which malignancy was a possibility. Three cases clinically were initially considered endometrial adenocarcinoma, but by our classification criteria, including Alcian blue staining for cervical mucin content of acid mucopolysaccharide, they were more specifically identified as primary endocervical in origin.
The polysaccharide composition of the human gallbladder well was studied in carcinomas and metaplastic changes of various degrees, and the results obtained were compared with those for the normal material previously presented (Terho, T, and Laitio, M. Biochim. Biophys. Acta 338: 135, 1974). Elevated amounts of acid connective tissue polysaccharides (heparitin and dermatan sulfates as well as chondroitin 4- or 6-sulfate, or both, could be observed in carinomas. In histochemical stainings it was found that in carcinomas and in the two specimens classified as group III (containing the most extensive metaplastic changes at disposal), the intracellular mucin was mainly neutral or nonsulfated acidic. The amounts of sulfated mucin were relatively insignificant. This mucin polysaccharide material was isolated and its composition was determined. It was observed to be large polysaccharide material was isolated and its composition was determined. It was observed to be large molecular (approximate molecular sizes 1 to 2 times 10-6), and to be composed of fucose, galactose, glucosamine, and galactosamine as well as small amounts of sialic acid. The basic structure of these polysaccharides is thus similar to that of normal sulfated mucin. The almost total absence of acid groups, however, causes the polysaccharide material in question to stain in a manner identical with neutral mucin when investigated with histochemical methods. The carcinomas also contained some sulfomucin; its proportion, however, was small as compared with the amounts of nonsulfated acid and neutral mucin in biochemical characterization. A small molecular polysaccharide fraction, assumed to originate in membrane-bound glycoproteins, was isolated from the insoluble gallbladder tissue residue. The proportion of this fraction was larger in carcinomas than in normal material. This rise as well as the rise in the quantity of acid connective tissue polysaccharides is presumably due to the large number of cells in the carcinoma tissue as well as to fibrosis.
Particulates with the properties of cores and/or ribonucleoproteins of RNA tumor viruses have been isolated from Sterox-SL-treated fractions of murine and human mammary adenocarcinomas. These particulates have an RNA-directed DNA polymerase, a 60 to 70 S RNA, and a density of   126 g/ml or greater in sucrose equilibrium density gradients. Their uniquely higher densities lead to banding in regions comparatively free of cellular contaminants. These circumstances minimize some of the technical complications of performing the simultaneous detection assay in the presence of cell debris.
In the majority of instances, periampullary tumors include adenocarcinomas of the pancreatic head, duodenum, ampulla of Vater, and lower bile duct. Diagnosis is based mainly on a history of jaundice or is made by endoscopic duodenoscopy with retrograde pancreatography or by cholangiography or both. The best treatment for these tumors is pancreatoduodenectomy or palliative bypass if the tumor has spread beyond the region encompassed by resection. In experienced hands, resection can be accomplished with a mortality rate of less than 10 per cent and is followed by a 5-year survival rate of 30 to 40 per cent in carcinomas of the ampulla, duodenum, or lower bile duct and of about 10 to 15 per cent in carcinomas of the pancreatic head. Palliative surgical, chemotherapeutic, and radiotherapeutic procedures as yet do not prolong life appreciably.
The incidence of malignant tumors in the primary immunodeficiency diseases is dramatically increased. Four patients with primary immunodeficiencies who developed fatal malignancies are reported. Lymphoreticular tumors and leukemia predominate in most conditions, but epithelial neoplasms are the most common tumors in selective Iga deficiency, and they comprise over one-fourth of malignancies in common variable immunodeficiency. With the exception of common variable immunodeficiency and the Wiskott-Aldrich syndrome, hyperplasia of lymphoid tissue usually does not occur. Lymph node enlargement in any of the other immunodeficiencies is therefore most likely secondary to malignancy. Benign gastrointestinal nodular lymphoid hyperplasia occurs frequently in common variable immunodeficiency and in some instances may be impossible to differentiate roentgenologically from lymphoma.
A staining method is presented by which azocarmine combines with spermine to form a poorly soluble red precipitate highlighted against the yellow cytoplasm of positive cells achieved by counterstaining with metanil yellow. In the prostate, the spermine-dye complex was abundant in normal acinar epithelial cells, moderate in the epithelial cells of hyperplastic glands, and moderate to absent in carcinoma cells. Spermine is evidently concerned with stabilizing the structure of desoxyribose nucleic acid and probably of proteins, notably several zinc metalloenzymes. Diagnosis and treatment of carcinoma of the prostate should include an adequate basic diet, retention of testes, hormonal treatment oriented toward testicular, pituitary and hypothalamic hormones; zinc--ordinary and radioactive; and utilization of spermine and precursors.
Thirty-nine unselected patients suffering from inoperable, recurrent, or residual adenocarcinoma of the stomach were referred for palliation with fast neutrons from the Medical Research Council's cyclotron at Hammersmith Hospital. A full course of 1440 rads given in 12 treatments over 26 days was administered to the patients. Because of the relatively low energy (7-5 MeV) of the beam from this particular machine, it was not possible to deliver the full dose uniformly throughout the tumour except in extremely thin patients. Pain, dysphagia, vomiting, and bleeding were relieved in the majority of cases. The side effects were minimal and easily controlled. Palpable masses disappeared. Five patients required surgery after neutron therapy. All the incisions were made through irradioated tissue and all except one healed normally. Tumour was present outside the treated area, but the absence of any palpable mass within the treated area was a consistent finding. Radiologically, the stomachs remained abnormal and later changes included gross mucosal abnormality and shrinkage. Fourteen patients came to necropsy and in 10 no tumour was present macroscopocally. Tumour cells were seen in all except two cases but these were few, surrounded by dense fibrous tissue, and may not have been viable. The remaining stomach was abnormal with a thickened wall and destruction of mucosa. Three of the four cases in which macroscopic tumour was present received less than the standard dose because of the inadequate penetration of the beam. Excellent regression of tumors was achieved by the neutrons, but the stomachs did not recover from this satisfactorily. Gastrectomy four to six months after treatment is therefore suggested. This operation and other surgical procedures in other patients were successfully carried out. There is a need for higher energy neutrons to improve treatment and extend it to patients of thick-set build.
Rabbits were immunized with extracts of primary or grafted intestinal adeno-carcinomas induced by carcinogenic drugs in inbred rats. After absorption with normal tissue extracts, the antisera were able to recognize three tumor-associated antigens. Two of them were glycoproteins, present in cancer cells but also, in trace amounts, in mucous cells of the normal digestive tract. The third antigen is not detectable in the normal digestive system, but present in normal spleen; on im-unofluorescence, it is not located in the cancer cells, but in polymorphonuclear cells infiltrating the tumor. None of the three antigens cross-reacts with human carcinoembryonic antigen, or human or rat alphafetoprotein. On the other hand, one of the glycoprotein antigens is immunologically related to the human blood group A substance.
Eleven patients with terminal metastatic prostatic carcinoma were selected for a pilot study to evaluate how effective diethylstilbestrol diphosphate (Stilphostrol) and cylcophosphamide (Cytoxan) are in this disease.  Six of 7 patients had a good response when treated with diethylstilbestrol diphosphate.  The mean duration of response was 6.4 months.  All 6 patients given cyclophosphamide had marked relief of pain and increased mobility.  Of these, 3 died twelve, sixteen, and nineteen weeks, respectively, following initiation of therapy while still benefiting from pain relief.  The mean duration of response was 14.8 weeks.
The correct classification of carcinoma of the lung is not only of therapeutic and prognostic importance but is also considered to have epidemiological and aetiological significance. Histological tests for mucin are essential in the classification of lung tumours but there is little information available about the influence of the method of detection used on the results of classification. Five established staining techniques were tested using paraffin blocks from surgical specimens of 81 human lung tumours diagnosed as adenocarcinoma, ie tumours of WHO Type III. Mowry's alcian blue-periodic acid-Schiff (AB-PAS) technique gave the highest proportion of positives (93%) slightly fewer (90%) being obtained by the PAS technique alone. Both these methods were influenced by the presence of cytoplasmic hyaline globules, structures which cannot be regarded as mucin. The stain recommended by the World Health Organization was also influenced by the presence of hyaline globules, was less frequently positive than the PAS techniques and was considered to have no special advantages. The aldehyde fuchsin-alcian blue sequence was positive in only 83% of cases but provided some information about the type of mucin present. Southgate's mucicarmine also detected mucin in only 83% of cases. It was concluded that the apparent incidence of adenocarcinomas may be influenced by staining methods used. Some standardization of technique is desirable and the AB-PAS combination appears to be the most satisfactory.
Attempt were made to initiate cell lines from 11 specimens obtained from nine patients with renal cell carcinoma. Primary cultures were obtained in seven instances with only five long term cells lines. Two of these cell lines were obtained from metastatic tumors in two patients. Using microcytotoxicity assay, both autochthonous and allogeneic lymphocytotoxicity, specific to renal cell tumor, was demonstrated. This would suggest a common cross-reacting tumor-associated antigen. No lymphocytotoxicity could be demonstrated using autochthonous lymphocytes aganist two metastatic tumor target cell lines. This would suggest some antigenic differences between primary tumor and its metastases. In seven instances significant complement-dependent cytotoxicity was demonstrated using six different renal cell carcinoma target cell lines. Serums from three patients with renal cell carcinoma, one without any recurrent tumor and two with metastases, appear to significantly block the autochthonous and allogeneic lymphocyte cytotoxicity.
Two cases of urinary obstruction secondary to neoplastic involvement of the prostate from abdominal-perineal resection for carcinoma of the rectosigmoid are discussed. A review of the literature and the management of this infrequent entity is described.
Using the method of double diffusion in agar and precipitation, inhibition test and specific antitumor immune sera, perchloric extracts of carcinomas of the stomach and lower parts of the gastrointestinal tract were found to contain a carcinoembryonic antigen with electrophoretic mobility of gamma-globulins. Antigens from carcinomas of all studied parts of the gastrointestinal tract (stomach, sigmoid, colon and rectum) gave lines of identity in the test of double diffusion in agar. This antigen was not demonstrable in the mucous membranes surrounding the carcinomas of the gastrointestinal tract or in normal organs (gastrointestinal mucosa, liver, kidneys, spleen, plasma), or in perchloric extracts of gastrointestinal tissues of human fetuses.
This study had the limited aim of ascertaining the efficacy of bleomycin in controlling m etastatic renal carcinoma. Fifteen patients received bleomycin intramuscularly and five patients received the drug via continuous infusion. Only two patients had responses, both mixed. We concluded that the therapeutic value of bleomycin in the treatment of advanced renal carcinoma is negligible.
An in vitro cell line (SGT) derived from a mouse submaxillary gland adenocarcinoma (TGS) containing A and B viral particles maintained its oncogenicity only for newborn isogeneic hosts (C3H/He mice) immunosuppressed with antithymocyte serum. Inoculation into adult isogeneic animals did not cause tumor but provided partial protection against a challenge with TGS cells. The loss of oncogenicity for nonimmunosuppressed isogeneic hosts was accompanied by the acqusition of oncogenicity for adult, nonimmunosuppressed, xenogeneic hosts (golden hamsters) given subcutaneous inoculations of SGT cells on the back. From the tumor grown in the hamster, which is histologically similar to the original tumor of the mouse, an in vitro cell line (HWS) was derived. The comparative analysis of the 2 cell lines, SGT and HWS, led to the following conclusions: (a) the karyological pattern of the 2 cell lines in virtually the same; (b) the cell surface antigenic pattern is similar for the 2 cell lines, as determined by colony inhibition test and cytotoxicty test; (c) the cells of the HWS line behave serologically as a mouse-hamster hybrid, also as determined by colony inhibition and cytotoxicity tests; (d) both cell lines have only intracytoplasmic viral particles of the A type; and (e) agglutination with the plant lectins concanavalin A and wheat germ agglutinin occurs at lower concentrations of agglutinin for HWS cells than for SGT cells.
A review of our 247 patients with adenocarcinoma of the lung revealed the overall five year survival rate to be only 0.81%. Lung resection offers the chance of cure if the lesion is peripherally located and without lymph node involvement. Direct chest wall invasion by tumor is not contraindication to surgery. Radiation therapy was not especially effective in our series. Several chemotherapeutic agents gave an overall response of 3  11%.
Occurrence in an Adenocarcinoma of a Meckel's diverticulum. Neoplasia is the least common complication of Meckel's diverticulum. A case of partial obstruction of the small intestine due to adenocarcinoma arising in a Meckel's diverticulum is presented. The noteworthy feature of this case is the presence of neoplastic Paneth cells in the tumor.
Occurrence, diagnosis, and treatment. Fifty-five patients treated for cervical carcinoma developed bony metastases between January 1, 1961 and December 31, 1973. Roentgenograms were diagnostic in all but 2 of the patients. In 15 patients, a combination of radioactive scans and roentgenograms was used to establish the diagnosis. The most common mechanism of bony involvement from carcinoma of the cervix was extension of the neoplasm from para-aortic nodes, with involvement of the adjacent vertebral bodies. The earliest metastases were discovered at the time of the primary diagnosis. Thirteen years was the longest interval from the primary diagnosis until the discovery of bony metastases. Sixty-nine percent of the patients were diagnosed within 30 months. Ninety-six percent of the patients died within 18 months. Seventy-six percent of the patients received some form of therapy for their metastases. Thirty-six of these patients were treated with radiation therapy. Four of these patients received complete relief of symptoms, 24 some relief, and 8 patients received no relief.
One primary goal of preoperative radiotherapy for hypernephroma is to reduce the volume of tumor and, therefore, improve the possibility of resection. It is important that this goal be accomplished promptly so that 4 to 6 weeks after radiation therapy nephrectomy can be attempted. A longer waiting period may allow fibrosis of the normal surrounding tissues and make surgery more difficult. In addition, longer waiting periods could theoretically increase the probability of metastasis. Therefore, we plan to continue clinical investigation on the use of combined intra-arterial actinomycin D and radiotherapy as a possible useful means of improving the possibility of prompt surgical resection, since theoretically this regimen may be a method of increasing the effective radiation dose to the hypernephroma without increasing the effective radiation dose to surrounding normal tissue, such as bowel. The method may also have merit as an improved means of palliating selected patients with metastases who are symptomatic from a bulky primary hypernephroma.
Indium-111 attached to bleomycin is useful in the scintigraphic localization of a variety of tumors. Since it does not normally accumulate in bowel and feces, it is superior to other radiopharmaceuticals, such as gallium-67 citrate, in the demonstration of abnormalities in the abdomen and pelvis. Twenty-eight patients with know carcinoma of the cervix were studied with whole body 111In-belomycin scans. Two "false-positive" scans were produced by local inflammation. Six "false-negative" scans were attributed to small tumors escaping scintigraphic detection. In the remaining 20 patients, scan findings correlated well with site and extent of the tumor as determined by other means. 111In-bleomycin scintiscanning may prove to be a highly useful adjunct in the evaluation of patients with carcinoma of the cervix.
In the present uncertainty as to the relative importance of maximum radical resection, surgical treatment of bronchial carcinoma should be guided by the state of cardio-pulmonary function and quality of survival.  In borderline cases, therefore, consideration should be given to economic resection, either parenchymal or bronchial.  Surgery was performed for bronchial carcinoma in 369 cases between 1963 and 1974, involving 30 segmental resections and 26 bronchial sleeve resections.  Favourable results are reported for the curative operations, whereas the results of palliative resections show low mortality but unfavourable longterm survival.
Sera from eight of 15 patients with colonic carcinoma exhibited demonstrable cytotoxicity against an established cell strain derived from adenocarcinoma of the ileocecum, HCT-8. Sera from 12 of 16 patients with rectal carcinoma were cytotoxic for an established cell strain derived from an adenocarcinoma of the rectum, HRT-18. Patients with colonic carcinoma exhibited serum cytotoxicity against only the colonic target cells, whereas patients with rectal carcinoma gave significant cytotoxicity against both cell strains. This cytotoxicity was shown to be complement-dependent and appeared to be specific for colonic and/or rectal carcinoma cells. Although the cells produced carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in vitro, the cytotoxic antibody response in these patients did not appear to be directed against CEA. Serum cytotoxicity was not demonstrated against two other cell strains, HCT-48 and HT-29, derived from adenocarcinomas of the human colon, except for a reaction against a blood-group-related antigen. These cell strains had comparable levels of cell-associated CEA. The routine titration of cytotoxic antibody against these established cell cultures may provide meaningful information on the host's immune response to colorectal neoplasms.
A method is described for the consistent in vitro generation cytotoxic cells by incubating Fischer 344 rat spleen cells on monolayers of a syngeneic mammary adenocarcinoma. Significant cytotoxicity by in vitro culture is generated as early as 3 days after initiation and effector cells are cytolytic only toward target cells of the sensitizing monolayer. Reciprocal sensitization with allogeneic fibroblasts as the immunizing monolayer yielded effector cells cytolytic for the fibroblasts but without effect on the mammary tumor. The consistency in the generation of cytotoxic cells by in vitro culture should permit its standardized use in following other related immune phenomena such as blocking by serologic factors and suppression, recritment of memory for cytotoxic function.
A tumor-associated protein was found in tissue derived from an X-irradiation-induced adenocarcinoma in the small bowel of the rat. The protein was associated with the cell membranes of the tumor tissue. It shared common antigenic determinants both with a rat fetal protein and a perchloric acid-soluble protein isolated from the serum of the tumor-bearing rat.
A clinicopathologic study. The clinical and pathologic features of 43 primary adenacarcinomas of the small intestine (32 jejunal and 11 ileal) are reported. Seventy-four percent of the patients presented with partial or complete small bowel obstruction, 56% complained of abdominal pain, 37% had symptoms of anemia (weakness, easy fatigability), and 35% had lost weight. Anemic hemoglobin levels occurred in 69%, and a palpable abdominal mass in 25%. Treatment consisted of a "curative" or "palliative" resection, or a bypass procedure. Seventy-nine percent of the tumors showed an annular, constricting pattern, while the remaining 21% had a predominantly fungating or polypoid appearance. Three individuals currently free of clinical recurrence have been followed less than 5 years. Of the remaining 40 patients, a 5-year cure was achieved in 11 (28%), including 6 (15%) who at present have no recurrence and 5 (13%) who subsequently died of other causes. Within 5 years, 28 of these 40 patients (70%) were known or presumed dead tumor, and 1 had succumbed to other causes (2%). Various pathologic features were correlated with the clinical course. Documented lymph node metastasis proved to be the most valuable prognostic finding, 88% of these individuals dying of tumor, as contrasted to 45% of those with tumor-free nodes. A few cases of superficially invasive carcinoma found in an otherwise benign adenomatous lesion had a good prognosis when symptoms were produced mainly by the adenoma, the carcinoma being a relatively minor component.
The case records of four groups of women over thirty on the books of a thyroid clinic were used to explore a possible association between breast cancer and Hashimoto's thyroiditis. The index group consisted of 1810 women (10 160 person-years of observation) with Hashimoto's thyroiditis, and the three control groups, matched by sex, age, marital status, and residency, were selected from patients with myxoedema (essential hypothyroidism), benign nodular goitre, or hyperthyroidism. The incidence of breast cancer for the index group, though not for control groups, was significantly higher than that expected from data for the general population, suggesting that patients with Hashimoto's thyroiditis are one high-risk population for breast cancer.
Cell cultures derived from fetal human and prostatic adenocarcinoma were inoculated with SV40 virus. Within 6 weeks in vitro morphologic transformation occurred, after which the cells proliferated rapidly. They exhibited the SV40 T-antigen by immunofluorescence and survived propagation beyond the limited lifespan of uninfected cultures. We suggest that this may be a useful technique in establishing stable cell lines of human prostate.
Twenty-five patients with disseminated renal cell carcinoma have been followed for eleven months. These patients have been treated with CCNU, bleomycin, methotrexate, and platinum in various combinations. The results have been discussed in light of other studies using chemotherapeutic agents against this disease process.
The records of 157 patients with cardioesophageal carcinoma were reviewed. It is evident that although the prognosis of patients with squamous carcinoma is better than that of patients with adenocarcinoma, neither lesion is compatible with substantial long-term survival. Palliative resection of squamous carcinoma provides satisfactory short-term relief of symptoms. Palliative resection of adenocarcinoma, however, does not afford a similar response. Alternative modes of therapy are suggested.
40 patients have been followed up for more than a year. B.C.G. improved survival in patients with a limited tumour burden: there were no recurrences and no deaths in 17 stage-I patients treated with intrapleural B.C.G. whereas 9 of 22 comparable control patients developed recurrent cancer and 5 died in the same interval (p=0.003). Intrapleural B.C.G. treatment did not seem to be beneficial in patients with more advanced disease. The hazards associated with injecting these living organisms into the pleural space have been reduced by preclinical laboratory testing in animals, use of a single limited dose of microorganisms, administration of isoniazid, and careful patient monitoring.
Uridine 5'-diphosphate-galactose:glycoprotein galactosyltransferase activity was demonstrated in homogenates of normal ovary and ovarian epithelial adenocarcinomas. The specific activity of the enzyme in ovarian tumors was 3 to 5 times higher than in normal ovaries when the enzyme was assayed under identical conditions. The glycoprotein fetuin, from which terminal sialic acid and penultimate galactose were removed (fetuin minus N-acetylneuraminis acid and galactose), acted as an excellent exogenous acceptor. Galactosyltransferase from normal ovary and ovarian tumor cells had similar properties. Both required Mn2+ and Triton X-100 and had broad pH optima between 5.5 and 7. Galactosyltransferase activity was also measured in serum samples from ovarian cancer patients and normal healthy individuals in the presence of fetuin minus N-acetylneuraminic acid and galactose as exogenous acceptor. The enzyme levels were significantly elevated in the sera of ovarian cancer patients as compared to normal controls. The differences in the levels of this enzyme in the tissues and sera of normal individuals and ovarian cancer patients were not due to differential levels of the degrading enzymes such as uridine 5'-diphosphate-galactose pyrophosphatase or beta-D-galactosidase. Serial determinations were carried out on the sera of 5 ovarian cancer patients over a long period of time. The serum level of galactosyltransferase activity appeared to correlate with tumor volume as well as with the clinical status of the patient, which suggests possible leakage of the tumor enzyme into the host sera. Serial determination of this enzyme level in ovarian cancer patients seems promising in measuring tumor progression or success of therapeutic approaches.
Public patients admitted to a public hospital with carcinoma of the rectum were older and had more advanced lesions than those generally reported. Elderly patients were often unfit for any definitive treatment. Only half of all patients had curative resections and half of these lives five years; survival was related to stage. Palliative resection proved safe and worth while. Late diagnosis of rectal cancer among the aged and the poor demands improvement in our standards of community health care.
Prostate cancer developed in two male patients being treated with fluoxymesterone for erectile impotence. It is suggested that the current increased interest in and therapy for sexual dysfunction be accompanied by an awareness of a possible causal relationship between exogenous androgens and prostrate cancer.
Computerised axial tomography demonstrated the presence of a mass lesion in the pancreas in 9 (64%) of 14 patients with histologically confirmed pancreatic cancer. Since this was a retrospective analysis, the percentage of false positive and negative results using this technique is not as yet known. The technique appears accurate in detecting abnormal pancreatic masses of 10 cm in diameter or more, however, for masses less than 10 cm in diameter the yield at present is only 33%. With further technical refinement to increase resolution, the automatic computerised transverse axial scan should prove to be an invaluable procedure for the detection of pancreatic carcinoma, in designing radiation therapy ports, and in providing objective information regarding response of therapy and progression of disease.
During the period 1958 to 1972 inclusive, 217 patients were subjected to a palliative operation because of carcinoma of the stomach. Subtotal gastric resection was performed in 33 and a total resection in 42 cases. The postoperative mortality in the resected group amounted to 8%. The average duration of survival with exclusion of the postoperative mortality amounted to 17 months with a median duration of 12 months. Five patients in this group (7%) survived for 5 years, and two patients are still alive without recurrence 9 and 6 years, respectively, after the operation. Among the 142 remaining patients, the postoperative mortality was 23%. The average survival with exclusion of the postoperative mortality was 5 months; the median duration of survival amounted to 4 months. The average duration of survival among the patients subjected to a gastro- or jejunostomy was shorter: 3 months, with a median of 2 months. Of the various palliative measures, resection is to be preferred. If it is not feasible, gastro-enterostomy and intubation may be considered. In a limited number of cases, the alimentary fistula may still be indicated, even though it is an unsatisfactory type of palliation. Hoerr's classification is satisfactory as a clinical subdivision. The dividing line between operations with curative and with palliative intent as a rule is put at B III. Of the patients treated palliatively, 92% had died after 2 years; 79% of those subjected to resection and 100% of those subjected to some other intervention.
Acinar cells of neoplastic prostate tissues are more heterogeneous in size and shape than benign hyperplastic cells when observed by scanning electron microscopy. Three types of acinar cells are recognizable by surface structure, cells with microvilli, cells without microvilli, and cells with membrane ruffles. The pitted cells previously seen in BPH tissues are probably artifactual. The identity of the crater cells is sitll in question.
The surgical treatment of 3163 patients seen at St Mark's Hospital with a single adenocarcinoma of the rectum in the years 1948-72 is described and the results analysed. In 2948 patients (93-2 per cent) the primary tumour was removed. The operative mortality fell from 7-0 per cent in the years 1948-52 to 2-1 per cent in 1968-72. The proportion of restorative operations has risen steadily over the years to a level of 41-1 per cent in the years 1968-72. There were 2410 operation survivors in the years 1948-67. The crude 5-year survival rate in the whole group was 47-1 per cent (corrected figure 56-7 per cent), and 56-6 per cent (corrected figure 68-4 per cent) for the 1931 survivors of radical operations. Comparison of results for patients surviving radical synchronous combined excision and radical anterior resection shows a significant difference in the two groups: in the former the crude 5-year survival rate was 52-7 per cent (corrected figure 63-8 per cent), and in the latter group the respective figures were 66-7 and 79-4 per cent. A higher proportion of Dukes' A and B cases and of low grade tumours are shown as the pathological background to the more favourable prognosis for patients surviving radical anterior resection.
The lymphocytotoxicity test was used to study the existence of immunologically active lymphocyte reactions in patients with renal carcinoma at different stages. In 9 patients with an advanced renal carcioma (stage IV) a low lymphocytotoxicity was found, while the examination of 7 patients with stage I and II renal tumours showed a high value of the lymphocytotoxicity test. The clinical importance of the lymphocytotoxicity test is discussed with special interest in a possible immunotherapy.
With a view to detecting early biochemical changes in diseased prostate glands, polyamines, zinc, cholesterol, and physical measurements of pH and specific gravity were determined in expressed prostatic secretion. The pH of prostatic secretion from normal men was found to be higher than previously reported in the literature. The other measured substances and specific gravity were found to be decreased in prostatitis whereas the specific gravity was markedly elevated in those patients with adenocarcinoma. Clarification of physicochemical studies on prostate secretion may lead to a system of better monitoring the course of prostate disease.
"Fingerprints" of 0.9% NaCl solution extracts obtained from fetal guts and individual adenocarcinoma of the colon show a randomized pattern of expression of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) determinants by CEA radioimmunoassay and isoelectric focusing. All CEA-containing antigens found in a pool of 20 primary adenomas were found at some stage in fetal development. No single CEA-reacting peak was typical of any one period of fetal development. When fetal gut profiles were grouped according to trimester in utero, however, an expanded gene pool was found in the second trimester which correlates well with maximum gastrointestinal growth and differentiation. Isoelectric focusing-CEA radioimmunoassay profiles of individual primary adenomas were similar to but never identical with individual fetal gut profiles. "Fingerprints" of metastatic adenomas of entodermal origin showed quantitative and qualitative increases in molecules with CEA determinants unlike these latter categories. Such data suggest that both integrator and controller gene activities may be lost in metastatic disease. Rather than "phase-specific gene sets" on different chromosomes being activated by various oncogenic modalities, it is more probable that individual chromosomes are involved in oncogenesis. While more data are needed to confirm this idea, it is safe to say that the expression of molecules with CEA determinants need not be caused by either derepressive or reexpressive gene activation. These data point to the individuality of gene expression of molecules with CEA determinants both in fetal development and in early neoplasia. Since CEA-reacting molecules were not found in tumors of ectodermal or mesodermal origin by these methods, such products should be termed carcino-developmental antigens of entodermal or colonic origin.
The alpha-protein which we previously detected in PCA extracts of malignant tumours, normal tissues, sera and other body fluids has been further tested. The alpha-protein was identified by immunological methods as alpha1-antichymotrypsin. Experiments by crossed immunoelectrophoresis showed that this protein cross-reacts with the betaE-protein found in the PCA extracts. The betaE-protein shows heterogeneity in molecular size, electrophoretic mobility and it has been demonstrated that it shares antigenic determinants with the CEA or betaI-molecule. Cross-reaction between betaE and other glycoproteins found in the PCA extract of normal or malignant tissue or serum was not detected.
Thymic-dependent lymphocytic blastogenesis of peripheral blood lymphocytes of 59 patients with varying stages of prostatic cancer to the non-specific plant mitogen, phytohaemagglutinin (PHA) and the correlation of their responsiveness with the clinical stage of malignancy and level of alpha2-globulin have been evaluated. Patients within each of the four stages of malignancy possessed statistically significant extrinsic (noted in 40 (68%) of 59 patients) and intrinsic (noted in 21 (47%) of 45 patients) aberrations of their lymphocytic responsiveness to PHA compared with the responsiveness of a control population of non-cancer patients. The observed aberrations were, however, not significantly different between each stage nor did they correlate with the stage of disease. Similarly, levels of alpha2-globulin, while significantly elevated within each stage, as compared with the levels in the control population, no significant differences or correlation with the stage of disease was observed. Of interest, perhaps pending further study, were observations of the increased frequency of the number of patients with a significant elevation of alpha2 with a progression of malignancy from localized to invasive and metastatic disease. A similar trend in the incidence of the association of aberrations of lymphocytic reactivity with elevated levels of alpha2 were also noted with a progression of disease. The present confirmatory observations of a recent study in this laboratory of diminished cellular responsiveness in patients with prostatic cancer may be of considerable relevance in directing the therapeutic management of the patient - lest the therapy selected be further debilitating providing reduced surveillance - metastization of tumour cells, and alteration of tumour-host homeostasis.
Serum and urine beta 2-microglobulin concentrations were determined in 38-6% of the 869 inhabitants of a village in which both Balkan endemic nephropathy and papillary tumours of the urinary-tract epithelium are common. Over 23% of the "healthy" population had raised serum and/or urine beta 2-microglobulin. 5 of 6 patients with papillary tumours of the renal pelvis, without evidence of renal parenchymal involvement, and 13-4% of the "healthy" population had raised serum-beta 2-microglobulin. It is suggested that overproduction of beta 2-microglobulin, a light-chain-like immune globulin, by the tumour cells may result in a light-chain-like nephropathy--ie, endemic Balkan nephropathy.
The results of therapy for 78 patients with disseminated renal cell carcinoma are evaluated. Symptoms related to the primary tumor were noted in only 28 per cent of the patients and were not difficult to manage in those patients not undergoing nephrectomy. Adjuctive nephrectomy, therefore, is a more appropriate term than palliative nephrectomy when referring to removal of the primary tumor as part of an aggresive combined therapeutic approach. Of patients receiving an adjunctive nephrectomy those with osseous metastases only had a better 1-year survival rate (36 per cent) than those with metastases to other sites (18 per cent). Complete regression of metastases was noted in 12 per cent of patients treated with medroxyprogesterone acetate and adjunctive nephrectomy. The role of adjunctive nephrectomy combined with embolic infarction, hormonal therapy, chemotherapy and/or immunotherapy is discussed.
A study of 66 patients in whom microscopic foci of prostatic cancer was found in prostatectomies done for benign prostatic hyperplasia revealed in 32 of the 66 cases (48%) that there were in retrospect abnormal rectal findings that should have suggested the possibility of neoplasia. Other abnormalities were elevated serum acid phosphatase (5 patients), asymmetrical enlargement of one lateral prostatic lobe at cystoscopy (7 patients), and unilateral hydroureteronephrosis (7 patients). Urinary retention was the presenting symptoms in 56% of the patients. Difficult enucleation was noted in 41% of the open prostatectomies. The importance of performing careful prostatic biopsy in any suspicious prostatic enlargement is again stressed.
alpha-Fetoprotein was investigated in nonhepatoma patients, whose definitive diagnoses had been confirmed at surgery. Its changes in serum level and localization in tissues were reported and the possible etiology and pathogenesis of these diseases were discussed with an emphasis on morphological observation.
Two hundred patients at high risk for endometrial adenocarcinoma were screened using the Gravlee Jet Washer. Tissue obtained from the first 100 patients was processed by cell block technic alone; tissue from the second 100 patients was processed by cell block plus direct smear and Nucleopore filtration stained by the Papanicolaou method. All patients had histologic diagnosis by fractional curettage. Six of 12 patients with a tissue diagnosis of carcinoma were missed by the jet washer using the cell block technic alone. In the second 100 patients, no cases of cancer were missed using both cell block and cytologic technics. Technic and application of the jet washer in screening for endometrial carcinoma are discussed. We conclude that the Gravlee Jet Washer is a safe, effective screening tool which frequently may replace diagnostic curettage; however, if abnormal bleeding persists, curettage must be done.
Seventy-eight patients underwent palliative resections for adenocarcinoma of the colon or rectum. The operative mortality was 6.4 per cent. The high morbidity rate of 43.5 per cent, mostly attributable to errors in operative technic and sepsis, could  not be related to the extent of tumor spread. In fifty-nine patients long-term follow-up revealed a mean survival time of 12.4 months and a median of 9.1 months. Thirty-eight patients (64.4 per cent) survived six months, twenty patients (33.8 per cent) one year,  seven patients two years, and one patient five years. Patients with only local extension of disease had the most favorable duration of survival. Hepatic or peritoneal involvement alone did not preclude long-term survival, but with the two combined the outlook was less favorable. There is a small group of patients with extensive metastatic disease who will not benefit from resection. Otherwise, adenocarcinoma of the colon or rectum with local or distant metastases should be resected when feasible.
The leukocyte adherence inhibition technique was used to assess cell-mediated immunoreactivity and serum-blocking factors related to adenocarcinoma of the colon or rectum. In the group of 48 patients with confirmed tumors of this type, 36 of 38 had reactive leukocytes and 46 of 47 had serum-blocking factors. Patients whose tumors had been removed surgically, with no sign of recurrence, retained their leukocyte activity for up to 3.5 years in 6 of 6 cases, but only a small proportion (7 of 30) retained blocking factors. In 67 controls (who were patients with nonmalignant gastrointestinal disorders, patients with gastrointestinal tumors other than colorectal adenocarcinoma, patients with other cancers, or healthy volunteers), negative reactions were obtained, with diverticular disease the only prominent exception. The leukocyte adherence inhibition test appeared to be highly sensitive and specific. Application to the immunodiagnosis of colorectal cancer thus seems to be warranted.
DBA/2 mice bearing a syngeneic mammary adenocarcioma T1699 produced high levels of tumor-specific antibody, detected by indirect immunofluorescence and subsequently identified as the IgG2a subclass. Tumor-bearer sera passively administered to normal recipients protected the animals from subsequent challenge with T1699 tumor cells butnot from challenge with a non-cross-reacting syngeneic tumor, SaD2 fibrosarcoma. Administration of sera prior to tumor challenge was found to be more effective than treatment after the challenge. The protective effect of sera appeared to parallel both antibody titers and appearance of concomitant immunity; however, sera absorbed with T1699 cells, with the indirect fluorescent antibody titers reduced more than 100-fold, conferred an almost identical level of protection. Immune suppression of serum recipients before serum transfer abolished the effect, suggesting that protection depended on a cellular immune response by the host in addition to the possible protective effect(s) of humoral antibody.
Firmly established transplantable C3H/HeJ mammary carcinomas can be inhibited by host challenge with Vibrio cholerae neuraminidase (VCN)-treated tumor cells. The effect is totally immunospecific, even VCN-treated tumors bearing shared mammary tumor virus (MTV) antigen cannot induce the regression. Thus, VCN is capable of increasing the immunogenicity of the private, unique-unshared tumor antigens on mammary carcinomas; VCN is incapable of increasing the immunogenicity of the shared MTV-associated tumor antigen even in syngeneic C3HeB/FeJ MTV-free mice. The immunoregressive effect of VCN-treated tumor cells can be augmented by subtotal or total surgical excision of large transplantable tumors. Spontaneous mammary tumors in retired breeder C3H/HeJ female mice can be made to regress by two immunological maneuvers: (1) repeated intratumor injections of VCN and/or BCG; and (2) total excision and immunotherapy with VCN-treated autochthonous mammary tumor cells. The use of VCN-treated transplantable mammary tumor cells sharing the MTV-associated antigen was not better than excision alone. The evidence supports the idea that active specific immunotherapy of spontaneous tumors with VCN-altered tumor cells may require the use of autochthonous cells.
Benign and malignant prostatic tissue was removed in surgery and partitioned for (a) ultrastructural study, (b) tissue culture, and (c) (c) immunochemical study. Fourteen malignant and 18 benign prostatic cancer specimens were examined by transmission electron microscopy (TEM) for the presence of viruses or virus-like particles. Viruses could not be identified with assurity in thin sections. Acinar cells of normal, benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH), and neoplastic prostate tissue were examined in the scanning electron microscope and TEM and found to be extremely heterogenous in their surface morphologies. Three major types of surface morphologies were present: microvillous, ruffled, and bare. All three types of cells were present in normal, BPH, and neoplastic acini. A collagenase procedure was utilized to remove the stromal cells from glandular structures prior to in vitro cultivation. Partially purified extracts from 71 human urothelial tumors and 75 human urothelial nontumor tissues were used as competing antigens in competition radioimmunoassay in an effort to detect the presence of one of the structural components of type-C ribonucleic acid viruses, the p30 core protein. The urothelial tumors tested included 42 BPH specimens and 18 prostatic carcinoma specimens. Thirty-eight percent of the prostatic carcinoma tissues and 48% of the BPH tissues demonstrated the presence of a protein antigenically similar to the p30 core protein of an oncogenic RNA virus.
Twenty patients were skin tested with solubilized components of autologous prostatic adenocarcinoma or benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). Four of ten patients bearing adenocarcinoma of the prostate exhibited tumor-specific cutaneous responsiveness to solubilized autologous tumor-specific antigens (TSA). One responding patient also responded to solubilized allogeneic TSA. A single patient bearing prostatic carcinoma responded only to solubilized components of allogeneic BPH. Nine of ten patients with BPH exhibited no response to solubilized components of autologous BPH. The patient responding to the extract of autologous BPH, however, also had clinical stage B adenocarcinoma of the prostate. These observations suggest host responsiveness to TSA of prostatic carcinoma. Possible clinical significance and mechanisms to explain the findings are discussed.
Scanning electron microscopy is applied to the study of 3-dimensional surface and organization of a normal prostate gland and of samples of prostatic disease, including five cases of benign hyperplasia and 15 cases of prostatic adenocarcinoma of different degrees of differentiation. The study provided further evidence regarding the nature and origin of prostatic cancer at a cytologic level and indicated alternate pathways to the neoplastic spread within the prostate gland.
An animal model to investigate new therapeutic approaches for the treatment of renal adenocarcinoma has been further studied. This model is based on a transplantable murine renal adenocarcinoma whose growth follows Gompertzian kinetics, relates to tumor RNA and DNA content, and also correlates with the rate of tumor DNA synthesis. This model in the current study was also evaluated for the ability of various therapeutic agents to inhibit tumor DNA synthesis. Such tests may be valuable for the preclinical screening of potentially useful drugs and may provide insight into fundamental aspects of tumor control. In this study, CCNU, BCNU, and adriamycin were potent inhibitors of tumor DNA synthesis whereas cytosine arabinoside, bleomycin, and cyclophosphamide were not. These observations were confirmed by autoradiography and correlated with other experimental end points of tumor therapy such as tumor weight and animal survival. This preclinical screening model is an effective and helpful means whereby new drugs and drug combinations can be tested for potential use in human renal cell carcinoma.
An 8-year study of the records of 127 patients with carcinoma of the esophagus revealed that the data necessary to make an evaluation of various methods of palliative treatment frequently were not recorded on the charts. Therefore, it was not possible to recommend one particular paliative treatment for carcinoma of the esophagus. The authors believe that a prospective study is required to evaluate objectively the various modes of treatment for this disease. They propose a grading system with numbered values, so that future studies can be made more objective: in addition such a system would allow comparison of series from different treatment centres.
Pitfalls in surgical management. Adenocarcinoma of the proximal third of the stomach is a florid tumor with a high propensity for esophageal extension limphagitic invasion, and hepatic dissemination. Treatment results in 117 consecutive cases indicate that cure rates may be improved by a closer attention to the esophageal margin of resection.
Pancreatic carcinoma remains a difficult problem in surgery. High mortality and overall discouraging results of pancreaticoduodenectomy misled some physicians to believe that surgery is ineffective in management of pancreatic carcinoma. Patients with pancreatic carcinoma in two major hospitals from 1963 through 1976 were analyzed. Results of pancreaticoduodenctomies and palliative operations are reported.
In human prostatic carcinomatous acini, the columnar cells possessed a loosely organized meshwork of ridges and grooves and many isolated, short, and disorganized strands of tight junctions, unlike those of benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH), where the tight junctional ridges and grooves were numerous and compact. Desmosomes were more irregular in size, shape and distribution in cancerous cells than in BPH. Our observation indicated that the junctional complexes were altered and defective in cancerous cells and probably facilitated migration of some acinar cells into the stroma. In addition, we have also shown that the membranes including the intramembranous particles of Golgi complexes, mitochondria, secretory granules and vacuoles, lipofuscin granules and nuclei, were essentially similar in cancerous and BPH columar cells.
This communication describes an automated micro-adherence inhibition assay. Tumor-specific immunity was demonstrated with B16 melanoma and MCA-38 colon adenocarcinoma, both of which are syngeneic to the same strain of mouse (C57B16/J). Abrogation of the leukocyte adherence inhibition (LAI) response of sensitized leukocytes has been demonstrated in the MCA-38 tumor system by the addition of serum from mice bearing MCA-38 progressively growing tumors, a property not present in normal serum. The sensitivity of the system has also been demonstrated by showing that LAI will change prior to a tumor becoming palpable. This microassay has the advantage of being simple, rapid and reproducible, and involves the use of minimal quantities of antigenic preparations and leukocytes, and in addition is amenable to rigorous statistical analysis.
During the 10 years from 1965 through 1974, 86 patients with adenocarcinoma of the pancreas were diagnosed or referred for treatment at the University of Oregon Health Sciences Center. The average age and survival in these patients is not significantly different from other published series. Only four patients had resectable tumors, and of these two survived over twelve months. Eight other patients also survived over twelve months, and no two of these had the same treatment regimens (although nine of the ten long-term survivors received some form of chemotherapy). Fourteen patients received a combination of chemotherapy and radiation therapy. While their average survival was only two months longer than that of the entire series, three were long-term survivors. Over 75% had significant palliation; this suggests that this treatment should be considered in selected cases.
Immunofluorescence staining was applied to tissue with primary nonhepatic malignancies and/or their metastatic nodules in the liver. Tumor cells from the primary sites of two patients with carcinoma of the pancreas and one patient with Hodgkin's disease were found to be positive for alpha-fetoprotein (AFP). In five patients with gastrointestinal tract cancer, and two with nongastrointestinal tract carcinoma, the liver cells immediately adjacent to the metastiatic foci were positive for AFP. Negative results for AFP was found in seven patients with liver metastasis; of these seven patients, five had nongastrointestinal tract cancer, and two had cancer that arose in the gastrointestinal tract. It is unclear what influences the production of AFP in cases of liver metastasis, since some neoplasms from the same organ system do provoke this phenomenon, and others do not.
The development of a tissue culture line of human prostatic adenocarcinoma is described. The culture (HPC-36), derived from tumor tissue explants, is a pure epithelial culture with characteristics of neoplastic cells, including a large nuclear size relative to the amount of cytoplasm, multiple nucleoli within the nucleus, many mitotic figures, the formation of multinucleated giant cells and the loss of contact inhibition. The cells also stained positively for acid phosphatase and have been grown in monolayer and suspension cultures. The HPC-36 cells presently are being studied to determine whether they are true descendants of the cancer cells.
The periodic acid-thionin Schiff/potassium hydroxide/periodic acid-Schiff (PAT/KOH/PAS) procedure has been used to investigate the histochemical staining characteristics of the mucins found in adenocarcinoma and villous lesions of the large intestine. The 46 blocks examined represented 58 lesions from 37 patients, all of whom had had resections for carcinoma of the colon. tin sharp contrast to normal colon, none of the adenocarcinomas stained red with the PAT/KOH/PAS. With two exceptions the poorly and moderately differentiated adenocarcinomas stained blue, whereas of the well differentiated lesions half were blue and half purple. The malignant villous lesions demonstrated the same trends, although a larger percentage were purple. None of the benign lesions stained blue. It is suggested that malignancy in the colon is accompanied by an increase in blue staining in the PAT/KOH/PAS technique and that such staining may be of value in the interpretation of highly atypical adenoma where it might identify the onset of malignancy. This change in staining indicates a distinct alteration in the chemistry of the mucins which we interpret as a reduction in the degree of side chain O-acylation of their constituent sialic acids.
The study of IgA, IgG and IgM immunoglobulins obtained from tissues of prostate adenoma and adenocarcinoma, as well as of homogenates by electrophoresis in polyacrylamide gels, revealed the presence, the amount and the different conformation of protein fractions in the adenoma and in the adenocarcinoma. Inflammatory processes do not play a significant role. Comparative measures of nucleic acids and of SH groups suggest the existence of molecular mechanisms interpreted in the light of ageing processes.
Benign hyperplastic and neoplastic human prostate tissue samples were obtained by needle biopsy, transurethral resection or open prostatectomy. Acinar cells of both types of tissues were examined in the scanning electron microscope. It had been reported previously that adenocarcinoma acinar cells were more heterogeneous in size and shape than BPH acinar cells; the purpose of this study was to determine if there were surface morphology differences between the two types of tissues. Acinar cells were found to be extremely heterogeneous in their surface morphologies; three major types of surface morphologies were present - microvillous, ruffled, and bare. Within each class of surface morphology there was heterogeneity, both in size and density, of surface structures present. Microvillous, ruffled, and bare cells appeared to be present in normal, BPH, and neoplastic acini with no significant qualitative or quantitative differences in surface morphologies. Infrequently, it was possible to distinguish between well-differentiated and poorly-differentiated carcinomas because cells of the latter tissues were present in sheets rather than acini and appeared flat and totally devoid of surface detail. The SEM studies also sought to determine a marker to establish the origin of prostate tissue culture cells as normal, BPH or cancerous. Surface morphologies from tissues could be traced into the tissue cultures; again, three types of cells are present - bare, microvillous, and ruffled. However, since surface morphology does not appear to be a distinguishin feature of the pathology of the tissue it cannot provide a distinguishing marker for the origin of tissue culture cells. Scanning electron microscopy also provided an opportunity to observe possible secretory mechanisms and products in the prostate acinar cells.
Although several investigators have reported serum alpha-fetoprotein positive gastric cancer with or without metastasis to the liver, its site of production is still unclear. We studied on the site of alpha-fetoprotein synthesis in our cases which showed remarkably high level of serum alpha-fetoprotein, and clarified the presence of alpha-fetoprotein producing gastric cancer by means of direct immunofluorescent technique. However, we also knew the hepatocytes adjacent ot the metastatic lesions could also synthesize alpha-fetoprotein, although these hepatocytes were not known whether under regeneration or degeneration. Through this study, the other carcinofetal proteins such as carcino-placental alkaline phosphatase and CEA were examined using the sera or tumor tissues. Our results will support the idea that cancer is the disease of cell differentiation.
The cause of adenocarcinoma of the colon has not been proven and a viral association has not been reported with this disease. A sensitive biochemical technique for the detection of viral nucleic acid was used to determine whether one type of herpesvirus, namely a human strain of cytomegalovirus, was uniquely present in tumour tissue. 24 specimens of colon, obtained at surgery from 14 patients, were analysed by membrane CR.N.A.-D.N.A. hybridisation. 4 of 7 tumours of the colon were definitely positive for C.M.V. D.N.A. (2greater than or equal to 2 genome-equivalents/cell), or repeatedly showed more than 1 genome-equivalent/cell. Macroscopically normal colon 5 cm from the tumour, as well as histologically normal and abnormal colon from a control population with Crohn's disease were uniformly negative for C.M.V. D.N.A, except for 1 specimen which was macroscopically normal tissue from a patient with carcinoma of the colon. Among patients with conditions that predispose to adenocarcinoma of the colon, 1 of 2 patients with familial polyposis and 1 of 3 with ulcerative colitis harboured in their colon greater than or equal to 2 genome-equivalents of C.M.V. D.N.A. per cell, and another ulcerative colitis patient had 1-2 genome-equivalents/cell.
Bronchial artery infusion of mitomycin C might be very effective in treating minor tumors but, as a rule, less effective in the treatment of larger tumors. In order to achieve improved effect of treatment, 21 cases (stage II-III/TNM) were given supplementary chemotherapy with bleomycin or vincristine-bleomycin. Preoperative treatment was given to 11 cases in which indications for surgical treatment were primarily uncertain or absent. The other group consisted of 10 patients with inoperable lesions. Combined treatment has proved to have a strong but mainly local effect. Repeated courses (up to 5 times) were more effective than a single one. The regional effect, i.e: on overgrowth onto the mediastinum, pericardium or thoracic wall was weak. The system effect was negligible. Penetrating data about objective response are given.
The records of 31 patients with carcinoma of the proximal bile ducts were reviewed and the operative procedures, results, causes of deaths and autopsy findings were analyzed and correlated. Ten poor risk patients were treated by external drainage and died of jaundice or abscesses of the liver within six months. However, one patient survived 13 months after effective bilateral drainage. Twelve patients underwent intubation through the tumor into the hepatic ducts with or without postoperative irradiation. Four patients with irradiation survived 42, 15, 15 and ten months, while eight patients without irradiation died within six months. Autopsy findings of two patients who survived 15 months revealed metastases to the various organs. Four patients underwent resection. A patient who underwent resection of the common hepatic duct and hepaticoduodenostomy died of ascending cholangitis nine months postoperatively, while a patient treated by resection of the common hepatic duct with hepaticojejunostomy died of a recurrence 25 months postoperatively. Two patients underwent left hepatic lobectomy and resection of the right hepatic duct followed by hepatojejunostomy. One patient survived 25 months and died of a reccurrence, while the other patient died of abscesses of the liver ten months postoperatively.
The differential effects of normal and immunologically primed lymphocytes on the adherence of trypsinized rat mammary adenocarcinoma tumor cells (DMBA"8) to their substratum are described, utilizing both allogeneically and syngeneically primed lymphoid cells as effectors. This observation may illustrate an important immunological phenomenon, and may result in a simplified assay procedure for the detection of cell-mediated immunity.
In benign hyperplasia marked beta-glucuronidase and N-acetyl-beta-glucosaminidase activity was seen in the prostatic epithelium whereas the reactions for 5 other glycosidases were only slight or negative. The intensity of the reaction for the glycosidases in prostatic carcinoma was dependent upon the degree of the differentiation. The possible importance of glycosidases for the invasiveness of prostatic carcinoma is briefly discussed.
Survival factors of 86 patients with metastatic renal cell carcinoma were studied by computer analysis. Cumulative survival was 53 per cent at 6 months, 43 per cent at 1 year, 26 per cent at 2 years and 13 per cent at 5 years. Survival was influenced favorably by confinement of metastases to the lungs, by the absence of local recurrence or persistence of tumor and by a longer interval free of disease after removal of the primary tumor. Medical therapy improved survival during the first year after diagnosis of metastases but no objective regression of tumor was observed. Excision of metastatic foci significantly improved survival for up to 5 years (p less than 0.05 and p less than 0.02) after which most patients died of recurrence. Palliative or adjunctive nephrectomy in patients with metastases was associated with a 6 per cent mortality rate but it increases survival over other patients with metastases at the time of diagnosis of renal carcinoma who did not undergo nephrectomy. This difference was owing to patient selection and survival of  those who had adjunctive nephrectomy was no greater than that of the study population as a whole. However, based on the factors that were associated with improved survival palliative nephrectomy may be beneficial when a limited number of metastases treatable by excision or radiation therapy are present, when effective systemic therapy exists or when the primary tumor produces severe symptoms.
The tumorigenicity of dexamethasone-treated tissue-cultured mammary tumor cells was compared to that of untreated mammary tumor cells. The dexamethasone-induced cells progressed faster in normal syngeneic animals than did untreated mammary tumor cells. The fact that the growth rate differential was also observed in athymic mice suggests that T-lymphocyte-mediated  immunity was not a factor in the accelerated progression in vivo of the tumor cells that had been cultured in the presence of dexamethasone.
We present a series of 63 patients suffering from urothelial carcinoma (53 of the bladder and 10 of the superior urinary tract) in different stages of development. We compare the serum alpha-2 globulin figures with the different parameters making up the TNM classification of the U.I.C.C (period 1974-1979), observing that there is a hyperalpha-2 globulinemia in 40% of the tumours in the superior urinary tract and that, on the other hand, the data obtained for the bladder carcinomas are not conclusive.
The records of 144 patients with colorectal carcinoma treated with radiotherapy were reviewed. Ninety-two patients received treatment for palliative purposes only (bleeding, pain, mucus discharge, tenesmus, mass). Good palliation was achieved in the majority of patients with a dose on the range of 1200 to 1400 rets. Thirty-seven patients received radical doses of radiation for recurrent or inoperable cancer. Five out of 37 (14%) are alive without evidence of disease, 24 to 84 months following radiotherapy. Fifteen patients received pre- or postoperative radiotherapy as an adjuvant to surgery. Six out of the 15 (40%) are alive without evidence of disease.
A human lung tumor-associated antigen was purified from a saline extract of a lung adenocarcinoma. The antigen was demonstrated in extracts of lung adenocarcinoma. The antigen was demonstrated in extracts of lung tumors with the use of an absorbed antiserum by double-diffusion immunoprecipitation. The antiserum did not react with extracts of normal lung or other normal tissues, and the antigen was immunologically distinct from other tumor-associated antigens. Purification was achieved by antibody affinity chromatography and preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis. Isolation procedures were monitored by immunoreactivity with absorbed monospecific antiserum. The antigen was labeled with 125I and judged homogeneous by 1) polyacrylamide gel elecrophoresis in detergent and nondetergent gels, 2) molecular sieve chromatography, 3) ion exchange chromatography, and 4) sucrose gradient sedimentation analysis. A molecular weight of 77,000 was calculated from the s20.w value of 4.24S and from the D20.w value of 5.0X10(-7) cm2/sec. Sodium dodecyl sulfate gel electrophoresis indicated a subunit molecular weight of 42,000. The Stokes radius of the antigen was 40 A and the frictional ratio was   142, indicating a nonspherical molecule. The purified radioiodinated antigen could be quantitatively precipitated with specific antiserum.
In 24 patients with malignant kidney tumours percutaneous embolizations of the arteria renalis were performed in about 1 year. The material for embolization was gelatine-sponge-particles. The embolization was done pre-operatively, usually in connection with the arteriographic examination of kidney tumours (hypernephroid carcinoma). In 2 patients without operation it was done as a palliative measure. Our favourable results to improve the operability of tumours agree with reports in the literature. According to our opinion the pre-operative embolization of the arteria renalis with kidney tumours offers the possibility of a blood-sparing operation and a reduction of tumour-cell outwashings.
In the period 1965 to 1976 inclusive, 55 patients suffering from duodenopancreatic adenocarcinoma were surgically treated at the Free University Hospital. Twenty of these patients underwent a 'curative' Whipple pancreaticoduodenectomy for a resectable tumor. The difference in survival time makes a differentiation important between carcinomas occurring in the head of the pancreas and those of the peri-ampullary region. In our series, 11 of the former were found and 9 of the latter group. Of each group one patient died within 30 days of the operation. The average survival time of 9 patients, operated on for a tumor in the head of the pancreas, was 10.2 months, with a range from 2 to 23 months. One patient is still alive 23 months after the operation. The average survival time of 5 patients with a periampullary tumor was 22 months with a range from 6 to 52 months. Three patients are still alive, one more than 12 years and 2 more than 19 months after operation. Considering the bad results, and the fact that 30 percent of pancreatic carcinomas are multifocal, it would seem that the classical Whipple operation is a thing of the past. One can then make a plea for total pancreaticoduodenectomy or even for a regional pancreatectomy. Thirty-five patients underwent a palliative procedure, consisting of a biliary bypass combined in a number of cases with a gastroenterostomy. Five patients died within 30 days of the operation. The average survival time for the remaining patients was 9.5 months with a range of   15 to 30 months.
Two cases showing many of the visceral features of exstrophy of the cloaca are described. In addition, there were the typical pelvic skeletal deformity and lumbosacral spina bifida but the abdominal wall was intact, although thin and weak. The embryogenesis is discussed. It is considered that the condition resulted from the breakdown of an infra-umbilical membrane at the 5 mm. stage. Later, mesodermal infiltration led to secondary closure of the membrane but visceral development was halted.
A case of prune belly syndrome that was managed at birth with cutaneous ureterostomies and later reconstructed with a pyeloileovesical diversion (reversed 7) is presented. This constitutes the first report of such treatment in this anomaly. The indications, operative procedure and results after long-term followup are discussed.
The genetic, clinical, and necropsy findings of 2 brothers with the prune belly anomaly are presented and the literature reviewed. The combined data emphasise the clinical and genetic heterogeneity of the disorder and show that in at least some instances a heritable component may be the primary insult. The most likely heritable explanation involves a two-step autosomal dominant mutation with sex-limited expression that partially mimics X-linkage.
Three cases of rectus sheath haematoma are presented in which the diagnosis was confirmed by the use of ultrasound. The aetiology and diagnosis of the disease are discussed and the use of ultrasonography in a disease with a previously low preoperative diagnostic rate is emphasized.
A gram-positive, nonsporing coiled rod was visible on Gram stain and isolated in pure culture from 20 ml of pus. This organism differs from previously described species in that it produces only acetic acid from glucose metabolism, hydrolyzes esculin, and has less fermentative activity in carbohydrates.
Two patients who developed rectus sheath hematoma while on anticoagulants are presented. Ultrasound was the definitive method of establishing the diagnosis.
A multi-center study. The specific properties of Stomahesive tested in 116 stomal and 20 fistulous patients render it really useful in stomatherapy where it increases the comfort of the patients:  it offers an excellent peristomal skin protection whatever the nature of the stoma or origin of the fistula; 2. it promotes rapid healing of skin lesions, even in ileostomy, transverse colostomy, ureterostomy and fistula patients; 3. it ensures an effective degree of impermeability; 4. it provides a large base for adhesion of the collecting bag; 5. it can be kept on for about 6 days in most cases; 6. The local tolerance is excellent (Acta chir. belg, 1977, 76, 533-537).
This experimental work is a comparative trial in the rat of 6 inert prostheses (3 permeable and 3 non-permeable) that are regularly used in man for the repair of large abdominal wall defects. This is performed in both aseptic and septic conditions. Serial macroscopic and bacteriological observations were done. Quantitative histological criteria were defined to characterize the resistance and biological tolerance to the material. This shows that:  the width of the cellular reaction, the number of giant, inflammatory, fibroblastic cells confirms the superiority of meshes whatever the implantation conditions; 2. the proportion of fibroblasts to inflammatory cells is a histological expression of the solidity of the repair and of the biological tolerance to the material (Acta chir. belg, 1977, 76, 575-582).
Silicone casting of abdominal wall defects around enteric fistulas in six patients and problem stomas in three patients proved to be an effective means of controlling the output of the fistulas, reducing wound care time, and reducing or eliminating parenteral nutrition needs. Outpatient management was possible in seven of the nine patients. It is observed that the wounds healed rapidly with this method of fistula control. Epithelialization occurred more rapidly than expected. This method of management may tend to make the fistulas remain open longer than by other means of care, but the significant increase in patient comfort, the financial savings, and the relative safety warrant continued utilization and observation of this method of management.
A retrospective analysis of 242 consecutive diagnostic abdominal paracenteses in patients with liver disease disclosed seven major complications, including serious hemorrhage (four), perforation of bowel with generalized peritonitis (one), perforation of bowel with abdominal wall abscess (one), and a catheter fragment left in the abdominal wall or cavity (one). The results of this study emphasize the potential dangers of this procedure in these patients and raise the possibility that complications may be more common than previously thought.
The distribution of blood groups of the ABO system is different in the rhesus-positive and rhesus-negative subpopulations. An increasing frequency of the phenotype A2 in the rhesus-negative subpopulation is observed. The calculation of the gene frequency reveals a deficiency of genes A1 and O, and the increasing frequency of genes A2 and B in the rhesus-negative part of the population. On the whole for the inhabitants of Minsk the ratio of the phenotypes A2/A1 differs significantly from the corresponding index for the republic as a whole, which is the evidence of a significant migration of the population in the capital of Byelorussia. The observed correlative dependences in the distribution of the genes of ABO system and of the rhesus system permit to recommend the accomplishment of a scientific search between the hereditary pathology and the susceptibility to different diseases and blood groups taking into consideration the rhesus appurtenance of the populations studied.
Tests for the presence of Gm(1) substance were made on a total of 104 human teeth. In about 90 percent of the cases examined, it was possible to observe agreement between the serum and the Gm(1) substance. Lack of eluted dental material and a high degree of affection with caries were found to have adverse effects upon Gm(1) typification. Detection of the Gm(1) substance is another important characteristic in forensic identification.
No statistically significant deviations in phenotype frequencies of the 25 HL-A antigens or the ABO antigens were seen when 111 Caucasian patients with trophoblastic disease were compared with 1,259 healthy Caucasian controls. However, an increasein the incidence of HL-A11 was found in 39 patients who currently had the disease, but not in 72 who had recovered from the disease. Further, an increase in the frequency of W18 was observed among 18 patients who currently had 'invasive' disease (choriocarcinoma or invasive mole), but not in 44 who had recovered from such disease. If valid for larger patient population, these increases may suggest association of HL-A11 and W18 with the 'morbidity' of the trophoblastic disease. No increase in histocompatibility was seen in 45 patient-couples over 67 control-couples in terms of decrease in the number of male spouse's HL-A incompatibilities, and no significant difference was seen in the distribution of pregnancies in the two groups. No significant difference was observed in the incidence of different male-female combinations of ABO blood groups between 95 patient-couples and an equal number of control-couples. Lymphocytotoxic antibodies were found in 64 patients (158 sera) or 36% of the 178 patients (413 sera) examined. HL-A specific antibodies were found in 30 or 17% patients (39 sera). Of these 30, 24 patients had molar pregnancies and six had choriocarcinoma. Whether these antibodies have a role in the destruction of neoplastic tissue remains to be determined.
Thirty-five informative families were scored for linkage between the ABO and AK loci. The recombination fractions were estimated separately in females and males and were compared with values reported in the literature. A   133:1 ratio for the female:male recombination fraction was obtained by combining all sources, but the difference between the recombination fractions was not significantly different from zero. The present data, combined with those reported earlier, show that the most likely recombination fraction is about 14%.
In man-Chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids the segregation patterns of the loci for 25 human enzyme markers and human chromosomes were studied. The results provide evidence for the localization of the gene for adenylate kinase-1 (AK1) on chromosome 9. Since the loci for the ABO blood group (ABO), nail-patella syndrome (Np), and AK1 are known to be linked in man, the ABO:Np:AK1 linkage group may be assigned to chromosome 9.
Quantitative red cell adenylate kinase (AK-1) assay has been used in 8 patients with partial duplication or deletion of chromosome 9 in an attempt to find the precise intrachromosomal location of the structural gene locus. All regions of chromosome 9 are represented in abnormal dosage in at least one patient. A 43% increase in AK-1 activity was found to be associated with duplication of the terminal band of the long arm of chromosome 9. Duplication of all other parts of chromosome 9 were associated with normal enzyme activity. These findings not only confirm the assignment of the AK-1 locus to chromosome 9 made previously in somatic cell hybrids, but suggest a more precise assignment to region 9q33 leads to qter. This places the ABO:Np-1:AK-1 linkage group at the distal end of the long arm of chromosome 9.
New complex glycolipids have been extracted from hog gastric mucosa with the mixture of 0.4 M sodium acetate in methanol/chloroform/water. Three A-active fucolipids having branched carbohydrate chains have been purified from this extract. The postulated structures of these glycolipids are based on the results of partial acid hydrolysis, oxidation with periodate and chromium trioxide, and permethylation studies.
The agglutination percentages given by various erythrocytes with reference sera have been compared in blood samples from Kulamwos living in the Ivory Coast and of blood donors of the regional transfusion centre of Toulouse. The study of O, A, B and AB phenotypes shows:  in O Kulamwos a higher agglutination percentage with anti-H than in Toulousains; 2. in B Kulamwos a higher agglutination percentage with anti-B than in Toulousains; 3. in A Kulamwos a very marked frequency of A intermediate which can be classified in different categories due to the variability of their agglutination percentage with anti-A1 and anti-H sera.
We have failed to measure the recombination fraction between 9qh and the ABO:AK1 linkage group. Since the total male map distance along chromosome 9 is likely to be at least 120 cM, calculated from male chiasmata counts (Hultn, 1974) they may well not be within measurable distance of each other. ACONs does not lie between ABO and AK1, but there is so little information on this marker from family studies that it could lie almost anywhere else on chromosome 9 and might be within measurable distance of 9qh. The map of chromosome 9 based on studies on families with normal karyotypes is summarized in Fig.  We hope to improve this map in a subsequent paper based on observations on families with abnormal karyotypes.
Some families with abnormalities of chromosome 9 have been combined with others from the literature to show that AK1 and ABO must lie near the end of that chromosome. Current evidence suggests that both lie in band 9q34. MNSs, GPT and Gc can be excluded from chromosome 9.
In male albino rats the electrolytic lesions of the dorsal and median raphe nuclei of the mesencephalon diminished apomorphine-induced aggressiveness (number of attacks, aggressive posture latencies) but didn't influence significantly the intensity of the stereotypy. Both the blockator of tryptophane hydroxylase parachlorophenylamine (PCPA) and 1-tryptophane did not exert any influence on behavioral effects of apomorphine. The raphe-lesion as well as PCPA decreased the level of serotonin and 5-hydroxyindoleacetic acid in the rat forebrain. PCPA decreased in raphe-lesioned rats the dopamine level too. M-cholinoblocking agent atrophine enhanced apomorphine-induced aggressiveness and stereotypy. The blockator of cholinesterase physostigmine had opposite effects. The results suggest that apomorphine induced aggressiveness depends on serotoninergic and cholinergic activity in the brain and there exists a functional link between these neuromediator systems in the CNS.
The authors have compared the content of acetylcholine (ACh) of the two ciliary bodies (150 microgram of tissue) after the instillation of a stimulating dose of a 1% aqueous solution of physostigmine (10 applications of three drops at intervals of three minutes) into the conjunctival fornix of one eye. Kymographic measurements on guinea-pig ileum demonstrated an average elevation of the ACh content in the instilled ciliary bodies (0.48 microgram) against the controls (0.33 micron). The eyes were enucleated one hour after the last application.
The measurement of the acetylcholine (ACh) content of 12 choroids influenced by a 1% solution of physostigmine salicylate (10 applications of three drops at three minute intervals) into the conjunctival fornix of one eye demonstrated elevated average values for ACh content (0.87 microgram) compared with those for the control eye (0.75 microgram). The eyes were enucleated one hour after the last application.
The hypotheses of relative cholinergic underactivity in Huntington's disease, tardive dyskinesia, mania, and schizophrenia were pharmacologically investigated, using physostigmine and choline chloride. Intravenous physostigmine improved the involuntary movements of all of four patients with tardive dyskinesia and three of six patients with Huntington's disease. Physostigmine infusion also decreased manic symptoms in six of nine patients with mania, but had no beneficial effects in three patients with schizophrenia. Precursorloading with choline chloride may increase brain acetylcholine levels and central cholinergic activity. In patients with movement disorders a transient improvement during physostigmine infusion predicted a positive response to a trial of oral choline chloride. One manic patient may have been improved by choline chloride, however choline chloride did not improve symptoms in four of six schizophrenix patients. Chronic treatment with oral choline chloride increases plasma levels of choline during administration and for approximately 48 hr after discontinuation of treatment. A single 5-g dose of choline chloride also transiently raises plasma choline levels. These results with physostigmine support the hypotheses of cholinergic underactivity in Huntington's disease, tardive dyskinesia, and mania. Agents which might chronically increase cholinergic activity such as choline chloride should be further tested in these disorders.
In experiments in vitro at 37 and 17 degrees C, studies have been made of the effect of ACh upon the activity of Mg- and Na,K-ATPase of brain synaptosomes of the ground squirrel in summer animals and during winter hibernation. ACh (6 mM) decreases the activity of ATPases by 23-33% at 37 degrees C. During winter hibernation, the inhibitory effect of ACh is increased resulting in lower values of residual ATPase activity after the effect of ACh as compared with those obtained in summer period.
Kymographic measurements of acetylcholine (ACh) in bovine retinal tissue carried out on guinea-pig ileum do not indicate a significant elevated concentration of ACh in the eye instilled with physostingmine salicylate (1% aqueous solution, 10 applications of three drops at intervals of 3 minutes). The eyes were enucleated one hour after the last application.
Feeding choline, a precursor of the neurotransmitter acetylcholine, has been shown experimentally to increase brain acetylcholine release and enhance cholinergic function A subsequent trial of oral choline ameliorated symptoms in patients with tardive dyskinesia, which has been linked to cholinergic dysfunction. The findings suggest a role for dietary precursors in treating diseases associated with neurotransmitter abnormality.
Acetylcholine (Ach) is more efficient on the red fish heart at 14 degrees C than at 5 degrees C or 8 degrees C. It does not probably exist a cholinesterasic system and high concentrations of Ach are to be used to obtain significant variations of the heart frequency. Ach does not appear as a physiological mediator and temperature seems to be an essential factor in heart regulation and modulation of the pharmacological effects of eventual mediators. A thermal adaptation exists but the fast increase of the temperature, in the presence of Ach, results in heart blocage, whose contractions reappear spontanously during cooling. This is at the present time no valuable hypothesis could be made to explain this phenomenon.
We have registered the contractions of the frog's abdominal muscle in Ringer's solution. The contractions were produced either by acetylcholin or by succinyldicholin. The graphics showed that the succinyldicholin contractions were much slower than the acetylcholin ones. The tracings were not equalized by a preliminary addition of eserin. We conclude that acetylcholine excites the fast fibers and that succinyldicholin excites the slow fibers of the muscle.
Effect of electrode thickness and position in cortex. Blood flow distribution in the renal cortex was investigated in control and during i.a. infusion of dopamine (DA) and acetylcholine (Ach) in dogs. Local blood flow in outer cortex (OCF) and in inner cortex (ICF) was measured by platinum electrodes detecting hydrogen washout rate in tissue. Mean cortical blood flow measured by hydrogen washout rate in the renal vein (CFV) was compared with renal arterial blood flow (RAF) measured by electromagnetic flowmeter. With electrodes of 0.05-0.2 mm diameter control blood flow rates in outer and inner cortex were 4.57 +/- (S.D.)   173 ml/min.g, and 4.35 +/- 0.57 ml/min.g, which is higher than found using 0.2-0.5 mm electrodes in this and previous studies. OCF and ICF increased proportionally during intraarterial infusion of DA or Ach. The increase in local blood flow per unit volume was about 20% less than the increase in RAF, most likely due to an increase in renal volume and a reduced vasodilatory response in the surrounding of some electrodes. CFV rose almost to the same degree as RAF, showing a diffusion equilibrium for hydrogen gas even at maximal flow rate. During vasoconstriction induced by high doses of DA, OCF and ICF fell proportionately. Thus, equal vascular responses in outer and inner cortex were observed during both vasodilator and vasoconstrictor infusion. This indicates that changes in sodium excretion with renal blood flow may not be associated with a redistribution of cortical peritubular blood flow.
A method is described for the simultaneous demonstration of 6-3H thymidine incorporation and acid phosphatase activity in cryostae sections of mouse thymus. The method enables a comparison of mitosis and acid hydrolase activity to be made in the same tissue section. In 8-week-old mice acid phosphatase positive cells reprsent   123 +/- 0.06% of the total population and 8.4 +/- 0.27% of the cells incorporate tritiated thymidine. Acid phosphatase activity can be used to estimate cell autolysis and death. The implication of the method in relation to tissue dynamics is discussed.
In summing up, we find that only serum acid phosphatase activity rose immediately, and beta-galactosidase activity 6 hours, after whole body irradiation, in each case after an exposure dose of 800 R. At the other intervals, the three enzyme activities studied either remained unchanged or were statistically significantly lowered. The most pronounced decrease was found in serum beta-galactosidase and serum beta-glucuronidase activity on the 3rd, 5th and 7th day after exposure.
Monkey pulps were homogenized in a Triton tris solution. After three centrifugation steps (800, 20000, and 105000 g) the supernatant was applied on acryl amide columns at pH 7.5 in a tris-diethyl barbituric acid buffer. Electrophoresis was performed at a constant current of 2.5 mA per gel column at 18--20 degrees C. Incubations for alkaline phosphatase (E.C. 313.1) were carried out at pH 8.3 using naphthol-AS-MX-phosphate as substrate and Fast Red Violet LB salt as coupler. Incubations for acid phosphatase (E.C. 313.2) were undertaken at pH 5.0 using alpha-naphtyl phosphate as substrate and hexazotized pararosanilin as coupling agent. After the incubations for alkaline phosphatase as well as acid phosphatase two bands showing enzyme activity were demonstrated. By means of treatment with heat (56 degrees C) prior to incubation or addition of vanadate or pyrophosphate to the incubation medium it was shown that the main part of the fast moving alkaline phosphatase band was sensitive to these procedures. The alkaline phosphatase of the slow moving band appeared to be resistant to heat or the addition of inhibitors.
The activities of several lysosomal hydrolases including beta-glucuronidase, acid phosphatase and hexosaminidase were compared in serum from 19 well-nourished subjects and 13 children (age 5--24 months) who were suffering from marasmus. The marasmic children exhibited growth retardation and muscle wastage but had normal serum protein values and absence of psychomotor retardation or oedema. Significant changes were observed in serum beta-glucuronidase and acid phosphatase activities. Compared to the control group, serum beta-glucuronidase (determined at pH 4.5 using the fluorogenic substrate, 4-methylumbelliferyl-beta-D-glucuronide) was 2.3-fold higher (p less than 0.001) in the marasmic children. In contrast, serum acid phosphatase values were approximately 50% lower (p less than 0.01) in the marasmic population. Serum hexosaminidase values in the two groups under study were not significantly different. Determination of the beta-glucuronidase to acid phosphatase ratio permitted effective discrimination (p less than 0.001) of serum from normal and protein-calorie malnourished children. The finding that the elevated value of the beta-glucuronidase : acid phosphatase ratio (0.64--  137) decreased to within the normal range of values (0.10--0.43) after nutritional rehabilitation of several marasmic cases indicates that the determination of serum lysosomal hydrolases using fluorogenic substrates might provide a rapid and sensitive quantitative method for objectively evaluating the status of protein-calorie malnourished children and their responsiveness to nutritional therapy.
The normal isoenzymatic pattern of leucocytic acid-phosphatase based on the study of 150 haematologically normal individuals is reported. The different pathologic patterns of the leucocytic acid-phosphatase isoenzymes occurring in non-lymphoblastic acute leukaemias are presented and correlated with the subdivisions of acute leukaemias established by the French-American-British (FAB) Co-operative Group. This study is considered to be especially useful in identifying pure acute monocytic leukaemias corresponding to subtype M5 of the FAB as well as acute erythraemias with unusual cytological and cytochemical features.
The biochemical and immunologic characterization of acid phosphatase in serum and bone marrow was described as well as the clinical application of the immunodiffusion assay for prostatic acid phosphatase.
It was found that neutrophils in untreated uraemic patients as well as in subjects on regular dialysis treatment displayed higher activity of acid phosphatase, alkaline phosphatase and peroxidase. Spontaneous reduction of nitro blue tetrazolium (NBT) by granulocytes was also higher in both groups in comparison to controls. Stimulation with latex particles gave similar results of NBT reduction in investigated patients and controls. Lymphocytes also showed an increase in acid phosphatase activity if compared to healthy persons. It seems possible that granulocytes which take part in unspecific defense mechanisms are more active in uraemic patients due perhaps to subclinical infections.
In this paper, we formulate the hypothesis that in the process of target cell lysis a lysosomal enzyme regurgitation, performed by killer cells at the level of the target effector junction, accounts for the target lesion which precedes the lysis (lethal hit). This process of exocytosis, similar to the one described previously in polymorphonuclear neutrophils is supported by cytological studies performed directly on identified killers isolated by micromanipulation. Light and electron microscopy observations confirm a previous report which describes the effector cells rich in lysosomal bodies. In addition, when a killer cell is associated with a target cell to form a conjugate, lysosomes are concentrated near the cell junction and, after incubation at 37 degrees C, acid phosphatases may be detected at the junction. Lysosomal enzyme exocytosis explains why target lysis needs an effector target binding to occur and also the other conditions required for any exocytosis process such as Ca++ in the medium, integrity of the microtubular apparatus, a low level of cyclic AMP and energy dependancy.
A series of transcervical uterine biopsy specimens were obtained at various stages of the menstrual cycle from a colony of 11 normally cycling female baboons, Papio anubis and Papio cynocephalus. Morphologically, baboon endometrium appeared to be similar to human endometrium. Alkaline phosphatase activity was maximal throughout the preovulatory phase and during the late postovulatory period. During the preovulatory phase acid phosphatase was not demonstrable but increased after ovulation to reach maximal activity prior to menstruation. While differences exist between human and baboon endometria, the overall morphologic and histochemical changes are similar. In addition, the baboon's endometrium is readily accessible by transcervical uterine biopsy, thus making these animals valuable primate models for study of human reproductive problems.
The in vitro effects of vitamin D3 metabolites, parathyroid extract (PTE), purified parathyroid hormone (bPTH), vitamin A, and heparin on acid and alkaline phosphatases in rat or mouse calvaria in culture were investigated. Results show that: (a) when compared to values found in half calvaria incubated for 24 h in control medium, the bone acid and alkaline phosphatase content is significantly higher in paired halves incubated with PTE (L USP/ml), bPTH (4 x 10(-8)M), heparin (5 USP/ml), vitamin A (23 USP/ml), 25-(OH)D3 (2.5 x 10(-11) to 2.5 x 10(-8)M), 24,25-(OH)2D3, and 1,25-(OH)2D3 (2.5 x 10(-12) to 2.5 x 10(-7M); (b) the presence of 24,25-(OH)2D3 at low concentrations in the incubation medium decreases significantly the PTE, bPTH, vitamin A, or heparin induced stimulation of the phosphatase activities. This interaction is also observed when measuring beta glucuronidase and glucose-6-phosphatase activities and 45Ca release from previously labeled mouse calvaria; (c) a similar activity could not be found with 1,25-(OH)2D3 suggesting that 24,25-(OH)2D3 may have a specific role in bone metabolism.
The indices of acid-alkaline blood balance was studied in the dynamics of dosed hungering in 29 patients with sluggish schizophrenia and 16 patients with residual signs oforganic lesions of the CNS. There were differences in the pH index, standard and buffer bicarbonates alkaline deficiency which indicated to different degrees of acidosis in this group of patients. Significant differences in the acid-alkaline indices during hunger were seen in the different groups of patients depending upon the existence or absence of hypothalamic disorders (without consideration of their nosological affinity). The existence of hypothalamic disorders requires a more careful consideration when prescribing hunger therapy (the first session should not exceed 10-14 days).
The cardiovascular, blood gas, acid-base and metabolic changes occurring during operative stress were studied in 10 elderly, metabolically healthy patients, suffering from idiopathic trigeminal neuralgia, who underwent electrocoagulation of the gasserian ganglion under neuroleptanalgesia. In a group of 12 patients undergoing the same operative procedure and anesthesthetic management, we investigated the effects of administration of a beta blocking agent on these parameters. Intraoperative rises of blood pressure and tachycardia were prevented by intravenous administration of 0.4 mg Pindolol (Visken), whereas increases in the blood glucose levels at the end of the operation were the same. The increase of glycerol, free fatty acids and ketone bodies was markedly reduced after pretreatment with the beta blocker compared with the controlgroup. In the patients without beta blocker treatment pH and standard bicarbonate at the end of the operation were lower as the result of the stimulation of ketogenesis.
Reported in this paper are changes in the acid-base state and lactic concentration of blood and muscle samples taken from 28 pigs prior to, during, and after high-intensity exhausting stress applied at ambient temperatures between 17 degrees C and 21 degrees C and at 35 degrees C. Close correlations were found to exist between acid-base states, on the one hand, and lactic acid concentrations, on the other. The lactic acid concentrations reached in blood plasma were between 30 and 40 mHol/1, pH being below 7.0 and BE values being smaller than -22 mHol/ Close relationships were established between the lactic acid concentration of venous blood plasma, blood pH, and the pH of the musculus longissimus dorsi. Respiratory compensation was of minor importance with ambient temperatures between 17 degrees C and 21 degrees C, but it was of considerable effectiveness at 35 degrees C.
A rapid anaysis of parameters of the acid-base equilibrium and blood gases during open heart surgery and emergency therapy is absolutely necessary. Computing of the several parameters of the acid-base status by slide rules or nomograms is time consuming and can be shortened by computer applications. The central blood gas laboratory consists of a blood gas analyzer for PO2, PCO2 and pH, an electronic desktop calculator, a four color X-Y-plotter and two data lines to the cardiac surgery unit and to the intensive care unit. The time needed for computing and feedback of the parameters could be decreased to one quarter. In addition to numerical data printout, a graphical representation of the several parameters is possible on a X-Y-plotter and includes the Rahn-Fenn-O2-CO2-Diagram with venous admixture, ventilation perfusion ratio, alveolar dead space ventilation and the standard and actual oxygen dissociation curve as well as the pH/HCO3- Acid-Base nomogram. Furthermore, a computer diagnosis of the actual disturbances can be plotted.
Ion-sensitive microelectrodes were used to record intracellular pH, Na+ and Cl- in snail neurones. NaCl or HCl was injected iontophoretically to compare the Na pump with the pHi regulating system. The Na pump was inhibited by ouabain, carbonyl cyanide m-chlorophenyl hydrazone and increasing the membrane potential, whereas the pHi regulating system was relatively unaffected. Activation of the Na pump had no effect on pHi whereas activation of the pHi recovery process increased internal Na+. Activation of the pHi recovery process by CO2 application increased internal Na+ and also decreased internal Cl-. The results show that there is no direct connexion between the Na pump and the pHi recovery process, and that the pHi recovery process is electroneutral, and appears not to require metabolic energy. The results also confirm that the pHi recovery process involves the influx of Na+ ions and the efflux of Cl- ions.
When temperature changes are superimposed on changes in the control variables of acid-base state (PCO2, strong ion difference), the understanding of acid-base changes becomes difficult. A solution has recently been proposed for blood (Malan, 1977); it was based on the assumption that closed system conditions correspond to a minimal change in the overall acid-base state when temperature varies. The feasibility of extending these concepts to muscle intracellular acid-base vs temperature relationships is evaluated on the basis of a model study; the errors made by replacing closed conditions (which require knowledge of chemical composition) by more convenient approximations are estimated. A representation of both extracellular and intracellular acid-base data on a temperature-corrected bicarbonate-pH diagram is derived. It allows the interpretation of variable-temperature intracellular acid-base changes in terms of changes in control variables, 'respiratory (PCO2) or 'metabolic' (strong ion difference).
The nature of pH changes with temperature is similar in both air-breathing and water-breathing poikilotherms having a pH-temperature slope of -0.015 to 0.020 U/degrees C. The means by which this is accomplished are quite different in the two groups. The air-breather behaves in vivo as a Rosenthal, or constant CO2 content system, with PaCO2 increasing at higher temperatures. The increase in PaCO2 is brought about by a reduction in the ration VE/MCO2. The water-breather, on the other hand, does not change VG/MO2, so as not to sacrifice oxygen delivery, and consequently does not control PaCO2 by ventilation and perhaps does not control it at all. Instead, the ratio of CT/SCO2 is controlled by altering blood bicarbonate concentration. Since alteraction of Na+ and Cl- uptake rates affects blood pH, and alterations of blood pH affect uptake of Na+ and Cl- at the gills, the carrier-mediated Na+/H+(NH4+) and Cl-/HCO3-(OH-) mechanisms now known to occur in gills appear to be the primary pH-regulating mechanism in water-breathers. Our knowledge of the role of gut and kidney in pH regulation is incomplete, but on the basis of preliminary information the kidney does not appear to respond to acid challenge.
Against the background of classical observations made 50 years ago, a brief review is offered of some of the work performed in the author's laboratory on the behavior of weak acids and bases towards living animal cells. The significance of membrane permeability of the charged partner of these electrolytes is pointed out, and the existence of an active process of H+ extrusion (or its equivalent) in response to acid loading is demonstrated. The effect of intracellular inhomogeneity on weak acid and base transmembrane distribution is examined. The significance of these variables for weak acid- or base-derived intracellular pH is discussed.
Experiments are reviewed in which intracellular pH (pHi), during exposure of a cell to CO2- or NH3-containing solutions, not only undergoes an acidification of alkalinization, respectively, but tends to return toward its original value and, upon removal of the test solution, rebounds to a value more alkaline or acid, respectively, than the initial one. A simple physiochemical model is discussed which interprets these observations both qualitatively and quantitatively. In the case of NH3-induced transients, only passive movements seem to take place; in the CO2-induced transients one must postulate an active 'proton pump'. Experimentally verifiable predictions can be made from these models. It is suggested that many physiological effects follow exposure to CO2 or NH3 may be subject to similar transients and rebounds.
In the quantification of buffering the distinct roles of bicarbonate and of other buffers must be taken into account. The determination of the total non-bicarbonate buffer value, betaa, in intact tissues is complicated by active pH regulation and by heterogeneity of cytoplasm with respect to betaa, while heterogeneity with respect to pH in vivo could cause errors in estimates made with homogenates. Available estimates of betaa are discussed, as are the individual contributions of proteins, dipeptides and phosphates. A high betaa is appropriate in cells which sometimes have high rates of glycolysis, or which buffer extracellular fluid, but non-protein buffer concentrations can be well below the limits imposed by osmolarity, perhaps because buffering can upset ionic gradients.
A specific and quantitative immunological method for determination of human erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase isoenzyme B has been used to ascertain the contents of this enzyme in the erythrocytes of healthy persons and of subjects with chronic metabolic and respiratory acidosis. The investigations have shown significant increase of carbonic anhydrase type B in the erythrocytes of patients suffering from renal failure with chronic acidosis, and in patients with chronic obstructive lung disease and chronic respiratory acidosis. The erythrocytes of acidotic uremic patients have a significantly higher content of erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase isoenzyme B than do the erythrocytes of uremic subjects without chronic acidosis. In chronic obstructive lung disease, the content of this enzyme in erythrocytes was significantly higher in the hypercapnic patients than in the normocapnic ones. In renal failure, significant correlation was found between carbonic anhydrase isoenzyme B and standard bicarbonate. In chronic obstructive lung disease no significant correlation was found between carbonic anhydrase and pCO2.
Severe ketoacidosis sometimes develops in chronic alcoholics after increased alcohol intake associated with dietary restriction. This particular case was unusual from two standpoints: a considerable, prolonged and unexplained increase in serum free fatty acid, and discordance between the degree of ketonaemia and an abundant liver glycogen load.
It is accepted that in hypercapnia the rise in cerebrospinal fluid bicarbonate concentration (CSF [HCO3-]) occurs because of local HCO3--generating mechanisms, dependent on carbonic anhydrase, as well as on diffusion of HCO3- from plasma. To investigate further the regulation of CSF [HCO3-], CSF HCO3- formation was studied under conditions of pure isocapnic CSF "metabolic" acidosis. In anesthetized normocapnic dogs CSF [HCO3-] was lowered to approximately 15 mmol/l by perfusing the brain ventricles with a low HCO3- solution for 45 min. In dogs with normal plasma [HCO3-], CSF [HCO3-] rose by approximately 7 mmol/l in 2 h after the end of the perfusion. Lowering plasma [HCO3-] to 10 mmol/l by infusing HCl, limited the CSF [HCO3-] rise to 2 mmol/l, indicating the importance of plasma HCO3- for the restoration of CSF [HCO3-]. The small and persistent rise of CSF [HCO3-] at low plasma [HCO3-] occurred against a concentration gradient with blood. Intraventricular injection of acetazolamide had no further effect on this small rise. It is concluded that under the conditions of our experiments the CSF [HCO3-] rise is significantly dependent on plasma [HCO3-] and the caronic anhydrase-dependent HCO3- generation in the CNS is less important.
Vitamin D and mineral metabolism status was examined in five children maintained chronically on combined ketogenic diet-anticonvulsant drug therapy (KG), and the results compared to those obtained in 18 patients treated with anticonvulsant drugs alone (AD) and 15 normal controls. KG patients exhibited biochemical findings of vitamin D deficiency osteomalacia: decreased serum 25-hydroxyvitamin D (25OHD) and calcium concentrations, elevated serum alkaline phosphatase and parathyroid hormone concentrations, decreased urinary calcium and increased urinary hydroxyproline excretion, and decreased bone mass. Although the KG and AD groups demonstrated similar reductions in serum 25OHD concentration, the KG patients exhibited a significantly greater reduction in bone mass. In response to vitamin D supplementation (5000 IU/day), mean bone mass in the KG group increased by 8.1 +/- 0.9% (P less than 0.001) over a 12-month period. These results suggest that ketogenic diet and anticonvulsant drug therapy have additive deleterious effects on bone mass and that these effects are partially reversible by vitamin D treatment.
Multiple carboxylase defects and complementation studies with propionicacidemia in cultured fibroblasts. Fibroblast cultures from two individuals with biotin-responsive organicacidemia were found to have a pleiotropic deficiency of propionyl-CoA carboxylase, beta-methylcrotonyl-CoA carboxylase, and pyruvate carboxylase activities after growth in biotin limited culture medium, conditions which do not affect the carboxylase activities of normal cells. All three enzyme activities were restored to normal levels after transferring the mutant strains to biotin-rich medium. Both patients excreted abnormal levels of an array of metabolic intermediates, including beta-methylcrotonate, beta-hydroxyisovalerate, beta-hydroxypropionate, and lactate, which reflect metabolic blocks at all three carboxylase sites.14 mutants deficient in only propionyl-CoA carboxylase activity from patients with propionicacidemia and the two biotin-responsive strains were examined for complementation with seven previously mapped pcc mutants. No new pcc complementation groups were identified. Nine of the mutants were mapped to group pccA. The remaining 12 mutants mapped to pccBC or its B or C subgroups, confirming the complex nature of this group. The biotin-responsive mutants failed to complement each other but did complement mutants from all the pcc groups. Thus biotin-responsive organicacidemia is defined by a new complementation group, bio. The results obtained in this study suggest that the bio mutants have a defect of either biotin transport or a common holocarboxylase synthetase required for the biotin activation of all three mitochondrial carboxylases.
Two patients with methylmalonic acidaemia due to methylmalonyl-CoA mutase deficiency were studied for several years. Both exhibited at least two attacks of severe ketoacidosis, during which they excreted, in addition to methylmalonic acid, a number of abnormal compounds: 3-hydroxypropionic acid, 2-methyl-3-hydroxybutyric, 3-hydroxy-n-valeric acid, 3-oxo-n-valeric acid, 2-methyl-3-oxobutyric acid, citraconic acid and N-tiglyglycine. These compounds represent partly intermediary metabolites from the isoleucine degradation pathway and partly secondary metabolites of propionyl-CoA and tiglyl-CoA.
Studies on fibroblasts from patients with lactic acidosis of different causes showed secondary metabolic changes in pathways of glucose metabolism. These secondary changes may be important clues to the diagnosis of the many different types of hereditary lactic acidosis.
A case of alcoholic ketoacidosis in a 23-year-old chronic alcoholic, gravada V, para IV, is reported. Symptoms were constant, severe, nonradiating pain with crampy exacerbations, anorexia, nausea and vomiting. The patient had a tender and irritable full-term uterus. She was treated inhospital with vigorous fluid therapy and 5% dextrose in normal saline, sodium bicarbonate, glucose and insulin and showed improvement overnight. Alcoholic ketoacidosis has not been reported in pregnant women. Metabolic derangements combine to produce ketoacidosis more readily in the pregnant alcoholic. Differentiation of alcoholic ketoacidosis and diabetic ketoacidosis is important since treatment varies. For alcoholic ketoacidosis, treatment is vigorous rehydration with dextrose-saline while diabetic ketoacidosis usually requires multiple therapeutic modalities.
Diabetes, starvation, and after growth hormone administration. The study was designed to evaluate hepatic mitochondrial function during ketotic states. The ketogenic models studied were streptozotocin-induced diabetic ketoacidosis, 48 h of starvation, and after growth hormone administration. In the last-mentioned model we observed increased free fatty acids but not ketonemia. Oxidative phosphorylation was measured using the citric acid cycle substrates pyruvate and succinate, the amino acid glutamate, a ketone body beta-hydroxybutyrate, and a long-chain fatty acid palmitoyl-l-carnitine. State 3 (ADP stimulated) and state 4 (ADP limited) respiration, respiratory control ratio (state 3/state 4), and the ADP/O ratios were normal in the controls and the experimental groups. Uncoupled respiration produced by dinitrophenol with a variety of substrates was unchanged in the experimental groups compared to the controls. Fatty acid oxidation was studied in detail. The rate of utilization of palmitoyl-l-carnitine by controls or experimental groups did not depend on the product formed (citrate, acetoacetate). No significant changes were observed in the oxidation of palmitoyl-CoA (+ carnitine) or with an intermediate-chain fatty acid hexanoate. The specific activity of hepatic mitochondria carnitine palmitoyltransferase did not change in any of the three experimental groups. It is concluded that during diabetic ketoacidosis, starvation, and growth hormone administration, there is (a) no alteration in hepatic mitochondrial function; (b) no change in the intrinsic capacity of hepatic mitochondria to oxidize fatty acids; and (c) no change in the specific activity of mitochondrial carnitine palmitoyltransferase. The mechanism by which the body restrains flux through the mitochondrial oxidative machinery remains to be fully determined.
An increase in H+ ions concentration by infusion of hydrochloric acid produces a reduction in lactacidemia. This phenomenon is a result of the inhibitory effect of acidosis on phosphofructokinase producing a diminution of intracellular glycolysis.
Investigation of rare disorders may sometimes help in the understanding of common problems. We describe a patient with an unusual and previously unreported acne-free naevus occurring in an area severely affected by acne. Investigation revealed smaller sebaceous glands, a reduced sebum excretion rate, decreased number of Corynebacterium acnes in the pilosebaceous ducts and a reduced conversion of testosterone to 5 alphadihydrotestosterone in the areas which were free of acne compared with acne-bearing skin. The results of these investigations support some of the suggested mechanisms responsible for the development of acne.
175 women of reproductive age, with hirsutism of differing degrees and different pathogenetic causes (ovarian, adrenal, iatrogenic) or idiopathic, and acne were treated with two different combinations of Cyprotrone acetate and ethinyl estradiol (SH 8.1041 and SH B209AB). 90 patients were given SH 8.1041 and 10 were given SH B209AB. 75 received both preparations. The total number of treatment cycles was 1534. Clinical, hormonal and biochemical assessments were made before, during and after treatment. The degrees of hirsutism and acne, and of seborrhea and hair loss when present, were scored by means of a modified version of the Ferriman and Gallway criteria. SH 8.1041 brought about a significant improvement in the majority of the patients. SH B209AB was generally used as maintenance therapy for hirsutism and severe acne. It was the initial treatment of choice in patients with milder acne. Reduction of hirsutism was usually apparent after the fourth cycle of therapy and acne regressed after the first month. Both combinations were well-tolerated biochemically. In a few patients on SH 8.1042, slight and transient increases in BSP, SGOT, SGPT and bilirubin were observed, but cessation of treatment was not necessary. Some patients on SH 8.1041 complained of transient frigidity, mild depression, breast discomfort and nausea.
Forty-one chemical company workers had chloracne as a result of exposure to 3,4,3',4'-tetrachloroazoxybenzene (TCAB), an extraneous intermediate produced during the manufacture of a new herbicide. There was no laboratory evidence of significant hepatotoxicity or porphyria during the short time the herbicide was produced. An acnegenic when applied to the rabbit ear, TCAB is also a potent inducer of the microsomal enzyme aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase. Prevention of chlorance is a difficult industrial engineering task and treatment of the disease is even more perplexing.
The topical effect on acne of a benzoyl peroxide acetone gel was studied over an eight week period and simultaneously compared with the effect of a benzoyl peroxide lotion and a vitamin A acid cream. The three formulations produced a significant reduction in the number of comedones. The two benzoyl peroxide formulations substantially reduced the number of papules, but this effect was not observed to a significant degree with the vitamin A acid. Burning sensation following application, a common problem with the benzoyl peroxide alcohol gels, was not reported by patients using the benzoyl peroxide acetone gel.
A controlled multicenter trial against retinoic acid. In a double-blind controlled multicenter trial consisting of 257 patients with acne vulgaris an 8-week topical treatment with the retinoic acid derivative Ro 11-1430 (0.1% lotion) was compared with vitamin A acid (0.05% lotion) and the lotion alone (placebo). In reducing the number of comedones vitamin A acid was superior to Ro 11-1430, which was significantly better than placebo. The reduction in number of papules and pustules was not statistically significant on either treatment. Local side effects, ie erythema, desquamation, burning and pruritus occurred more frequently and were more severe on vitamin A acid than on Ro 11-1430 and placebo which did not differ. No correlation was found between incidence and severity of local reactions and therapeutic effect.
The introduction of topical antibiotics for acne vulgaris has ushered in a new era in the treatment of this troublesome disorder. Tetracycline, erythromycin, and clindamycin can now be prepared in lotion form in vehicles that are capable of carrying the antibiotic into the follicular canal, where the primary lesion of acne occurs. Topical antibiotics are practically as effective as oral antibiotics in treating acne and are particularly useful for mild papular acne of puberty and early adolescence and papular-pustular acne of adult women. Use of topical antibiotics avoids the possibility of the adverse effects of systemic therapy; the side effects from the formulations reported here are negligible. Above all, antibiotic lotions do not produce the dryness and scaling that occur with most other topical acne preparations.
A quantitative study was made of the microflora of 174 acne and 68 non-acne subjects. Two groups of organisms were investigated, the anaerobic diphtheroids and members of the Micrococcaceae. The results showed high numbers of both groups of bacteria in skin bearing blackheads, papules or pustules and in non-acne adolescent skin. There were significantly lower numbers of bacteria in the pilosebaceous ducts of normal looking skin in acne areas and in pre-adolescent skin when compared with non-acne adolescent skin. It is suggested that increased numbers of bacteria alone do not predispose to acne, but that their interaction with the skin, which is a function of the localized skin environment, may be important.
Sodium sulfacetamide, penetrating antibacterial, in combination with hydrocortisone and sulfur, has enjoyed twenty years of remarkable safety, with outstanding efficacy and patient acceptance, in the prescription treatment of pustular acne and severe, refractory seborrheic dermatitis. Recently, this combination has been reported to be highly effective concomitant therapy for perioral dermatitis. Almost paradoxically, it achieves these desired goals without the excessive erythema and discomforting irritation associated with retinoic acid and benzoyl peroxide.
Seven important therapeutic measures in managing acne are described, for the treatment of the 7 types of acne. These therapeutic measures are retinoic acid, benzoyl peroxide gel, topical antibiotics, oral antibiotics, intralesional corticosteroids, liquid nitrogen and oral corticosteroids.
The acne-scarred face presents a challenge to the reconstructive surgeon. Dermaplaning technic with the Castro-viejo Electrokeratome ("C-V Planner") results in precise leveling of the skin. Numerous deep pit scars are amenable to small excisions; extensive milk-cheek scarring is treatable by segmental excision and reconstruction. Both dermaplaning and scalpel surgery may be required to achieve a cosmetically satisfactory result in a face badly scarred by severe acne.
Myosin-like protein was obtained from E. coli by extraction with a sucrose solution and by precipitation with rabbit skeletal actin. The preparation of E. coli myosin-like protein looked very similar, in the sodium dodecyl sulfate-gel electrophoretic pattern, to that of rabbit skeletal myosin. The myosin-like protein was able to reversibly bind to rabbit actin. It had the activities of EDTA-, Ca-, and Mg-ATPases. The product in the EDTA-ATPase reaction catalyzed by the myosin-like protein was identified as ADP by ion exchange chromatography. The Mg-ATPase activity of E. coli myosin-like protein was activated by either rabbit actin or E. coli actin-like protein though the activation was much stronger by the latter. However, the myosin-like protein did not exhibit superprecipitation either with rabbit actin or with E. coli actin-like protein. Actin-like protein was also obtained from E. coli by essentially the same procedures as those described for preparation of rabbit skeletal actin. E. coli actin-like protein was capable of activating Mg-ATPase of rabbit myosin, and also of superprecipitation with rabbit myosin. Extraction from both the whole cells and the membrane fraction of E. coli strongly suggested that the myosin-like protein and the actin-like protein are both localized in the membrane fraction rather than in the cytoplasmic fraction.
Muscle actin has been found to polymerize reversibly upon addition of low concentrations of polyamines. This polymerization, studied by centrifugation, has shown a linear relationship between the actin polymerization yield and the chain length of the polyamine. Among the biological polyamines tested, spermidine and spermine are the most efficient. The polymerization of actin can also be induced by the corresponding mono or diguanidine derivatives of these polyamines but monoamines or amino acids are inactive at the same concentration. The transformation of actin from a globular to a fibrous from upon addition of spermidine is also demonstrated by the changes in the near-ultraviolet circular dichoroic spectrum of this protein. Moreover, the polyamine-induced F -actin exhibits the same properties as the salt-induced F -actin: it strongly activates the Mg2+ -ATPase of myosin, its specific viscosity is enhanced to the same extent and electron micrographs show homogeneous thin filaments.
F-actin monomer (F-monomer) is formed upon the addition of neutral salt to G-actin. Since F-monomer has a digestibility similar to that of F-actin and much lower than that of G-actin, it has been proposed that F-monomer has a conformation different from that of G-actin and similar to the conformation of the subunits in F-actin. To examine whether F-monomer will enhance the magnesium-activated myosin adenosine triphosphatase (Mg2+-ATPase) as much as F-actin, the ability of partially polymerized actin populations at equilibrium to activate the Mg2+-ATPase of heavy meromyosin was investigated. Correlations were made between ATPase activities and the polymerization state of actin as determined by measurements of viscosity and digestibility. No significant activation of the heavy meromyosin ATPase was observed under conditions where G-actin or mixtures of G-actin and F-monomer were present. As polymer formation occurred at higher actin concentrations, or with increased KCl concentrations, substantial activation characteristic of F-actin was observed. The data suggest that F-monomer may undergo a further conformational change as it forms nuclei or joins onto polymers. Alternatively, the site of actin which activates the myosin ATPase may involve the crevice between two adjacent actin subunits.
Addition of ATP, CaCl2, and KCl to supernatants prepared from mycelia of Snowflake (strain 507), a morphological mutant of Neurospora crassa, results in the formation of filaments 70 nm in diameter. The "decorated" appearance of these filaments after incubation with heavy meromyosin from rabbits suggests they are actin-like.
Interactions with muscle contractile and regulatory proteins. Actin and spectrin were isolated from washed red blood cell membranes. Spectrin bound and polymerized erythrocyte actin in the absence of potassium. Spectrin coated into polystyrene latex particles bound 8--9 mol of erythrocyte actin per mol of spectrin when actin was in its depolymerized state. Spectrin enhanced the interaction of erythrocyte actin with muscle myosin as manifested by changes in Mg2+-ATPase activity. A similar enhancement also was observed with muscle alpha-actinin while muscle tropomyosin abolished these effects. The data suggest that spectrin may play the role of polymerizing factor as well as the anchoring site for erythrocyte actin just as alpha-actinin is the anchoring site for actin filaments in muscle and other non-muscle cells.
Actin has been purified from amoebae of Dictyostelium discoideum by a procedure which is notable in that proteolysis has been diminished to undetectable levels and "selective" purification steps have been avoided. The overall yield of this procedure is 5- to 10- fold greater than that of a previous report (Spudich, J. A. (1974) J. Biol. Chem. 249, 6013-6020). The detailed biochemical and structural properties of this new preparation (preparation B) have been compared to those of Dictyostelium actin prepared by the previous procedure (preparation A) as well as to rabbit skeletal muscle actin. Preparation B actin is similar to muscle actin in its molecular weight, ability to activate myosin, filament structure, and polymerization properties. Preparation B actin has the same molecular weight and isoelectric point as preparation A actin, which is more acidic than that of skeletal muscle actin. However, preparation B actin and muscle actin form longer filaments than preparation A actin, as judged by viscometry and electron microscopy.
The effect of actin concentration on the myosin catalyzed exchange of phosphate oxygens with water accompanying ATP hydrolysis has been investigated. The extent of exchange was found to extrapolate to zero at infinite actin concentration at 23 and 0 degrees C for myosin subfragments S1(A1) and S1(A2). This result is consistent with actin associating directly with the product of the hydrolysis step and is not readily consistent with refractory state schemes in which the entire flow goes via a dissociating pathway. The possibility of a refractory state in the form of a phosphorylated intermediate or a bound metaphosphate state with hydrolysis occurring in the transition to the refractory state merits consideration. A full analysis of the dependence of intermediate exchange on the rate constants of the acto-S1 scheme is given and the errors arising from other methods of analysis are discussed. The rate of oxygen exchange was measured as 10 s-1 (23 degrees C) a value comparable with but slightly lower than the rate of reversal of the ATP cleavage step.
The apparent second-order rate constant, ka-2, of actin binding to a myosin-ATP state (M*.ATP) and releasing ATP to the medium has been determined by two methods. The first was the measurement of the amount of ATP released when actin was added to the intermediate state, M*.ATP; the second was the measurement of oxygen exchange between  ATP and HOH. A quantitative treatment of ATP in equilibrium HOH exchange is given to allow extraction of elementary rate constants from the data. Agreement between the two methods was good and at low ionic strength and 23 degrees C, ka-2 is 6 X 10(5) M-1 s-1 which is about one-third the value of the apparent second-order rate constant, ka4, of actin binding to the myosin product state (M**.ADP.Pi). The determination of ka-2 allows a lower limit of 6 s-1 to be placed upon the first-order rate of ATP release from AM.ATP. This is to be compared with a value of less than or equal to   15 X 10(-4) s-1 for the equivalent steps of the myosin scheme; thus actin enhances the rate by a factor of 4 X 10(4) or more. A greater proportion of the bound ATP is released to the medium as ATP with increasing actin concentration. This reflects the contribution to rate limitation at saturating actin concentration of steps between myosin states dissociated from actin.
The effect of ionic strength, temperature, and divalent cations on the association of myosin with actin was determined in the ultracentrifuge using scanning absorption optics. The association constant (Ka) for the binding of heavy meromyosin (HmM) to F-actin was 1 X 10(7) M-1 at 20 degrees C, in 0.10 M KCl, 0.01 M imidazole (pH 7.0), 5 MM potassium phosphate, 1 mM MgCl2, and 0.3 mM ethylene glycol bis(beta-aminoethyl ether)-N,N'-tetraacetic acid. Ka was the same for HMM prepared by trypsin or chymotrypsin. The affinity of subfragment 1 (S1) for actin under the same ionic conditions was 3 X 10(6) M- Varying the preparative procedure for S1 had little effect on Ka. The small difference in binding energy between HMM and S1 suggests that either only one head can bind strongly to actin at a time or that free energy is lost during the sterically unfavorable attachment of the two heads to actin.
We varied the molar ratio of added lanthanide ion to skeletal muscle actin (M3+/A) and observed their effects on the change in reduced viscosity (Nred) in the presence of polymerizing quantities of salt (0.1 M KC1). Once the concentration of the lanthanide ion exceeds the concentration of the nucleotide present (0.2 mM ATP), we noted that with M3+/A ratios up to 4: (a) there was a sharp peak in the observed Nred above the level achieved by control F-actin; (b) the magnitude of (a) was shown to be a function of the initial G-actin concentration. With an M3+/A ratio of greater than 4 we observed: (i) a sharp fall in the observed Nred; (ii) the formation of an insoluble aggregate of actin; (iii) the formation of (ii) was completely reversed by removal of the M3+; (iv) a complete inhibition of the ATP hydrolysis which always accompanies the G- to F-actin transition; (v) the number of mol of M3+ required to completely inhibit the rise in Nred (above the viscosity of G-actin) was a function of the ionic radii of the 11 lanthanide ions tested; and (vi) the effects described in (i) were not mimicked when the initial protein was in the F form. In the absence of added KCI, divalent cations (e.g. Mg2+) polymerize G-actin but this effect is not mimicked by the addition of the lanthanide ions. However, under these conditions the lanthanide ions cause the formation of an insoluble aggregate of actin. We conclude that with greater than 4 mol of lanthanide ions, G-actin aggregates in a form which contains little or no F-actin and that the lanthanide ion-induced aggregates are therefore different from the Mg2+-induced F-actin paracrystals.
The presence of anions of phosphate (Pi), pyrophosphate (PPi), adenine nucleotides and sulfate greatly enhanced the production of superoxide radical (-O-2) by isolated guinea-pig macrophages. These anions, however, failed to enhance the production of -O-2 by the xanthine oxidase system, suggesting that they serve only as activators of -O-2 generating enzyme(s) located on the macrophage cell membrane. Many other common anions  were ineffective in the macrophage system. In the presence of concentrations of Pi, PPi, adenine-5'-triphosphate (ATP) reported to be in the synovial fluid, -O-2 was produced efficiently and was inhibited by diclofenac sodium. These anions induced rat paw edema, maintained the swelling at least up to 6 h. The edema was suppressed partially by repeated injection of superoxide dismutase (SOD). High doses of sodium chloride and nitrate failed to maintain the swelling.
Studies on the effect of a series of alpha, omega-diadenosine 5'-polyphosphate (ApnA; n = 2 to 6) on carbamyl phosphate synthetase showed that only Ap5A is an effective inhibitor. Ap5A also inhibits two partial reactions catalyzed by the enzyme: bicarbonate-dependent ATPase and ATP synthesis from carbamyl phosphate and ADP. The data indicate that Ap5A binds to the enzyme sites that interact with ATP. Of a variety of ATP-utilizing enzymes (kinases, hydrolases, synthetases), only adenylate kinase (Leinhard, G. E, and Secemski, I. I. (1973) J. Biol. Chem. 248, 1121--1123) and carbamyl phosphate synthetase are inhibited by Ap5A. The present findings provide strong evidence that carbamyl phosphate synthetase has two separate binding sites for ATP in which the gamma-phosphate moeities of ATP are bound in close proximity to the bicarbonate binding site of the enzyme.
The ratio of adenylic nucleotides, activity of adenylatekinase and ATPase were studied in the liver subcellular fractions and in tumours of rats with cancerogenesis induced by diethylnitrozamine and p-dimethylaminoazobenzene. The adenylatekinase activity increases in the liver hyaloplasm of rats with tumours and in the tissue of the tumours themselves, the activity of ATPase is unchanged. An increase in the adenylatekinase activity in hyaloplasm is accompanied by a decrease in the level of ATP with the absence of changes in ADP and AMP, that results in a drop "of the adenylate energy charge" value (Atkinson reflecting the balance of adenyl nucleotides in a cell.
Adenosine depressed norepinephrine contractions of dogs' saphenous vein strips in both the presence and the absence of Ca2+ and after inhibition of calcium influx by verapamil. It antagonized noncompetitively contractions induced by Ca2+ in depolarized strips after alpha-adrenergic blockade. Contractions obtained with acetylcholine were also depressed by adenosine. This depression was not accompanied by an increase in cAMP or a decrease in the elevated cGMP level. Thus the depression of the smooth muscle cell reactivity still occurs in the absence of calcium influx and is not mediated by the cyclic 3',5'-nucleotide system. Adenosine diphosphate and triphosphate, but not adenosine (10(-6) to 10(-4) M), increased the basal tension of resting saphenous strips. This was prevented by removal of calcium from the bath. In contracted strips, lower concentrations of both nucleotides (10(-6) to 10(-5) M) caused relaxation whereas with high concentrations (10(-4) to 10(-3) M) further contraction occurred. Thus, unlike adenosine, the adenine nucleotides facilitate calcium influx.
The authors report the results of separate determination of the concentration of free adenine nucleotides (ATP, ADP, AMP) in tumors, intact animals liver, and tumor-bearing animals liver. In Zajdela ascites hepatoma, ascites tumor NKly and solid lymphosarcoma, solid hepatomas 46 and 22 A the amount of ATP and ADP was found to be markedly reduced compared with their content in the liver. The ratio ATP/ADP is increased in ascites cells of tumor NKly, Zaidela hepatoma and lymphosarcoma and is decreased in solid hepatoma 46 and 22 A. Cell energy potential, calculated on the basis of ATP ratio to a sum of adenine-nucleotides, is also increased in ascites cells of tumor NKly, Zaidela hepatoma and is diminished or remains unchanged in hepatoma 46 or 22A. Cell energy charge is increased in tumor NKly, Zajdela hepatoma, lymphosarcoma and is decreased in solid hepatoma 46 and 22A.
A mathematical model is proposed to describe the behavior of the pyruvate metabolic reactions, Krebs cycle and oxidative phosphorylation over a wide range of changes in the pyruvate influx rate and the activities of ATPase and NADH-reoxidating dehydrogenase. The role of adenine and pyridine nucleotides in various allosteric regulations of the Krebs cycle enzymes is discussed. The accumulation of ATP and NADH has been shown to proceed in definite succession, which makes the allosteric regulation of the Krebs cycle enzymes successive too. First "works" the inhibition by ATP, then by NADH. It has been shown that the properties of the model are in qualitative agreement with the experimental data (Garber A, Hanson R. [1]) on pyruvate oxidation by mitochondria from guinea pig liver, when allosteric regulation of isocitrate dehydrogenase by adenine nucleotides is taken into account.
The action of the adenyl compounds adenosine triphosphate (ATP), adenosine diphosphate (ADP), adenosine monophosphate (AMP) and adenosine was studied on the human blister base preparation. All 4 adenyl compounds produced pain which was slow in onset and not maintained. The threshold concentration for pain was of the order of 1-3 micron. The slopes of log concentration:pain intensity plots were relatively shallow and for moderate to severe pain a 100-fold increase of the threshold concentration was required. The adenyl compounds resembled 5-hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin with respect to onset and duration of action but were less potent. On the other hand, for threshold effects they were more potent than acetylcholine or potassium. Evidence was found for an interaction of adenyl compounds with 5-hydroxytryptamine but not with potassium, acetylcholine or bradykinin. Cyclic adenosine 3',5'-monophosphate or the chelation of extracellular calcium or magnesium were shown not to be involved in the algogenic action of adenyl compounds and the action of adenyl compounds on the rabbit isolated jejunum too was found to be unrelated to their algogenic action on the human blister base preparation.
Possibility of spin label studies as a method of investigation of different molecular associations is considered with adenosine, adenosine-5'-mono, di- and triphosphate as examples. The proposed method is based on dependence of the parameters of spin-labelled derivatives ESR-spectra on concentration of corresponding unlabelled compounds. Being highly sensitive the method takes the advantage of obtaining not only thermodynamic characteristics of association but dynamic parameters of molecular mobility of the associates as well. It is shown by this method that base-phosphate interaction participates in nucleotide association, together with the stacking interaction.
Simultaneous measurements of the mitochondrial [NAD+]/[NADH], the cytoplasmic [ATP]/[ADP] x [Pi], and the respiratory rate were carried out in suspensions of cultured kidney cells in a range of defined oxygen tensions. The results show that as the extracellular oxygen concentration falls there is a decrease in the respiratory rate, which is accompanied by a decrease in the [ATP]/[ADP] and a progressive reduction of cytochrome c. Even at low O2 tensions the mitochondrial respiratory chain between the NAD couple and cytochrome c remains at near equilibrium with the ATP synthesizing reactions. It is concluded that limited oxygen supply affects cellular metabolism at much higher concentrations than the P50 value for the oxygen dependence of respiration, but the respiratory rate remains relatively unchanged due to compensatory changes in the [ATP]/[ADP] X [Pi] and progressive reduction of cytochrome c. These metabolic changes may form a basis for the phenomenon of tissue oxygen sensing at near physiological oxygen tensions.
Addition of cyclic-AMP (c-AMP) to Streptomyces griseus fermentations inhibited candicidin formation. In a phosphate-free resting cell system, c-AMP inhibited net candicidin formation and incorporation of labeled propionate and p-aminobenzoic acid into the antibiotic but did not inhibit protein synthesis. All nucleotides tested, regardless of the position of the phosphate ester, were effective inhibitors; nucleosides and free bases were not. Inhibition occurred whether the nucleotide was added early or late. The results indicate that inhibition of antibiotic formation by exogenous nucleotides, including cyclic nucleotides, is similar to the effect produced by inorganic phosphate.
To study the cellular basis for specific antigen-induced leukocyte adherence inhibition, enriched populations of B cells, T cells, and monocytes were prepared by a two-stage adherence separation procedure from spleen cells of normal C57BL/6J mice and mice bearing progressively growing MCA-38 tumors. The reactor cell undergoing specific antigen-induced adherence inhibition was identified as a monocyte (esterase positive, did not respond to mitogens, and did not bear Thy   12 antigen or surface immunoglobulin). Furthermore, an enriched population of MCA-38 sensitized B cells could program normal monocytes to undergo specific antigen-induced adherence inhibition. This programming could be abolished by pretreatment of the MCA-38 sensitized B cells with anti-immunoglobulin and complement (indirect cytotoxicity method). In contrast, enriched populations of MCA-38 sensitized T cells could not program normal nylon wool adherent cells to undergo antigen-specific adherence inhibition; and anti-Thy   12 serum and complement had no effect on specific antigen-induced adherence inhibition. Thus, in this murine tumor model, leukocyte adherence inhibition appears to be due to the programming of monocytes by sensitized B cells.
The possible correlation of hyperamylasemia and prostatic disease was investigated in patients with benign prostatic hyperplasia, adenocarcinoma of the prostate, and in patients without clinical evidence of prostatic lesion. Our results indicate that prostatic lesions whether benign or malignant are not associated with either elevation of serum amylase or abnormal isozyme zymograms.
Extrahepatic biliary obstruction can be caused by cancer metastatic from the colon to the lymph nodes adjacent to the bile duct. This report details our experience with eight such cases treated at the Massachusetts General Hospital in the last seven years. The interval between resection of the primary tumor and appearance of jaundice averaged 13 months. The location of the obstruction, preferably defined preoperatively by cholangiography, was low on the common duct in three cases and high in the porta hepatis in five. Relief of biliary obstruction was accomplished by biliary-enteric bypass (four cases), internal biliary stenting by permanent indwelling tube (two cases), or by portal irradiation (two cases). In addition to palliating the symptoms of obstructive jaundice, the period of comfortable survival appears to have been extended: the bypassed patients lived 13-38 months. Erosion of tumor into the duodenum, with resulting gastrointestinal hemorrhage, was an additional problem in three patients. Our overall experience illustrates the value of distinguishing this subgroup of patients from the larger number whose jaundice results from extensive liver metastases, and of treating aggressively those with extrahepatic biliary obstruction.
The ability of dietary fibre to prevent colon cancer was tested in rats injected with 1,2-dimethylhydrazine (D.M.H.), a substance which induces cancer of the colon. 60 rats were fed the same formula solid diet but allocated three different amounts of dietary fibre--20 were given 4.8% w/w crude fibre, 20 were given 20% w/w bran, and 20 received no fibre. Half of the animals in each fibre group received a course of subcutaneous D.M.H. and half were given subcutaneous saline. After a year's observation, there was no significant difference in the incidence of, or mortality from, colonic carcinoma between the D.M.H.-treated groups.
The extracts of human prostatic tissue specimens contain oncornavirus-like reverse transcriptase activity. This activity was isolated by banding the tissue extract in an equilibrium sucrose density gradient followed by phosphocellulose chromatography of the lysate of the material banding at a density of   114--  120 g/cc. It was characterised by its utilisation of poly (Cm) as a template and its inhibition by selective inhibitors of viral reverse transcriptase. Human prostatic tissues of three histo-pathologic types--normal, hyperplastic and adenocarcinoma--were examined. One out of four normal, five out of six hyperplastic, and two out of two adenocarcinoma specimens displayed virus-like reverse transcriptase activity.
Thirty-eight patients with primary adenocarcinoma arising at the junction of the right, left, and common hepatic biliary ducts were seen at the Mayo Clinic, Rochester, Minn, between 1950 and 1976. Prompt and lasting relief of jaundice and cholangitis occurred in four patients undergoing resection of the tumor combined with left hepatic lobectomy, and their mean survival was 33 months. Relief of symptoms was only temporary in 26 patients treated with drainage of the biliary tree, and their mean survival was only ten months. Eight patients undergoing exploration only had no relief of symptoms, and none survived beyond four months. We conclude that resection of these tumors in selected patients gives good palliation and offers the chance of long-term cure. If resection is not possible, biliary decompression results in satisfactory palliation, whereas exploration only does not.
Bronchial angiography was performed in 17 patients with advanced non-oat cell bronchogenic carcinoma. The patients were treated 1 to 5 times with infusions of 10 mg of mitomycin-C (MMC) into the tumor-feeding bronchial artery. All but 2 patients received in addition small doses of vincristine (intravenously) and bleomycin (intramuscularly) or only bleomycin to potentiate the effect of MMC. No major side effects occurred and the systemic toxicity was insignificant. An objective tumor reponse was encountered in 11/17 patients. Intraarterial chemotherapy is strictly local and therefore effective especially in patients with limited or locally advanced disease. In patients with more extensive disease an adjunctive therapy of a more regional or systemic modality must be given.
Syngeneic  mice were immunized with sublethal viable cells of a spontaneous mammary adenocarcinoma S3W. The serum was tested by complement-dependent cytotoxicity against in vitro-cultured S3W cells and a spectrum of controls. S3W cells were found to react with at least four different kinds of antibodies in the serum. One antigen was present on several leukemia cell lines. A second cross-reactive antigen was detected on polyoma virus-induced tumors. A third was demonstrated on other mammary carcinoma lines and in a sarcoma of C3H origin. Following the removal of all three antibodies by absorption with the appropriate cross-reactive target cells, a fourth antibody remained that gave a strong cytotoxic reaction with S3W but with no other target line tested.
A modification of surgical intervention for cancer of the pancreatoduodenal zone organs aimed at the creation of a biliferous anastomosis and gastroenteroanastomosis at a time was carried out upon 26 patients. In 7 patients this was added by a temporary external bile drainage with a "plug" of interanastomotic intestinal loop. The suggested method of the simultaneous formation of biliodigestive and gastrointestinal anastomoses is functionally beneficial, easy to be carried out and favours the prophylaxis of postoperative complications.
The present investigation was undertaken to determine whether antitumor antibodies are produced by A strain mice during the growth of a transplantable mammary adenocarcinoma (A-10). The antibody response was monitored by a sensitive radioimmunoassay which can detect 1 ng of antibody. No evidence of a humoral antitumor response was observed in animals given i.p. or s.c. injections of A-10 ascites cells. Control experiments showed that a humoral response was detectable 1 week after the inoculation of an allogeneic tumor. Immunoglobulin binds nonspecifically to cells via an Fc portion of the immunoglobulin molecule, and this was seen with a tumor bearer serum pool and with immunoglobulin preparations eluted from A-10 ascites cells. No specific antitumor antibody was found in these sources. The A strain mice could not be immunized to reject a challenge of live A-10 cells with mitomycin C-treated A-10 cells, with neuraminidase-treated A-10 cells, or with A-10 membrane preparations. It was concluded that the A-10 tumor is not immunogenic in its host of origin.
